<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20100820112431.txt.gz
TIME:20100820112431
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
_________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
August 20, 2010
Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
_________________________
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(845) 369-4500
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On August 20, 2010, The Dress Barn, Inc., a Connecticut corporation ("dressbarn"), Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation and wholly owned subsidiary of dressbarn ("Ascena"), and DB Merger Corp., a Connecticut corporation and wholly owned subsidiary of Ascena ("MergerCo"), entered into an Agreement and Plan of Reorganization (the "Reorganization Agreement"), that provides for the merger (the "Merger") of dressbarn with MergerCo, with dressbarn surviving the Merger as a wholly owned subsidiary of Ascena, and the conversion of each share of common stock, par value $0.05 per share ("dressbarn Common Stock"), of dressbarn, issued and outstanding immediately prior to the effective time of the Merger, into one duly issued, fully paid and nonassessable share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share ("Ascena Common Stock"), of Ascena. In addition, each outstanding option to purchase or other right to acquire shares of dressbarn Common Stock would automatically convert into an option to purchase or right to acquire, upon the same terms and conditions, an identical number of shares of Ascena Common Stock. Pursuant to the Reorganization Agreement, immediately following the Merger, dressbarn would distribute the stock of its subsidiaries, Maurices Incorporated, a Delaware corporation ("maurices"), and Tween Brands, Inc., a Delaware corporation, which operates the Justice brand ("Tween Brands"), to Ascena (the Merger and such distribution, collectively, the "Reorganization"). As a result of the Reorganization, Ascena would own dressbarn, maurices and Tween Brands as sister subsidiaries.
 
Upon completion of the Reorganization, Ascena, a Delaware corporation, would, in effect, replace dressbarn, a Connecticut corporation, as the publicly held corporation traded on the NASDAQ Global Select Market under the symbol "ASNA", and the holders of dressbarn Common Stock would hold the same number of shares and same ownership percentage of Ascena after the Reorganization as they held of dressbarn immediately prior to the Reorganization.
 
The directors and executive officers of Ascena immediately following the Reorganization would be the same individuals who were directors and executive officers, respectively, of dressbarn immediately prior to the Reorganization.
 
The boards of directors of dressbarn, Ascena and MergerCo have unanimously approved the Reorganization Agreement and the transactions contemplated thereby. The Reorganization Agreement is subject to specified conditions, including approval by dressbarn's shareholders at dressbarn's 2010 Annual Meeting of Shareholders (the "Annual Meeting"), which is currently scheduled for December 8, 2010. If approved by dressbarn's shareholders at the Annual Meeting and the other conditions set forth in the Reorganization Agreement are satisfied, it is currently expected that the Reorganization would be completed on or about January 1, 2011.
 
The Reorganization Agreement may be terminated and the transactions contemplated thereby may be abandoned at any time prior to the effective time of the merger by action of the board of directors of dressbarn if it should determine that for any reason the completion of the transactions provided for therein would be inadvisable or not in the best interest of dressbarn or its shareholders.
 
The Reorganization is intended to be tax-free for dressbarn and its shareholders for U.S. federal income tax purposes.
 
Upon completion of the Reorganization, Ascena Common Stock would be deemed to be registered under Section 12(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, pursuant to Rule 12g-3(a) promulgated thereunder. For purposes of Rule 12g-3(a), Ascena would be the successor issuer to dressbarn.
 
The foregoing description of the Reorganization Agreement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Reorganization Agreement, which is attached hereto as Exhibit 2.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Additional Information and Where to Find It
 
The Dress Barn, Inc. and Ascena Retail Group, Inc. have filed a registration statement that includes a preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant documents in connection with the proposed Reorganization. DRESSBARN SHAREHOLDERS ARE URGED TO READ CAREFULLY THESE DOCUMENTS AND THE
 
 
 
 
DEFINITIVE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS, WHEN FILED AND MAILED, BECAUSE THEY CONTAIN AND WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROPOSED REORGANIZATION. Investors may obtain a free copy of the preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and other filings containing information about dressbarn, Ascena and the proposed Reorganization, from the SEC at the SEC's website at
http://www.sec.gov
. In addition, copies of the preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and other filings containing information about dressbarn, Ascena and the proposed Reorganization can be obtained without charge by directing a request to The Dress Barn, Inc., 30 Dunnigan Drive, Suffern, NY 10901 Attention: Investor Relations Department (telephone: (845) 369-4600) or accessing them on dressbarn's corporate web site at
www.dressbarn.com
.
 
dressbarn, its directors, executive officers, certain other members of management and employees may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies from the shareholders of dressbarn in favor of the proposed Reorganization. Additional information regarding the interests of potential participants in the proxy solicitation is included in the preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and will be included in the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant documents that The Dress Barn, Inc. and Ascena Retail Group, Inc. have filed and intend to file with the SEC in connection with the Annual Meeting.
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On August 20, 2010, dressbarn issued a press release relating to the Reorganization. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
On August 20, 2010, dressbarn issued an internal announcement to its employees relating to the Reorganization. A copy of the internal announcement is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
              
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 2.1
This AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF REORGANIZATION (this ""), dated as of August 20, 2010, is among The Dress Barn, Inc., a Connecticut corporation (the ""), Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation and a direct, wholly owned subsidiary of the Company (""), and DB Merger Corp, a Connecticut corporation and a direct, wholly owned subsidiary of HoldingCo ("").
Agreement
Company
HoldingCo
MergerCo
WHEREAS, as of the date hereof, the authorized capital stock of the Company consists of (i) 165,000,000 shares of common stock, par value $0.05 per share (""), of which approximately 78,542,934 shares are issued and outstanding, approximately 6,910,747 shares are reserved for issuance under the Company's Plans (as defined below) and upon exercise of outstanding Company Awards (as hereinafter defined) and no shares are held in treasury, and (ii) 100,000 shares of preferred stock, par value $0.05 per share (""), of which none is outstanding;
Company Common Stock
Company Preferred Stock
WHEREAS, as of the date hereof, the authorized capital stock of HoldingCo consists of (i) 375,000,000 shares of common stock, par value $0.01 per share (""), of which 100 shares are issued and outstanding and no shares are held in treasury, and (ii) 1,000,000 shares of preferred stock, par value $0.01 per share (""), of which none is outstanding;
HoldingCo Common Stock
HoldingCo Preferred Stock
WHEREAS, as of the date hereof, all of the issued and outstanding common stock of MergerCo ("") is held by HoldingCo;
MergerCo Common Stock
WHEREAS, HoldingCo and MergerCo are newly formed entities organized for the purpose of participating in the transactions herein contemplated;
WHEREAS, the Board of Directors of each of the Company, HoldingCo and MergerCo have unanimously determined that it is advisable and in the best interests of their respective securityholders to reorganize to create a new holding company structure by merging the Company with MergerCo with the Company being the surviving entity (sometimes hereinafter referred to as the ""), and converting each outstanding share of Company Common Stock into one share of HoldingCo Common Stock, all in accordance with the terms of this Agreement;
Surviving Company
WHEREAS, the Board of Directors of the Company has unanimously determined that it is advisable and in the best interests of its shareholders to reorganize the Company's operations, such that the public company owned by its shareholders is incorporated in the State of Delaware and, accordingly, HoldingCo has been incorporated in the State of Delaware;
WHEREAS, the Boards of Directors of each of HoldingCo, the Company and MergerCo and the sole shareholder of MergerCo have approved this Agreement and the merger of the Company with MergerCo upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement (the "");
Merger
WHEREAS, the Boards of Directors of each of the Company and MergerCo have declared advisable this Agreement and the Merger upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, and the Boards of Directors of each of the Company and MergerCo have unanimously determined to recommend to their respective shareholders the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger, subject to the terms and conditions hereof and in accordance with the provisions of the Connecticut Business Corporation Act (the "");
CBCA
WHEREAS, the parties intend, by executing this Agreement, to adopt a plan of reorganization within the meaning of Section 368 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the ""), and to cause the Merger to qualify as a reorganization under the provisions of Section 368(a) of the Code, as well as a transaction to which Section 351(a) of the Code applies; and
Code
WHEREAS, promptly following the Effective Time (as defined below), HoldingCo plans to take, or cause its direct and indirect wholly owned subsidiaries to take, additional actions (the
"") to enable HoldingCo to achieve certain benefits sought by the Boards of Directors of the Company, HoldingCo and MergerCo in authorizing the Merger.
Subsequent Actions
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the covenants and agreements contained in this Agreement, and intending to be legally bound hereby, the Company, HoldingCo and MergerCo hereby agree as follows:
1.1 . In accordance with Section 33-815 of the CBCA, and subject to and upon the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Company shall, at the Effective Time (as defined below), be merged with MergerCo, the separate corporate existence of MergerCo shall cease and the Company shall continue as the Surviving Company. At the Effective Time, the effect of the Merger shall be as provided in Section 33-820 of the CBCA.
The Merger
1.2 . The Merger shall become effective upon the filing of a Certificate of Merger with the Secretary of the State of the State of Connecticut or a later date specified therein (the ""). It is currently anticipated by the parties that the Effective Time will be on or about January 1, 2011.
Effective Time
Effective Time
1.3 .
Organizational Documents of the Surviving Company
1.3.1 From and after the Effective Time, the amended and restated certificate of incorporation of the Company, as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time, shall continue in full force and effect as the certificate of incorporation of the Surviving Company until thereafter amended as provided therein or by applicable law.
1.3.2 From and after the Effective Time, the amended and restated bylaws of the Company, as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time, shall continue in full force and effect as the bylaws of the Surviving Company (the "") until thereafter amended as provided therein or by applicable law.
Surviving Company Bylaws
1.4 . The directors of MergerCo immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the initial directors of the Surviving Company and will hold office from the Effective Time until their successors are duly elected or appointed and qualified in the manner provided in the Surviving Company Bylaws or as otherwise provided by law.
Directors
1.5 . The officers of MergerCo immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the initial officers of the Surviving Company and will hold office from the Effective Time until their successors are duly elected or appointed and qualified in the manner provided in the Surviving Company Bylaws or as otherwise provided by law.
Officers
1.6 . Prior to the Effective Time, the Company in its capacity as the sole stockholder of HoldingCo, agrees to take or cause to be taken all such actions as are necessary to cause those persons serving as the directors and executive officers of the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time to be elected or appointed as the directors and executive officers of HoldingCo, each such person to have the same office(s) with HoldingCo (and the same committee memberships in the case of directors) as he or she held with the Company, with the directors serving in the same class that they serve with the Company to serve until the earlier of the next meeting of the HoldingCo stockholders at which an election of directors of such class is held and until their successors are elected or appointed (or their earlier death, disability or retirement).
Directors and Officers of HoldingCo
1.7 . Subject to the terms of this Agreement, the parties hereto shall take all such reasonable and lawful action as may be necessary or appropriate in order to effectuate the Merger and to comply with the requirements of the CBCA. If, at any time after the Effective Time, the Surviving Company shall consider or be advised that any deeds, bills of sale, assignments, assurances or any other actions or things are necessary or desirable to vest, perfect or confirm, of record or otherwise, in the Surviving Company its right, title or interest in, to or under any of the rights, properties or assets of either of MergerCo or the Company acquired or to be acquired by the
Additional Actions
Surviving Company as a result of, or in connection with, the Merger or otherwise to carry out this Agreement, the officers of the Surviving Company shall be authorized to execute and deliver, in the name and on behalf of each of MergerCo and the Company, all such deeds, bills of sale, assignments and assurances and to take and do, in the name and on behalf of each of MergerCo and the Company or otherwise, all such other actions and things as may be necessary or desirable to vest, perfect or confirm any and all right, title and interest in, to and under such rights, properties or assets in the Surviving Company or otherwise to carry out this Agreement.
1.8 . At the Effective Time, by virtue of the Merger and without any action on the part of HoldingCo, MergerCo, the Company or the holder of any of the following securities:
Conversion of Securities
1.8.1 Each share of Company Common Stock issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than any shares held in treasury, which shall be automatically cancelled and retired without the payment of any consideration therefor) shall be converted into one duly issued, fully paid and nonassessable share of HoldingCo Common Stock (the "").
Merger Consideration
1.8.2 The MergerCo common stock held by HoldingCo will automatically be converted into, and thereafter represent, 100% of the common stock of the Surviving Company.
1.8.3 Each share of HoldingCo Common Stock owned by the Company immediately prior to the Merger shall automatically be cancelled and retired and shall cease to exist.
1.8.4 From and after the Effective Time, holders of certificates formerly evidencing Company Common Stock shall cease to have any rights as shareholders of the Company, except as provided by law; , that such holders shall have the rights set forth in Section 1.9 herein.
provided,
however
1.8.5 In accordance with Section 33-856 of the CBCA, no appraisal rights shall be available to holders of Company Common Stock in connection with the Merger.
1.9 . At the Effective Time, each outstanding share of Company Common Stock (other than any shares of Company Common Stock to be cancelled in accordance with Section 1.8) shall automatically represent the same number of shares of HoldingCo Common Stock without any further act or deed by the shareholders of the Company and record of such ownership shall be kept in uncertificated, book entry form by HoldingCo's transfer agent. Until thereafter surrendered for transfer or exchange in the ordinary course, each outstanding certificate that, immediately prior to the Effective Time, evidenced Company Common Stock shall, from and after the Effective Time, be deemed and treated for all corporate purposes to evidence the ownership of the same number of shares of HoldingCo Common Stock.
No Surrender of Certificates; Direct Registration of HoldingCo Common Stock
1.10 . At the Effective Time, the stock transfer books of the Company shall be closed and thereafter shall be no further registration of transfers of shares of Company Common Stock theretofore outstanding on the records of the Company. From and after the Effective Time, the holders of certificates representing shares of Company Common Stock outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall cease to have any rights with respect to such shares of Company Common Stock except as otherwise provided in this Agreement or by law. On or after the Effective Time, any certificates presented to the exchange agent or HoldingCo for any reason shall solely represent the right to receive the Merger Consideration issuable in respect of the shares of Company Common Stock formerly represented by such certificates without any interest thereon.
Stock Transfer Books
1.11 . This Agreement is intended to constitute a "plan of reorganization" within the meaning of Treasury Regulations Section 1.368-2(g). Each party hereto shall use its commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Merger to qualify, and will not knowingly take any actions or cause any actions to be taken which could reasonably be expected to prevent the Merger from qualifying, as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code, as well as a transaction to which Section 351(a) of the Code applies.
Plan of Reorganization
1.12 . It is the intent of the parties hereto that HoldingCo be deemed a "successor issuer" of the Company in accordance with Rule 12g-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and Rule 414 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. At or after the Effective Time, HoldingCo shall file (i) an appropriate report on Form 8-K describing the Merger and (ii) appropriate pre-effective and/or post-effective amendments, as applicable, to any Registration Statements of the Company on Form S-8.
Successor Issuer
2.1 . At the Effective Time, all unexercised and unexpired options to purchase Company Common Stock ("") or shares of restricted stock (collectively with Company Options, "") then outstanding under either The Dress Barn, Inc. 2001 Stock Incentive Plan, The Dress Barn, Inc. 1995 Stock Option Plan or The Dress Barn, Inc. 1993 Incentive Stock Option Plan or the other rights to acquire Company Common Stock under The Dress Barn, Inc. 401(k) Savings Plan or The Dress Barn, Inc. 2005 Employee Stock Purchase Plan (collectively, the ""), whether or not then exercisable, will be assumed by HoldingCo. Each Company Award so assumed by HoldingCo under this Agreement will continue to have, and be subject to, the same terms and conditions as set forth in the applicable Company Plan and any agreements thereunder immediately prior to the Effective Time (including, without limitation, the vesting schedule (without acceleration thereof by virtue of the Merger and the transactions contemplated hereby) and per share exercise price), except that each Company Award will be exercisable (or will become exercisable in accordance with its terms) for, or shall be denominated with reference to, that number of shares of HoldingCo Common Stock equal to the number of shares of Company Common Stock that were subject to such Company Award immediately prior to the Effective Time. The conversion of any Company Options that are "incentive stock options" within the meaning of Section 422 of the Code, into options to purchase HoldingCo Common Stock shall be made in a manner consistent with Section 424(a) of the Code so as not to constitute a "modification" of such Company Options within the meaning of Section 424 of the Code.
Assumption of Company Awards
Company Options
Company Awards
Company Plans
2.2 . Effective as of the Effective Time, the Company hereby assigns to HoldingCo, and HoldingCo hereby assumes and agrees to perform, all obligations of the Company pursuant to the Company Plans, each stock option agreement and restricted stock agreement entered into pursuant to the Company Plans, and each outstanding Company Award granted thereunder.
Assignment and Assumption of Agreements
2.3 . On or prior to the Effective Time, HoldingCo will reserve sufficient shares of HoldingCo Common Stock to provide for the issuance of HoldingCo Common Stock upon exercise of the Company Awards outstanding under the Company Plans.
Reservation of Shares
2.4 .
Registration Statement; Proxy/Prospectus
2.4.1 As promptly as practicable after the execution of this Agreement, the Company shall prepare and file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") a proxy statement in preliminary form relating to the Shareholders' Meeting (as hereinafter defined) (together with any amendments thereof or supplements thereto, the "") and HoldingCo shall prepare and file with the SEC a registration statement on Form S-4 (together with all amendments thereto, the "" and the prospectus contained in the Registration Statement together with the Proxy Statement, the ""), in which the Proxy Statement shall be included, in connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "") of the shares of HoldingCo Common Stock to be issued to the shareholders of the Company as the Merger Consideration. Each of HoldingCo and the Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause the Registration Statement to become effective and the Proxy Statement to be cleared by the SEC as promptly as practicable, and, prior to the effective date of Registration Statement, HoldingCo shall take all actions reasonably required under any applicable federal securities laws or state blue sky laws in
SEC
Proxy Statement
Registration Statement
Proxy/Prospectus
Securities Act
connection with the issuance of shares of HoldingCo Common Stock pursuant to the Merger. As promptly as reasonably practicable after the Registration Statement shall have become effective and the Proxy Statement shall have been cleared by the SEC, the Company shall mail or cause to be mailed or otherwise make available in accordance with the Securities Act and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ""), the Proxy/Prospectus to its shareholders; , , that the parties shall consult and cooperate with each other in determining the appropriate time for mailing or otherwise making available to the Company's shareholders the Proxy/Prospectus in light of the date set for the Shareholders' Meeting.
Exchange Act
provided
however
2.5 .
Meeting of Company Shareholders; Board Recommendation
2.5.1 . The Company shall take all action necessary in accordance with the CBCA and its amended and restated certificate of incorporation and amended and restated bylaws to call, hold and convene a meeting of its shareholders to consider the adoption of this Agreement (the "") to be held no less than 10 nor more than 60 days following the distribution of the definitive Proxy/Prospectus to its shareholders. The Company will use its reasonable best efforts to solicit from its shareholders proxies in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and approval of the Merger. The Company may adjourn or postpone the Shareholders' Meeting to the extent necessary to ensure that any necessary supplement or amendment to the Proxy/Prospectus is provided to its shareholders in advance of any vote on this Agreement and the Merger or, if as of the time for which the Shareholders' Meeting is originally scheduled (as set forth in the Proxy/Prospectus) there are insufficient shares of Company Common Stock voting in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and approval of the Merger or represented (either in person or by proxy) to constitute a quorum necessary to conduct the business of such Shareholders' Meeting.
Meeting of Company Shareholders
Shareholders' Meeting
2.6 . Prior to the Effective Time, the Board of Directors of the Company or an appropriate committee of non-employee directors thereof (as such term is defined for purposes of Rule 16b-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act) shall adopt a resolution consistent with the interpretive guidance of the SEC so that the receipt by any officer or director of the Company who is a covered person for purposes of Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act of shares of HoldingCo Common Stock in exchange for shares of Company Common Stock or Company Options pursuant to this Agreement and the Merger is intended to be an exempt transaction pursuant to Section 16b-3 of the Exchange Act. Prior to the Effective Time, the Board of Directors of HoldingCo or an appropriate committee of non-employee directors (as such term is defined for purposes of Rule 16b-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act) shall adopt a resolution consistent with the interpretive guidance of the SEC so that the receipt by any officer or director of the Company or HoldingCo who is a covered person for purposes of Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act of shares of HoldingCo Common Stock or options in exchange for shares of Company Common Stock or Company Options pursuant to this Agreement and the Merger is intended to be an exempt transaction for purposes of Section 16b-3 of the Exchange Act.
Section 16 Matters
2.7 . Promptly following the Effective Time, HoldingCo will, pursuant to appropriate corporate resolutions and such additional documentation as may be required, cause the Surviving Company to distribute all of the issued and outstanding securities of its wholly owned subsidiaries, Maurices Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (""), and Tween Brands, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), to HoldingCo such that each of the Surviving Company, Maurices and Tween Brands shall thereafter be wholly owned, sister subsidiaries of HoldingCo.
Subsequent Actions
Maurices
Tween Brands
3.1 . The obligations of the parties to this Agreement to consummate the Merger and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement shall be subject to fulfillment or waiver by the parties hereto at or prior to the Effective Time of each of the following conditions:
Conditions Precedent
3.1.1 The Registration Statement shall have been declared effective by the SEC under the Securities Act and no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued by the SEC and no proceeding for that purpose shall have been initiated or, to the knowledge of HoldingCo or the Company, threatened by the SEC and not concluded or withdrawn. No similar proceeding with respect to the Proxy Statement shall have been initiated or, to the knowledge of HoldingCo or the Company, threatened by the SEC and not concluded or withdrawn.
3.1.2 This Agreement and the Merger shall have been approved by the requisite vote of the shareholders of the Company in accordance with the CBCA.
3.1.3 The HoldingCo Common Stock to be issued pursuant to the Merger shall have been approved for listing by The NASDAQ Global Select Market ("").
NASDAQ
3.1.4 No order, statute, rule, regulation, executive order, injunction, stay, decree, judgment or restraining order that is in effect shall have been enacted, entered, promulgated or enforced by any court or governmental or regulatory authority or instrumentality that prohibits or makes illegal the consummation of the Merger or the transactions contemplated hereby.
3.1.5 The Boards of Directors of the Company and HoldingCo shall have received a legal opinion of Proskauer Rose LLP in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to them indicating that holders of Company Common Stock will not recognize gain or loss for United States federal income tax purposes as a result of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
4.1 . HoldingCo will use its best efforts to obtain, at or before the Effective Time, confirmation of listing on the NASDAQ of the HoldingCo Common Stock issuable pursuant to the Merger.
Listing of HoldingCo Common Stock
4.2 . The Company and HoldingCo will take or cause to be taken all actions necessary or desirable in order to implement the assumption by HoldingCo pursuant to Section 2.2 of the Company Plans, each stock option agreement or restricted stock agreement entered into pursuant thereto, and each Company Award granted thereunder, all to the extent deemed appropriate by the Company and HoldingCo and permitted under applicable law.
The Plans
4.3 . HoldingCo shall procure insurance or cause the execution of the insurance policies of the Company such that, upon consummation of the Merger, HoldingCo shall have insurance coverage that is substantially identical to the insurance coverage held by the Company immediately prior to the Merger.
Insurance
5.1 . This Agreement may be terminated and the Merger contemplated hereby may be abandoned at any time prior to the Effective Time by action of the Board of Directors of the Company if such Board of Directors should determine that for any reason the completion of the transactions provided for herein would be inadvisable or not in the best interest of the Company or its shareholders. In the event of such termination and abandonment, this Agreement shall become void and neither the Company, HoldingCo nor MergerCo nor their respective stockholders, members, directors or officers shall have any liability with respect to such termination and abandonment.
Termination
5.2 . At any time prior to the Effective Time, this Agreement may, to the extent permitted by the CBCA, be supplemented, amended or modified by the mutual consent of the parties to this Agreement.
Amendment
6.1 . This Agreement shall be governed by and construed and enforced under the laws of the State of Delaware.
Governing Law
6.2 . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which when executed shall be deemed to be an original but all of which shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
6.3 . This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement and supersedes all other agreements and undertakings, both written and oral, among the parties, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Entire Agreement
6.4 . The provisions of this Agreement are severable, and in the event any provision hereof is determined to be invalid or unenforceable, such invalidity or unenforceability shall not in any way affect the validity or enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof.
Severability
6.5 . Nothing contained in this Agreement is intended by the parties hereto to expand the rights and remedies of any person or entity not party hereto against any party hereto as compared to the rights and remedies which such person or entity would have had against any party hereto had the parties hereto not consummated the transactions contemplated hereby.
No Third-Party Beneficiaries
6.6 . Each of the Company and HoldingCo will comply with the recordkeeping and information reporting requirements of the Code that are imposed as a result of the transactions contemplated hereby, and will provide information reporting statements to holders of Company Common Stock at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Code and applicable Treasury Regulations.
Tax Matters
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company, HoldingCo and MergerCo have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the date first written above by their respective officers thereunto duly authorized.
T
HE
D
RESS
B
ARN
, I
NC
.
A
SCENA
R
ETAIL
G
ROUP
, I
NC
.
DB M
ERGER
C
ORP
.

SUFFERN, NY  August 20, 2010 
Dress Barn, Inc.
(NASDAQ - DBRN)
today announced that it will hold its annual meeting of shareholders on December 8, 2010, at 2:00 p.m. local time at its corporate offices in Suffern, New York. At the meeting, Dress Barn shareholders will be asked, among other things, to consider and vote on a proposal to reorganize Dress Barn as a holding company incorporated in Delaware.
In the reorganization, each of Dress Barn, Maurices and Tween Brands, which operates our Justice brand, would become subsidiaries of a new Delaware corporation named Ascena Retail Group, Inc., or Ascena, and Dress Barn shareholders would become stockholders of this new Delaware holding company on a one-for-one basis, holding the same number of shares and same ownership percentage after the reorganization as they held immediately prior to the reorganization. The reorganization generally would be tax-free for Dress Barn shareholders. Shareholders of record on October 8, 2010 will be entitled to attend and vote at the annual meeting on the proposal to approve the reorganization, which is more fully described in the proxy statement/prospectus relating to the meeting.
Upon completion of the reorganization, Ascena would, in effect, replace the present company as the publicly held corporation. Ascena through its subsidiaries would continue to conduct all of the operations currently conducted by Dress Barn and its subsidiaries, and the directors and executive officers of Dress Barn prior to the reorganization would be the same as the directors and executive officers of Ascena following the reorganization. The shares of Ascena common stock are expected to trade on the NASDAQ Global Select Market under the ticker symbol "ASNA."
The Board of Directors and management of Dress Barn believe that implementing the holding company structure would provide the Company with strategic, operational and financing flexibility, and incorporating the new holding company in Delaware would allow the Company to take advantage of the flexibility, predictability and responsiveness that Delaware corporate law provides.
"The proposed change in structure and name should provide an image more closely aligned with our current vision and strategies," President and Chief Executive Officer, David R. Jaffe commented. "In recent years, we've become a fundamentally different company that extends beyond the original
dressbarn
concept and brand. Our vision is to be a family of retail brands each serving a unique customer niche. We expect the holding company structure to enable us to leverage our infrastructure while allowing each brand to focus intently on delivering a great experience to its customer."
If approved at the annual meeting, it is currently expected that the reorganization would take place on or about January 1, 2011.
At the annual meeting, shareholders will also be asked to elect two directors, ratify auditors and approve changes to a Dress Barn incentive plan.
About Dress Barn, Inc.
Dress Barn, Inc.
(NASDAQ - DBRN)
, is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls operating under the
dressbarn
,
maurices
and
Justice
names. The Company operates 2,480 stores.
dressbarn
stores offer casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 833 stores in 47 states.
maurices
stores offer casual and career apparel and accessories at great values to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operate 757 stores in 44 states.
Justice
stores offer trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operate 890 stores in 46 states and Puerto Rico.
For more information, please visit
www.dressbarn.com
,
www.maurices.com
and
www.shopjustice.com
.
Dress Barn Forward-Looking Statement Disclosure
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute "forward-looking statements", within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available on our most recent report on Form 10-K for the year ended July 25, 2009 and Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 24, 2010.
Additional Information
Dress Barn, Inc. and Ascena Retail Group, Inc. have filed a registration statement that includes a preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant documents in connection with the proposed Delaware holding company reorganization. DRESS BARN SHAREHOLDERS ARE URGED TO READ CAREFULLY THESE DOCUMENTS AND THE DEFINITIVE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS, WHEN FILED AND MAILED, BECAUSE THEY CONTAIN AND WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROPOSED DELAWARE HOLDING COMPANY REORGANIZATION. Investors may obtain a free copy of the preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and other filings containing information about Dress Barn, Ascena and the proposed reorganization, from the SEC at the SEC's website at http://www.sec.gov. In addition, copies of the preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and other filings containing
information about Dress Barn, Ascena and the proposed reorganization can be obtained without charge by directing a request to Dress Barn, Inc., 30 Dunnigan Drive, Suffern, NY 10901 Attention: Investor Relations Department (telephone: (845) 369-4600) or accessing them on Dress Barn, Inc.'s corporate Web site at www.dressbarn.com.
Dress Barn, its directors, executive officers, certain other members of management and employees may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies from the shareholders of Dress Barn in favor of the proposed holding company reorganization. Additional information regarding the interests of potential participants in the proxy solicitation is included in the preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and will be included in the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant documents that Dress Barn, Inc. and Ascena Retail Group, Inc. have filed and intend to file with the SEC in connection with the annual meeting of shareholders of Dress Barn, Inc.
This press release is being made pursuant to and in compliance with the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and does not constitute an offer of any securities for sale or a solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, nor shall there be any sale of the securities in any state or jurisdiction in which such an offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to the registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction. Any offer of the securities will be made solely by means of a prospectus included in the registration statement and any prospectus supplement that may be issued in connection with such offering.

Today, we announced our plans to reorganize the company's businesses under a new holding company with a new corporate name: Ascena Retail Group, Inc. ("Ascena"). Assuming we receive shareholder approval in December and certain other conditions are satisfied, the reorganization is expected to be finalized on or about January 1, 2011. At that time, shares of Ascena common stock are expected to trade on the NASDAQ Global Select Market under the ticker symbol "ASNA."
This change will provide a new image for our company  one that is more closely aligned with our current vision and strategies.
The Ascena name was selected for several reasons. First, there's certainly no doubt we have ascended to new heights over the past several years. Today, we are three brands strong, with 2,480 stores and 30,000 associates
.
Each brand is differentiated by its distinct niche, yet we are unified in our quest to continue growing and achieving.
Secondly, the Ascena name reflects the very foundation for which our brands have become known:
empowering women and girls to feel good about themselves
. Since my parents opened our first store in 1962, dressbarn has continued to realize opportunities and find success. I am so proud to look back over the last 50 years and marvel at how the company has and continues to evolve.
In 2005, our acquisition of maurices aligned with our strategic vision. This was a proven business with a small market focus poised for expansion. Since our merger, maurices has more than doubled its number of stores and sales.
We continued to add to our portfolio last year when we acquired Justice, nationally recognized for their focus on the tween girl. Justice's results have proven that their market position and business model are a powerful addition to our portfolio.
These are accomplishments we share. And, although our strategy has been to operate each model independently, we share a common bond: we are all leading the retail field when it comes to providing our customers with the most current fashions at great values and with outstanding service. As an enterprise with three very distinct retail niches, we serve young girls and women from seven to seventy years of age.
What does the future hold? We envision continuing to grow our family of brands. We don't have any particular plans or proposals regarding the nature of what any new additions to the Ascena family might be; however, we would likely look at companies where we could add value as well as serve a specific customer segment. As we grow as an enterprise, each brand will continue to focus intently on its customers; however, each of us will benefit from the shared resources and expertise that we all contribute to one another. We expect to be able to use the holding company structure (
Ascena
) to leverage our infrastructure.
The introduction of Ascena will be yet one more milestone to celebrate in our journey. It is with sincere appreciation that I express my gratitude to you: without your hard work and dedication, none of this would be possible.
I'll be sure to keep you updated on our progress.
David
Dress Barn, Inc. and Ascena Retail Group, Inc. have filed a registration statement that includes a preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant documents in connection with the proposed Delaware holding company reorganization. DRESS BARN SHAREHOLDERS ARE URGED TO READ CAREFULLY THESE DOCUMENTS AND THE DEFINITIVE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS, WHEN FILED AND MAILED, BECAUSE THEY CONTAIN AND WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROPOSED DELAWARE HOLDING COMPANY REORGANIZATION. Investors may obtain a free copy of the preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and other filings containing information about Dress Barn, Ascena and the proposed reorganization, from the SEC at the SEC's website at http://www.sec.gov. In addition, copies of the preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and other filings containing information about Dress Barn, Ascena and the proposed reorganization can be obtained without charge by directing a request to Dress Barn, Inc., 30 Dunnigan Drive, Suffern, NY 10901 Attention: Investor Relations Department (telephone: (845) 369-4600) or accessing them on Dress Barn, Inc.'s corporate Web site at
www.dressbarn.com
.
Dress Barn, its directors, executive officers, certain other members of management and employees may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies from the shareholders of Dress Barn in favor of the proposed holding company reorganization. Additional information regarding the interests of potential participants in the proxy solicitation is included in the preliminary proxy statement/prospectus and will be
included in the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant documents that Dress Barn, Inc. and Ascena Retail Group, Inc. have filed and intend to file with the SEC in connection with the annual meeting of shareholders of Dress Barn, Inc.
This announcement is being made pursuant to and in compliance with the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and does not constitute an offer of any securities for sale or a solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, nor shall there be any sale of the securities in any state or jurisdiction in which such an offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to the registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction. Any offer of the securities will be made solely by means of a prospectus included in the registration statement and any prospectus supplement that may be issued in connection with such offering.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110103100401.txt.gz
TIME:20110103100401
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 2.01 Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets.
On January 1, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Ascena"), completed its previously announced reorganization pursuant to the Agreement and Plan of Reorganization dated as of August 20, 2010 (the "Reorganization Agreement"), by and among Ascena, The Dress Barn, Inc., a Connecticut corporation ("dressbarn"), and DB Merger Corp., a Connecticut corporation ("MergerCo"). The Reorganization Agreement was approved and adopted by dressbarn's shareholders at dressbarn's annual meeting of shareholders, which was held on December 17, 2010, and by dressbarn as the sole stockholder of Ascena.
The Reorganization Agreement provided for the merger (the "Merger") of dressbarn with MergerCo, with dressbarn surviving the Merger as a wholly owned subsidiary of Ascena, and the conversion of each share of common stock, par value $0.05 per share ("dressbarn Common Stock"), of dressbarn, issued and outstanding immediately prior to the effective time of the Merger, into one duly issued, fully paid and nonassessable share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share ("Ascena Common Stock"), of Ascena. In addition, each outstanding option to purchase or other right to acquire shares of dressbarn Common Stock was automatically converted into an option to purchase or right to acquire, upon the same terms and conditions, an identical number of shares of Ascena Common Stock. Pursuant to the Reorganization Agreement, immediately following the Merger, dressbarn distributed the stock of its subsidiaries, Maurices Incorporated, a Delaware corporation ("maurices"), and Tween Brands, Inc., a Delaware corporation, which operates the Justice brand ("Tween Brands"), to Ascena (the Merger and such distribution, collectively, the "Reorganization"). As a result of the Reorganization, Ascena now owns dressbarn, maurices and Tween Brands as sister subsidiaries.
Upon completion of the Reorganization, Ascena, a Delaware corporation, replaced dressbarn, a Connecticut corporation, as the publicly held corporation, and the holders of dressbarn Common Stock now hold the same number of shares and same ownership percentage of Ascena as they held of dressbarn immediately prior to the Reorganization. As of January 3, 2011, shares of Ascena Common Stock commenced trading on the NASDAQ Global Select Market under the symbol "ASNA".
The directors and executive officers of Ascena immediately following the Reorganization are the same individuals who were directors and executive officers, respectively, of dressbarn immediately prior to the Reorganization.
Upon completion of the Reorganization, Ascena Common Stock was deemed to be registered under Section 12(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, pursuant to Rule 12g-3(a) promulgated thereunder. For purposes of Rule 12g-3(a), Ascena is the successor issuer to dressbarn.
The foregoing description of the Reorganization Agreement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Reorganization Agreement, a copy of which was filed as Exhibit 2.1 to each of Ascena's and dressbarn's Current Reports on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 20, 2010.
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Indemnification Agreements
On January 1, 2011, Ascena entered into indemnification agreements (each, an "Indemnification Agreement") with each of members of the board of directors of Ascena, Armand Correia, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, and Gene L. Wexler, Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Assistant Secretary. The Indemnification Agreements supplement the Company's Second Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended, and By-Laws and Delaware law in providing certain indemnification rights to these individuals. The Indemnification Agreements provide, among other things, that Ascena will indemnify these individuals to the fullest extent permitted by Delaware law and to any greater extent that Delaware law may in the future permit, including the advancement of attorneys' fees and other expenses incurred by such individuals in connection with any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or other proceeding, whether of a civil, criminal, administrative, regulatory, legislative or investigative nature, relating to any occurrence or event before or after the date of the Indemnification Agreements, by reason of the fact that such individuals is or were directors or officers of Ascena, subject to certain exclusions and procedures set forth in the Indemnification Agreements.
The foregoing description of the Indemnification Agreements does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the form of Indemnification Agreement, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On January 3, 2011, dressbarn issued a press release relating to the Reorganization. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 3.1
          The undersigned corporation (the "Corporation"), in order to amend its Second Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, hereby certifies as follows:
           The name of the Corporation is
FIRST:
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
           The Corporation hereby amends its Second Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation as follows:
SECOND:
          The first paragraph of Section 4 of the Second Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, relating to the total number of shares of stock for which the Corporation shall have the authority to issue, is hereby amended in its entirety and, as so amended, shall read as follows:
           The written amendment effected herein was authorized by the written consent, setting forth the action so taken, of a majority of all of the outstanding shares entitled to vote thereon pursuant to Sections 228 and 242 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
THIRD:
          , the Corporation has caused this Certificate of Amendment to be executed on its behalf this 3 day of December, 2010.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
rd

Exhibit 10.1
          This Indemnification Agreement (this "") is made as of ___________, 20__ by and between Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), and ______________ (""). This Agreement supersedes and replaces any and all previous Agreements between the Company and Indemnitee covering the subject matter of this Agreement. Certain capitalized terms used herein are defined in Section 2 hereof.
Agreement
Company
Indemnitee
          WHEREAS, highly competent persons have become more reluctant to serve publicly held corporations as directors, officers or in other capacities unless they are provided with adequate protection through insurance and/or adequate indemnification against inordinate risks of claims and actions against them arising out of their service to and activities on behalf of the corporation;
          WHEREAS, the Board of Directors of the Company (the "") has determined that, in order to attract and retain qualified individuals, the Company will attempt to maintain on an ongoing basis, at its sole expense, liability insurance to protect persons serving the Company and its subsidiaries from certain liabilities. Although the furnishing of such insurance has been a customary and widespread practice among United States-based corporations and other business enterprises, the Company believes that, given current market conditions and trends, such insurance may be available to it in the future only at higher premiums and with more exclusions. At the same time, directors, officers and other persons in service to corporations or business enterprises are being increasingly subjected to expensive and time-consuming litigation relating to, among other things, matters that traditionally would have been brought only against the corporation or business enterprise itself;
Board
          WHEREAS, the uncertainties relating to such insurance and to indemnification have increased the difficulty of attracting and retaining such persons;
          WHEREAS, the Board has determined that the increased difficulty in attracting and retaining such persons is detrimental to the best interests of the Company and its stockholders and that the Company should act to assure such persons that there will be increased certainty of such protection in the future;
          WHEREAS, the Bylaws (the "") and Certificate of Incorporation (the "") of the Company require indemnification of the officers and directors of the Company. Indemnitee may also be entitled to indemnification pursuant to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the ""). The Bylaws, Certificate of Incorporation and the DGCL expressly provide that the indemnification provisions set forth therein are not exclusive, and thereby contemplate that contracts may be entered into between the Company and members of the Board, officers and other persons with respect to indemnification;
Bylaws
Certificate of Incorporation
DGCL
          WHEREAS, it is reasonable, prudent and necessary for the Company contractually to obligate itself to indemnify, and to advance expenses on behalf of, such persons to the fullest
extent permitted by applicable law so that they will serve or continue to serve the Company free from undue concern that they will not be so indemnified;
          WHEREAS, this Agreement is a supplement to and in furtherance of the Bylaws, Certificate of Incorporation and any resolutions adopted pursuant thereto, and shall not be deemed a substitute therefor, nor to diminish or abrogate any rights of Indemnitee thereunder; and
          WHEREAS, Indemnitee does not regard the protection available under the Bylaws, Certificate of Incorporation and insurance as adequate in the present circumstances, and may not be willing to serve as an officer or director without adequate protection, and the Company desires Indemnitee to serve in such capacity. Indemnitee is willing to serve, continue to serve and to take on additional service for or on behalf of the Company on the condition that he be so indemnified.
          NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the covenants contained herein, the Company and Indemnitee do hereby covenant and agree as follows:
          Section 1. Indemnitee agrees to serve as a [director][officer] of the Company. Indemnitee may at any time and for any reason resign from such position (subject to any other contractual obligation or any obligation imposed by operation of law), in which event the Company shall have no obligation under this Agreement to continue Indemnitee in such position. This Agreement shall not be deemed an employment contract between the Company (or any of its subsidiaries or any Enterprise) and Indemnitee. Indemnitee specifically acknowledges that Indemnitee's employment with the Company (or any of its subsidiaries or any Enterprise), if any, is at will, and Indemnitee may be discharged at any time for any reason, with or without cause, except as may be otherwise provided in any written employment contract between Indemnitee and the Company (or any of its subsidiaries or any Enterprise), other applicable formal severance policies duly adopted by the Board or, with respect to service as a director or officer of the Company, by the Certificate of Incorporation, the Bylaws and the DGCL. The foregoing notwithstanding, this Agreement shall continue in force after Indemnitee has ceased to serve as a director or officer of the Company, as provided in Section 16 hereof.
Services to the Company.
          Section 2. As used in this Agreement:
Definitions.
                    (a) References to "" shall mean any person who is or was a director, officer or employee of the Company or a subsidiary of the Company or other person authorized by the Company to act for the Company, to include such person serving in such capacity as a director, officer, employee, fiduciary or other official of another corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust or other enterprise at the request of, for the convenience of or to represent the interests of the Company or a subsidiary of the Company.
agent
                    (b) A "" shall be deemed to occur upon the earliest to occur after the date of this Agreement of any of the following events:
Change in Control
                              i. Acquisition of Stock by Third Party. Any Person is or becomes the Beneficial Owner (as defined below), directly or indirectly, of securities of the Company representing 15% or more of the combined voting power of the Company's then outstanding securities unless the change in relative Beneficial Ownership of the Company's securities by any Person results solely from a reduction in the aggregate number of outstanding shares of securities entitled to vote generally in the election of directors;
                              ii. Change in Board of Directors. During any period of two consecutive years (not including any period prior to the execution of this Agreement), individuals who at the beginning of such period constitute the Board, and any new director (other than a director designated by a person who has entered into an agreement with the Company to effect a transaction described in Sections 2(b)(i), 2(b)(iii) or 2(b)(iv)) whose election by the Board or nomination for election by the Company's stockholders was approved by a vote of at least two-thirds of the directors then still in office who either were directors at the beginning of the period or whose election or nomination for election was previously so approved, cease for any reason to constitute at least a majority of the members of the Board;
                              iii. Corporate Transactions. The effective date of a merger or consolidation of the Company with any other entity, other than a merger or consolidation that would result in the voting securities of the Company outstanding immediately prior to such merger or consolidation continuing to represent (either by remaining outstanding or by being converted into voting securities of the surviving entity) more than 51% of the combined voting power of the voting securities of the surviving entity outstanding immediately after such merger or consolidation and with the power to elect at least a majority of the board of directors or other governing body of such surviving entity;
                              iv. Liquidation. The approval by the stockholders of the Company of a complete liquidation of the Company or an agreement for the sale or disposition by the Company of all or substantially all of the Company's assets; and
                              v. Other Events. There occurs any other event of a nature that would be required to be reported in response to Item 6(e) of Schedule 14A of Regulation 14A (or a response to any similar item on any similar schedule or form) promulgated under the Exchange Act, whether or not the Company is then subject to such reporting requirement.
For purposes of this Section 2(b), the following terms shall have the following meanings:
 
                    (c) "" describes the status of a person who is or was a director, trustee, partner, managing member, officer, employee, agent or fiduciary of the Company or of any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership or joint venture, trust or other enterprise which such person is or was serving at the request of the Company.
Corporate Status
                    (d) "" shall mean a director of the Company who is not and was not a party to the Proceeding in respect of which indemnification is sought by Indemnitee.
Disinterested Director
                    (e) "" shall mean the Company and any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise of which Indemnitee is or was serving at the request of the Company as a director, officer, trustee, partner, managing member, employee, agent or fiduciary.
Enterprise
                    (f) "" shall include all reasonable attorneys' fees, retainers, court costs, transcript costs, fees of experts and other professionals, witness fees, travel expenses, duplicating costs, printing and binding costs, telephone charges, postage, delivery service fees, fax transmission charges, secretarial services, any federal, state, local or foreign taxes imposed on Indemnitee as a result of the actual or deemed receipt of any payments under this Agreement, ERISA excise taxes and penalties, and all other disbursements, obligations or expenses of the types customarily incurred in connection with, or as a result of, prosecuting, defending, preparing to prosecute or defend, investigating, being or preparing to be a deponent or witness in or otherwise participating in a Proceeding. Expenses also shall include (i) Expenses incurred in connection with any appeal resulting from any Proceeding, including, without limitation, the premium, security for and other costs relating to any cost bond, supersedeas bond or other appeal bond or its equivalent, (ii) expenses incurred in connection with recovery under any directors' and officers' liability insurance policies maintained by the Company, regardless of whether Indemnitee is ultimately determined to be entitled to such indemnification, advancement or Expenses or insurance recovery, as the case may be, and (iii) for purposes of Section 14(d) only, Expenses incurred by or on behalf of Indemnitee in connection with the interpretation, enforcement or defense of Indemnitee's rights under this Agreement, by litigation or otherwise. The parties agree that for the purposes of any advancement of Expenses for which Indemnitee has made written demand to the Company in accordance with this Agreement, all Expenses included in such demand that are certified by affidavit of Indemnitee's counsel as being reasonable shall be presumed conclusively to be reasonable. Expenses, however, shall not
Expenses
include amounts paid in settlement by Indemnitee or the amount of judgments or fines against Indemnitee.
                    (g) "" shall mean a law firm, or a member of a law firm, that is experienced in matters of corporation law and neither presently is, nor in the past five years has been, retained to represent: (i) the Company or Indemnitee in any matter material to either such party (other than with respect to matters concerning Indemnitee under this Agreement, or of other indemnitees under similar indemnification agreements), or (ii) any other party to the Proceeding giving rise to a claim for indemnification hereunder. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the term "Independent Counsel" shall not include any person who, under the applicable standards of professional conduct then prevailing, would have a conflict of interest in representing either the Company or Indemnitee in an action to determine Indemnitee's rights under this Agreement. The Company agrees to pay the reasonable fees and expenses of the Independent Counsel referred to above and to fully indemnify such counsel against any and all Expenses, claims, liabilities and damages arising out of or relating to this Agreement or its engagement pursuant hereto.
Independent Counsel
                    (h) The term "" shall include any threatened, pending or completed action, suit, claim, counterclaim, cross claim, arbitration, mediation, alternate dispute resolution mechanism, investigation, inquiry, administrative hearing or any other actual, threatened or completed proceeding, whether brought in the right of the Company or otherwise and whether of a civil, criminal, administrative, regulatory, legislative or investigative (formal or informal) nature, including any appeal therefrom, in which Indemnitee was, is or will be involved as a party, potential party, non-party witness or otherwise by reason of the fact that Indemnitee is or was a director or officer of the Company, by reason of any action taken by him (or a failure to take action by him) or of any action (or failure to act) on his part while acting pursuant to his Corporate Status, in each case whether or not serving in such capacity at the time any liability or Expense is incurred for which indemnification, reimbursement or advancement of Expenses can be provided under this Agreement. If Indemnitee believes in good faith that a given situation may lead to or culminate in the institution of a Proceeding, this shall be considered a Proceeding under this paragraph.
Proceeding
                    (i) Reference to "" shall include employee benefit plans; references to "" shall include any excise tax assessed with respect to any employee benefit plan; references to "" shall include any service as a director, officer, employee or agent of the Company that imposes duties on, or involves services by, such director, officer, employee or agent with respect to an employee benefit plan, its participants or beneficiaries; and a person who acted in good faith and in a manner he reasonably believed to be in the best interests of the participants and beneficiaries of an employee benefit plan shall be deemed to have acted in a manner "not opposed to the best interests of the Company" as referred to in this Agreement.
other enterprise
fines
serving at the request of the Company
          Section 3. The Company shall indemnify Indemnitee in accordance with the provisions of this Section 3 if Indemnitee is, or is threatened to be made, a party to or a participant in any Proceeding, other than a Proceeding by or in the
Indemnity in Third-Party Proceedings.
right of the Company to procure a judgment in its favor. Pursuant to this Section 3, Indemnitee shall be indemnified to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law against all Expenses, judgments, liabilities, fines, penalties and amounts paid in settlement (including all interest, assessments and other charges paid or payable in connection with or in respect of such Expenses, judgments, liabilities, fines, penalties and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred by Indemnitee or on his behalf in connection with such Proceeding or any claim, issue or matter therein, if Indemnitee acted in good faith and in a manner he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company and, in the case of a criminal Proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe that his conduct was unlawful. The parties hereto intend that this Agreement, to the fullest extent permitted by law, shall provide for indemnification in excess of that expressly permitted by statute, including, without limitation, any indemnification provided by the Certificate of Incorporation, the Bylaws, vote of its stockholders or disinterested directors or applicable law.
          Section 4. The Company shall indemnify Indemnitee in accordance with the provisions of this Section 4 if Indemnitee is, or is threatened to be made, a party to or a participant in any Proceeding by or in the right of the Company to procure a judgment in its favor. Pursuant to this Section 4, Indemnitee shall be indemnified to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law against all Expenses actually and reasonably incurred by him or on his behalf in connection with such Proceeding or any claim, issue or matter therein, if Indemnitee acted in good faith and in a manner he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company. If applicable law so provides, no indemnification for Expenses shall be made under this Section 4 in respect of any claim, issue or matter as to which Indemnitee shall have been finally adjudged by a court to be liable to the Company, unless and only to the extent that the Delaware Court of Chancery or any court in which the Proceeding was brought shall determine upon application that, despite the adjudication of liability but in view of all the circumstances of the case, Indemnitee is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification.
Indemnity in Proceedings by or in the Right of the Company.
          Section 5. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Agreement, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law and to the extent that Indemnitee is a party to (or a participant in) and is successful, on the merits or otherwise, in any Proceeding or in defense of any claim, issue or matter therein, in whole or in part, the Company shall indemnify Indemnitee against all Expenses actually and reasonably incurred by him or on his behalf in connection therewith. If Indemnitee is not wholly successful in such Proceeding but is successful, on the merits or otherwise, as to one or more but less than all claims, issues or matters in such Proceeding, the Company shall indemnify Indemnitee against all Expenses actually and reasonably incurred by him or on his behalf in connection with or related to each successfully resolved claim, issue or matter to the fullest extent permitted by law. For purposes of this Section and without limitation, the termination of any claim, issue or matter in such a Proceeding by dismissal, with or without prejudice, shall be deemed to be a successful result as to such claim, issue or matter.
Indemnification for Expenses of a Party Who is Wholly or Partly Successful.
          Section 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law and to the extent
Indemnification For Expenses of a Witness.
that Indemnitee is, by reason of his Corporate Status, a witness or otherwise asked to participate in any aspect of a Proceeding to which Indemnitee is not a party, he shall be indemnified against all Expenses actually and reasonably incurred by him or on his behalf in connection therewith.
          Section 7. If Indemnitee is entitled under any provision of this Agreement to indemnification by the Company for some or a portion of Expenses, but not, however, for the total amount thereof, the Company shall nevertheless indemnify Indemnitee for the portion thereof to which Indemnitee is entitled.
Partial Indemnification.
          Section 8.
Additional Indemnification.
                    (a) Notwithstanding any limitation in Sections 3, 4 or 5, the Company shall indemnify Indemnitee to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law if Indemnitee is a party to or threatened to be made a party to or a participant in any Proceeding (including a Proceeding by or in the right of the Company to procure a judgment in its favor) against all Expenses, judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement (including all interest, assessments and other charges paid or payable in connection with or in respect of such Expenses, judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred by or on behalf of Indemnitee in connection with the Proceeding.
                    (b) For purposes of Section 8(a), the meaning of the phrase "" shall include, but not be limited to:
to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law
                              i. to the fullest extent permitted by the provision of the DGCL that authorizes or contemplates additional indemnification by agreement, or the corresponding provision of any amendment to or replacement of the DGCL, and
                              ii. to the fullest extent authorized or permitted by any amendments to or replacements of the DGCL adopted after the date of this Agreement that increase the extent to which a corporation may indemnify its officers and directors.
          Section 9. Notwithstanding any provision in this Agreement, the Company shall not be obligated under this Agreement to make any indemnification payment in connection with any claim made against Indemnitee:
Exclusions.
                    (a) for which payment has actually been made to or on behalf of Indemnitee under any insurance policy or other indemnity provision, except with respect to any excess beyond the amount paid under any insurance policy or other indemnity provision; or
                    (b) for (i) an accounting of profits made from the purchase and sale (or sale and purchase) by Indemnitee of securities of the Company within the meaning of Section 16(b) of the Exchange Act or similar provisions of state statutory law or common law, or (ii) any reimbursement of the Company by Indemnitee of any bonus or other incentive-based or equity-based compensation or of any profits realized by Indemnitee from the sale of securities of the Company, as required in each case under the Exchange Act (including any such reimbursements that arise from an accounting restatement of the Company pursuant to Section 304 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (the ""), or the payment to the Company of profits arising from the purchase and sale by Indemnitee of securities in violation of Section 306 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act); or
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
                    (c) except as provided in Section 14(d) of this Agreement, in connection with any Proceeding (or any part of any Proceeding) initiated by Indemnitee, including any Proceeding (or any part of any Proceeding) initiated by Indemnitee against the Company or its directors, officers, employees or other indemnitees, unless (i) the Board authorized the Proceeding (or any part of any Proceeding) prior to its initiation, (ii) such payment arises in connection with any mandatory counterclaim or cross-claim or affirmative defense brought or raised by Indemnitee in any Proceeding (or any part of any Proceeding), or (iii) the Company provides the indemnification, in its sole discretion, pursuant to the powers vested in the Company under applicable law.
          Section 10. . Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary (other than Section 14(d)), the Company shall advance, to the extent not prohibited by law, the Expenses incurred by or on behalf of Indemnitee in connection with any Proceeding (or any part of any Proceeding) not initiated by Indemnitee, and such advancement shall be made within 30 days after the receipt by the Company of a statement or statements requesting such advances from time to time (which shall include invoices received by Indemnitee in connection with such Expenses but, in the case of invoices in connection with legal services, any references to legal work performed or to expenditures made that would cause Indemnitee to waive any privilege accorded by applicable law shall not be so included), whether prior to or after final disposition of any Proceeding. Advances shall be unsecured and interest-free. Advances shall be made without regard to Indemnitee's ability to repay the Expenses and without regard to Indemnitee's ultimate entitlement to indemnification under the other provisions of this Agreement. In accordance with Section 14(d), advances shall include any and all reasonable Expenses incurred pursuing an action to enforce this right of advancement, including Expenses incurred preparing and forwarding statements to the Company to support the advances claimed. Indemnitee shall qualify for advances upon the execution and delivery to the Company of this Agreement, which shall constitute an undertaking providing that Indemnitee undertakes to repay the amounts advanced (without interest) to the extent that it is ultimately determined that Indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified by the Company. No other form of undertaking shall be required other than the execution of this Agreement. This Section 10 shall not apply to any claim made by Indemnitee for which indemnity is excluded pursuant to Section 9.
Advances of Expenses
          Section 11. .
Procedure for Notification and Defense of Claim
                    (a) Indemnitee shall notify the Company in writing of any matter with respect to which Indemnitee intends to seek indemnification or advancement of Expenses hereunder as soon as reasonably practicable following the receipt by Indemnitee of written notice thereof or Indemnitee's becoming aware thereof. The written notification to the Company shall include a description of the nature of the Proceeding and the facts underlying the Proceeding, in each case, to the extent known to Indemnitee. To obtain indemnification under this Agreement, Indemnitee shall submit to the Company a written request, including therein or therewith such
documentation and information as is reasonably available to Indemnitee and is reasonably necessary to determine whether and to what extent Indemnitee is entitled to indemnification following the final disposition of such Proceeding. The failure by Indemnitee to notify the Company hereunder will not relieve the Company from any liability that it may have to Indemnitee hereunder or otherwise than under this Agreement, and any delay in so notifying the Company shall not constitute a waiver by Indemnitee of any rights under this Agreement, except to the extent (solely with respect to the indemnity hereunder) that such failure or delay materially prejudices the Company. The Secretary of the Company shall, promptly upon receipt of such a request for indemnification, advise the Board in writing that Indemnitee has requested indemnification.
                    (b) The Company will be entitled to participate in the Proceeding at its own expense.
                    (c) The Company shall not settle any Proceeding (in whole or in part) if such settlement would impose any Expense, judgment, liability, fine, penalty or limitation on Indemnitee which Indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified hereunder without Indemnitee's prior written consent.
          Section 12. .
Procedure Upon Application for Indemnification
                    (a) Upon written request by Indemnitee for indemnification pursuant to Section 11(a), a determination, if required by applicable law, with respect to Indemnitee's entitlement thereto shall be made in the specific case: (i) if a Change in Control shall have occurred, by Independent Counsel in a written opinion to the Board, a copy of which shall be delivered to Indemnitee; or (ii) if a Change in Control shall not have occurred, (A) by a majority vote of the Disinterested Directors, even though less than a quorum of the Board, (B) by a committee of Disinterested Directors designated by a majority vote of the Disinterested Directors, even though less than a quorum of the Board, (C) if there are no such Disinterested Directors or, if such Disinterested Directors so direct, by Independent Counsel in a written opinion to the Board, a copy of which shall be delivered to Indemnitee or (D) if so directed by the Board, by the stockholders of the Company; and, if it is so determined that Indemnitee is entitled to indemnification, payment to Indemnitee shall be made within 10 days after such determination. Indemnitee shall cooperate with the person, persons or entity making such determination with respect to Indemnitee's entitlement to indemnification, including providing to such person, persons or entity upon reasonable advance request any documentation or information that is not privileged or otherwise protected from disclosure and that is reasonably available to Indemnitee and reasonably necessary to such determination. Any costs or Expenses (including attorneys' fees and disbursements) incurred by or on behalf of Indemnitee in so cooperating with the person, persons or entity making such determination shall be borne by the Company (irrespective of the determination as to Indemnitee's entitlement to indemnification) and the Company hereby indemnifies and agrees to hold Indemnitee harmless therefrom. The Company promptly will advise Indemnitee in writing with respect to any determination that Indemnitee is or is not entitled to indemnification, including a description of any reason or basis for which indemnification has been denied.
                    (b) In the event the determination of entitlement to indemnification is to be made by Independent Counsel pursuant to Section 12(a) hereof, the Independent Counsel shall be selected as provided in this Section 12(b). If a Change in Control shall not have occurred, the Independent Counsel shall be selected by the Board, and the Company shall give written notice to Indemnitee advising him of the identity of the Independent Counsel so selected. If a Change in Control shall have occurred, the Independent Counsel shall be selected by Indemnitee (unless Indemnitee shall request that such selection be made by the Board, in which event the preceding sentence shall apply), and Indemnitee shall give written notice to the Company advising it of the identity of the Independent Counsel so selected. In either event, Indemnitee or the Company, as the case may be, may, within 10 days after such written notice of selection shall have been given, deliver to the Company or to Indemnitee, as the case may be, a written objection to such selection; , , that such objection may be asserted only on the ground that the Independent Counsel so selected does not meet the requirements of "Independent Counsel" as defined in Section 2 of this Agreement, and the objection shall set forth with particularity the factual basis of such assertion. Absent a proper and timely objection, the person so selected shall act as Independent Counsel. If such written objection is so made and substantiated, the Independent Counsel so selected may not serve as Independent Counsel unless and until such objection is withdrawn or the Delaware Court has determined that such objection is without merit. If, within 20 days after the later of submission by Indemnitee of a written request for indemnification pursuant to Section 11(a) hereof and the final disposition of the Proceeding, no Independent Counsel shall have been selected and not objected to, either the Company or Indemnitee may petition the Delaware Court for resolution of any objection that shall have been made by the Company or Indemnitee to the other's selection of Independent Counsel and/or for the appointment as Independent Counsel of a person selected by such court or by such other person as such court shall designate, and the person with respect to whom all objections are so resolved or the person so appointed shall act as Independent Counsel under Section 12(a) hereof. Upon the due commencement of any judicial proceeding or arbitration pursuant to Section 14(a) of this Agreement, Independent Counsel shall be discharged and relieved of any further responsibility in such capacity (subject to the applicable standards of professional conduct then prevailing).
provided
however
                    (c) If the Company disputes a portion of the amounts for which indemnification is requested, the undisputed portion shall be paid and only the disputed portion withheld pending resolution of any such dispute.
          Section 13. .
Presumptions and Effect of Certain Proceedings
                    (a) In making a determination with respect to entitlement to indemnification hereunder, the person or persons or entity making such determination shall, to the fullest extent not prohibited by law, presume that Indemnitee is entitled to indemnification under this Agreement if Indemnitee has submitted a request for indemnification in accordance with Section 11(a) of this Agreement, and the Company shall, to the fullest extent not prohibited by law, have the burden of proof to overcome that presumption in connection with the making by any person, persons or entity of any determination contrary to that presumption. Neither the failure of the Company (including by its directors or Independent Counsel) to have made a determination prior
to the commencement of any action pursuant to this Agreement that indemnification is proper in the circumstances because Indemnitee has met the applicable standard of conduct, nor an actual determination by the Company (including by its directors or Independent Counsel) that Indemnitee has not met such applicable standard of conduct, shall be a defense to the action or create a presumption that Indemnitee has not met the applicable standard of conduct.
                    (b) Subject to Section 14(e), if the person, persons or entity empowered or selected under Section 12 of this Agreement to determine whether Indemnitee is entitled to indemnification shall not have made a determination within 60 days after receipt by the Company of the request therefor, the requisite determination of entitlement to indemnification shall, to the fullest extent not prohibited by law, be deemed to have been made and Indemnitee shall be entitled to such indemnification, absent (i) a misstatement by Indemnitee of a material fact, or an omission of a material fact necessary to make Indemnitee's statement not materially misleading, in connection with the request for indemnification, or (ii) a prohibition of such indemnification under applicable law; , , that such 60-day period may be extended for a reasonable time, not to exceed an additional 30 days, if the person, persons or entity making the determination with respect to entitlement to indemnification in good faith requires such additional time for the obtaining or evaluating of documentation and/or information relating thereto; and , , that the foregoing provisions of this Section 13(b) shall not apply (i) if the determination of entitlement to indemnification is to be made by the stockholders pursuant to Section 12(a) of this Agreement and if (A) within 15 days after receipt by the Company of the request for such determination the Board has resolved to submit such determination to the stockholders for their consideration at an annual meeting thereof to be held within 75 days after such receipt and such determination is made thereat, or (B) a special meeting of stockholders is called within 15 days after such receipt for the purpose of making such determination, such meeting is held for such purpose within 60 days after having been so called and such determination is made thereat, or (ii) if the determination of entitlement to indemnification is to be made by Independent Counsel pursuant to Section 12(a) of this Agreement.
provided
however
provided
further
                    (c) The termination of any Proceeding or of any claim, issue or matter therein, by judgment, order, settlement or conviction, or upon a plea of or its equivalent, shall not (except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement) of itself adversely affect the right of Indemnitee to indemnification or create a presumption that Indemnitee did not act in good faith and in a manner which he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company or, with respect to any criminal Proceeding, that Indemnitee had reasonable cause to believe that his conduct was unlawful.
nolo
contendere
                    (d) For purposes of any determination of good faith, Indemnitee shall be deemed to have acted in good faith if Indemnitee's action is based on the records or books of account of the Enterprise, including financial statements, or on information supplied to Indemnitee by the directors or officers of the Enterprise in the course of their duties, or on the advice of legal counsel for the Enterprise or on information or records given or reports made to the Enterprise by an independent certified public accountant or by an appraiser or other expert selected with the reasonable care by the Enterprise. The provisions of this Section 13(d) shall
not be deemed to be exclusive or to limit in any way the other circumstances in which Indemnitee may be deemed to have met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in this Agreement. Whether or not the foregoing provisions of this Section 13(d) are satisfied, it shall in any event be presumed that Indemnitee has at all times acted in good faith and in a manner he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company.
                    (e) The knowledge and/or actions, or failure to act, of any director, officer, trustee, partner, managing member, fiduciary, agent or employee of the Enterprise shall not be imputed to Indemnitee for purposes of determining the right to indemnification under this Agreement.
          Section 14. .
Remedies of Indemnitee
                    (a) Subject to Section 14(e), in the event that (i) a determination is made pursuant to Section 12 of this Agreement that Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification under this Agreement, (ii) advancement of Expenses is not timely made pursuant to Section 10 of this Agreement, (iii) no determination of entitlement to indemnification shall have been made pursuant to Section 12(a) of this Agreement within 90 days after receipt by the Company of the request for indemnification, (iv) payment of indemnification is not made pursuant to Section 5, 6 or 7 or the last sentence of Section 12(a) of this Agreement within 10 days after receipt by the Company of a written request therefor, (v) payment of indemnification pursuant to Section 3, 4 or 8 of this Agreement is not made within 10 days after a determination has been made that Indemnitee is entitled to indemnification, or (vi) the Company or any other person takes or threatens to take any action to declare this Agreement void or unenforceable, or institutes any litigation or other action or Proceeding designed to deny, or to recover from, Indemnitee the benefits provided or intended to be provided to Indemnitee hereunder, Indemnitee shall be entitled to an adjudication by a court of his entitlement to such indemnification or advancement of Expenses. Alternatively, Indemnitee, at his option, may seek an award in arbitration to be conducted by a single arbitrator pursuant to the Commercial Arbitration Rules of the American Arbitration Association. Indemnitee shall commence such proceeding seeking an adjudication or an award in arbitration within 180 days following the date on which Indemnitee first has the right to commence such proceeding pursuant to this Section 14(a); , , that the foregoing clause shall not apply in respect of a proceeding brought by Indemnitee to enforce his rights under Section 5 of this Agreement. The Company shall not oppose Indemnitee's right to seek any such adjudication or award in arbitration.
provided
however
                    (b) In the event that a determination shall have been made pursuant to Section 12(a) of this Agreement that Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification, any judicial proceeding or arbitration commenced pursuant to this Section 14 shall be conducted in all respects as a trial, or arbitration, on the merits and Indemnitee shall not be prejudiced by reason of that adverse determination. In any judicial proceeding or arbitration commenced pursuant to this Section 14 the Company shall have the burden of proving Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification or advancement of Expenses, as the case may be.
de
novo
                    (c) If a determination shall have been made pursuant to Section 12(a) of this Agreement that Indemnitee is entitled to indemnification, the Company shall be bound by such determination in any judicial proceeding or arbitration commenced pursuant to this Section 14, absent (i) a misstatement by Indemnitee of a material fact, or an omission of a material fact necessary to make Indemnitee's statement not materially misleading, in connection with the request for indemnification, or (ii) a prohibition of such indemnification under applicable law.
                    (d) The Company shall, to the fullest extent not prohibited by law, be precluded from asserting in any judicial proceeding or arbitration commenced pursuant to this Section 14 that the procedures and presumptions of this Agreement are not valid, binding and enforceable and shall stipulate in any such court or before any such arbitrator that the Company is bound by all the provisions of this Agreement. It is the intent of the Company that, to the fullest extent permitted by law, Indemnitee not be required to incur legal fees or other Expenses associated with the interpretation, enforcement or defense of Indemnitee's rights under this Agreement by litigation or otherwise because the cost and expense thereof would substantially detract from the benefits intended to be extended to Indemnitee hereunder. The Company shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law, indemnify Indemnitee against any and all Expenses and, if requested by Indemnitee, shall (within 10 days after receipt by the Company of a written request therefor) advance, to the extent not prohibited by law, such Expenses to Indemnitee, which are incurred by or on behalf of Indemnitee in connection with any action brought by Indemnitee for indemnification or advancement of Expenses from the Company under this Agreement or under any directors' and officers' liability insurance policies maintained by the Company if, in the case of indemnification, Indemnitee is wholly successful on the underlying claims; if Indemnitee is not wholly successful on the underlying claims, then such indemnification shall be only to the extent Indemnitee is successful on such underlying claims or otherwise as permitted by law, whichever is greater.
                    (e) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, no determination as to entitlement of Indemnitee to indemnification under this Agreement shall be required to be made prior to the final disposition of the Proceeding.
          Section 15. .
Non-exclusivity; Survival of Rights; Insurance; Subrogation
                    (a) The rights of indemnification and to receive advancement of Expenses as provided by this Agreement (i) shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which Indemnitee may at any time be entitled under applicable law, the Certificate of Incorporation, the Bylaws, any agreement, a vote of stockholders or a resolution of directors, or otherwise and (ii) shall be interpreted independently of, and without reference to, any other such rights to which Indemnitee may at any time be entitled. No amendment, alteration or repeal of this Agreement or of any provision hereof shall limit or restrict any right of Indemnitee under this Agreement in respect of any action taken or omitted by such Indemnitee in his Corporate Status prior to such amendment, alteration or repeal. To the extent that a change in Delaware law, whether by statute or judicial decision, permits greater indemnification or advancement of Expenses than would be afforded currently under the Bylaws, Certificate of Incorporation and this Agreement, it is the intent of the parties hereto that Indemnitee shall enjoy by this Agreement the greater benefits so
afforded by such change. No right or remedy herein conferred is intended to be exclusive of any other right or remedy, and every other right and remedy shall be cumulative and in addition to every other right and remedy given hereunder or now or hereafter existing at law or in equity or otherwise. The assertion or employment of any right or remedy hereunder, or otherwise, shall not prevent the concurrent assertion or employment of any other right or remedy.
                    (b) To the extent that the Company maintains an insurance policy or policies providing liability insurance for directors, officers, employees, or agents of the Enterprise, Indemnitee shall be covered by such policy or policies in accordance with its or their terms to the maximum extent of the coverage available for any such director, officer, employee or agent under such policy or policies. If, at the time of the receipt of a notice of a claim pursuant to the terms hereof, the Company has director and officer liability insurance in effect, the Company shall give prompt notice of such claim or of the commencement of a Proceeding, as the case may be, to the insurers in accordance with the procedures set forth in the respective policies. The Company shall thereafter take all necessary or desirable action to cause such insurers to pay, on behalf of Indemnitee, all amounts payable as a result of such Proceeding in accordance with the terms of such policies.
                    (c) In the event of any payment under this Agreement, the Company shall be subrogated to the extent of such payment to all of the rights of recovery of Indemnitee, who shall execute all papers required and take all action necessary to secure such rights, including execution of such documents as are necessary to enable the Company to bring suit to enforce such rights.
                    (d) The Company shall not be liable under this Agreement to make any payment of amounts otherwise indemnifiable hereunder (or for which advancement is provided hereunder) if and to the extent that Indemnitee has otherwise actually received such payment under any insurance policy, contract, agreement or otherwise.
                    (e) The Company's obligation to indemnify or advance Expenses hereunder to Indemnitee who is or was serving at the request of the Company as a director, officer, trustee, partner, managing member, fiduciary, employee or agent of any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise shall be reduced by any amount Indemnitee has actually received as indemnification or advancement of Expenses from such other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise.
Section 16. . This Agreement shall continue until and terminate upon the later of (a) 10 years after the date that Indemnitee shall have ceased to serve as a director or officer of the Company or (b) one year after the final termination of any Proceeding then pending in respect of which Indemnitee is granted rights of indemnification or advancement of Expenses hereunder and of any proceeding (including any appeal) commenced by Indemnitee pursuant to Section 14 of this Agreement relating thereto. The indemnification and advancement of expenses rights provided by or granted pursuant to this Agreement shall be binding upon and be enforceable by the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns
Duration of Agreement
(including any direct or indirect successor by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise to all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company), shall continue as to an Indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee or agent of the Company or of any other Enterprise, and shall inure to the benefit of Indemnitee and his or her spouse, assigns, heirs, devisees, executors and administrators and other legal representatives. The Company shall require and shall cause any successor (whether direct or indirect by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company to, by written agreement, expressly assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent that the Company would be required to perform if no such succession had taken place.
          Section 17. . If any provision or provisions of this Agreement shall be held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable for any reason whatsoever, then (a) the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions of this Agreement (including, without limitation, each portion of any Section of this Agreement containing any such provision held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, that is not itself invalid, illegal or unenforceable) shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby and shall remain enforceable to the fullest extent permitted by law; (b) such provision or provisions shall be deemed reformed to the extent necessary to conform to applicable law and to give the maximum effect to the intent of the parties hereto; and (c) to the fullest extent possible, the provisions of this Agreement (including, without limitation, each portion of any Section of this Agreement containing any such provision held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, that is not itself invalid, illegal or unenforceable) shall be construed so as to give effect to the intent manifested thereby.
Severability
          Section 18.
Enforcement.
                    (a) The Company expressly confirms and agrees that it has entered into this Agreement and assumed the obligations imposed on it hereby in order to induce Indemnitee to serve as a director or officer of the Company, and the Company acknowledges that Indemnitee is relying upon this Agreement in serving as a director or officer of the Company.
                    (b) This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, oral, written and implied, between the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof; , , that this Agreement is a supplement to and in furtherance of the Certificate of Incorporation, the Bylaws, any directors' and officers' insurance maintained by the Company and applicable law, and shall not be deemed a substitute therefor, nor to diminish or abrogate any rights of Indemnitee thereunder.
provided
however
          Section 19. . No supplement, modification or amendment of this Agreement shall be binding unless executed in writing by the parties hereto. No waiver of any of the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed or shall constitute a waiver of any other provisions of this Agreement nor shall any waiver constitute a continuing waiver.
Modification and Waiver
          Section 20. . Indemnitee agrees promptly to notify the Company in writing upon being served with any summons, citation, subpoena, complaint, indictment, information or other document relating to any Proceeding or matter which may be subject to indemnification or advancement of Expenses covered hereunder. The failure of Indemnitee to so notify the Company shall not relieve the Company of any obligation which it may have to Indemnitee under this Agreement or otherwise.
Notice by Indemnitee
          Section 21. . All notices, requests, demands and other communications under this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if (a) delivered by hand and receipted for by the party to whom said notice or other communication shall have been directed, (b) mailed by certified or registered mail with postage prepaid, on the third business day after the date on which it is so mailed, (c) mailed by reputable overnight courier and receipted for by the party to whom said notice or other communication shall have been directed or (d) sent by facsimile transmission, with receipt of oral confirmation that such transmission has been received:
Notices
                    (a) If to Indemnitee, at the address indicated on the signature page of this Agreement, or such other address as Indemnitee shall provide to the Company.
                    (b) If to the Company to:
or to any other address as may have been furnished to Indemnitee by the Company.
          Section 22. To the fullest extent permissible under applicable law, if the indemnification provided for in this Agreement is unavailable to Indemnitee for any reason whatsoever, the Company, in lieu of indemnifying Indemnitee, shall contribute to the amount incurred by or on behalf of Indemnitee, whether for judgments, fines, penalties, excise taxes, amounts paid or to be paid in settlement and/or for Expenses, in connection with any claim relating to an indemnifiable event under this Agreement, in such proportion as is deemed fair and reasonable in light of all of the circumstances of such Proceeding in order to reflect (i) the relative benefits received by the Company and Indemnitee as a result of the event(s) and/or transaction(s) giving cause to such Proceeding; and/or (ii) the relative fault of the Company (and its directors, officers, employees and agents) and Indemnitee in connection with such event(s) and/or transaction(s).
Contribution.
          Section 23. . This Agreement and the legal relations among the parties shall be governed by, and construed and enforced in accordance with, the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to its conflict of laws rules. Except with respect to any arbitration commenced by Indemnitee pursuant to Section 14(a) of this Agreement, the Company and Indemnitee hereby irrevocably and unconditionally (i) agree that
Applicable Law and Consent to Jurisdiction
any action or proceeding arising out of or in connection with this Agreement shall be brought only in the Chancery Court of the State of Delaware (the ""), and not in any other state or federal court in the United States of America or any court in any other country, (ii) consent to submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Delaware Court for purposes of any action or proceeding arising out of or in connection with this Agreement, (iii) waive any objection to the laying of venue of any such action or proceeding in the Delaware Court and (iv) waive, and agree not to plead or to make, any claim that any such action or proceeding brought in the Delaware Court has been brought in an improper or inconvenient forum.
Delaware Court
          Section 24. . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which shall for all purposes be deemed to be an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same Agreement. Only one such counterpart signed by the party against whom enforceability is sought needs to be produced to evidence the existence of this Agreement.
Identical Counterparts
          Section 25. . Use of the masculine pronoun shall be deemed to include usage of the feminine pronoun where appropriate. The headings of this Agreement are inserted for convenience only and shall not be deemed to constitute part of this Agreement or to affect the construction thereof.
Miscellaneous
          IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this Agreement to be signed as of the day and year first above written.

Exhibit 99.1
 
NEWS RELEASE
 
THE DRESS BARN, INC. COMPLETES DELAWARE HOLDING COMPANY REORGANIZATION INTO ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
 
Shares of new Delaware holding company to commence trading on the NASDAQ Global Select Market under ticker symbol "ASNA"
 
SUFFERN, NY  January 3, 2011
The
Dress Barn, Inc.
(NASDAQ - DBRN)
today announced that on January 1, 2011, it completed its previously announced holding company reorganization. A new Delaware corporation, Ascena Retail Group, Inc., or Ascena, has replaced The Dress Barn, Inc. ("DBI") as the publicly held corporation. Today, January 3, 2011, the shares of Ascena common stock will commence trading on the NASDAQ Global Select Market under the ticker symbol "
ASNA
".
 
The purpose of the reorganization is to provide the company with strategic, operational and financial flexibility. Incorporating the new holding company in Delaware will allow the company to take advantage of the flexibility, predictability and responsiveness that Delaware corporate law provides. The business operations, directors and executive officers of the company will not change as a result of the reorganization.
 
As a result of the reorganization,
dressbarn
,
maurices
and Tween Brands, which operates our
Justice
brand, became subsidiaries of Ascena, and DBI shareholders automatically became stockholders of the new Delaware holding company on a one-for-one basis, holding the same number of Ascena shares and same ownership percentage after the reorganization as they held immediately prior to the reorganization.
 
The reorganization was tax-free for DBI shareholders. The reorganization was approved at DBI's annual meeting of shareholders on December 17, 2010.
 
David R. Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented, "In recent years, we've become a fundamentally different company that extends well beyond the original
dressbarn
concept and brand. We have become a family of retail brands, each serving a unique customer niche, each essential to our combined success. This name change reflects that reality as well as our vision for the future. We also believe that adopting a new holding company structure will enable each of our brands to better leverage our shared corporate infrastructure and to focus their efforts on delivering a great experience to their customers."
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls operating under the
dressbarn
,
maurices
and
Justice
brands. The Company operates 2,487 stores.
 
dressbarn
stores offer casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 838 stores in 47 states.
maurices
stores offer casual and career apparel and accessories at great values to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operate 758 stores in 44 states.
Justice
stores offer trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operate 891 stores in 46 states and Puerto Rico.
 
For more information, please visit ,, 
www.ascenaretail.com
www.dressbarn.com
and .
www.maurices.com
www.shopjustice.com
 
Ascena Forward-Looking Statement Disclosure
 
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available on Dress Barn's most recent report on Form 10-K/A for the year ended July 31, 2010 and Form 10-Q for the quarter ended October 30, 2010.
 
 
Investor Relations
(845) 369-4600
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110105165159.txt.gz
TIME:20110105165159
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 1.01  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On January 3, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the "Company") and certain of its domestic subsidiaries entered into an amended and restated revolving credit agreement (the "Credit Agreement") with the lenders thereunder and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. The Credit Agreement amends and restates the prior $200 million four-year credit facility entered into on November 25, 2009 by The Dress Barn, Inc., which is now a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company, and certain of its domestic subsidiaries which was scheduled to expire on November 25, 2013.
The Credit Agreement provides a senior secured revolving credit facility up to $200 million and matures in 5 years. The credit facility may be used for the issuance of letters of credit, to finance the acquisition of working capital assets in the ordinary course of business and capital expenditures, and for general corporate purposes. The Credit Agreement includes a $150 million letter of credit sublimit, of which $25 million can be used for standby letters of credit, and a $20 million swing loan sublimit. The interest rates, pricing and fees under the Credit Agreement fluctuate based on excess availability as defined in the Credit Agreement. There are no borrowings outstanding under the Credit Agreement.
The Credit Agreement contains customary representations, warranties, and affirmative covenants. The Credit Agreement also contains customary negative covenants, subject to negotiated exceptions on (i) liens, (ii) investments, (iii) indebtedness, (iv) significant corporate changes including mergers and acquisitions, (v) dispositions, (vi) restricted payments and certain other restrictive agreements. The Credit Agreement also contains customary events of default, such as payment defaults, cross-defaults to other material indebtedness, bankruptcy and insolvency, the occurrence of a defined change in control, or the failure to observe the negative covenants and other covenants related to the operation of the Company's business.
The Company's obligations under the Credit Agreement are guaranteed by certain of its domestic subsidiaries (the "Subsidiary Guarantors"). As collateral security under the Credit Agreement and the guarantees thereof, the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors have granted to the administrative agent for the benefit of the lenders, a first priority lien on substantially all of their tangible and intangible assets, including, without limitation, certain domestic inventory, but excluding real estate.
The above description of the Credit Agreement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the actual terms of the Credit Agreement, a copy of which is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 2.03  Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The information required by this item is included in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.

[CS&M Ref. No. 6701-814]
                    AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT dated as of January 3, 2011, among ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC., a newly organized Delaware corporation, the Borrowing Subsidiaries party hereto, the other Loan Parties party hereto, the Lenders party hereto, and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
                    The Borrowing Subsidiaries (such term and each other capitalized term used herein having the meaning assigned to it in Article I of this Agreement), the other Loan Parties, certain Lenders and the Administrative Agent are parties to the Existing Credit Agreement, and have agreed to amend and restate such Agreement to provide for, among other things, (a) the Reorganization, (b) the addition of New Parent as a Borrower thereunder, (c) the extension of the maturity of the credit facility established thereby and (d) certain pricing and other amendments thereto, all as set forth herein.
                    Accordingly, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein contained and other good and valuable consideration, the sufficiency and receipt of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree that the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in the form of this Agreement.
                    SECTION 1.01. As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms.
                    "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, bears interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in the Restated Security Agreement.
Account
                    "" means any Person obligated on an Account.
Account Debtor
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 6.04.
Acquired Entity
                    "" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period or for any ABR Borrowing, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for the applicable Interest Period multiplied by (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
                    "" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Administrative Agent
                    "" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
                    "" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
                    "" means this Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, as modified, amended or restated from time to time.
Agreement
                    "" means the Agreement and Plan of Reorganization dated as of August 20, 2010, among Dress Barn, New Parent and DB Merger Corp.
Agreement and Plan of Reorganization
                    "" means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus  of 1% per annum and (c) the Adjusted LIBO Rate for a one month Interest Period on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) plus 1% per annum; that, for the avoidance of doubt, the Adjusted LIBO Rate for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on the Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page (or on any successor or substitute page) at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day (without any rounding). Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
provided
                    "" means, with respect to any Lender, with respect to Revolving Loans, LC Exposure, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances, a percentage equal to a fraction the numerator of which is such Lender's Revolving Commitment and the denominator of which is the aggregate amount of the Revolving Commitments of all the Lenders (if the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Revolving Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments at or prior to the time of determination); that for purposes of Section 2.20 when a Defaulting Lender shall exist, any such Defaulting Lender's Revolving Commitment shall be disregarded in the calculation.
Applicable Percentage
provided
                    "" means, for any day, with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Revolving Loan or the participation fee for any Standby Letter of Credit or Documentary Letter of Credit, as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth in the table below under the caption "ABR Spread", "Eurodollar Spread", "Standby LC Fee" or "Documentary LC Fee", as the case may be, based upon Average Availability for the most recently ended fiscal quarter of New Parent (or, prior to the end of the fiscal quarter in which the Reorganization is consummated, the most recently ended fiscal quarter of Dress Barn):
Applicable Rate
For purposes of the foregoing, the Applicable Rate shall be determined as of the end of each fiscal quarter of New Parent (or, as provided above, Dress Barn) based upon the Borrowing Base Certificate that is delivered from time to time pursuant to Section 5.01(g) as of the last day of such fiscal quarter, with any changes to the Applicable Rate resulting from a change in Average Availability to be effective on the first day of the first month following delivery of such Borrowing Base Certificate. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this definition, if the Borrower shall fail to deliver any Borrowing Base Certificate as of the last day of any fiscal quarter by the time required under Section 5.01(g), then the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to Category 3 in the table above from and including the day next following the date on which such Borrowing Base Certificate shall have been due to but excluding the sixth day after the date on which such Borrowing Base Certificate shall have been delivered.
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 10.10.
Applicable Share
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.04.
Approved Fund
                    "" means, individually and collectively as the context may require, J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, in their capacities as Joint Bookrunners and Joint Lead Arrangers for the credit facilities established hereby.
Arrangers
                    "" means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.04), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
Exhibit A
                    "" means, at any time, an amount equal to (a) the lesser of (i) the aggregate Revolving Commitments and (ii) the Borrowing Base (b) the Credit Exposure of all Lenders.
Availability
minus
                    "" means the period from and including the Original Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Commitments.
Availability Period
                    "" means, with respect to any fiscal quarter, (a) the sum of Availability for each day during such fiscal quarter divided by (b) the number of days in such fiscal quarter.
Average Availability
                    "" means each and any of the following bank services provided to any Loan Party by any Lender or any of its Affiliates: (a) credit cards for commercial customers (including, without limitation, "commercial credit cards" and purchasing cards), (b) stored value cards and (c) treasury management services (including, without limitation, controlled disbursement, automated clearinghouse transactions, return items, overdrafts and interstate depository network services).
Banking Services
                    "" of the Loan Parties means any and all obligations of the Loan Parties, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor) in connection with Banking Services.
Banking Services Obligations
                    "" mean all Reserves which the Administrative Agent from time to time establishes in its Permitted Discretion for Banking Services then provided or Banking Services Obligations outstanding.
Banking Services Reserves
                    "" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
                    "" or "" means, individually or collectively, New Parent and the Borrowing Subsidiaries.
Borrower
Borrowers
                    "" means New Parent, in its capacity as contractual representative of the Borrowers pursuant to Article XI.
Borrower Representative
                    "" means (a) Revolving Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect, (b) a Swingline Loan, (c) a Protective Advance and (d) an Overadvance.
Borrowing
                    "" means, at any time, an amount equal to the sum of (a) 90% of the Borrowers' Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable at such time, (b) the lesser of (i) 75% of the Borrowers' Eligible Inventory, valued at the lower of cost, determined on a first-in-first-out basis, or market value at such time and (ii) the product of 85% the Net Orderly Liquidation Value percentage identified in the most recent inventory appraisal ordered by the Administrative Agent the Borrowers' Eligible Inventory, valued at the lower of cost, determined on a first-in-first-out basis, or market value, (c) Reserves. The Administrative Agent may, in its Permitted Discretion and with not fewer than four Business Days' prior written notice to New Parent, reduce the advance rates set forth above, adjust Reserves or reduce one or more of the other elements used in computing the Borrowing Base. The Borrowing Base at any time shall be determined by reference to the most recent Borrowing Base Certificate delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(g) or Section 4.02(c); that if any Borrowing Base Certificate delivered under Section 5.01(g) or Section 4.02(c) shall prove to have been materially inaccurate (regardless of whether any Commitments are in effect or any amounts are outstanding hereunder when such
Borrowing Base
plus
multiplied by
multiplied by
minus
provided
inaccuracy is discovered), and such inaccuracy shall have resulted in the payment of any interest or fees at rates lower than those that were in fact applicable for any period (based on the actual Borrowing Base), the applicable Borrowers shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for distribution to the Lenders (or former Lenders) as their interests may appear, the accrued interest or fees that should have been paid but were not paid as a result of such inaccuracy.
                    "" means a certificate, signed and certified as accurate and complete by a Financial Officer of the Borrower Representative, in substantially the form of or another form which is acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion.
Borrowing Base Certificate
Exhibit C
                    "" means the last day of each fiscal quarter; that (a) if on the last day of any fiscal month (i) any Revolving Loans shall be outstanding, (ii) the LC Exposure shall be $25,000,000 or more or (iii) the cash and cash equivalents of New Parent and its subsidiaries shall be $100,000,000 or less, then the last day of such fiscal month will also be a Borrowing Base Reporting Date and (b) during any Enhanced Reporting Period, the last day of each week will be a Borrowing Base Reporting Date.
Borrowing Base Reporting Date
provided
                    "" means a request by the Borrower Representative for a Revolving Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03.
Borrowing Request
                    "" means, until such time as it ceases to be a Borrowing Subsidiary pursuant to Section 2.22, each Subsidiary listed as a Borrower on the signature pages hereto and any other wholly owned Subsidiary designated as a Borrowing Subsidiary pursuant to Section 2.22.
Borrowing Subsidiary
                    "" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term "" shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
provided
Business Day
                    "" means, for any period, (a) the additions to property, plant and equipment and other capital expenditures of New Parent and its Subsidiaries that are (or would be) set forth in a consolidated statement of cash flows of New Parent for such period prepared in accordance with GAAP and (b) Capital Lease Obligations or Synthetic Lease Obligations incurred by New Parent and its consolidated Subsidiaries during such period.
Capital Expenditures
                    "" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
                    "" means each Person that is a "controlled foreign corporation" within the meaning of Section 957(a) of the Code.
CFC
                    "" means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission thereunder as in effect on the date hereof) other than the Permitted Investors, of Equity Interests representing more than 30% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests of New Parent and the percentage of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by Equity Interests owned by such Person or group then exceeds the percentage of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by Equity Interests owned by the Permitted Investors; (b) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of New Parent by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the board of directors of New Parent nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated; or (c) the occurrence of a "change of control", as defined in any agreement or instrument governing Material Indebtedness.
Change in Control
                    "" means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the Original Effective Date, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the Original Effective Date or (c) compliance by any Lender or any Issuing Bank (or, for purposes of Section 2.15(b), by any lending office of such Lender or by such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the Original Effective Date.
Change in Law
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.16.
Charges
                    "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Revolving Loans, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances.
Class
                    "" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
                    "" means any and all property owned, leased or operated by a Person covered by the Collateral Documents (which shall not include any real property or interests therein) and any and all other property of any Loan Party, now existing or hereafter acquired, that may at any time be or become subject to a security interest or Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent in accordance with the terms of the Collateral Documents, on behalf of itself and the Lender Parties, to secure the Secured Obligations.
Collateral
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in the Restated Security Agreement.
Collateral Access Agreement
                    "" means, at any time, the requirement that:
Collateral and Guarantee Requirement
                    Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Loan Party formed or acquired after the Original Effective Date shall not be required to comply with the foregoing requirements prior to the time specified in Section 5.15. The foregoing definition shall not require the creation or perfection of pledges of or security interests in, or the obtaining of legal opinions or other deliverables with respect to, particular assets of the Loan Parties if and for so long as the Administrative Agent, in consultation with New Parent, determines that the cost of creating or perfecting such pledges or security interests in such assets or obtaining legal opinions or other deliverables in respect of such assets shall be excessive in view of the benefits to be obtained by the Lenders therefrom. The Administrative Agent may grant extensions of time for the creation and perfection of security interests in or the obtaining of legal opinions or other deliverables with respect to particular assets (including extensions beyond the Original Effective Date or the Restatement Effective Date or in connection with assets acquired, or Subsidiaries formed or acquired, after the Original Effective Date or the Restatement Effective Date) where it determines that such actions cannot be accomplished without undue effort or expense by the time or times at which they would otherwise be required to be accomplished by this Agreement or the Collateral Documents.
                    "" means, individually and collectively as the context may require, the Restated Security Agreement, each Collateral Access Agreement, each Credit Card Notification Agreement, each Deposit Account Control Agreement and each other document granting a Lien upon any assets of any Loan Party (other than real property or any interests therein) as security for payment of the Secured Obligations.
Collateral Documents
                    "" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Commercial Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements relating to Commercial Letters of Credit that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrowers at such time. The Commercial LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Commercial LC Exposure at such time.
Commercial LC Exposure
                    "" means a letter of credit that is (a) designated as a Commercial Letter of Credit by the Borrower Representative at the time of, or prior to, the issuance thereof, (b) issued to provide for the payment of the purchase price for goods or services purchased by a Borrower or a Subsidiary and (c) intended to be drawn when such purchase price is due and payable and not merely upon the occurrence of a default or other contingency.
Commercial Letter of Credit
                    "" means, with respect to each Lender, the sum of such Lender's Revolving Commitment together with the commitment of such Lender to acquire participations in Overadvances and Protective Advances hereunder. The initial amount of each Lender's Commitment is set forth on the , or in the Assignment and Assumption or amendment pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Commitment, as applicable.
Commitment
Commitment Schedule
                    "" means .
Commitment Schedule
Schedule 2.01
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in the Restated Security Agreement.
Concentration Account
                    "" means, for any period, the excess of (a) the sum of (i) the cash interest expense (including (x) imputed interest expense in respect of Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations, (y) all commissions, discounts and other fees and charges owed with respect to letters of credit and bankers' acceptance financing and (z) net costs under Swap Agreements entered into to hedge interest rates to the extent such net costs are allocable to such period in accordance with GAAP) of New Parent and the Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, (ii) any interest accrued during such period in respect of Indebtedness of New Parent or any Subsidiary that is required to be capitalized rather than included in consolidated interest expense for such period in accordance with GAAP, plus (iii) any cash payments made during such period in respect of obligations referred to in clause (b)(iii) below that were amortized or accrued in a previous period, minus (b) the sum of (i) interest income of New Parent and the Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, (ii) to the extent included in such consolidated interest expense for such period, non-cash amounts attributable to amortization of financing costs paid in a previous period, plus (iii) to the extent included in such consolidated interest expense for such period, non-cash amounts attributable to amortization of debt discounts or accrued interest payable in kind for such period.
Consolidated Cash Interest Expense
                    "" means, for any period, Consolidated Net Income for such period plus (a) without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (i) consolidated interest expense for such period, (ii) consolidated income tax expense for such period, (iii) all amounts attributable to depreciation and amortization for such period, (iv) any non-cash extraordinary charges for such period, (v) any non-cash compensation charges, including arising from restricted stock and stock-option grants, for such period, (vi) any other non-cash charges (other than the write-down of current assets) for such period, (vii) fees and expenses paid in connection with the consummation of the Transactions (as such term is defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) and cash extraordinary charges in an aggregate amount for all such fees, expenses and charges not to exceed $40,000,000 (of which not more than $10,000,000 may be paid or accrued in periods after Dress Barn's fiscal year ending July 31, 2010) and (viii) charges attributable to the integration of the business of Tween Brands with the business of Dress Barn or New Parent that are paid or otherwise accounted for prior to December 31, 2011, in an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 in any
Consolidated EBITDA
period or $4,000,000 in the aggregate for all periods, and minus (b) without duplication (i) to the extent not deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, all cash payments made during such period on account of non-cash charges that were or would have been added to Consolidated Net Income pursuant to clauses (a)(iv), (a)(v) or (a)(vi) above in such period or in a previous period and (ii) to the extent included in determining such Consolidated Net Income, any extraordinary gains and all non-cash items of income (other than normal accruals in the ordinary course of business) for such period, all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
                    "" means, for any period, Consolidated EBITDA for such period plus, without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated EBITDA, Consolidated Rental Expense for such period, all as determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated EBITDAR
                    "" means, for any period, the sum, without duplication, of (a) Consolidated Cash Interest Expense, (b) Consolidated Rental Expense, (c) mandatory prepayments and scheduled principal payments on, and cash payments upon the conversion of, Indebtedness made during such period, (d) expense for taxes paid in cash, (e) Restricted Payments paid in cash, (f) Capital Lease Obligation payments and (g) mandatory cash contributions to any Plan, all calculated for New Parent and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
Consolidated Fixed Charges
                    "" means, for any period, the net income or loss of New Parent and the Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that there shall be excluded (a) the income of any Person (other than New Parent) in which any other Person (other than New Parent or any Subsidiary or any director holding qualifying shares in compliance with applicable law) owns an Equity Interest, except to the extent of the amount of dividends or other distributions actually paid to New Parent or any of the Subsidiaries during such period, (or, so long as the declaration or payment of dividends or other distributions by such first Person is not at the time restricted by operation of the terms of its charter or any agreement, instrument, judgment, decree, statute, rule or regulation applicable to such Person, to the extent cash equal to such income (or New Parent's or any Subsidiary's ratable portion thereof) is readily procurable by New Parent or such Subsidiary from such Person by causing such Person to dividend or otherwise distribute such income (or such portion) to New Parent or such Subsidiary) and (b) the income or loss of any Person accrued prior to the date it becomes a Subsidiary or is merged into or consolidated with New Parent or any Subsidiary or the date that such Person's assets are acquired by New Parent or any Subsidiary.
Consolidated Net Income
provided
                    "" means, for any period, the aggregate minimum rental expense of New Parent and the Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, in respect of all rental obligations under operating leases.
Consolidated Rental Expense
                    "" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through
Control
the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Controlling
Controlled
                    "" means for purposes of Section 9.17, the Secured Obligations.
Corresponding Debt
                    "" means any period (a) commencing on any date when Availability shall have been less than the greater of (i) 15% of the aggregate Revolving Commitments then in effect and (ii) $25,000,000 for three consecutive Business Days and (b) ending on the first day thereafter when Availability shall have been greater than 17.5% of the aggregate Revolving Commitments then in effect for 30 consecutive days.
Covenant Period
                    "" means (a) any receivables due to any Borrower from a credit card issuer or credit card processor in connection with purchases of Inventory of such Borrower on (i) credit cards issued by Visa, MasterCard, American Express, Discover and any other credit card issuers or providers that are reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent or (ii) private label credit cards of any Borrower issued through Dress Barn's or New Parent's credit card program with Alliance Data Systems under non-recourse arrangements substantially similar to those in effect on the date hereof, and (b) debit cards and mall cards issued by issuers or providers that are reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, in each case which have been earned by performance by such Borrower but not yet paid to such Borrower by the credit card issuer or the credit card processor, as applicable.
Credit Card Accounts Receivable
                    "" means each Credit Card Notification Agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, executed by the Borrowers and delivered to the Borrowers' credit card providers, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time.
Credit Card Notification Agreements
                    "" means, as to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Revolving Loans, its LC Exposure, its Swingline Exposure and its Applicable Percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Protective Advances and Overadvances outstanding at such time.
Credit Exposure
                    "" means DB Merger Corp., a subsidiary of Dress Barn.
DB Merger Corp.
                    "" means any event or condition which constitutes an Event of Default or which upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
                    "" means any Lender, as determined by the Administrative Agent, that has (a) failed to fund any portion of its Loans or participations in Letters of Credit or Swingline Loans within three Business Days of the date required to be funded by it hereunder, (b) notified any Borrower, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, the Swingline Lender or any Lender in writing that it does not intend to comply with any of its funding obligations under this Agreement or has made a public statement to the effect that it does not intend to comply with its funding obligations under
Defaulting Lender
this Agreement or under other agreements in which it commits to extend credit, (c) failed, within three Business Days after request by the Administrative Agent, to confirm that it will comply with the terms of this Agreement relating to its obligations to fund prospective Loans and participations in then outstanding Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans, (d) otherwise failed to pay over to the Administrative Agent or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder within three Business Days of the date when due, unless the subject of a good faith dispute, or (e) (i) become or is insolvent or has a parent company that has become or is insolvent or (ii) become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee or custodian appointed for it, or has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment or has a parent company that has become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee or custodian appointed for it, or has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment.
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in the Restated Security Agreement.
Deposit Account Control Agreement
                    "" means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in .
Disclosed Matters
Schedule 3.06
                    "" means any capital stock which, by its terms (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable), or upon the happening of any event, (a) matures (excluding any maturity as the result of an optional redemption by the issuer thereof) or is mandatorily redeemable, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, or is redeemable at the option of the holder thereof, in whole or in part, or requires the payment of any cash dividend or any other scheduled payment constituting a return of capital, in each case at any time on or prior to the first anniversary of the Maturity Date, or (b) is convertible into or exchangeable (unless at the sole option of the issuer thereof) for (i) cash, (ii) debt securities or (iii) any capital stock referred to in (a) above, in each case at any time prior to the first anniversary of the Maturity Date.
Disqualified Stock
                    "" means the distribution and office facility owned by Dunnigan and located at 22 Hemion Road and 30 Dunnigan Drive, Suffern, New York 10901.
Distribution Center
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in the Restated Security Agreement.
Document
                    "" or "" refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
                    "" means any Subsidiary other than a Foreign Subsidiary.
Domestic Subsidiary
                    "" means any period (a) during which any Default under paragraph (a) of Article VII or any Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or (b)
Dominion Period
during a Reduced Availability Period; that if all applicable circumstances described in clauses (a) and (b) shall cease to exist, the Borrower Representative may, not more than twice during each period of 12 consecutive months, request that the Administrative Agent discontinue the applicable Dominion Period, and the Administrative Agent will promptly comply with such request and will provide notification of such discontinuance to the Borrowers' credit card processors.
provided
                    "" means The Dress Barn, Inc., a wholly owned Subsidiary of New Parent.
Dress Barn
                    "" means Dunnigan Realty, LLC, a wholly owned Subsidiary that was formed solely to purchase, own and operate the Distribution Center.
Dunnigan
                    "" means, at any time, the Credit Card Accounts Receivable of a Borrower which the Administrative Agent determines in its Permitted Discretion are eligible as the basis for the (i) extension of Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans and (ii) the issuance of Letters of Credit. Without limiting the Administrative Agent's discretion provided herein, Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable shall not include any Credit Card Account Receivable:
Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable
                    In the event that a Credit Card Account Receivable which was previously an Eligible Credit Card Account Receivable ceases to be an Eligible Credit Card Account Receivable hereunder (other than by reason of clause (m) or (p)), such Borrower or the Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent thereof on and at the time of submission to the Administrative Agent of the next Borrowing Base Certificate. In determining the amount of an Eligible Credit Card Account Receivable, the face amount of a Credit Card Account Receivable may, in the Administrative Agent's Permitted Discretion, be reduced by, without duplication, to the extent not reflected in such face amount, (i) the amount of all accrued and actual discounts, claims, credits or credits pending, promotional program allowances, price adjustments, finance charges or other allowances (including any amount that such Borrower may be obligated to rebate to an Account Debtor pursuant to the terms of any agreement or understanding (written or oral)) applicable to such Credit Card Account Receivable and (ii) the aggregate amount of all cash received in respect of such Credit Card Account Receivable but not yet applied by such Borrower to reduce the amount of such Credit Card Account Receivable. Standards of eligibility may be made more restrictive from time to time solely by the Administrative Agent in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion, with any such changes to be effective four Business Days after delivery of notice thereof to the Borrower Representative and the Lenders.
                    "" means a Foreign Subsidiary that is (x) a first-tier CFC owned directly by any Borrower or any Domestic Subsidiary that is a "U.S. person", as defined under the Code, or (y) described in clause (ii) of the definition of Foreign Subsidiary.
Eligible Foreign Subsidiary
                    "" means, at any time, the Inventory of a Borrower which the Administrative Agent determines in its Permitted Discretion is eligible as the basis for the (i) extension of Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans and (ii) the issuance of Letters of Credit. Without limiting the Administrative Agent's discretion provided herein, Eligible Inventory shall not include any Inventory:
Eligible Inventory
that in determining the value of the Eligible Inventory, such value shall be reduced by, without duplication, any amounts representing (a) Vendor Rebates; (b) costs included in Inventory relating to advertising; (c) to the extent determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion to be appropriate, the shrink reserve; (d) the unreconciled discrepancy between the general inventory ledger and the perpetual Inventory ledger, to the extent the general Inventory ledger reflects less Inventory than the perpetual Inventory ledger; and (e) a reserve for Inventory which is designated or demanded to be returned to or retained by the applicable vendor or which is recognized as damaged or off quality by the applicable Borrower.
provided
                    In the event that a Financial Officer has actual knowledge that Inventory at any location having a fair market value of $5,000,000 or more which was previously Eligible Inventory ceases to be Eligible Inventory hereunder (other than by reason of clause (c) or (o)), such Borrower or the Borrower Representative shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof; that the Borrowers shall not be required to deliver an updated Borrowing Base Certificate until such time as submission to the Administrative Agent of the next Borrowing Base Certificate is required hereunder; provided further that the Administrative Agent may, in its reasonable discretion, upon receipt of such notice as set forth above, adjust Availability to reflect such change in Eligible Inventory.
provided
                    "" means a bank or financial institution that is organized under the laws of the United States or any State or district thereof with an office in New York, New York which has a combined capital surplus of at least $200,000,000.
Eligible Successor Agent
                    "" means any period (a) commencing at any time when Availability shall be less than 20% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (b) ending when Availability shall have been greater than 22.5% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect for a period of 30 consecutive days.
Enhanced Reporting Period
                    "" means all applicable federal, state, and local laws (including common law), regulations, rules, ordinances, codes, decrees, judgments, directives, orders (including consent orders), and binding agreements with any Governmental Authority in each case, relating to pollution or protection of the environment, natural resources, human health and safety, or the presence, Release of, or exposure to, Hazardous Materials, or the generation, manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, transport, recycling or handling of, or the arrangement for such activities with respect to, Hazardous Materials.
Environmental Laws
                    "" means any liability, claim, action, suit, agreement, judgment or order arising under or relating to any Environmental Law for any damages, injunctive relief, losses, fines, penalties, fees, expenses (including reasonable fees and expenses of attorneys and consultants) or costs, whether contingent or otherwise, including those arising from or relating to: (a) compliance or non-compliance with any Environmental Law or permit, license or approval issued thereunder, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the Release of any Hazardous Materials or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
                    "" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest.
Equity Interests
                    "" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
                    "" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with a Borrower, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
                    "" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of an "accumulated funding deficiency" (as defined in Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(d) of the Code or Section 303(d) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by any Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by any Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by any Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by any Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any
ERISA Event
Multiemployer Plan from any Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability (or that could reasonably be expected to result in Withdrawal Liability) or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
                    "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Article VII.
Event of Default
                    "" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, any Issuing Bank or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of any Borrower hereunder, (a) income or franchise Taxes imposed on (or measured by) its net income by the United States of America, or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located, (b) any branch profits Taxes imposed by the United States of America or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction described in clause (a) above and (c) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by a Borrower under Section 2.19(b)), any withholding Tax that is imposed by the United States of America and would apply to amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party to this Agreement (or designates a new lending office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lender's failure to comply with Section 2.17(f), except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new lending office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrowers with respect to such withholding Tax pursuant to Section 2.17(a).
Excluded Taxes
                    "" means the Credit Agreement dated as of November 25, 2009, as amended to the date hereof, among Dress Barn, the Borrowing Subsidiaries named therein, the other loan parties party thereto, the lenders party thereto and JPMCB, as administrative agent for such lenders.
Existing Credit Agreement
                    "" means the letters of credit referred to on .
Existing Letters of Credit
Schedule 2.06
                    "" means the Mortgage, Assignment of Leases and Rents and Security Agreement dated as of June 24, 2003, given by Dunnigan, as assignor, to John Hancock Life Insurance Company, as assignee, in the principal amount of $34,000,000, covering the Distribution Center and securing the Existing Mortgage Loan.
Existing Mortgage
                    "" means the mortgage loan in the initial principal amount of $34,000,000 made by John Hancock Life Insurance Company to Dunnigan, the proceeds of which were used by Dunnigan to finance the purchase of the Distribution Center, which loan matures in July 2023.
Existing Mortgage Loan
                    "" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight
Federal Funds Effective Rate
Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
                    "" means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of a Borrower.
Financial Officer
                    "" means, for any period, the ratio of (a) (i) Consolidated EBITDAR for such period minus (ii) Capital Expenditures for such period, to (b) Consolidated Fixed Charges for such period. In the event that New Parent or any Subsidiary shall have completed an acquisition (including a Permitted Acquisition) or disposition of any material Person, division or business unit since the beginning of the relevant period, the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio shall be determined for such period on a pro forma basis as if such acquisition or disposition, and any related incurrence or repayment of Indebtedness, had occurred at the beginning of such period.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
                    "" means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States of America, a State thereof or the District of Columbia.
Foreign Lender
                    "" means a pledge or charge agreement granting a Lien on Equity Interests in a Foreign Subsidiary to secure the Secured Obligations, governed by the law of the jurisdiction of organization of such Foreign Subsidiary and in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Foreign Pledge Agreement
                    "" means a Subsidiary that (i) is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States or any State thereof or the District of Columbia, or (ii) substantially all the assets of which consist of Equity Interests of Subsidiaries defined in clause (i).
Foreign Subsidiary
                    "" means the deposit account(s) of the Borrowers to which the Administrative Agent is authorized by the Borrowers to transfer the proceeds of any Borrowings requested or authorized pursuant to this Agreement.
Funding Accounts
                    "" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
                    "" means, at any time, the sum of (a) 50% of the aggregate remaining amount at such time of outstanding gift certificates and gift cards sold by the Borrowers entitling the holder thereof to use all or a portion of the certificate or gift card to pay all or a portion of the purchase price of Inventory and (b) 100% of the aggregate amount at such time of outstanding customer deposits and merchandise credits entitling the holder thereof to use all or a portion of such deposit or credit to pay all or a portion of the purchase price of Inventory.
Gift Card Reserve
                    "" means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
                    "" of or by any Person (the "") means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness of any other Person (the "") in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness; , that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 10.01.
Guaranteed Obligations
                    "" means any chemical, material, substance or waste that is prohibited, limited or regulated by or pursuant to any applicable Environmental Law, including, without limitation, any petroleum products or byproducts and all other hydrocarbons, coal ash, radon gas, asbestos-containing materials, urea formaldehyde foam insulation, polychlorinated biphenyls, chlorofluorocarbons and all other ozone-depleting substances or mold.
Hazardous Materials
                    "" of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person upon which interest charges are customarily paid, (d) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (e) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding trade accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business), (f) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed (but only to the extent of the lesser of (x) the amount of such Indebtedness and (y) the fair market value of such property, if such Indebtedness has not been assumed), (g) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (h) all Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations of such Person, (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty and (j) all
Indebtedness
obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers' acceptances. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor by contract, as a matter of law or otherwise as a result of such Person's ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor.
                    "" means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.03(b).
Indemnitee
                    "" means the information package prepared for Lenders relating to the Borrowers and the Transactions (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) and dated August 2009, and all other written materials relating to the Borrowers and the Transactions (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement or in this Agreement) provided to the Lenders in connection with the syndication of the Revolving Commitments under the Existing Credit Agreement or this Agreement or the solicitation of consents to the amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement effected hereby.
Information Materials
                    "" means any secured intercompany credit agreements that may, from time to time, be entered into between New Parent, as lender, and Dress Barn, Tween Brands and/or Maurices, as borrowers.
Intercompany Credit Agreements
                    "" means a request by the Borrower Representative to convert or continue a Revolving Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.08.
Interest Election Request
                    "" means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), the first Business Day of each calendar quarter and the Maturity Date, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months' duration, each day prior to the end of such Interest Period that is three, six or nine months' after the first day of such Interest Period, and the Maturity Date, and (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, Protective Advance or Overadvance, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid and the Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
                    "" means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months (or, with the consent of each Lender, nine or twelve months) thereafter, as the Borrower Representative may elect; , that (i) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing only, such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (ii) any Interest Period that commences
Interest Period
provided
on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and, in the case of a Revolving Borrowing, thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in the Restated Security Agreement.
Inventory
                    "" means (a) each of JPMCB and Bank of America, N.A., in its capacity as an issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Section 2.06(i), and (b) solely with respect to any Existing Letter of Credit, any Lender that shall have issued such Letter of Credit. An Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Bank, in which case the term "Issuing Bank" shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Bank
                    "" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., a national banking association, in its individual capacity, and its successors.
JPMCB
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 5.15.
Joinder Agreement
                    "" means Jule, Inc., a Subsidiary of Dress Barn.
Jule
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.06(j).
LC Collateral Account
                    "" means a payment made by an Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
                    "" means, at any time, the sum of the Commercial LC Exposure and the Standby LC Exposure. The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
                    "" means, individually and collectively as the context may require, the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks.
Lender Parties
                    "" means the Persons listed on the and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption or an amendment referred to in Section 2.09(f), other than any such Person that shall have ceased to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term "Lenders" includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
Commitment Schedule
                    "" means each Existing Letter of Credit and any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement.
Letter of Credit
                    "" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the "" with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
LIBO Rate
                    "" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
                    "" means, on any date of determination, the sum of (a) the aggregate amount of unrestricted cash, unrestricted cash equivalents and unrestricted short-term investments of the Loan Parties and (b) Availability.
Liquidity
                    "" means this Agreement, any promissory notes issued pursuant to this Agreement, any Letter of Credit applications, the Collateral Documents, the Loan Guarantee, and all other agreements, instruments, documents and certificates identified in Section 4.01 executed and delivered to, or in favor of, the Administrative Agent or any Lender Party and including all other pledges, powers of attorney, consents, assignments, contracts, notices, letter of credit agreements and all other written matter whether heretofore, now or hereafter executed by or on behalf of any Loan Party, or any employee of any Loan Party, and delivered to the Administrative Agent or any Lender Party in connection with the Agreement or the transactions contemplated thereby. Any reference in this Agreement or any other Loan Document to a Loan Document shall include all appendices, exhibits or schedules thereto, and all amendments, restatements, supplements or other modifications thereto, and shall refer to this Agreement or such Loan Document as the same may be in effect at any and all times such reference becomes operative.
Loan Documents
                    "" means of this Agreement.
Loan Guarantee
Article X
                    "" means each Loan Party.
Loan Guarantor
                    "" means the Borrowers, the Borrowers' Domestic Subsidiaries (other than Dunnigan and Jule) and any other Person who becomes a party to this Agreement pursuant to a Joinder Agreement and their successors and assigns.
Loan Parties
                    "" means the loans and advances made by the Lenders pursuant to this Agreement, including Swingline Loans, Overadvances and Protective Advances.
Loans
                    "" means any event, development or circumstance that constitutes, has resulted in or could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Material Adverse Change
                    "" means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, operations, properties, condition, (financial or otherwise), results of operations or liabilities (including contingent liabilities) of New Parent and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of any Borrower to perform any of its material obligations under the Loan Documents to which it is a party, (c) the Collateral, or the Administrative Agent's Liens (on behalf of itself and the Lender Parties) on the Collateral or the priority of such Liens (with materiality to be determined for purposes of this clause (c) in terms of the Collateral taken as a whole, and not in terms of any individual item of Collateral), or (d) the rights of or benefits available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Lenders under the Loan Documents (other than, in the case of this clause (d) only, a material adverse effect caused by any improper action or omission of any Issuing Bank or Lender or the Administrative Agent).
Material Adverse Effect
                    "" means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of New Parent and the Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $20,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the "obligations" of New Parent or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that New Parent or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
                    "" means January 3, 2016, or any earlier date on which the Commitments are reduced to zero or otherwise terminated pursuant to the terms hereof.
Maturity Date
                    "" means Maurices Incorporated, a wholly owned Subsidiary of New Parent.
Maurices
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 10.09.
Maximum Liability
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.16.
Maximum Rate
                    "" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereto.
Moody's
                    "" means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
                    "" means Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
New Parent
                    "" means, with respect to Inventory of any Person, the orderly liquidation value thereof, as determined on a basis consistent in all material respects with the inventory appraisals referred to in Section 4.01(h) (with such adjustments as shall be deemed appropriate to reflect events or changes in circumstances after the dates of such appraisals) by an appraiser acceptable to the Administrative Agent, net of all costs of liquidation thereof.
Net Orderly Liquidation Value
                    "" means, with respect to any event, (a) the cash proceeds received in respect of such event including (i) any cash received in respect of any non-cash proceeds (including any cash payments received by way of deferred payment of principal pursuant to a note or installment receivable or purchase price adjustment receivable or otherwise, but excluding any interest payments), but only as and when received, (ii) in the case of a casualty, insurance proceeds and (iii) in the case of a condemnation or similar event, condemnation awards and similar payments, net of (b) the sum of (i) all customary fees and out-of-pocket expenses paid to third parties (other than Affiliates of New Parent) in connection with such event (including fees and out-of-pocket expenses attributable to claiming such proceeds), (ii) in the case of a sale, transfer or other disposition of an asset (including pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction or a casualty or a condemnation or similar proceeding), the amount of all payments required to be made as a result of such event to repay Indebtedness (other than Loans) secured by such asset or otherwise subject to mandatory prepayment as a result of such event and (iii) the amount of all taxes paid (or reasonably estimated to be payable) and the amount of any reserves established to fund contingent liabilities reasonably estimated to be payable, in each case during the year that such event occurred or the next succeeding year and that are directly attributable to such event (as determined reasonably and in good faith by a Financial Officer), including any such reserves established in respect of indemnification, pension and other post-employment benefit liabilities, workers compensation liabilities, liabilities associated with retiree benefits or benefits related to environmental matters.
Net Proceeds
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.02(d).
Non-Consenting Lender
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 10.10.
Non-Paying Guarantor
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 10.02.
Obligated Party
                    "" means all unpaid principal of and accrued and unpaid interest on the Loans, all LC Exposure, all accrued and unpaid fees and all expenses, reimbursements, indemnities and other obligations of the Loan Parties to the Lenders or to any Lender, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any indemnified party
Obligations
arising under the Loan Documents, whether direct or indirect (including those acquired by assumption), absolute or contingent, due or to become due, now existing or hereafter arising and including interest, fees, costs, expenses and indemnities that accrue after the commencement by or against any Loan Party or any Affiliate thereof of any proceeding under any bankruptcy or insolvency laws naming such Person as the debtor in such proceeding, regardless of whether such interest, fees costs, expenses and indemnities are allowed claims in such proceeding.
                    "" means November 25, 2009, the date on which the conditions specified in Section 4.01 of the Existing Credit Agreement were satisfied.
Original Effective Date
                    "" means any and all present or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made hereunder or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, this Agreement.
Other Taxes
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.05(b).
Overadvance
                    "" means any amount which a Borrower owes to the Administrative Agent under Section 9.17.
Parallel Debt
                    "" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Participant
                    "" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Participant Register
                    "" means the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001 (Title III of Pub.L. No. 107-56 (Signed into law October 26, 2001)).
Patriot Act
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 10.10.
Paying Guarantor
                    "" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
                    "" means a certificate in the form of or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Perfection Certificate
Exhibit F
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 6.04(g).
Permitted Acquisition
                    "" means a determination made in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable (from the perspective of a secured asset-based lender) business judgment.
Permitted Discretion
                    "" means:
Permitted Encumbrances
that the term "Permitted Encumbrances" shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
provided
                    "" means:
Permitted Investments
                    "" means David Jaffe (or any member of his family that is actively involved in the management of the Borrower), Armand Correia, Reid Hackney, Lisa Rhodes and George Goldfarb.
Permitted Investors
                    "" means any payment, dividend or distribution by any Loan Party to New Parent in order to pay consolidated or combined federal, state or local Taxes which payment by New Parent is not in excess of the tax liabilities that would have been payable by New Parent and its Subsidiaries on a stand-alone basis.
Permitted Tax Distribution
                    "" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
                    "" means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which any Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
                    "" means the certain Post-Closing Letter Agreement, dated as of the date hereof, between New Parent and the Administrative Agent, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time.
Post-Closing Letter Agreement
                    "" means:
Prepayment Event
                    "" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMCB as its prime rate at its offices at 270 Park Avenue in New York City or any successor executive office; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
                    "" means, with respect to compliance with any test or covenant hereunder, compliance with such covenant or test after giving effect to any proposed Permitted Acquisition or any Restricted Payment or payment in respect of Indebtedness (collectively, "") (including pro forma adjustments arising out of events which are directly attributable to the proposed Pro Forma Event, are factually supportable and are expected to have a continuing impact, in each case as reasonably determined by New Parent and as certified by a Financial Officer of New Parent and approved by the Administrative Agent) using, for purposes of determining such compliance, the historical financial statements of any entities or assets so acquired or to be acquired and the consolidated financial statements of New Parent and its Subsidiaries which shall be reformulated as if such Pro Forma Event, and all other Pro Forma Event that have been consummated during the period, and any Indebtedness or
Pro Forma Basis
Pro Forma Events
other liabilities incurred in connection with any such Pro Forma Event had been consummated and incurred at the beginning of such period.
                    "" means, at any date of determination, that the Borrowers shall be in compliance with the covenant set forth in Section 6.12 for the most recently completed period of four consecutive fiscal quarters for which financial statements shall have been delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 5.01, calculated on a Pro Forma Basis in respect of the event giving rise to such determination.
Pro Forma Compliance
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.04.
Protective Advance
                    "" of any Person means any capital stock of such Person that is not Disqualified Stock.
Qualified Capital Stock
                    "" means any period (a) commencing (i) at any time when Availability shall be less than 17.5% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect or (ii) at any time when Availability shall have been less than 20% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect for three consecutive Business Days and (b) ending when Availability shall have been greater than 22.5% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect for a period of 60 consecutive days.
Reduced Availability Period
                    "" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Register
                    "" means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
                    "" means any actual release, spill, emission, leaking, dumping, injection, pouring, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migration into or through the environment or within or upon any building, structure, facility or fixture.
Release
                    "" with respect to any leased store, warehouse distribution center, regional distribution center or depot where any Inventory subject to Liens arising by operation of law is located, a reserve equal to two months' rent at such store, warehouse distribution center, regional distribution center or depot.
Rent Reserve
                    "" means the series of transactions described and provided for in the Reorganization Documents that will result in Dress Barn, Tween Brands, and Maurices becoming direct wholly owned subsidiaries of New Parent and the Equity Interests of New Parent being owned by the owners of Dress Barn's Equity Interests immediately prior to the effectiveness of the Reorganization.
Reorganization
                    "" means (a) the Agreement and Plan of Reorganization, (b) the Certificate of Merger, pursuant to which DB Merger Corp. will be merged with and into Dress Barn, and (c) the Stock Distribution Agreement, copies of
Reorganization Documents
which have been made available to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders prior to the date hereof.
                    "" means reports prepared by the Administrative Agent or another Person showing the results of appraisals, field examinations or audits pertaining to the Borrowers' assets from information furnished by or on behalf of the Borrowers, after the Administrative Agent has exercised its rights of inspection pursuant to this Agreement, which Reports may be distributed to the Lenders by the Administrative Agent.
Report
                    "" means, at any time, Lenders having Credit Exposure and unused Commitments representing more than 50% of the sum of the total Credit Exposure and unused Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
                    "" means, as to any Person, the Certificate of Incorporation and By-Laws or other organizational or governing documents of such Person, and any law, treaty, rule or regulation or determination of an arbitrator or a court or other Governmental Authority, in each case applicable to or binding upon such Person or any of its property or to which such Person or any of its property is subject.
Requirement of Law
                    "" means any and all reserves which the Administrative Agent deems necessary, in its Permitted Discretion, to maintain (including, without limitation, reserves for accrued and unpaid interest on the Secured Obligations, Rent Reserves, Gift Card Reserves, Banking Services Reserves and reserves for consignee's, warehousemen's and bailee's charges, reserves for dilution of Accounts, reserves for Inventory shrinkage, reserves for customs charges and shipping charges related to any Inventory in transit, reserves for Swap Obligations, reserves for contingent liabilities of any Loan Party, reserves for uninsured losses of any Loan Party, reserves for uninsured, underinsured, un-indemnified or under-indemnified liabilities or potential liabilities with respect to any litigation and reserves for taxes, fees, assessments, and other governmental charges) with respect to the Collateral or any Loan Party.
Reserves
                    "" means that certain Amended and Restated Pledge and Security Agreement, dated as of the Restatement Effective Date, between the Loan Parties and the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lender Parties, and any other pledge or security agreement entered into by any other Loan Party (as required by this Agreement or any other Loan Document), or any other Person, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time.
Restated Security Agreement
                    "" means January 3, 2011.
Restatement Effective Date
                    "" means (a) any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in New Parent or any Subsidiary, or any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any such Equity Interests in New Parent or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests in New Parent.
Restricted Payment
                    "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit, Protective Advances, Overadvances and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum possible aggregate amount of such Lender's Credit Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to (a) Section 2.09 and (b) assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Revolving Commitment is set forth on the , or in the Assignment and Assumption or amendment pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Revolving Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Revolving Commitments is $200,000,000.
Revolving Commitment
Commitment Schedule
                    "" means a Loan made pursuant to Sections 2.01 and 2.02(a).
Revolving Loan
                    "" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw Hill Companies, Inc., or any successor thereto.
S&P
                    "" means all Obligations, together with all (i) Banking Services Obligations and (ii) Swap Obligations owing to one or more Lenders or their respective Affiliates; that at or prior to the time that any transaction relating to such Swap Obligation is executed, the Lender party thereto (if other than JPMCB) shall have delivered written notice to the Administrative Agent that such a transaction has been entered into and that it constitutes a Secured Obligation entitled to the benefits of the Collateral Documents.
Secured Obligations
provided
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.05(d).
Settlement
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.05(d).
Settlement Date
                    "" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Standby Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements relating to Standby Letters of Credit that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrowers at such time. The Standby LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Standby LC Exposure at such time.
Standby LC Exposure
                    "" means all Letters for Credit other than Commercial Letters of Credit.
Standby Letter of Credit
                    "" means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject with respect to the Adjusted LIBO Rate, for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency Liabilities" in
Statutory Reserve Rate
Regulation D of the Board). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
                    "" means the Stock Distribution Agreement dated as of January 1, 2011 between Dress Barn and New Parent.
Stock Distribution Agreement
                    "" of a Person means any Indebtedness of such Person the payment of which is subordinated to payment of the Secured Obligations.
Subordinated Indebtedness
                    "" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity (a) of which securities or other ownership interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (b) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
                    "" means any direct or indirect subsidiary of New Parent or a Loan Party, as applicable.
Subsidiary
                    "" means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Borrowers or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
                    "" of a Person means any and all obligations of such Person, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor), under (a) any and all Swap Agreements, and (b) any and all cancellations, buy backs, reversals, terminations or assignments of any Swap Agreement transaction.
Swap Obligations
                    "" means, at any time, the sum of the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Swingline Loans at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
                    "" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder, and its successors and assigns in such capacity.
Swingline Lender
                    "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.05(a).
Swingline Loan
                    "" means Bank of America, N.A.
Syndication Agent
                    "" means, as to any Person, any lease (including leases that may be terminated by the lessee at any time) of any property (whether real, personal or mixed) (a) that is accounted for as an operating lease under GAAP and (b) in respect of which the lessee retains or obtains ownership of the property so leased for US federal income tax purposes, other than any such lease under which such person is the lessor.
Synthetic Lease
                    "" means, as to any Person, an amount equal to the sum of (a) the obligations of such person to pay rent or other amounts under any Synthetic Lease which are attributable to principal and, without duplication, (b) the amount of any purchase price payment under any Synthetic Lease assuming the lessee exercises the option to purchase the leased property at the end of the lease term.
Synthetic Lease Obligations
                    "" means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, charges or withholdings imposed by any Governmental Authority, including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto.
Taxes
                    "" means the (a) execution, delivery and performance by the Loan Parties of this Agreement, the borrowing of the Loans, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder, (b) the creation and perfection of the security interests provided for in the Collateral Documents and (c) the Reorganization.
Transactions
                    "" means Tween Brands, Inc., a Subsidiary of New Parent.
Tween Brands
                    "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
                    "" means the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect from time to time in the State of New York or any other state the laws of which are required to be applied in connection with the perfection of security interests created by the Collateral Documents.
UCC
                    "" means, at any time, any Secured Obligations (or portion thereof) that are contingent in nature or unliquidated at such time, including
Unliquidated Obligations
any Secured Obligation that is: (i) an obligation to reimburse a bank for drawings not yet made under a letter of credit issued by it; (ii) any other obligation (including any guarantee) that is contingent in nature at such time; or (iii) an obligation to provide collateral to secure any of the foregoing types of obligations.
                    "" means credits earned from vendors for volume purchases that reduce net inventory costs for the Borrowers.
Vendor Rebates
                    "" means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
                    SECTION 1.02. For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Loan") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Loan") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Loan"). Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Borrowing") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Borrowing") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing").
Classification of Loans and Borrowings.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
                    SECTION 1.03. The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (c) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
Terms Generally.
                    SECTION 1.04. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that, if the Borrower Representative notifies the Administrative Agent that the Borrowers request an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower Representative that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the
Accounting Terms; GAAP.
provided
application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith; that the Borrower Representative, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent and Lenders, on the other hand, agree to negotiate in good faith with respect to any proposed amendment to eliminate or adjust for the effect of any such change in GAAP.
provided
                    SECTION 2.01. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender, severally and not jointly, agrees to make Revolving Loans to the Borrowers from time to time during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in (i) such Lender's Credit Exposure exceeding such Lender's Revolving Commitment or (ii) the total Credit Exposures exceeding the lesser of (x) the aggregate Revolving Commitments or (y) the Borrowing Base, subject to the Administrative Agent's authority, in its sole discretion, to make Protective Advances and Overadvances pursuant to the terms of Section 2.04 and 2.05. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrowers may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Commitments.
                    SECTION 2.02. (a) Each Loan (other than a Swingline Loan) shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans of the same Class and Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments of the applicable Class. Any Protective Advance and any Swingline Loan shall be made in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.04 and 2.05.
Loans and Borrowings.
                    (b) Subject to Section 2.14, each Revolving Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower Representative may request in accordance herewith. Each Swingline Loan shall be an ABR Loan. Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrowers to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
                    (c) At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000.
                    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower Representative shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
                    SECTION 2.03. To request a Revolving Borrowing, the Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent
Requests for Revolving Borrowings.
of such request either in writing (delivered by hand or facsimile) in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower Representative or by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing; that any such notice of an ABR Revolving Borrowing to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.06(e) may be given not later than 12:00 noon, New York time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower Representative. Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.01:
provided
If no election as to the Type of Revolving Borrowing is specified, then the requested Revolving Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, then the applicable Borrower(s) shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
                    SECTION 2.04. (a) Subject to the limitations set forth below, the Administrative Agent is authorized by the Borrowers and the Lenders, from time to time in the Administrative Agent's sole discretion (but shall have absolutely no obligation), to make Loans to the Borrowers, on behalf of all Lenders, which the Administrative Agent, in its Permitted Discretion, deems necessary or desirable (i) to preserve or protect the Collateral or any portion thereof, (ii) to enhance the likelihood of, or maximize the amount of, repayment of the Loans and other Obligations, or (iii) to pay any other amounts required to be paid by the Borrowers pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, including payments of reimbursable expenses (including costs, fees, and expenses as described in Section 9.03) and other sums payable under the Loan
Protective Advances.
Documents which have not been paid by the Borrowers after written demand therefor (any of such Loans are herein referred to as ""); that, the aggregate amount of Protective Advances outstanding at any time shall not at any time exceed (i) $10,000,000 in the aggregate or, (ii) together with any Overadvances outstanding at any time pursuant to Section 2.05, $15,000,000 in the aggregate; that, the aggregate Credit Exposure shall not exceed the aggregate Revolving Commitments. Protective Advances may be made even if the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have not been satisfied. The Protective Advances shall be secured by the Liens in favor of the Administrative Agent in and to the Collateral and shall constitute Obligations hereunder. All Protective Advances shall be ABR Borrowings. The Administrative Agent's authorization to make Protective Advances may be revoked at any time by the Required Lenders. Any such revocation must be in writing and shall become effective prospectively upon the Administrative Agent's receipt thereof. At any time that there is sufficient Availability and the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have been satisfied, the Administrative Agent may request the Lenders to make Revolving Loans to repay a Protective Advance. At any other time the Administrative Agent may require the Lenders to fund their risk participations described in Section 2.04(b).
Protective Advances
provided
provided
further
                    (b) Upon the making of a Protective Advance by the Administrative Agent (whether before or after the occurrence of a Default), each Lender shall be deemed, without further action by any party hereto, to have unconditionally and irrevocably purchased from the Administrative Agent without recourse or warranty, an undivided interest and participation in such Protective Advance in proportion to its Applicable Percentage. From and after the date, if any, on which any Lender is required to fund its participation in any Protective Advance purchased hereunder, the Administrative Agent shall promptly distribute to such Lender, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of all payments of principal and interest and all proceeds of Collateral received by the Administrative Agent in respect of such Protective Advance.
                    SECTION 2.05. (a) The Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Lenders agree that in order to facilitate the administration of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, promptly after the Borrower Representative requests an ABR Borrowing, the Swingline Lender may, in its discretion, elect to have the terms of this Section 2.05(a) apply to such Borrowing Request by advancing, on behalf of the Lenders and in the amount requested, same day funds to the Borrowers, on the applicable Borrowing date to the Funding Account(s) (each such Loan made solely by the Swingline Lender pursuant to this Section 2.05(a) is referred to in this Agreement as a ""), with settlement among them as to the Swingline Loans to take place on a periodic basis as set forth in Section 2.05(d). Each Swingline Loan shall be subject to all the terms and conditions applicable to other ABR Loans funded by the Lenders, except that all payments thereon shall be payable to the Swingline Lender solely for its own account. The aggregate amount of Swingline Loans outstanding at any time shall not exceed $20,000,000. The Swingline Lender shall not make any Swingline Loan if the requested Swingline Loan exceeds Availability (before giving effect to such Swingline Loan). All Swingline Loans shall be ABR Borrowings.
Swingline Loans and Overadvances.
Swingline Loan
                    (b) Any provision of this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, at the request of the Borrower Representative, the Administrative Agent may in its sole discretion (but with absolutely no obligation), make Revolving Loans to the Borrowers, on behalf of the Lenders, in amounts that exceed Availability (any such excess Revolving Loans are herein referred to collectively as ""); that no Overadvance shall result in a Default due to Borrowers' failure to comply with Section 2.01 for so long as such Overadvance remains outstanding in accordance with the terms of this paragraph, but solely with respect to the amount of such Overadvance. In addition, Overadvances may be made even if the condition precedent set forth in Section 4.02(c) has not been satisfied. All Overadvances shall constitute ABR Borrowings. The authority of the Administrative Agent to make Overadvances is limited to an aggregate amount not to exceed (i) $10,000,000 at any time outstanding or, (ii) together with all Protective Advances outstanding at any time pursuant to Section 2.04, $15,000,000 at any time outstanding. No Overadvance may remain outstanding for more than sixty days and no Overadvance shall cause any Lender's Credit Exposure to exceed its Revolving Commitment; that the Required Lenders may at any time revoke the Administrative Agent's authorization to make Overadvances. Any such revocation must be in writing and shall become effective prospectively upon the Administrative Agent's receipt thereof.
Overadvances
provided
provided
                    (c) Upon the making of a Swingline Loan or an Overadvance (whether before or after the occurrence of a Default and regardless of whether a Settlement has been requested with respect to such Swingline Loan or Overadvance), each Lender shall be deemed, without further action by any party hereto, to have unconditionally and irrevocably purchased from the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, without recourse or warranty, an undivided interest and participation in such Swingline Loan or Overadvance in proportion to its Applicable Percentage of the aggregate Revolving Commitments. The Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent may, at any time, require the Lenders to fund their participations. From and after the date, if any, on which any Lender is required to fund its participation in any Swingline Loan or Overadvance purchased hereunder, the Administrative Agent shall promptly distribute to such Lender its Applicable Percentage of all payments of principal and interest and all proceeds of Collateral received by the Administrative Agent in respect of such Loan.
                    (d) The Administrative Agent, on behalf of the Swingline Lender, shall request settlement (a "") with the Lenders on at least a weekly basis or on any earlier date that the Administrative Agent elects, by notifying the Lenders of such requested Settlement by facsimile, telephone, or e-mail no later than 1:00 p.m. New York time on the date of such requested Settlement (the ""). Each Lender (other than the Swingline Lender, in the case of the Swingline Loans) shall transfer the amount of such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the outstanding principal amount of the applicable Loan with respect to which Settlement is requested to the Administrative Agent, to such account of the Administrative Agent as the Administrative Agent may designate, not later than 3:00 p.m., New York time, on such Settlement Date. Settlements may occur during the existence of a Default and whether or not the applicable conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have then been satisfied. Such amounts transferred to
Settlement
Settlement Date
the Administrative Agent shall be applied against the amounts of the Swingline Lender's Swingline Loans and, together with Swingline Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan, shall constitute Revolving Loans of such Lenders, respectively. If any such amount is not transferred to the Administrative Agent by any Lender on such Settlement Date, the Swingline Lender shall be entitled to recover such amount on demand from such Lender together with interest thereon as specified in Section 2.07.
                    SECTION 2.06. (a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower Representative may request the issuance of Letters of Credit for its own account or for the account of another Borrower, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks, at any time and from time to time during the Availability Period. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrowers to, or entered into by the Borrowers with, an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
Letters of Credit.
General.
                    (b) To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower Representative shall hand deliver or facsimile (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the applicable Issuing Bank) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If requested by an Issuing Bank, the applicable Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on such Issuing Bank's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrowers shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $150,000,000, (ii) the Standby LC Exposure shall not exceed $25,000,000, and (iii) the total Credit Exposures shall not exceed the lesser of (x) the aggregate Revolving Commitments or (y) the Borrowing Base.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions.
                    (c) Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date; that a Letter of Credit may expire at a later date if the applicable Borrower shall have deposited cash collateral in an LC Collateral Account pursuant to Section 2.06(j) in an amount equal to 103% of the undrawn face amount of such Letter of
Expiration Date.
provided
Credit. Any Letter of Credit may provide by its terms that it may be automatically extended for additional successive one year periods on terms reasonably acceptable to the applicable Issuing Bank. Any Letter of Credit providing for automatic extension shall be extended upon the then current expiration date without any further action by any Person unless the applicable Issuing Bank shall have given notice to the applicable beneficiary (with a copy to the applicable Borrower) of the election by such Issuing Bank not to extend such Letter of Credit, such notice to be given not fewer than 30 days prior to the then current expiration date of such Letter of Credit; that no Letter of Credit may be extended automatically or otherwise beyond the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date (other than in accordance with this clause (c)).
provided
                    (d) By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the applicable Issuing Bank or the Lenders, such Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from such Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of such Issuing Bank, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by such Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrowers on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrowers for any reason. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations.
                    (e) If an Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrowers shall, following notice of such LC Disbursement to the Borrower Representative, reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 1:00 p.m., New York time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower Representative shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower Representative prior to such time on such date, then not later than 1:00 p.m., New York time, on (i) the Business Day that the Borrower Representative receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York time, on the day of receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower Representative receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt; that the Borrowers may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 or 2.05 that such payment be financed with an ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan in an equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrowers' obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Revolving Borrowing or
Reimbursement.
provided
Swingline Loan. If the Borrowers fail to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrowers in respect thereof and such Lender's Applicable Percentage thereof. Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrowers, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to such Issuing Bank the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Borrowers pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the applicable Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse such Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and such Issuing Bank as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse an Issuing Bank for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of ABR Revolving Loans or a Swingline Loan as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrowers of their obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
mutatis
mutandis
                    (f) . The Borrowers' joint and several obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by any Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not substantially comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrowers' obligations hereunder. None of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders or the Issuing Banks, or any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Banks; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse any Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrowers to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by any Borrower that are caused by any Issuing Bank's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or wilful misconduct on the part of an Issuing Bank (as
Obligations Absolute
provided
finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), such Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, an Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
                    (g) Each Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit. Each Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the applicable Borrower by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of such demand for payment and whether such Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrowers of their obligation to reimburse such Issuing Bank and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures.
provided
                    (h) If any Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrowers shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrowers reimburse such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Borrowers fail to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then Section 2.13(d) shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the applicable Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse the Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
Interim Interest.
provided
                    (i) Any Issuing Bank may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Borrower Representative, the Administrative Agent, the replaced Issuing Bank and the successor Issuing Bank. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of an Issuing Bank. At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Borrowers shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Bank pursuant to Section 2.12(b). From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Bank shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term "Issuing Bank" shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Bank, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Banks, as the context shall require. After the replacement of an Issuing Bank hereunder, the replaced Issuing Bank shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
Replacement of the Issuing Banks.
                    (j) If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Borrower Representative receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Borrowers shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders (the ""), an amount in cash equal to 103% of the LC Exposure as of such date plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to any Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII. Such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the Secured Obligations. The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account and the Borrowers hereby grant the Administrative Agent a security interest in the LC Collateral Account. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Borrowers' risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrowers for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated, be applied to satisfy other Secured Obligations. If the Borrowers are required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrowers within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived. If any Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder pursuant to Section 2.11(b), such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to such Borrower as and to the extent that, after giving effect to such return, the Borrowers would remain in compliance with Section 2.11(b) and no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Cash Collateralization.
LC Collateral Account
provided
                    (k) Each Existing Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be a Letter of Credit issued hereunder as of the Original Effective Date for all purposes hereof and of the other Loan Documents, and no issuance or similar fees (as distinguished from ongoing participation or fronting fees) will be required in connection with the Existing Letters of Credit. Without limiting the foregoing (i) each such Existing Letter of Credit shall be included in the calculation of the LC Exposure, (ii) all liabilities of the Borrowers and the other Loan Parties with respect to such Existing Letters of Credit shall constitute Obligations and (iii) each Lender shall have reimbursement obligations with respect to such Existing Letters of Credit as provided in this Section 2.06. Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this Section 2.06, no Existing Letter of Credit that has not been issued by an Issuing Bank referred to in clause (a) of the definition of such term may be renewed or extended.
Existing Letters of Credit.
                    SECTION 2.07. (a) Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 1:00 p.m., New York time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders in an amount equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the requested Borrowing; that, Swingline Loans shall be made as provided in Section 2.05. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower Representative by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to the Funding Account(s); that ABR Revolving Loans made to finance the reimbursement of (i) an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(e) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the applicable Issuing Bank and (ii) a Protective Advance or an Overadvance shall be retained by the Administrative Agent.
Funding of Borrowings.
provided
provided
                    (b) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the applicable Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrowers severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the applicable Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrowers, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans, but without prejudice to any claim the Borrowers may have against such Lender. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing.
                    SECTION 2.08. (a) Each Revolving Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request. Thereafter, the Borrower Representative may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. The Borrower Representative may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing. This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings, Overadvances or Protective Advances, which may not be converted or continued.
Interest Elections.
                    (b) To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Borrowers
were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower Representative.
                    (c) Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrowers shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.
                    (d) Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
                    (e) If the Borrower Representative fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower Representative, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Revolving Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
                    SECTION 2.09. (a) Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Maturity Date.
Termination and Reduction of Commitments; Increase in Revolving Commitments.
                    (b) The Borrowers may at any time terminate the Commitments upon (i) the payment in full of all outstanding Loans, together with accrued and unpaid interest thereon and on any LC Disbursements, (ii) the cancellation and return of all outstanding Letters of Credit (or alternatively, with respect to each such Letter of Credit, the furnishing to the Administrative Agent of a cash deposit (or at the discretion of the Administrative Agent a back up Standby Letter of Credit reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent) equal to 103% of the portion of the LC Exposure attributable to such Letter of Credit as of such date), (iii) the payment in full of all accrued and unpaid fees and (iv) the payment in full of all reimbursable expenses and other Obligations together with accrued and unpaid interest thereon.
                    (c) The Borrowers may from time to time reduce the Revolving Commitments; that (i) each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 and (ii) the Borrowers shall not reduce the Revolving Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.11, the sum of the Credit Exposures would exceed the lesser of the total Revolving Commitments and the Borrowing Base.
provided
                    (d) The Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Borrower Representative pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Borrower Representative may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower Representative (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied. Any termination or reduction of the Commitments shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
provided
                    (e) The Borrowers shall have the right to increase the aggregate Revolving Commitments by obtaining additional Revolving Commitments, either from one or more of the Lenders or from one or more other lending institutions; that (i) no Lender hereunder shall have any obligation to provide any such requested increase, (ii) any such request for an increase shall be in a minimum amount of $10,000,000, (iii) the aggregate amount of all additional Revolving Credit Commitments obtained under this paragraph shall not exceed $50,000,000, (iv) the Administrative Agent shall have approved the identity of any such new Lender, such approval not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, (v) any such new Lender shall assume all the rights and obligations of a "Lender" hereunder, and (vi) the procedure described in Section 2.09(f) shall have been satisfied.
provided
                    (f) Any amendment hereto for such an increase or addition shall be in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and shall only require the
written signatures of the Administrative Agent, the Borrowers and the Lender(s) being added or increasing their Commitments, subject only to the approval of all Lenders if any such increase would cause the aggregate amount of all additional Revolving Credit Commitments obtained under paragraph (e) of this Section to exceed $50,000,000. As a condition precedent to such an increase, the Borrower Representative shall deliver to the Administrative Agent (i) a certificate of each Loan Party signed by an authorized officer of such Loan Party (A) certifying and attaching the resolutions adopted by such Loan Party approving or consenting to such increase, and (B) in the case of the Borrowers, certifying that, before and after giving effect to such increase, (x) the representations and warranties contained in Article III and the other Loan Documents are true and correct in all material respects, except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they are true and correct as of such earlier date, and (y) no Default exists and (ii) an opinion of counsel to the Loan Parties as to the power and authority of the Loan Parties to effect such increase and such other customary and related matters as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request.
                    (g) Within a reasonable time after the effective date of any increase, the Administrative Agent shall, and is hereby authorized and directed to, revise the to reflect such increase and shall distribute such revised to each of the Lenders and the Borrowers, whereupon such revised shall replace the old and become part of this Agreement. On the Business Day following any such increase, all outstanding ABR Advances shall be reallocated among the Lenders (including any newly added Lenders) in accordance with the Lenders' respective revised Applicable Percentages. Eurodollar Advances shall be reallocated among the Lenders at the expiration of the applicable Interest Periods in effect at the time of any such increase.
Commitment Schedule
Commitment Schedule
Commitment Schedule
Commitment Schedule
                    SECTION 2.10. (a) The Borrowers hereby unconditionally promise to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan on the Maturity Date and (ii) to the Administrative Agent the then unpaid amount of each Protective Advance and Overadvance on the earlier of the Maturity Date and demand by the Administrative Agent therefor.
Repayment and Amortization of Loans; Evidence of Debt.
                    (b) On each Business Day during any Dominion Period, the Administrative Agent shall apply all funds credited to a Concentration Account on such Business Day or the immediately preceding Business Day (at the discretion of the Administrative Agent, whether or not immediately available) to prepay any Protective Advances and Overadvance that may be outstanding and to prepay the Revolving Loans (including Swingline Loans) and to cash collateralize outstanding LC Exposure.
first
second
                    (c) Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrowers to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
                    (d) The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrowers to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
                    (e) The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (c) or (d) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrowers to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
                    (f) Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the Borrowers shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
                    SECTION 2.11. (a) The Borrowers shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to prior notice in accordance with paragraph (e) of this Section.
Prepayment of Loans.
                    (b) Except for Protective Advances permitted under Section 2.04 and Overadvances permitted under Section 2.05, in the event and on such occasion that the total Credit Exposure exceeds the lesser of (A) the aggregate Revolving Commitments and (B) the Borrowing Base, the Borrowers shall prepay the Revolving Loans, LC Exposure and/or Swingline Loans in an aggregate amount equal to such excess.
                    (c) In the event and on each occasion that any Net Proceeds are received by or on behalf of any Loan Party in respect of any Prepayment Event, the Borrowers shall, immediately after such Net Proceeds are received by any Loan Party, prepay the Obligations as set forth in paragraph (d) below in an aggregate amount equal to 100% of such Net Proceeds.
                    (d) All prepayments pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be applied, to prepay any Protective Advances and Overadvances that may be outstanding, pro rata, and to prepay the Revolving Loans (including Swingline Loans) without a corresponding reduction in the Revolving Commitment, and , if a Dominion Period shall be in effect, to cash collateralize outstanding LC Exposure.
first
second
third
                    (e) The Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment or (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York time, on the date of prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid; that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.09, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.09. Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Revolving Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Revolving Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Revolving Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02. Each prepayment of a Revolving Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Revolving Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.13.
provided
                    (f) Amounts to be applied pursuant to this Section 2.11 to prepay any Eurodollar Borrowing shall be deposited in a Breakage Prepayment Account (as defined below) if the applicable Borrower so requests in order to avoid the incurrence of costs under Section 2.16. On the last day of the Interest Period of such Eurodollar Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall apply any cash on deposit in such Breakage Prepayment Account to amounts due in respect of such Eurodollar Borrowing until all amounts due in respect thereof have been satisfied (with any remaining funds being returned to the Borrower Representative) or until all the allocable cash on deposit has been exhausted. For purposes of this paragraph (f), the term "" shall mean an account established by the Borrower Representative with the Administrative Agent and over which the Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal for application in accordance with this paragraph (f). The Administrative Agent will, at the request of the Borrower Representative, invest amounts on deposit in a Breakage Prepayment Account in short-term, cash equivalent investments selected by the Administrative Agent in consultation with the Borrower Representative that mature on or prior to the last day of the Interest Period of the applicable Eurodollar Borrowing; , , that the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to invest amounts on deposit in a Breakage Prepayment Account if a Default or an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing. The Borrowers shall indemnify the Administrative Agent for any losses relating to the investments made at the request or direction of the Borrower Representative so that the amount available to prepay amounts due in respect of the applicable Eurodollar Borrowing on the last day of the applicable Interest Period is not less than the amount that would have been available had no investments been made pursuant thereto. Other than any interest earned on such investments (which shall be for the account of the Borrowers, to the extent not necessary for the prepayment of Eurodollar Borrowings in accordance with this Section), the Breakage Prepayment Account shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments in the
Breakage Prepayment Account
provided
however
Breakage Prepayment Account shall be deposited in the Breakage Prepayment Account and reinvested and disbursed as specified above. If the maturity of the Loans and all amounts due hereunder has been accelerated pursuant to Article VII, the Administrative Agent may, in its sole discretion, apply all amounts on deposit in the Breakage Prepayment Account to satisfy any of the Obligations (and the Borrowers have pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement or another Collateral Document granted to the Administrative Agent a security interest in the Breakage Prepayment Account to secure such Obligations).
                    SECTION 2.12. (a) The Borrowers agree to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue for each day on the amount of the unused Revolving Commitment of such Lender on such day at a rate equal to 0.375% per annum. Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the first Business Day of each January, April, July and October, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Restatement Effective Date, and on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate. All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed. For purposes of computing commitment fees, the Revolving Commitment of a Lender shall be deemed to be used to the extent of the outstanding Revolving Loans and LC Exposure of such Lender (and the Swingline Exposure and participations in Protective Advances and Overadvances of such Lender shall be disregarded for such purpose).
Fees.
                    (b) The Borrowers agree to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participation in each Standby Letter of Credit or Commercial Letter of Credit at the Applicable Rate for a Letter of Credit of such type, in each case on the average daily amount of the portion of such Lender's LC Exposure attributable to such Letter of Credit (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Restatement Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Revolving Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to each Issuing Bank a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate or rates per annum separately agreed upon between Dress Barn or New Parent and such Issuing Bank, on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Restatement Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as such Issuing Bank's standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder. Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of each calendar month shall be payable on the first Business Day of the next succeeding month, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Restatement Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to the Issuing Banks pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within 10 days after demand.
provided
All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed.
                    (c) The Borrowers agree to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees in the amounts and payable at the times separately agreed upon between New Parent and the Administrative Agent.
                    (d) All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the applicable Issuing Bank, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances (absent manifest error in the amount paid). Notwithstanding any provision herein, fees accrued under the Existing Credit Agreement prior to the Restatement Effective Date shall not be reduced by the amendments effected hereby, and will be paid at the times provided herein.
                    SECTION 2.13. (a) The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan) shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
Interest.
                    (b) The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
                    (c) Each Protective Advance and Overadvance shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate for ABR Revolving Loans plus 2% per annum.
                    (d) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrowers hereunder is not paid when due (after giving effect to any applicable grace period), whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% per annum plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% per annum plus the rate applicable to ABR Revolving Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
                    (e) Accrued interest on each Loan (for ABR Loans, accrued through the last day of the prior calendar quarter) shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and upon termination of the Commitments; that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (d) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Revolving Loan prior to the end of the Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable
provided
on the effective date of such conversion. Notwithstanding any provision herein, interest accrued under the Existing Credit Agreement prior to the Restatement Effective Date shall not be reduced by the amendments effected hereby, and will be paid at the times provided herein.
                    (f) All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate or Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
                    SECTION 2.14. If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest.
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower Representative and the Lenders by telephone or facsimile as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower Representative and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist (which notification shall be made promptly after the Administrative Agent obtains knowledge of the cessation of such circumstances), (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Revolving Borrowing to, or continuation of any Revolving Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective, and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing.
                    SECTION 2.15. (a) If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs.
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to increase the cost to such Lender or such Issuing Bank of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or such Issuing Bank hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Borrowers will pay to such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
                    (b) If any Lender or any Issuing Bank determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank, to a level below that which such Lender or such Issuing Bank or such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's policies and the policies of such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrowers will pay to such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Bank or such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
                    (c) A certificate of a Lender or an Issuing Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or such Issuing Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower Representative and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrowers shall pay such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
                    (d) Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or any Issuing Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's right to demand such compensation; that the Borrowers shall not be required to compensate a Lender or an Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower Representative of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
                    SECTION 2.16. In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto,
Break Funding Payments.
(c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Eurodollar Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.11(e) and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower Representative pursuant to Section 2.19, then, in any such event (but subject to Section 2.11(f)), the Borrowers shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest which would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest that would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate that such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the eurodollar market. A certificate of any Lender setting forth and explaining in reasonable detail any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower Representative and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrowers shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 30 days after receipt thereof.
                    SECTION 2.17. (a) Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the Borrowers hereunder shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes; that if the Borrowers shall be required to deduct any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or Issuing Bank (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the Borrowers shall make such deductions and (iii) the Borrowers shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Taxes.
provided
                    (b) In addition, the Borrowers shall pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
                    (c) The Borrowers shall jointly and severally indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and each Issuing Bank, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, in connection with any Loan Document (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate setting forth and explaining in reasonable
detail the amount of such payment or liability delivered to the Borrower Representative by a Lender or an Issuing Bank, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or an Issuing Bank, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
                    (d) Each Lender and each Issuing Bank shall indemnify the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent, within 10 days after written demand therefor, against any and all Taxes and any and all related losses, claims, liabilities, penalties, interest and reasonable expenses (including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Borrowers or the Administrative Agent) incurred by or asserted against the Borrowers or the Administrative Agent by any Governmental Authority as a result of the failure by such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, to deliver, or as a result of the inaccuracy, inadequacy or deficiency of, any documentation required to be delivered to the Borrowers or the Administrative Agent pursuant to paragraph (f) of this Section. Each Lender and each Issuing Bank hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent to set off and apply any and all amounts at any time owing to such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, under this Agreement or any other Loan Document against any amount due to the Administrative Agent under this paragraph (d).
                    (e) As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrowers to a Governmental Authority, the Borrower Representative shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
                    (f) Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding Tax under the law of the United States of America, or any treaty to which the United States of America is a party, with respect to payments under this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall deliver to the Borrower Representative (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), on or prior to the date of this Agreement (or, in the case of any Lender that becomes a party to this Agreement pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, on or prior to the effective date of such Assignment and Assumption), either (a) two properly executed originals of Form W-8ECI or Form W-8BEN (or any successor forms) prescribed by the Internal Revenue Service or other documents satisfactory to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent, as the case may be, certifying (i) that all payments to be made to such Foreign Lender under the Loan Documents are exempt from United States withholding Taxes because such payments are effectively connected with the conduct by such Lender of a trade or business within the United States and are included in such Lender's gross income or (ii) that all payments to be made to such Foreign Lender under the Loan Documents are completely exempt from Taxes or are subject to such Taxes at a reduced rate by an applicable Tax treaty, or (b)(i) a certificate executed by such Lender certifying that such Lender is not a "bank" within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code and that such Lender qualifies for the portfolio interest exemption under Section 881(c) of the Code, and (ii) two properly executed originals of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8BEN (or any successor form), in each case, certifying such Lender's entitlement to an exemption from United States withholding Tax with respect to payments of interest to be made hereunder or under this
Agreement or any other Loan Document. In the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party, the Internal Revenue Service Form W-8BEN shall (i) with respect to payments of interest under the Loan Documents, establish an exemption from U.S. federal withholding Tax pursuant to the "interest" article of such tax treaty and (ii) with respect to any other applicable payments under the Loan Documents, establish an exemption from U.S. federal withholding Tax pursuant to the "business profits" or "other income" article of such tax treaty. Each Lender that is not a Foreign Lender shall deliver to the Borrower Representative (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) two properly executed originals of Internal Revenue Service Form W-9 (or any successor form). Each such Lender agrees (but only to the extent it is legally entitled to do so) to provide the Borrower Representative (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) with new forms prescribed by the Internal Revenue Service upon the expiration or obsolescence of any previously delivered form, after the occurrence of any event requiring a change in the most recent forms delivered by it to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent, or at any other time reasonably requested by Borrower Representative.
                    (g) If the Administrative Agent or a Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrowers or with respect to which the Borrowers have paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section, it shall pay over such refund to the Borrowers (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrowers under this Section with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); , that the Borrowers, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agree to repay the amount paid over to the Borrowers (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. This Section shall not be construed to require the Administrative Agent or any Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes which it deems confidential) to the Borrowers or any other Person.
provided
                    (h) Each Lender shall severally indemnify the Administrative Agent, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Excluded Taxes attributable to such Lender that are paid or payable by the Administrative Agent in connection with any Loan Document and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Excluded Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate setting forth and explaining in reasonable detail the amount of such payment or liability delivered to a Lender by the Administrative agent shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
                    SECTION 2.18. (a) The Borrowers shall make each payment required to be made by them hereunder (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or
Payments Generally; Allocation of Proceeds; Sharing of Set-offs.
of amounts payable under Section 2.15, 2.16 or 2.17, or otherwise) prior to 3:00 p.m., New York time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 10 South Dearborn Street, 22 Floor, Chicago, Illinois, except payments to be made directly to an Issuing Bank or Swingline Lender as expressly provided herein and except that payments pursuant to Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments hereunder shall be made in dollars.
nd
                    (b) Any proceeds of Collateral received by the Administrative Agent (i) not constituting (A) a specific payment of principal, interest, fees or other sum payable under the Loan Documents (which shall be applied as specified by the Borrowers), (B) a mandatory prepayment (which shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.11), (C) amounts to be applied from a Concentration Account during any Dominion Period (which shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.10(b)) or, (D) so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, amounts which are received into any Concentration Account (which shall be deposited to the Borrowers' Funding Account in accordance with the Restated Security Agreement) or (ii) after an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent so elects or the Required Lenders so direct, shall be applied ratably , to pay any fees, indemnities, or expense reimbursements then due to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks from the Borrowers (other than in connection with Banking Services or Swap Obligations), , to pay any fees or expense reimbursements then due to the Lenders from the Borrowers (other than in connection with Banking Services or Swap Obligations), , to pay interest due in respect of the Protective Advances and Overadvances, , to pay the principal of the Protective Advances and Overadvances, , to pay interest then due and payable on the Loans (other than the Protective Advances and Overadvances) ratably, , to prepay principal on the Loans (other than the Protective Advances and Overadvances) and unreimbursed LC Disbursements ratably, , to pay an amount to the Administrative Agent equal to 103% of the aggregate undrawn face amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit and the aggregate amount of any unpaid LC Disbursements, to be held as cash collateral for such Obligations, , to payment of any amounts owing with respect to Banking Services and Swap Obligations, , to the payment of any other Secured Obligations due to the Administrative Agent or any Lender, and , any excess to be returned to Borrower Representative Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, unless so directed by the Borrower Representative, or unless a Default is in existence, neither the Administrative Agent nor any Lender shall apply any payment which it receives to any Eurodollar Loan, except (a) on the expiration date of the Interest Period applicable to such Eurodollar Loan or (b) in the event, and
first
second
third
fourth
fifth
sixth
seventh
eighth
ninth
tenth
.
only to the extent, that there are no outstanding ABR Loans and, in any such event, the Borrowers shall pay the break funding payment required in accordance with Section 2.16.
                    (c) At the election of the Administrative Agent, all payments of principal, interest, LC Disbursements, fees, reimbursable expenses (including, without limitation, all reimbursements of fees and expenses pursuant to Section 9.03) and other sums payable under the Loan Documents may be paid from the proceeds of Borrowings made hereunder whether made following a request by the Borrower Representative pursuant to Section 2.03 or a deemed request as provided in this Section or may be deducted from any deposit account of any Borrower maintained with the Administrative Agent. Each Borrower hereby irrevocably authorizes (i) the Administrative Agent to make a Borrowing for the purpose of paying each payment of principal, interest, fees or any other amount due under the Loan Documents and agrees that all such amounts charged shall constitute Loans (including Swingline Loans and Overadvances, but such a Borrowing may only constitute a Protective Advance if it is to reimburse costs, fees and expenses pursuant to Section 9.03) and that all such Borrowings shall be deemed to have been requested pursuant to Sections 2.03, 2.04 or 2.05, as applicable and (ii) the Administrative Agent to charge any deposit account of any Borrower (other than, so long as no Dominion Period is in effect or no Event of Default shall have occurred or be continuing, any (A) retail operating store deposit account that is not a concentration or cash sweep account, (B) payroll account or (C) medical or insurance reimbursement account) maintained with the Administrative Agent for each payment of principal, interest, fees or any other amount due under the Loan Documents.
                    (d) If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans and participations in LC Disbursements of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Loans and participations in LC Disbursements; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrowers pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrowers or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply). Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against such Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as
provided
fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
                    (e) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower Representative prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the Issuing Banks hereunder that the Borrowers will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrowers have made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the Issuing Banks, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Borrowers have not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or Issuing Banks, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Bank with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
                    (f) If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it hereunder, then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), (i) apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lender's obligations hereunder until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid and/or (ii) hold any such amounts in a segregated account as cash collateral for, and apply any such amounts to, any future funding obligations of such Lender hereunder; application of amounts pursuant to (i) and (ii) above shall be made in such order as may be determined by the Administrative Agent in its discretion.
                    SECTION 2.19. (a) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrowers are required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Borrowers hereby agree to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment).
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders.
                    (b) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrowers are required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, or if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the Borrowers may, at their sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent by the Borrower Representative, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in
accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); that (i) the Borrowers shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks, which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrowers (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.15 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.17, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments. A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrowers to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
provided
                    SECTION 2.20. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
Defaulting Lenders.
                    (a) fees shall cease to accrue on the unfunded portion of the Revolving Commitment of such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(a);
                    (b) the Commitment and Revolving Credit Exposure of such Defaulting Lender shall not be included in determining whether all Lenders or the Required Lenders have taken or may take any action hereunder (including any consent to any amendment or waiver pursuant to Section 9.02); that any waiver, amendment or modification requiring the consent of all Lenders or each affected Lender which affects such Defaulting Lender differently than other affected Lenders shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender;
provided
                    (c) if any Swingline Exposure or LC Exposure exists at the time a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then:
                    (i) all or any part of such Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure shall be reallocated among the non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages, but only to the extent (A) the sum of all non-Defaulting Lenders' Revolving Credit Exposures plus such Defaulting Lender's Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure does not exceed the total of all non-Defaulting Lenders' Revolving Commitments and (B) the conditions set forth in Section 4.02 are satisfied at such time; and
                    (ii) if the reallocation described in clause (i) above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Borrowers shall within one Business Day following notice by the Administrative Agent, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the Borrowers against such Defaulting Lender, (A) first, prepay such Swingline
Exposure and (B) second, cash collateralize such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure (after giving effect to any partial reallocation pursuant to clause (i) above) in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.06(j) for so long as such LC Exposure is outstanding;
                    (iii) if the Borrowers cash collateralize any portion of such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure pursuant to clause (ii) above, the Borrowers shall not be required to pay any fees to such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lender's cash collateralized LC Exposure during the period such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is cash collateralized;
                    (iv) if the LC Exposure of the non-Defaulting Lenders is reallocated pursuant to this paragraph (c), then the fees payable to the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.12(b) shall be adjusted in accordance with such non-Defaulting Lenders' Applicable Percentages; or
                    (v) if any Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is neither cash collateralized nor reallocated pursuant to this paragraph (c), then, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the applicable Issuing Bank or any Lender hereunder, all letter of credit fees payable under Section 2.12(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure shall be payable to the applicable Issuing Bank until such LC Exposure is cash collateralized and/or reallocated;
                    (d) the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loan and an Issuing Bank shall not be required to issue, amend or increase any Letter of Credit, unless it is satisfied that the related exposure will be 100% covered by the Commitments of the non-Defaulting Lenders and/or cash collateral will be provided by the Borrowers in accordance with this paragraph (c) of this Section, and participating interests in any such newly issued or increased Letter of Credit or newly made Swingline Loan shall be allocated among non-Defaulting Lenders in a manner consistent with this paragraph (c)(i) of this Section (and Defaulting Lenders shall not participate therein); and
                    (e) in the event and on the date that each of the Administrative Agent, New Parent, each Issuing Bank and the Swingline Lender agrees that a Defaulting Lender has adequately remedied all matters that caused such Lender to be a Defaulting Lender, then the Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure of the other Lenders shall be readjusted to reflect the inclusion of such Lender's Revolving Commitment and on such date such Lender shall purchase at par such of the Loans of the other Lenders (other than Swingline Loans) as the Administrative Agent shall determine may be necessary in order for such Lender to hold such Loans in accordance with its Applicable Percentage.
                    SECTION 2.21. If after receipt of any payment which is applied to the payment of all or any part of the Obligations, the Administrative Agent or any Lender is for any reason compelled to surrender such payment or proceeds to any Person because such payment or application of proceeds is invalidated, declared fraudulent, set aside or determined to be void or voidable as a preference, impermissible setoff, or a diversion of trust funds, or for any other reason, then the Obligations or part
Returned Payments.
thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued and this Agreement shall continue in full force as if such payment or proceeds had not been received by the Administrative Agent or such Lender. The provisions of this Section shall be and remain effective notwithstanding any contrary action which may have been taken by the Administrative Agent or any Lender in reliance upon such payment or application of proceeds. The provisions of this Section shall survive the termination of this Agreement.
                    SECTION 2.22. New Parent may designate any Subsidiary that is a wholly owned Domestic Subsidiary of New Parent (other than Dunnigan) as a Borrowing Subsidiary upon ten Business Days notice to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders (such notice to include the name, primary business address and tax identification number of such proposed Borrowing Subsidiary). Upon proper notice and receipt by the Administrative Agent of such documents and legal opinions as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request and subject to the Administrative Agent's determining in consultation with the Lenders that designating such Subsidiary as a Borrowing Subsidiary would not cause any Lender to suffer any economic, legal or regulatory disadvantage, such Subsidiary shall be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. A Subsidiary shall cease to be a Borrowing Subsidiary hereunder at such time New Parent gives at least ten Business Days prior notice to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders of its intention to terminate such Subsidiary as a Borrowing Subsidiary; that any such termination shall not be effective and such Subsidiary shall remain a Borrowing Subsidiary until such time as all Loans to such Borrowing Subsidiary and accrued interest thereon and all other amounts then due from such Borrowing Subsidiary have been paid in full.
Borrowing Subsidiaries.
provided
                    Each Loan Party represents and warrants to the Lenders as follows:
                    SECTION 3.01. Each Loan Party and each of its subsidiaries is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Organization; Powers.
                    SECTION 3.02. (a) The Transactions, insofar as they are to be carried out by each Loan Party, are within such Loan Party's organizational powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, shareholder action. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each Loan Party and constitutes, and the other Loan Documents to which each Loan Party is a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will
Authorization; Enforceability; Benefit to Loan Parties.
constitute, the legal, valid and binding obligations of such Loan Party, enforceable in accordance with their terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
                    (b) Each Loan Party expects to derive benefit (and its board of directors or other governing body has determined that it may reasonably be expected to derive benefit), directly and indirectly, from (i) successful operations of each of the other Loan Parties and (ii) the credit extended by the Lenders to the Borrowers hereunder. Each Loan Party has determined that execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement and any other Loan Documents to be executed by such Loan Party is within its purpose, will be of direct and indirect benefit to such Loan Party, and is in its best interest.
                    SECTION 3.03. The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect and except for filings necessary to perfect Liens created under the Loan Documents, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of any Loan Party or any of its subsidiaries, or any order of any Governmental Authority, except, in the case of any applicable law or regulation, a violation which would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any indenture, material agreement or other material instrument binding upon any Loan Party or any of its subsidiaries or its assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by any Loan Party or its subsidiaries, and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of any Loan Party or any of its subsidiaries, except Liens created pursuant to the Loan Documents.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts.
                    SECTION 3.04. (a) The Loan Parties have heretofore furnished to the Lenders (i)(A) the consolidated balance sheets and related statements of earnings, shareholders' equity and cash flows of Dress Barn and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the fiscal years ended July 31, 2010, and July 25, 2009, each audited by and accompanied by the unqualified opinion of Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent public accountants and (B) the unaudited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of earnings, shareholders' equity and cash flows of Dress Barn and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the fiscal quarter ended October 30, 2010. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of Dress Barn and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clauses (i)(B) above.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change.
                    (b) The Loan Parties have heretofore furnished to the Lenders a pro forma consolidated balance sheet and pro forma statements of income, cash flows and profit and loss of Dress Barn as of and for the period of four fiscal quarters ended July 25, 2009, prepared giving effect to the Transactions (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) as if such Transactions had occurred on such date, in the case of such balance sheet, and
at the beginning of such period, in the case of such statements of income, cash flows and profit and loss. Such pro forma consolidated balance sheet and pro forma statements of income, cash flows and profit and loss (i) have been prepared in good faith based on the same assumptions used to prepare the pro forma financial statements included in the Information Materials (which assumptions are believed by the Borrowers to be reasonable), (ii) are based on the best information available to the Borrowers, (iii) accurately reflect all adjustments necessary to give effect to the Transactions and (iv) present fairly, in all material respects, the pro forma financial position and results of operations of Dress Barn and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the period of four fiscal quarters ended July 25, 2009, as if the Transactions (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) had occurred on such date or at the beginning of such period, as the case may be.
                    (c) Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto or in the Information Materials and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, none of the Loan Parties or their subsidiaries has, as of the Restatement Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities, unusual long-term commitments or unrealized losses.
                    (d) Since July 31, 2010, there has occurred no Material Adverse Change.
                    SECTION 3.05. (a) Each Loan Party and each of their subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business, except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes and Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02.
Properties.
                    Each Loan Party and each of its subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, tradenames, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by each Loan Party and its Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
                    (b) sets forth the address of each real property that will be owned, and each material parcel of property that will be leased, by the Loan Parties and their subsidiaries as of the Restatement Effective Date after giving effect to the Transactions.
Schedule 3.05
                    SECTION 3.06. (a) There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, threatened against or affecting the Loan Parties or any of their subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
Litigation and Environmental Matters.
                    (b) Except for the Disclosed Matters or matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, none of the Loan Parties nor any of their subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received written notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
                    (c) Since the date of this Agreement, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
                    SECTION 3.07. (a) Each Loan Party and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with all Requirements of Law applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect (it being agreed that this Section does not apply to any law which is specifically addressed in Section 3.06, 3.08, 3.09, 3.10 or 3.14). No Default has occurred and is continuing.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements.
                    (b) No Loan Party is in default in any material respect in the performance, observance or fulfillment of any of the obligations, covenants or conditions contained in (i) any material agreement to which it is a party or (ii) any agreement or instrument evidencing or governing Material Indebtedness.
                    SECTION 3.08. No Loan Party nor any of its Subsidiaries is an "investment company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Investment Company Status.
                    SECTION 3.09. Each Loan Party and its Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) any Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which such Loan Party or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes.
                    SECTION 3.10. (a) No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $2,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of such Plan.
ERISA; Margin Regulations.
                    (b) None of the Loan Parties or any of their Subsidiaries are engaged principally, or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of buying or carrying Margin Stock. No part of the proceeds of any Loan or any Letter of Credit will be used, whether directly or indirectly, and whether immediately, incidentally or ultimately, in any manner or for any purpose that would entail a violation of the Regulations T, U or X of the Board.
                    SECTION 3.11. The Loan Parties have disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which they or any of their Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to them, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Information Materials nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of any Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that, with respect to projected financial information, the Loan Parties represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time furnished.
Disclosure.
                    SECTION 3.12. sets forth (a) the name of, and the ownership interest of New Parent and each Subsidiary in, each Subsidiary as of the Restatement Effective Date, (b) a true and complete listing of each class of each of the Borrowers' authorized Equity Interests, of which all of such issued shares are validly issued, outstanding, fully paid and non-assessable, and owned beneficially and of record by the Persons identified (other than in the case of the owners of Equity Interests in New Parent) on , and (c) the type of entity of New Parent and each of its Subsidiaries. All the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in Subsidiaries owned by any Loan Party have been (to the extent such concepts are relevant with respect to such ownership interests) duly authorized and issued and are fully paid and non assessable.
Subsidiaries.
Schedule 3.12
Schedule 3.12
                    SECTION 3.13. sets forth a description of all insurance maintained by or on behalf of the Loan Parties and the Subsidiaries as of the Restatement Effective Date. As of the Restatement Effective Date, all premiums due and payable in respect of such insurance have been paid. The Loan Parties believe that the insurance maintained by or on behalf of the Loan Parties and the Subsidiaries is adequate.
Insurance.
Schedule 3.13
                    SECTION 3.14. As of the Restatement Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts or slowdowns against any Loan Party or any Subsidiary pending or, to the knowledge of the Borrowers, threatened. The hours worked by and payments made to employees of the Loan Parties and the Subsidiaries have not been in violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act or any other applicable Federal, state, local or foreign law dealing with such matters except for any such violation that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. All payments due from any Loan Party or any Subsidiary, or for which any claim may be
Labor Matters.
made against any Loan Party or any Subsidiary, on account of wages and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a liability on the books of the Loan Party or such Subsidiary to the extent required by GAAP. The consummation of the Transactions will not give rise to any right of termination or right of renegotiation on the part of any union under any collective bargaining agreement to which any Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries is bound.
                    SECTION 3.15. Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Restatement Effective Date, (a) the fair value of the assets of New Parent and its consolidated subsidiaries, at a fair valuation, will exceed their debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of New Parent and its consolidated subsidiaries will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of their debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (c) New Parent and its consolidated subsidiaries will be able to pay their debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise (it being understood and agreed that for purposes of this Section, contingent liabilities mean the maximum amount of liability that could reasonably be likely to result from pending litigation, asserted claims and assessments, guaranties, indemnification obligations, adjustment of purchase price or other post-closing payment adjustments (including earn-outs and other similar arrangements) and uninsured risks of New Parent and its subsidiaries), as such debts and liabilities become absolute and matured; and (d) New Parent and its consolidated subsidiaries will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the businesses in which they are engaged as such businesses are now conducted and are proposed to be conducted following the Restatement Effective Date.
Solvency.
                    SECTION 3.16. The provisions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents create legal and valid Liens on all the Collateral in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the Lender Parties, and such Liens will, upon the taking of the perfection actions required to be taken under the Loan Documents, constitute perfected and continuing Liens on the Collateral, securing the Secured Obligations, enforceable against the applicable Loan Parties and all third parties, and having priority over all other Liens on the Collateral except for (a) Permitted Encumbrances, to the extent any such Permitted Encumbrances would have priority over the Liens in favor of the Administrative Agent pursuant to any applicable law and (b) Liens perfected only by possession (including possession of any certificate of title) to the extent the Administrative Agent has not obtained or does not maintain possession of such Collateral.
Collateral Matters.
                    SECTION 3.17. The Borrowers will use the proceeds of the Loans and will request the issuance of Letters of Credit only for purposes set forth in Section 5.11.
Use of Proceeds.
                    SECTION 3.18. (as updated from time to time as permitted by Section 5.17) sets forth a list of all credit card processing arrangements to which any Loan Party is a party with respect to the payment to any Loan Party of the proceeds of all credit card charges for sales by such Loan Party.
Credit Card Arrangements.
Schedule 3.18
True and complete copies of agreements entered into in connection with the arrangements listed on have been delivered to the Administrative Agent, together with all material amendments, waivers and other modifications thereto. All such agreements are in full force and effect, currently binding upon each Loan Party that is a party thereto and, to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, binding upon other parties thereto in accordance with their terms. The Loan Parties are in compliance in all material respects with such agreements.
Schedule 3.18
                    SECTION 3.19. As of the Reorganization Effective Date (and after giving effect to the Reorganization), New Parent will not have engaged in any business or activity other than the ownership of Equity Interests in Subsidiaries, activities incidental thereto and actions required by law to maintain its existence.
New Parent.
                    SECTION 4.01. The amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement in the form of this Agreement shall become effective on January 3, 2011, but only if each of the following conditions shall have been satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02):
Restatement Effective Date.
          (a) The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received (i) from each party hereto either (A) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (B) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include a facsimile or pdf. transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement, (ii) from each Loan Party, a counterpart of the Restated Security Agreement signed on behalf of such party and (iii) such other certificates, documents, instruments and agreements mutually satisfactory to New Parent and the Lenders as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including written opinions of the Loan Parties' counsel, addressed to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders, in substantially the form of .
Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and Restated Security Agreement.
Exhibit B
          (b) The Reorganization shall have been consummated in accordance with applicable law and the terms of the Reorganization Documents, and the Administrative Agent shall have received evidence thereof satisfactory to it.
Reorganization.
          (c) The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) a certificate of each Loan Party, dated the Restatement Effective Date and executed by its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, which shall (A) attach copies of the certificate of incorporation and by laws or analogous constitutive documents of such Loan Party or certify that there have been no changes to such constitutive
Closing Certificates.
documents since November 25, 2009, (B) certify the resolutions of its Board of Directors, members or other governing body authorizing the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Restated Security Agreement, and (C) identify by name and title and bear the signatures of the Financial Officers and any other officers of such Loan Party authorized to sign such Loan Documents or certify that there have been no changes to such officers since November 25, 2009, and (ii) a long form good standing certificate (to the extent available) for each Loan Party from its jurisdiction of organization.
          (d) The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, signed by the chief financial officer of New Parent, (i) stating that no Default has occurred and is continuing, (ii) stating that the representations and warranties contained in Article III are true and correct on and as of such date, and (iii) certifying as to such other factual matters as may be reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent.
No Default Certificate.
          (e) The Collateral and Guarantee Requirement shall have been satisfied to the extent required by the provisions of the definition of such term.
Collateral and Guarantee Requirement.
          (f) The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence of insurance coverage for New Parent in form, scope, and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and otherwise in compliance with the terms of Section 4.10 of the Restated Security Agreement.
Insurance.
          (g) The Administrative Agent shall have received a properly completed and signed IRS Form W-8 or W-9, as applicable for New Parent.
Tax Forms.
          (h) The Administrative Agent and the Arrangers shall have received and shall reasonably be satisfied with appraisals of the Inventory of each Loan Party from appraisers selected by the Administrative Agent.
Appraisals.
          (i) The Lenders shall have received all documentation and other information reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent and required under applicable "know your customer" and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the Patriot Act.
"Know Your Customer" Requirements.
          (j) The Administrative Agent shall have received such other documents as the Administrative Agent may have reasonably requested.
Other Documents.
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower Representative and the Lenders of the Restatement Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.
                    SECTION 4.02. The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of each Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event.
          (a) The representations and warranties of the Borrowers set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable.
          (b) At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
          (c) After giving effect to any Borrowing or the issuance of any Letter of Credit, the aggregate Credit Exposures shall not exceed the lesser of (x) the aggregate Revolving Commitments or (y) (other than in the case of a Protective Advance or an Overadvance) the Borrowing Base, and the Administrative Agent shall have received a Borrowing Base Certificate as of a date not earlier than the last day of the most recent fiscal month ended at least 20 days prior to the date of such Borrowing or issuance.
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrowers on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this Section.
                    Notwithstanding the failure to satisfy the conditions precedent set forth in paragraphs (a) or (b) of this Section, unless otherwise directed by the Required Lenders, the Administrative Agent may, but shall have no obligation to, continue to make Loans and an Issuing Bank may, but shall have no obligation to, issue or cause to be issued any Letter of Credit for the ratable account and risk of Lenders from time to time if the Administrative Agent believes that making such Loans or issuing or causing to be issued any such Letter of Credit is in the best interests of the Lenders.
                    Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees, expenses and other amounts payable under any Loan Document (other than Banking Services Obligations and contingent or indemnity obligations for which no claim has been made) have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Loan Parties covenant and agree, jointly and severally, with the Lenders that:
                    SECTION 5.01. The Borrowers will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements; Borrowing Base and Other Information.
          (a) within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of New Parent, its audited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all
reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a "going concern" or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of New Parent and its consolidated subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
          (b) within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of New Parent (or Dress Barn, in the case of any fiscal quarter ended prior to the Reorganization), the consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flows of New Parent (or Dress Barn, in the case of any fiscal quarter ended prior to the Reorganization) as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by one of its Financial Officers as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of New Parent (or Dress Barn, as the case may be) and its consolidated subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
          (c) at any time that any Revolving Loan is outstanding or the LC Exposure is equal to or greater than $100,000,000, within 20 days after the end of each fiscal month of New Parent (or Dress Barn, in the case of any fiscal month ended prior to the Reorganization), the consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flows of New Parent (or Dress Barn, in the case of any fiscal month ended prior to the Reorganization) as of the end of and for such fiscal month and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by one of its Financial Officers as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of New Parent (or Dress Barn, as the case may be) and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
          (d) concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) or (b) or (c) above, a certificate of a Financial Officer of New Parent in substantially the form of (i) certifying, in the case of the financial statements delivered under clause (b) or (c), that such financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of New Parent (or Dress Barn, as the case may be) and its consolidated subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes, (ii) certifying as
Exhibit D
to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (iii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Section 6.12, (iv) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate;
          (e) concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, a certificate of the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements stating whether they obtained knowledge during the course of their examination of such financial statements of any Default (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines);
          (f) as soon as available, but within 15 days after the end of each fiscal year of New Parent a copy of the plan and forecast (including a projected consolidated and consolidating balance sheet, income statement and funds flow statement in form acceptable to the Administrative Agent) of New Parent for each month of the upcoming fiscal year in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent;
          (g) as soon as available but in any event within 20 days (or, during any Enhanced Reporting Period, 3 days) after each Borrowing Base Reporting Date, and at such other times as may be requested by the Administrative Agent, a Borrowing Base Certificate setting forth a computation of the Borrowing Base as of such Borrowing Base Reporting Date, together with supporting information and any additional reports with respect to the Borrowing Base that the Administrative Agent may reasonably request;
          (h) as soon as available but in any event within 20 days (or, during any Enhanced Reporting Period, 3 days) after each Borrowing Base Reporting Date, and at such other times as may be requested by the Administrative Agent, the following information as of such Borrowing Base Reporting Date, all delivered electronically in a text formatted file reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent:
          (i) a detailed aging of the Borrowers' Credit Card Receivables (A) including aging by credit card issuer and processor and (B) reconciled to the Borrowing Base Certificate delivered as of such date, prepared in a manner reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, together with a summary specifying the balance due from each credit card issuer or credit card processor;
          (ii) a schedule detailing the Borrowers' Inventory, in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, (A) by location (showing Inventory in transit, any Inventory located with a third party under any consignment, bailee arrangement, or warehouse agreement), by product type and by volume
payment pending such contest could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
                    SECTION 5.06. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
Maintenance of Properties.
                    SECTION 5.07. The Loan Parties will, and will cause each of their subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies having a financial strength rating of at least A- by A.M. Best Company (a) insurance in such amounts (with no greater risk retention) and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies of established repute engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations and (b) all insurance required to be maintained pursuant to the Collateral Documents. The Borrower will furnish to the Lenders, upon request of the Administrative Agent, information in reasonable detail as to the insurance so maintained.
Insurance.
                    SECTION 5.08. The Borrowers (a) will furnish to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders prompt written notice of any casualty or other insured damage to any Collateral with a value of $5,000,000 or more and (b) will ensure that the Net Proceeds of any such event (whether in the form of insurance proceeds or otherwise) are collected and applied in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Agreement and the Collateral Documents.
Casualty.
                    SECTION 5.09. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, (a) keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct (in all material respects) entries are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities and (b) permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender (including employees of the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any consultants, accountants, lawyers and appraisers retained by the Administrative Agent), upon reasonable prior notice (but in no event more than once each fiscal quarter unless a Default has occurred and is continuing), to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and, accompanied by one or more such officers or their designees if requested by the Borrower Representative, independent accountants, all at such reasonable times during normal business hours and as often as reasonably requested. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the right of the Administrative Agent or any Lender to conduct appraisals or field examinations shall be governed exclusively by Sections 5.12 and 5.13, respectively, and shall not be limited by this Section.
Books and Records; Inspection Rights.
                    SECTION 5.10. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, comply with all Requirements of Law applicable to it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws.
                    SECTION 5.11. The Letters of Credit and the proceeds of the Loans will be used only for general corporate purposes of the Borrowers and their subsidiaries. No part of the proceeds of any Loan and no Letter of Credit will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations T, U and X.
Use of Proceeds.
                    SECTION 5.12. The Borrowers will provide to the Administrative Agent from time to time upon the Administrative Agent's request, at the sole expense of the Borrowers, appraisals (or updates thereof) of the Inventory of the Borrowers from appraisers selected and engaged by the Administrative Agent, prepared on a basis consistent in all material respects with the inventory appraisals referred to in Section 4.01(h) (with such adjustments as shall be deemed appropriate to reflect events or changes in circumstances after the dates of such appraisals); , that the Administrative Agent shall be entitled to request only one such appraisal in any calendar year, except that (a) at any time when any Revolving Loan is outstanding or the LC Exposure is equal to or greater than $75,000,000, the Administrative Agent may request a second appraisal in the then-current calendar year, (b) at any time when Availability shall have been less than 20% of the aggregate Revolving Commitments then in effect for three consecutive Business Days, the Administrative Agent may request a second or a third appraisal in the then-current calendar year and (c) if an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, there shall be no limitation on the number of appraisals that the Administrative Agent may request. For purposes of the foregoing, it is understood that a single appraisal may consist of appraisals of the assets of each Borrower and may be conducted at multiple sites. Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon reasonable advance notice to the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent may request appraisals in addition to those authorized by the preceding sentences of this Section; that the Borrowers will not be responsible for the expense of appraisals conducted pursuant to this sentence.
Appraisals.
provided
provided
                    SECTION 5.13. At any time that the Administrative Agent requests, the Borrowers and the Subsidiaries will allow the Administrative Agent, at the sole expense of the Borrowers, to conduct, or engage a third party to conduct, field examinations (or updates thereof) during normal business hours to ensure the adequacy of Collateral included in the Borrowing Base and related reporting and control systems; , that the Administrative Agent shall be entitled to conduct only one such field examination in any calendar year, except that (a) at any time when any Revolving Loan is outstanding or the LC Exposure is equal to or greater than $75,000,000, the Administrative Agent may conduct a second field examination in the then-current calendar year, (b) at any time when Availability shall have been less than 20% of the aggregate Revolving Commitments then in effect for three consecutive Business Days, the Administrative Agent may conduct a second or a third field examination in the then-current calendar year and (c) if an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, there shall be no limitation on the number of field examinations that the Administrative Agent may conduct. For purposes of the foregoing, it is understood that a single field examination may consist of examinations of the assets of each Borrower and may be conducted at multiple sites. Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon reasonable advance notice to the Borrower, the Administrative Agent may conduct, or engage a third party to conduct, field examinations in addition to those authorized by the preceding
Field Examinations.
provided
sentences of this Section; that the Borrowers will not be responsible for the expense of field examinations conducted pursuant to this sentence.
provided
                    SECTION 5.14. The Borrowers and their subsidiaries will maintain the Administrative Agent or one or more Lenders acceptable to the Administrative Agent as their principal depository bank, including for the maintenance of operating, administrative, cash management, collection activity, and other deposit accounts for the conduct of their business; , that the Borrowers shall not be required to satisfy the foregoing requirement with respect to any (i) retail operating store deposit account that is not a concentration or cash sweep account, (ii) payroll account or (iii) medical or insurance reimbursement account) so long as such accounts in clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) are established in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice.
Depository Banks.
provided
                    SECTION 5.15. If any additional Domestic Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Restatement Effective Date, the Borrowers will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will, as promptly as practicable, and in any event within 30 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in writing) after such Subsidiary is formed or acquired (i) execute and deliver a Joinder Agreement, substantially in the form of hereto (the "") and (ii) cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied with respect to such Subsidiary and with respect to any Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of such Subsidiary owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party. If any additional Eligible Foreign Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Restatement Effective Date, the Borrowers will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will, as promptly as practicable, and in any event within 60 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in writing) after such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary is formed or acquired, cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied with respect to any Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party.
Additional Subsidiaries.
Exhibit E
Joinder Agreement
                    SECTION 5.16. (a) The Borrowers will, and will cause each Loan Party to, execute any and all further documents, financing statements, agreements and instruments, and take all further actions (including the filing and recording of financing statements and other documents), which may be required under applicable law, or which the Administrative Agent may reasonably request, to cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be and remain satisfied at all times, all at the expense of the Loan Parties. The Borrowers also agree to provide to the Administrative Agent, from time to time upon request, evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent as to the perfection and priority of the Liens created or intended to be created by the Collateral Documents.
Further Assurances.
                     (b) If any material assets (other than interests in real property) are acquired by any Loan Party after the Restatement Effective Date (other than assets constituting Collateral under the Collateral Agreements that become subject to the Lien of the Collateral Agreements upon the acquisition thereof), the Borrowers will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and, if requested by the Administrative Agent or
the Required Lenders, will cause such assets to be subjected to a Lien securing the Obligations and will take, and cause the Subsidiary Parties to take, such actions as shall be necessary or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to grant and perfect such Liens, including actions described in paragraph (a) of this Section, all at the expense of the Loan Parties. It is understood and agreed that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the foregoing provisions of this Section or any Collateral Document, the Loan Parties shall not be required to (i)(A) grant mortgages, leasehold mortgages or collateral assignments of leases and rents or (B) obtain landlord lien waivers or collateral access rights agreements with respect to any of its retail operating store locations or (ii) enter into deposit control agreements in respect of (A) any retail operating store deposit account that is not a concentration or cash sweep account, (B) any payroll account or (C) medical or insurance reimbursement accounts.
                    SECTION 5.17. Each Borrower will, and will cause each of its subsidiaries to, (a) comply in all material respects with all its obligations under each credit card processing agreement to which it is party and (b) maintain credit card processing arrangements with the credit card issuers and processors identified on ; , , that the Borrowers may amend to remove any credit card issuer or processor identified therein or to add additional credit card issuers and processors that are satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its reasonable discretion, and concurrently with the making of any such amendment the Borrowers shall provide to the Administrative Agent evidence that a Credit Card Notification Agreement shall have been delivered to any credit card issuer or processor added to such Schedule.
Credit Card Notification Agreements.
Schedule 3.18
provided
however
Schedule 3.18
                    SECTION 5.18. The Borrowers and the other Loan Parties shall deliver, when and as required by the terms of the Post-Closing Letter Agreement, the items referenced therein.
Post Closing Requirements.
                    SECTION 5.19. The Borrowers will deliver and pay to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent on January 3, 2011, all fees payable in connection with the arrangement and effectiveness of this Agreement and all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses (including the reasonable and documented fees and expenses of legal counsel) in connection with the arrangement and effectiveness of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby or due and payable as of the Restatement Effective Date under the Existing Credit Agreement, in each case for which invoices have been presented on or before the Restatement Effective Date.
Fees.
                    Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees, expenses and other amounts payable under any Loan Document (other than Banking Services Obligations and contingent or indemnity obligations for which no claim has been made) have been paid in full and all Letters of
Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Loan Parties covenant and agree, jointly and severally, with the Lenders that:
                    SECTION 6.01. (a) The Borrowers will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
Indebtedness; Certain Equity Securities.
                     (b) The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, issue any Equity Interests that are not Qualified Capital Stock, other than to the Borrower or a
Subsidiary; that any issuance of Equity Interests of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to any Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.04.
provided
                    SECTION 6.02. The Borrowers will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Liens.
                    SECTION 6.03. (a) No Borrower will, or will permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing (i) any Subsidiary may merge into New Parent in a transaction in which New Parent is the surviving corporation, (ii) any Subsidiary may merge into any Subsidiary in a
Fundamental Changes; Restrictions on Dunnigan and New Parent.
transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary and, if any party to such merger is a Loan Party, a Loan Party, (iii) any Subsidiary (other than a Loan Party) may liquidate or dissolve if New Parent determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of New Parent and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders and (iv) New Parent or any Subsidiary may effect a Permitted Acquisition by means of any merger or consolidation of a type permitted by this Section in which New Parent or a Subsidiary is the surviving entity in such transaction; that any such merger involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by Section 6.04.
provided
                     (b) No Borrower will, or will permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Borrowers and their Subsidiaries on the date of this Agreement and businesses reasonably related thereto, including development, operation and promotion of other apparel or accessories in a specialty store environment.
                     (c) The Borrowers will not permit Dunnigan to (i) engage in any business or activity other than (A) the ownership of the Distribution Center and activities incidental thereto (including the leasing of space therein), (B) performance of its obligations under and in connection with the Existing Mortgage Loan and (C) actions required by law to maintain its existence, (ii) purchase, own, hold or acquire any assets other than the Distribution Center, cash and Permitted Investments, (iii) sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any asset (except that Dunnigan may (A) lease space in the Distribution Center in the ordinary course of business or (B) sell all real property owned by it, including the Distribution Center, and thereafter liquidate or dissolve), (iv) incur any liabilities other than liabilities under the Existing Mortgage Loan, liabilities imposed by law, including tax liabilities, and other liabilities incidental to its existence and permitted business and activities, (v) create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset owned by it, other than pursuant to the Existing Mortgage, judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (k) of Article VII and other Liens that constitute Permitted Encumbrances or (vi) merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve (other than permitted by paragraph (a) of this Section or clause (iii) of this paragraph (c)).
                    SECTION 6.04. The Borrowers will not, and will not permit any of their Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a wholly owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests in or evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any capital contributions or any loans or advances to, enter into or permit to exist any Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person (all the foregoing being called "investments"), or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person constituting a business unit, except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions.
                     (a) Permitted Investments;
                     (b) investments existing on the Restatement Effective Date and set forth on ;
Schedule 6.04
                     (c) investments by the Borrowers and their Subsidiaries in Equity Interests in their respective subsidiaries and in Dunnigan; that any such Equity Interests (other than those of Dunnigan) held by a Loan Party shall be pledged pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement to the extent required in order for the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied;
provided
                     (d) loans or advances made by New Parent to any Subsidiary and made by any Subsidiary to New Parent or any other Subsidiary; that (i) the aggregate amount of any such loans and advances made by a Loan Party to any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall not exceed $50,000,000 and (ii) any such loans and advances made by a Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note (which may be in the form of a grid note) pledged pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement;
provided
                     (e) Guarantees constituting Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01;
                     (f) investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
                     (g) the acquisition of all or substantially all the assets of a Person or line of business of such Person, or not less than 100% of the Equity Interests (except for directors' qualifying shares) of a Person (referred to herein as the ""); that (i) such acquisition was not preceded by an unsolicited tender offer for such Equity Interests by, or proxy contest initiated by, New Parent or any Subsidiary; (ii) after giving effect to the acquisition the Borrower shall be in compliance with Section 6.03(b); (iii) the Acquired Entity is located, and substantially all of its operations are conducted, in the United States of America; (iv) both before and after giving effect to such acquisition no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing; (v) after giving effect to such acquisition (A) the Borrower would be in Pro Forma Compliance and (B) Availability, determined on a Pro Forma Basis, shall have been and shall be not less than 25% of the aggregate Revolving Commitments at all times during the period commencing on the 60th day before such acquisition and ending on the first anniversary of such acquisition; (vi) New Parent shall comply, and shall cause the Acquired Entity to comply, with the applicable provisions of Sections 5.14 and 5.15 and the Collateral Documents; and (vii) New Parent shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of New Parent in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in the preceding clause (v) and confirming that the other requirements of this paragraph (g) have been satisfied (any acquisition of an Acquired Entity meeting all the criteria of this paragraph (g) being referred to herein as a "");
Acquired Entity
provided
Permitted Acquisition
that all sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions permitted hereby (other than those permitted by clause (b) above) shall be made for fair value and for at least 75% cash consideration.
provided
                    SECTION 6.06. The Borrowers will not, and will not permit any of their subsidiaries to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, whereby they shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in their businesses, whether now owned or hereinafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property that they intend to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property sold or transferred, except for any such sale of any fixed or capital assets that is made for cash consideration in an amount not less than the cost of such fixed or capital asset and is consummated within 180 days after the applicable Borrower or subsidiary acquires or completes the construction of such fixed or capital asset.
Sale and Leaseback Transactions.
                    SECTION 6.07. The Borrowers will not, and will not permit any of their subsidiaries to, enter into any Swap Agreement, other than Swap Agreements entered into in the ordinary course of business to hedge or mitigate risks to which any Borrower or subsidiary is exposed in the conduct of its business or the management of its liabilities and not for speculative purposes.
Swap Agreements.
                    SECTION 6.08. (a) The Borrowers will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, or incur any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to do so, except (i) New Parent may declare and pay dividends with respect to its capital stock payable solely in additional shares of its common stock, (ii) Subsidiaries may declare and pay dividends ratably with respect to their capital stock, (iii) New Parent may make Restricted Payments, not exceeding $1,000,000 during any fiscal year, pursuant to and in accordance with stock option plans or other benefit plans for management or employees of New Parent and the Subsidiaries, (iv) Permitted Tax Distributions by any Loan Party to another Loan Party, so long as such
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments of Indebtedness.
Loan Party uses such distributions to pay its Taxes and (v) New Parent may repurchase shares of its common stock; that at the time of and immediately after giving effect to any such Restricted Payment, (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing (other than any Restricted Payment set forth in clause (iv)), (B) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio, computed on a Pro Forma Basis for the most recent period of four fiscal quarters for which financial statements shall have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01, shall be not less than 1.25 to 1.00 and (C) Availability, determined on a Pro Forma Basis, shall have been and shall be not less than 25% of the aggregate Revolving Commitments at all times during the period commencing on the 60th day before such Restricted Payment and ending on the first anniversary of such Restricted Payment.
provided
                     (b) The Borrowers will not, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, make or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) of or in respect of principal of or interest on any Indebtedness, or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any Indebtedness, except:
                    SECTION 6.09. No Borrower will, or will permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease or otherwise transfer any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) transactions in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to such Borrower or Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arm's-length basis from unrelated third parties, (b) transactions between or among the Loan Parties not involving any other Affiliate, (c) any Restricted Payment permitted by Section 6.08, (d) the payment of reasonable fees and compensation to, and the providing of reasonable indemnities on behalf of, directors and officers of New Parent, as determined by the board of directors of
Transactions with Affiliates.
New Parent in good faith, (e) the transactions described on and (f) the lease between Dunnigan and New Parent in respect of the Distribution Center as in effect on the Restatement Effective Date or any amendments thereto that (i) do not increase New Parent's obligations thereunder in any material respect or (ii) would be permitted in accordance with clause (a) of this Section.
Schedule 6.09
                    SECTION 6.10. The Borrowers will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of New Parent or Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets, or (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to its Equity Interests or to make or repay loans or advances to New Parent or any other Subsidiary or to Guarantee Indebtedness of New Parent or any Subsidiary; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by any Loan Document, (ii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the Restatement Effective Date identified on (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (iii) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary pending such sale; that such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (iv) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness and (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases restricting the assignment thereof.
Restrictive Agreements.
provided
Schedule 6.10
provided
                    SECTION 6.11. No Borrower will, or will permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive any of its rights under its certificate of incorporation, by-laws or other organizational documents, in either case, to the extent such amendment, modification or waiver would be adverse in any material respect to the rights or interests of the Lenders hereunder or under any other Loan Document.
Amendment of Material Documents.
                    SECTION 6.12. The Borrowers will not permit the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for any period of four fiscal quarters ending during a Covenant Period to be less than 1.10 to 1.00.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
                    SECTION 6.13. The Borrowers will not change their fiscal year or their method of determining fiscal quarters.
Changes in Fiscal Periods.
                    If any of the following events ("") shall occur:
Events of Default
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to any Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower Representative, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers; and in case of any event with respect to any Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers to the extent permitted by applicable law.
                    Each of the Lenders and each of the Issuing Banks hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf, including execution of the other Loan Documents, and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms of the
Loan Documents, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
                    The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with the Loan Parties or any Subsidiary of a Loan Party or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
                    The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth in the Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing as directed by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to any Loan Party or any of its subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or wilful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Borrower Representative or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or in connection with any Loan Document, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth in any Loan Document, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of any Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, (v) the creation, perfection or priority of Liens on the Collateral or the existence of the Collateral, or (vi) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
                    The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. The Administrative Agent
may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrowers), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
                    The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
                    Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Borrower Representative. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Borrowers, to appoint a successor that is an Eligible Successor Agent. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, in consultation with the Borrower Representative, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which is an Eligible Successor Agent, until such time, if any, as the Required Lenders appoint a Successor Administrative Agent. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. The fees payable by the Borrowers to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrowers and such successor. After the Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article, Section 2.17(d) and Section 9.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
                    Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
                    The Loan Parties acknowledge and agree that the Administrative Agent may prepare and distribute to the Lenders Reports containing information obtained by the Administrative Agent through the conduct of appraisals and field examinations pursuant to Sections 5.12 and 5.13 and the exercise of its inspection rights under Section 5.09. Each Lender hereby agrees that (a) it has requested a copy of each Report prepared by or on behalf of the Administrative Agent; (b) the Administrative Agent (i) makes no representation or warranty, express or implied, as to the completeness or accuracy of any Report or any of the information contained therein or any inaccuracy or omission contained in or relating to a Report and (ii) shall not be liable for any information contained in any Report; (c) the Reports are not comprehensive audits or examinations, and that any Person performing any field examination will inspect only specific information regarding the Loan Parties and will rely significantly upon the Loan Parties' books and records, as well as on representations of the Loan Parties' personnel and that the Administrative Agent undertakes no obligation to update, correct or supplement the Reports; (d) it will keep all Reports confidential and strictly for its internal use, not share the Report with any Loan Party or any other Person except as otherwise permitted pursuant to this Agreement; and (e) without limiting the generality of any other indemnification provision contained in this Agreement, it will pay and protect, and indemnify, defend, and hold the Administrative Agent and any such other Person preparing a Report harmless from and against, the claims, actions, proceedings, damages, costs, expenses, and other amounts (including reasonable attorney fees) incurred by as the direct or indirect result of any third parties who might obtain all or part of any Report through the indemnifying Lender.
                    The Syndication Agent shall not have any rights, powers, obligations, liabilities, responsibilities or duties under this Agreement other than those applicable to all Lenders as such.
                    SECTION 9.01. (a) Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by facsimile, as follows:
Notices.
All such notices and other communications (i) sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received or (ii) sent by facsimile shall be deemed to have been given when sent (or, if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient).
                    (b) Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications (including e-mail and internet or intranet websites) pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender. The Administrative Agent or the Borrower Representative (on behalf of the Loan Parties) may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications. All such notices and other communications (i) sent to an e-mail address shall be deemed received upon the sender's receipt of an acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by return e-mail or other written acknowledgement); that if not given during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient, and (ii) posted to an Internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its e-mail address as described in the foregoing clause (b)(i) of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor.
provided
provided
provided
                    (c) Any party hereto may change its address or facsimile number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.
                    SECTION 9.02. (a) No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or
Waivers; Amendments.
discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders hereunder and under any other Loan Document are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by any Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Bank may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
                    (b) None of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any provision hereof or thereof may be waived, amended or modified except (i) in the case of this Agreement, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Borrowers and the Required Lenders or (ii) in the case of any other Loan Document, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, with the consent of the Required Lenders; that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender (provided that the Administrative Agent may make Protective Advances as set forth in Section 2.04), (ii) reduce or forgive the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce or forgive any interest or fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby, (iii) postpone any scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any date for the payment of any interest, fees or other Obligations payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby, (iv) change Section 2.18(b) or (d) in a manner that would alter the manner in which payments are shared, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) increase the advance rates set forth in the definition of Borrowing Base or add new categories of eligible assets, without the written consent of each Lender, (vi) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of "Required Lenders" or any other provision of any Loan Document specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights thereunder or make any determination or grant any consent thereunder, without the written consent of each Lender, (vii) change Section 2.20 without the consent of each Lender (other than any Defaulting Lender), (viii) release any Loan Guarantor from its obligation under its Loan Guarantee (except as otherwise permitted herein or in the other Loan Documents), without the written consent of each Lender, or (ix) except as provided in clauses (c) and (d) of this Section or in any Collateral Document, release Collateral having an aggregate value in excess of $20,000,000 without the written consent of each Lender; further that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Swingline Lender hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be (it being understood that any change to Section 2.20 shall
provided
provided
require the consent of the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Banks). Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, this Agreement may be amended without any additional consents to provide for increased Commitments in the manner contemplated by Section 2.09. The Administrative Agent may also amend the to reflect assignments entered into pursuant to Section 9.04.
Commitment Schedule
                    (c) The Lenders hereby irrevocably authorize the Administrative Agent, at its option and in its sole discretion, to release any Liens granted to the Administrative Agent by the Loan Parties on any Collateral (i) upon the termination of the all Commitments, payment and satisfaction in full in cash of all Secured Obligations (other than Unliquidated Obligations), and the cash collateralization of all Unliquidated Obligations in a manner satisfactory to each affected Lender, (ii) constituting property being sold or disposed of if the Loan Party disposing of such property certifies to the Administrative Agent that the sale or disposition is made in compliance with the terms of this Agreement (and the Administrative Agent may rely conclusively on any such certificate, without further inquiry), and to the extent that the property being sold or disposed of constitutes 100% of the Equity Interest of a Subsidiary, the Administrative Agent is authorized to release any Loan Guarantee provided by such Subsidiary, (iii) constituting property leased to a Loan Party under a lease which has expired or been terminated in a transaction not prohibited under this Agreement, or (iv) as required to effect any sale or other disposition of such Collateral in connection with any exercise of remedies of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to Article VII. Except as provided in the preceding sentence and clause (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent will not release any Liens on Collateral without the prior written authorization of the Required Lenders; that, the Administrative Agent may in its discretion, release its Liens on Collateral valued in the aggregate not in excess of $10,000,000 during any calendar year without the prior written authorization of the Required Lenders. Any such release shall not in any manner discharge, affect, or impair the Obligations or any Liens (other than those expressly being released) upon (or obligations of the Loan Parties in respect of) all interests retained by the Loan Parties, including the proceeds of any sale, all of which shall continue to constitute part of the Collateral.
provided
                    (d) If, in connection with any proposed amendment, waiver or consent requiring the consent of "each Lender" or "each Lender affected thereby," the consents of Lenders having Credit Exposure and unused Commitments representing more than 66% of the sum of the total Credit Exposure and unused Commitments at such time are obtained, but the consents of other necessary Lenders are not obtained (any such Lender whose consent is necessary but not obtained being referred to herein as a ""), then the Borrowers may elect to replace any Non-Consenting Lender as a Lender party to this Agreement; that, concurrently with such replacement, (i) another bank or other entity which is reasonably satisfactory to the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent shall agree, as of such date, to purchase for cash the Loans and other Obligations due to the Non-Consenting Lender pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption and to become a Lender for all purposes under this Agreement and to assume all obligations of the Non-Consenting Lender to be terminated as of such date and to comply with the requirements of clause (b) of Section 9.04, and (ii) the Borrowers shall pay to such Non-Consenting Lender in same day funds on the day of
Non-Consenting Lender
provided
such replacement (A) all interest, fees and other amounts then accrued but unpaid to such Non-Consenting Lender by the Borrowers hereunder to and including the date of termination, including without limitation payments due to such Non-Consenting Lender under Sections 2.15 and 2.17, and (B) an amount, if any, equal to the payment which would have been due to such Lender on the day of such replacement under Section 2.16 had the Loans of such Non-Consenting Lender been prepaid on such date rather than sold to the replacement Lender.
                    SECTION 9.03. (a) The Borrowers shall pay (i) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers and their respective Affiliates, including the reasonable and documented fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Arrangers, in connection with the syndication and distribution (including, without limitation, via the internet or through a service such as Intralinks) of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of the Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions of the Loan Documents (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by each Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement, collection or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit. Subject to the provisions of Sections 5.09, 5.12 and 5.13, expenses subject to reimbursement by the Borrowers under this Section include, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with:
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.
All of the foregoing costs and expenses may be charged to the Borrowers as Revolving Loans or to another deposit account, all as described in Section 2.18(c).
                    (b) The Borrowers agree, jointly and severally, to indemnify the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, each Issuing Bank and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, penalties, incremental taxes, liabilities and related expenses, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of the Loan Documents or any agreement or instrument contemplated thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by an Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or Release of Hazardous Materials on at, to or from any property owned or operated by any Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any other Environmental Liability related in any way to any Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, (iv) the failure of the Borrowers to deliver to the Administrative Agent the required receipts or other required documentary evidence with respect to a payment made by the Borrowers for Taxes pursuant to Section 2.17, or (v) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether such proceeding is initiated by an Indemnitee or any third party or any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, penalties, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and non-appealable judgment to have resulted from the bad faith, gross negligence or wilful misconduct of such Indemnitee. Except as set forth in clause (iv) of this paragraph (b), this Section 9.03 shall not apply to any Taxes (other than Other Taxes).
Indemnitee
provided
                    (c) To the extent the Borrowers fail to pay any amount required to be paid by them to the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, such Lender's Applicable Percentage (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, penalty, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such.
provided
                    (d) To the extent permitted by applicable law, no Loan Party shall assert, and each hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
                    (e) All amounts due under this Section shall be payable not later than 10 days after written demand therefor.
                    SECTION 9.04. (a) The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of an Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) the Borrowers may not assign or otherwise transfer any of their rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by a Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of an Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns.
                    (b) (i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
                    (c) (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Swingline Lender, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (each a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under the Loan Documents. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce the Loan Documents and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of the Loan Documents; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section
Participant
provided
provided
9.02(b) that affects such Participant. Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrowers agree that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16 and 2.17 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender; that such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.18(c) as though it were a Lender.
provided
                    (ii) A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.15 or 2.17 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower Representative's prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 2.17 unless the Borrower Representative is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrowers, to comply with Section 2.17(f) as though it were a Lender. Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, maintain a register on which it enters the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each participant's interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement (the ""). The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and the Borrower and such Lender shall treat each person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary. The Participant Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Participant Register
                    (d) Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
                    SECTION 9.05. All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have
Survival.
not expired or terminated. The provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
                    SECTION 9.06. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. Except as provided in Section 4.01, this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness.
                    SECTION 9.07. Any provision of any Loan Document held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions thereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability.
                    SECTION 9.08. If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of the Borrowers or such Loan Guarantor against any of and all the Secured Obligations held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under the Loan Documents and although such obligations may be unmatured. The applicable Lender shall notify the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent of such set-off or application; that any failure to give or any delay in giving such notice shall not affect the validity of any such set-off or application under this Section. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff.
provided
                    SECTION 9.09. (a) The Loan Documents (other than those containing a contrary express choice
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
of law provision) shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York, but giving effect to federal laws applicable to national banks.
                    (b) Each Loan Party hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of any US Federal or New York State court sitting in New York, New York in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to any Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against any Loan Party or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
                    (c) Each Loan Party hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
                    (d) Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
                    SECTION 9.10. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED THEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
                    SECTION 9.11. Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this
Headings.
Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
                    SECTION 9.12. Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority, (c) to the extent required by Requirement of Laws or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Loan Parties and their obligations, (g) with the consent of the Borrower Representative, or (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrowers. For the purposes of this Section, "" means all information received from the Borrowers relating to the Borrowers or their business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender on a non-confidential basis prior to disclosure by the Borrowers; that, in the case of information received from the Borrowers after the Restatement Effective Date, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
Confidentiality.
Information
provided
                    EACH LENDER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 9.12 FURNISHED TO IT PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING NEW PARENT AND ITS AFFILIATES AND THEIR RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES, AND CONFIRMS THAT IT HAS DEVELOPED COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES REGARDING THE USE OF MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION AND THAT IT WILL HANDLE SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
                    ALL INFORMATION, INCLUDING REQUESTS FOR WAIVERS AND AMENDMENTS, FURNISHED BY THE BORROWERS OR THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT PURSUANT TO, OR IN THE COURSE OF
ADMINISTERING, THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE SYNDICATE-LEVEL INFORMATION, WHICH MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION ABOUT NEW PARENT, THE LOAN PARTIES AND THEIR RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES. ACCORDINGLY, EACH LENDER REPRESENTS TO THE BORROWERS AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT THAT IT HAS IDENTIFIED IN ITS ADMINISTRATIVE QUESTIONNAIRE A CREDIT CONTACT WHO MAY RECEIVE INFORMATION THAT MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
                    SECTION 9.13. The respective obligations of the Lenders hereunder are several and not joint and the failure of any Lender to make any Loan or perform any of its obligations hereunder shall not relieve any other Lender from any of its obligations hereunder. Anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, neither any Issuing Bank nor any Lender shall be obligated to extend credit to the Borrowers in violation of any Requirement of Law.
Several Obligations; Nonreliance; Violation of Law.
                    SECTION 9.14. Each Lender that is subject to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the "") hereby notifies the Borrowers that pursuant to the requirements of the Act, it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrowers, which information includes the names and addresses of the Borrowers and other information that will allow such Lender to identify the Borrowers in accordance with the Act.
USA PATRIOT Act.
Act
                    SECTION 9.15. Each Lender hereby appoints each other Lender as its agent for the purpose of perfecting Liens, for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, in assets which, in accordance with Article 9 of the UCC or any other applicable law can be perfected only by possession. Should any Lender (other than the Administrative Agent) obtain possession of any such Collateral, such Lender shall notify the Administrative Agent thereof, and, promptly upon the Administrative Agent's request therefor shall deliver such Collateral to the Administrative Agent or otherwise deal with such Collateral in accordance with the Administrative Agent's instructions.
Appointment for Perfection.
                    SECTION 9.16. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan, together with all fees, charges and other amounts which are treated as interest on such Loan under applicable law (collectively the ""), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the "") which may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding such Loan in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan hereunder, together with all Charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and Charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan but were not payable as a
Interest Rate Limitation.
Charges
Maximum Rate
result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated and the interest and Charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
                    SECTION 9.17. (a) Each Borrower irrevocably and unconditionally undertakes to pay to the Administrative Agent amounts equal to, and in the currency or currencies of, its Corresponding Debt.
Dutch Parallel Debt.
                    (b) The Parallel Debt of each Borrower:
                    (c) For purposes of this Section 9.17, the Administrative Agent:
                    (d) The Parallel Debt of a Borrower shall be (i) decreased to the extent that its Corresponding Debt has been irrevocably and unconditionally paid or discharged, and (ii) increased to the extent to that its Corresponding Debt has increased, and the Corresponding Debt of a Borrower shall be (x) decreased to the extent that its Parallel Debt has been irrevocably and unconditionally paid or discharged, and (y) increased to the extent that its Parallel Debt has increased, in each case provided that the Parallel Debt of a Borrower shall never exceed its Corresponding Debt.
                    (e) All amounts received or recovered by the Administrative Agent in connection with this Section, to the extent permitted by applicable law, shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.18.
                    (f) This Section applies solely for the purpose of determining the secured obligations in the Collateral Documents governed by Dutch law.
                    SECTION 10.01. Each Loan Guarantor hereby agrees that it is jointly and severally liable for, and absolutely, irrevocably and unconditionally guarantees to the Lenders, the prompt payment when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, and at all times thereafter, of the Secured Obligations and all reasonable costs and expenses including, without limitation, all court costs and attorneys' and paralegals' fees and expenses paid or incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders in endeavoring to collect all or any part of the Secured Obligations from, or in prosecuting any action against, any Borrower, any Loan Guarantor or any other guarantor of all or any part of the Secured Obligations (such costs and expenses, together with the Secured Obligations, being collectively called the ""). Each Loan Guarantor further agrees that the Guaranteed Obligations may be extended or renewed in whole or in part without notice to or further assent from it, and that it remains bound upon its guarantee notwithstanding any such extension or renewal. All terms of this Loan Guarantee apply to and may be enforced by or on behalf of any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of any Lender that extended any portion of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Guarantee.
Guaranteed Obligations
                    SECTION 10.02. This Loan Guarantee is a Guarantee of payment and not of collection. Each Loan Guarantor waives any right to require the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender to sue any Borrower, any other Loan Guarantor, any other guarantor, or any other Person obligated for all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations (each, an ""), or to enforce its rights against any collateral securing all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Guarantee of Payment.
Obligated Party
                    SECTION 10.03. (a) Except as otherwise provided for herein, the obligations of each Loan Guarantor hereunder are unconditional and absolute and not subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination for any reason (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations), including: (i) any claim of waiver, release, extension, renewal, settlement, surrender, alteration, or compromise of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, by operation of law or otherwise; (ii) any change in the corporate existence, structure or ownership of any Borrower or any other guarantor of or other Person liable for any of the Guaranteed Obligations; (iii) any insolvency, bankruptcy, reorganization or other similar proceeding affecting any Obligated Party or its assets or any resulting release or discharge of any obligation of any Obligated Party; or (iv) the existence of any claim, setoff or other right which any Loan Guarantor may have at any time against any Obligated Party, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender, or any other Person, whether in connection herewith or in any unrelated transaction.
No Discharge or Diminishment of Loan Guarantee.
                    (b) The obligations of each Loan Guarantor hereunder are not subject to any defense or setoff, counterclaim, recoupment, or termination whatsoever by reason of the invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any of the Guaranteed Obligations or
otherwise, or any provision of applicable law or regulation purporting to prohibit payment by any Obligated Party, of the Guaranteed Obligations or any part thereof.
                    (c) Further, the obligations of any Loan Guarantor hereunder are not discharged or impaired or otherwise affected by: (i) the failure of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender to assert any claim or demand or to enforce any remedy with respect to all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations; (ii) any waiver or modification of or supplement to any provision of any agreement relating to the Guaranteed Obligations; (iii) any release, non-perfection or invalidity of any indirect or direct security for the obligations of any Borrower for all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations or any obligations of any other guarantor of or other Person liable for any of the Guaranteed Obligations; (iv) any action or failure to act by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender with respect to any collateral securing any part of the Guaranteed Obligations; or (v) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the payment or performance of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, or any other circumstance, act, omission or delay that might in any manner or to any extent vary the risk of such Loan Guarantor or that would otherwise operate as a discharge of any Loan Guarantor as a matter of law or equity (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations).
                    SECTION 10.04. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Loan Guarantor hereby waives any defense based on or arising out of any defense of any Borrower or any Loan Guarantor or the unenforceability of all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations from any cause, or the cessation from any cause of the liability of any Borrower or any Loan Guarantor, other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Loan Guarantor irrevocably waives acceptance hereof, presentment, demand, protest and, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any notice not provided for herein, as well as any requirement that at any time any action be taken by any person against any Obligated Party or any other Person. Each Loan Guarantor confirms that it is not a surety under any state law and shall not raise any such law as a defense to its obligations hereunder. The Administrative Agent may, at its election, foreclose on any Collateral held by it by one or more judicial or nonjudicial sales, accept an assignment of any such Collateral in lieu of foreclosure or otherwise act or fail to act with respect to any collateral securing all or a part of the Guaranteed Obligations, compromise or adjust any part of the Guaranteed Obligations, make any other accommodation with any Obligated Party or exercise any other right or remedy available to it against any Obligated Party, without affecting or impairing in any way the liability of such Loan Guarantor under this Loan Guarantee except to the extent the Guaranteed Obligations have been fully and indefeasibly paid in cash. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Loan Guarantor waives any defense arising out of any such election even though that election may operate, pursuant to applicable law, to impair or extinguish any right of reimbursement or subrogation or other right or remedy of any Loan Guarantor against any Obligated Party or any security.
Defenses Waived.
                    SECTION 10.05. No Loan Guarantor will assert any right, claim or cause of action, including, without limitation, a claim of subrogation,
Rights of Subrogation.
contribution or indemnification that it has against any Obligated Party, or any Collateral, until the Loan Parties and the Loan Guarantors have fully performed all their obligations to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders.
                    SECTION 10.06. If at any time any payment of any portion of the Guaranteed Obligations is rescinded or must otherwise be restored or returned upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of any Borrower or otherwise, each Loan Guarantor's obligations under this Loan Guarantee with respect to that payment shall be reinstated at such time as though the payment had not been made and whether or not the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders are in possession of this Loan Guarantee. If acceleration of the time for payment of any of the Guaranteed Obligations is stayed upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of any Borrower, all such amounts otherwise subject to acceleration under the terms of any agreement relating to the Guaranteed Obligations shall nonetheless be payable by the Loan Guarantors forthwith on demand by the Lender.
Reinstatement; Stay of Acceleration.
                    SECTION 10.07. Each Loan Guarantor assumes all responsibility for being and keeping itself informed of the Borrowers' financial condition and assets, and of all other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of the Guaranteed Obligations and the nature, scope and extent of the risks that each Loan Guarantor assumes and incurs under this Loan Guarantee, and agrees that none of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender shall have any duty to advise any Loan Guarantor of information known to it regarding those circumstances or risks.
Information.
                    SECTION 10.08. The provisions of Section 2.17 shall apply to all payments by the Loan Guarantors of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Taxes.
mutatis
mutandis
                    SECTION 10.09. The provisions of this Loan Guarantee are severable, and in any action or proceeding involving any state corporate law, or any state, federal or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other law affecting the rights of creditors generally, if the obligations of any Loan Guarantor under this Loan Guarantee would otherwise be held or determined to be avoidable, invalid or unenforceable on account of the amount of such Loan Guarantor's liability under this Loan Guarantee, then, notwithstanding any other provision of this Loan Guarantee to the contrary, the amount of such liability shall, without any further action by the Loan Guarantors or the Lenders, be automatically limited and reduced to the highest amount that is valid and enforceable as determined in such action or proceeding (such highest amount determined hereunder being the relevant Loan Guarantor's ""). This Section with respect to the Maximum Liability of each Loan Guarantor is intended solely to preserve the rights of the Lenders to the maximum extent not subject to avoidance under applicable law, and no Loan Guarantor nor any other Person or entity shall have any right or claim under this Section with respect to such Maximum Liability, except to the extent necessary so that the obligations of any Loan Guarantor hereunder shall not be rendered voidable under applicable law. Each Loan Guarantor agrees that the Guaranteed Obligations may at any time and from time to time exceed the Maximum Liability of each Loan Guarantor without impairing this Loan Guarantee or affecting the rights and remedies of the Lenders hereunder; that, nothing in this sentence
Maximum Liability.
Maximum Liability
provided
shall be construed to increase any Loan Guarantor's obligations hereunder beyond its Maximum Liability.
                    SECTION 10.10. In the event any Loan Guarantor (a "") shall make any payment or payments under this Loan Guarantee or shall suffer any loss as a result of any realization upon any collateral granted by it to secure its obligations under this Loan Guarantee, each other Loan Guarantor (each a "") shall contribute to such Paying Guarantor an amount equal to such Non-Paying Guarantor's Applicable Share of such payment or payments made, or losses suffered, by such Paying Guarantor. For purposes of this Article X, each Non-Paying Guarantor's "" with respect to any such payment or loss by a Paying Guarantor shall be determined as of the date on which such payment or loss was made by reference to the ratio of (i) such Non-Paying Guarantor's Maximum Liability as of such date (without giving effect to any right to receive, or obligation to make, any contribution hereunder) or, if such Non-Paying Guarantor's Maximum Liability has not been determined, the aggregate amount of all monies received by such Non-Paying Guarantor from the Borrowers after the Restatement Effective Date (whether by loan, capital infusion or by other means) to (ii) the aggregate Maximum Liability of all Loan Guarantors hereunder (including such Paying Guarantor) as of such date (without giving effect to any right to receive, or obligation to make, any contribution hereunder), or to the extent that a Maximum Liability has not been determined for any Loan Guarantor, the aggregate amount of all monies received by such Loan Guarantors from the Borrowers after the Restatement Effective Date (whether by loan, capital infusion or by other means). Nothing in this provision shall affect any Loan Guarantor's several liability for the entire amount of the Guaranteed Obligations (up to such Loan Guarantor's Maximum Liability). Each of the Loan Guarantors covenants and agrees that its right to receive any contribution under this Loan Guarantee from a Non-Paying Guarantor shall be subordinate and junior in right of payment to the payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations. This provision is for the benefit of both the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders and the Loan Guarantors and may be enforced by any one, or more, or all of them in accordance with the terms hereof.
Contribution.
Paying Guarantor
Non-Paying Guarantor
Applicable Share
                    SECTION 10.11. . The liability of each Loan Party as a Loan Guarantor under this Article X is in addition to and shall be cumulative with all other liabilities of each Loan Party to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents to which such Loan Party is a party or in respect of any obligations or liabilities of the other Loan Parties, without any limitation as to amount, unless the instrument or agreement evidencing or creating such other liability specifically provides to the contrary.
Liability Cumulative
                    SECTION 11.01. New Parent is hereby appointed by each of the Borrowers as its contractual representative (herein
Appointment; Nature of Relationship.
referred to as the "") hereunder and under each other Loan Document, and each of the Borrowers irrevocably authorizes the Borrower Representative to act as the contractual representative of such Borrower with the rights and duties expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents. The Borrower Representative agrees to act as such contractual representative upon the express conditions contained in this Article XI. Additionally, the Borrowers hereby appoint the Borrower Representative as their agent to receive all of the proceeds of the Loans in the Funding Account(s), at which time the Borrower Representative shall promptly disburse such Loans to the appropriate Borrower. The Administrative Agent and the Lenders, and their respective officers, directors, agents or employees, shall not be liable to the Borrower Representative or any Borrower for any action taken or omitted to be taken by the Borrower Representative or the Borrowers pursuant to this Section.
Borrower Representative
                    SECTION 11.02. The Borrower Representative shall have and may exercise such powers under the Loan Documents as are specifically delegated to the Borrower Representative by the terms of each thereof, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. The Borrower Representative shall have no implied duties to the Borrowers, or any obligation to the Lenders to take any action thereunder except any action specifically provided by the Loan Documents to be taken by the Borrower Representative.
Powers.
                    SECTION 11.03. The Borrower Representative may execute any of its duties as the Borrower Representative hereunder and under any other Loan Document by or through authorized officers.
Employment of Agents.
                    SECTION 11.04. Each Borrower shall immediately notify the Borrower Representative of the occurrence of any Default hereunder referring to this Agreement describing such Default and stating that such notice is a "notice of default." In the event that the Borrower Representative receives such a notice, the Borrower Representative shall give prompt notice thereof to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders. Any notice provided to the Borrower Representative hereunder shall constitute notice to each Borrower on the date received by the Borrower Representative.
Notices.
                    SECTION 11.05. Upon the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Borrower Representative may resign at any time, such resignation to be effective upon the appointment of a successor Borrower Representative. The Administrative Agent shall give prompt written notice of such resignation to the Lenders.
Successor Borrower Representative.
                    SECTION 11.06. The Borrowers hereby empower and authorize the Borrower Representative, on behalf of the Borrowers, to execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders the Loan Documents and all related agreements, certificates, documents, or instruments as shall be necessary or appropriate to effect the purposes of the Loan Documents, including without limitation, the Borrowing Base Certificates and the Compliance Certificates. Each Borrower agrees that any action taken by the Borrower Representative or the Borrowers in accordance with the terms of this Agreement or the
Execution of Loan Documents; Borrowing Base Certificate.
other Loan Documents, and the exercise by the Borrower Representative of its powers set forth therein or herein, together with such other powers that are reasonably incidental thereto, shall be binding upon all of the Borrowers.
                    SECTION 11.07. Each Borrower hereby agrees that such Borrower shall furnish promptly after each fiscal month to the Borrower Representative any certificate or report requested by the Borrower Representative, on which the Borrower Representative shall rely to prepare the Borrowing Base Certificates and Compliance Certificates required pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement.
Reporting.
                    IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
None.
As of the Effective Date, the Company, together with its Subsidiaries (other than the Acquired Company and its Subsidiaries (except for the Excess Umbrella policy below, which includes the Acquired Company and its Subsidiaries)), maintains the following insurance, as described below and as specified in the Schedule below:
In connection with the Company's leases of its stores, certain leases provide for additional rents based on percentages of net sales, charges for real estate taxes, insurance and other occupancy costs, the amounts of which are publicly disclosed in the Company's filings.
None.
EXHIBIT A
                    This Assignment and Assumption (the "") is dated as of the Effective Date set forth below and is entered into by and between [] (the "") and [] (the ""). Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement identified below (as amended, the ""), receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged by the Assignee. The Standard Terms and Conditions set forth in Annex 1 attached hereto are hereby agreed to and incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Assignment and Assumption as if set forth herein in full.
Assignment and Assumption
Insert name of Assignor
Assignor
Insert name of Assignee
Assignee
Amended and Restated Credit Agreement
                    For an agreed consideration, the Assignor hereby irrevocably sells and assigns to the Assignee, and the Assignee hereby irrevocably purchases and assumes from the Assignor, subject to and in accordance with the Standard Terms and Conditions and the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, as of the Effective Date inserted by the Administrative Agent as contemplated below (i) all of the Assignor's rights and obligations in its capacity as a Lender under the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto to the extent related to the amount and percentage interest identified below of all of such outstanding rights and obligations of the Assignor under the respective facilities identified below (including any letters of credit, guarantees, and swingline loans included in such facilities) and (ii) to the extent permitted to be assigned under applicable law, all claims, suits, causes of action and any other right of the Assignor (in its capacity as a Lender) against any Person, whether known or unknown, arising under or in connection with the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto or the loan transactions governed thereby or in any way based on or related to any of the foregoing, including contract claims, tort claims, malpractice claims, statutory claims and all other claims at law or in equity related to the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clause (i) above (the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) above being referred to herein collectively as the ""). Such sale and assignment is without recourse to the Assignor and, except as expressly provided in this Assignment and Assumption, without representation or warranty by the Assignor.
Assigned Interest
Effective Date: _____________ ___, 20___ [TO BE INSERTED BY ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND WHICH SHALL BE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF RECORDATION OF TRANSFER IN THE REGISTER THEREFOR.]
The Assignee agrees to deliver to the Administrative Agent a completed Administrative Questionnaire in which the Assignee designates one or more Credit Contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain material non-public information about New Parent, the Loan Parties and their Related Parties or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the Assignee's compliance procedures and applicable laws, including Federal and state securities laws.
The terms set forth in this Assignment and Assumption are hereby agreed to:
Consented to and Accepted:
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as         Administrative Agent
ANNEX 1
                    1.
Representations and Warranties.
                    1.1 . The Assignor (a) represents and warrants that (i) it is the legal and beneficial owner of the Assigned Interest, (ii) the Assigned Interest is free and clear of any lien, encumbrance or other adverse claim and (iii) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby; and (b) assumes no responsibility with respect to (i) any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, (ii) the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of the Loan Documents or any collateral thereunder, (iii) the financial condition of any Borrower, any of their Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person obligated in respect of any Loan Document or (iv) the performance or observance by any Borrower, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person of any of their respective obligations under any Loan Document.
Assignor
                    1.2. . The Assignee (a) represents and warrants that (i) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and to become a Lender under the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, (ii) it satisfies the requirements, if any, specified in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement that are required to be satisfied by it in order to acquire the Assigned Interest and become a Lender, (iii) from and after the Effective Date, it shall be bound by the provisions of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement as a Lender thereunder and, to the extent of the Assigned Interest, shall have the obligations of a Lender thereunder, (iv) it has received a copy of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, together with copies of the most recent financial statements delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 thereof, as applicable, and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Assignment and Assumption and to purchase the Assigned Interest on the basis of which it has made such analysis and decision independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent or any other Lender, and (v) if it is a Foreign Lender, attached to the Assignment and Assumption is any documentation required to be delivered by it pursuant to the terms of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, duly completed and executed by the Assignee; and (b) agrees that (i) it will, independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent, the Assignor or any other Lender, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Loan Documents, and (ii) it will perform in accordance with their terms all of the obligations which by the terms of the Loan Documents are required to be performed by it as a Lender.
Assignee
                    2. . From and after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments in respect of the Assigned Interest (including payments of principal, interest, fees and other amounts) to the Assignor for amounts which have accrued to but excluding the Effective Date and to the Assignee for amounts which have accrued from and after the Effective Date.
Payments
                    3. . This Assignment and Assumption shall be binding upon, and inure to the benefit of, the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. This Assignment and Assumption may be executed in any number of counterparts, which together shall constitute one instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Assignment and Assumption by facsimile shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Assignment and Assumption. This Assignment and Assumption shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of New York.
General Provisions
EXHIBIT B
January 3, 2011
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent 277 Park Avenue New York, New York 10017
Each of the Lenders and Issuing      Banks party to the Credit      Agreement referred to below
Ladies and Gentlemen:
                    We have acted as counsel to Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and to each of the subsidiaries of the Company named on Annex 1 hereto (collectively, the "Loan Parties" and, together with the Company, the "Obligors") in connection with the amended and restated credit agreement dated as of even date herewith (the "Credit Agreement") among the Company, the Loan Parties party thereto, the lenders named in the Credit Agreement (the "Lenders") and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent for the Lenders (the "Agent"). We are giving this opinion at the request of the Obligors pursuant to section 4.01(a)(iii) of the Credit Agreement. All capitalized terms used but not defined in this opinion have the meaning given them in the Credit Agreement or Annex 1 hereto, as the case may be.
                    In giving this opinion, we have examined:
                    In giving this opinion, we have assumed, with your permission, the genuineness of all signatures, the legal capacity of natural persons and the authenticity of all documents we have examined. As to questions of fact relevant to this opinion, with your permission and without any independent investigation or verification, we have relied upon, and assumed the accuracy of, the representations and warranties of each party in the Credit Documents and have relied upon certificates of officers of the Company and the other Obligors (including, without limitation, the certificate of Gene Wexler, the senior vice president and general counsel of the Company, dated this date (the "Fact Certificate")), and oral and written statements of certain public officials. We also have assumed, with your permission and without any independent verification, compliance by each party to the Credit Documents with its agreements in the respective Credit Documents, and that each Credit Document constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of each party to it (other than the Obligors) and is enforceable against each such party in accordance with its terms. For purposes of this opinion, we have assumed, with your permission and without any independent verification, that (i) the Applicable Certificates have not been amended and that no such amendment is pending or has been proposed, (ii) each of the New York/Delaware Subsidiaries is organized solely under the laws of the State of New York or Delaware, as the case may be, (iii) there are no proceedings pending or contemplated for (A) the merger, consolidation, conversion, dissolution, liquidation or termination of any of the New York/Delaware Subsidiaries, or (B) the transfer to or domestication in any other jurisdiction of any of the New York/Delaware Subsidiaries and (iv) none of the New York/Delaware Subsidiaries has changed its name whether by amendment of its Applicable Certificates, by reorganization or otherwise, within the last four months.
                    For purposes of this opinion, we have assumed, with your permission and without any independent verification, that (i) each of Dress Barn, DBC, MCM, TWBA, TWBP, TWBS, TWBI, TGC, TWBD, TWBDS, AF and TWBSP is a corporation or a limited liability company, as applicable, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, (ii) each of Dress Barn, MCM, TWBA, TWBP, TWBS, TWBDS, AF and TWBSP has the requisite corporate power and authority to execute, deliver and perform each Credit Document to which it is a party, (iii) each of DBC, TWBI, TGC and TWBD has the requisite limited liability company power and authority to execute and deliver each Credit Document to which it is a party, (iv) the execution, delivery and performance by each of Dress Barn, DBC, MCM, TWBA, TWBP, TWBS, TWBI, TGC, TWBD, TWBDS, AF and TWBSP of the Credit Documents to which it is a party have been duly authorized by all requisite corporate or limited liability company, as the case may be, action on the part of Dress Barn, DBC, MCM, TWBA, TWBP, TWBS, TWBI, TGC, TWBD, TWBDS, AF and TWBSP and (iv) each Credit Document to which each of Dress Barn, DBC, MCM, TWBA, TWBP, TWBS, TWBI, TGC, TWBD, TWBDS, AF and TWBSP is a party has been duly executed and delivered by each of Dress Barn, DBC, MCM, TWBA, TWBP, TWBS, TWBI, TGC, TWBD, TWBDS, AF and TWBSP.
                    In addition, we have assumed, with your permission and without any independent verification, that:
                    Whenever in this opinion any statement is made to our "knowledge" or any statement refers to matters "known to us", it means the actual knowledge and conscious awareness, without any independent verification, of the attorneys in our firm who have been directly involved in acting as counsel to the Company in connection with the transactions provided for in the Credit Documents.
                    Based upon and subject to the foregoing and the limitations and qualifications set forth below, we are of the opinion that:
                    This opinion is limited to the federal law of the United States, the Delaware General Corporation Law, the Delaware UCC and the laws of the state of New York, and we express no opinion as to the law of any other jurisdiction.
                    This opinion is addressed to you and is solely for your benefit and the benefit of your assigns as permitted in accordance with the terms of the Credit Documents and only in connection with the transactions contemplated by the Credit Documents. This opinion may not be relied upon by you or your permitted assigns for any other purpose or furnished to, circulated, quoted or relied upon by any other person for any purpose without our prior written consent.
Annex 1
The Dress Barn, Inc., a Connecticut corporation ("Dress Barn") D.B.R., Inc., a Delaware corporation ("DBR") DBX, Inc. a New York corporation ("DBX") Dress Barn Credit Management, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company ("DBC") Maurices Credit Management, Inc., a Virginia corporation ("MCM") Maurices Incorporated, a Delaware corporation ("Maurices") Worldwide Retail Holdings, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("WRH") Tween Brands, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Tween" and together with DBR, DBX, Maurices and WRH, the "New York/Delaware Subsidiaries") Tween Brands Agency, Inc., an Ohio corporation ("TWBA") Tween Brands Purchasing, Inc., an Ohio corporation ("TWBP") Tween Brands Service Co., an Ohio corporation ("TWBS") Tween Brands Investment, LLC, an Ohio limited liability company ("TWBI") Too GC, LLC an Ohio limited liability company ("TGC") Tween Brands Direct, LLC, an Ohio limited liability company ("TWBD") Tween Brands Direct Services, Inc., an Ohio corporation ("TWBDS") American Factoring, Inc., a Nevada corporation ("AF") Tween Brands Store Planning, Inc., an Ohio corporation ("TWBSP")
Annex 2
EXHIBIT C
EXHIBIT D
          This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011 (as amended, modified, renewed or extended from time to time, the "Amended and Restated Credit Agreement") among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., (the "Company"), the Borrowing Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent for the Lenders and as an Issuing Bank. Unless otherwise defined herein, capitalized terms used in this Compliance Certificate have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement.
          THE UNDERSIGNED HEREBY CERTIFIES IN HIS CAPACITY AS AN OFFICER OF THE COMPANY AND NOT IN HIS INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY, ON ITS BEHALF AND ON BEHALF OF THE BORROWERS, THAT TO HIS KNOWLEDGE AFTER DUE INQUIRY:
          1. I am the duly elected [               ] of the Borrower Representative;
          2. I have reviewed the terms of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and I have made, or have caused to be made under my supervision, a detailed review of the transactions and conditions of the Company and its Subsidiaries during the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements [and such financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes];
4
          3. The examinations described in paragraph 2 did not disclose, except as set forth below, and I have no knowledge of (i) the existence of any condition or event which constitutes a Default during or at the end of the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements or as of the date of this Certificate or (ii) any change in GAAP or in the application thereof that has occurred since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement;
          4. attached hereto sets forth financial data and computations evidencing the Borrowers' compliance with certain covenants of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct; and
Schedule I
          5. hereto sets forth the computations necessary to determine the Applicable Rate and commencing on the first day of the calendar month after the month in which this Compliance Certificate is delivered.
Schedule II
          Described below are the exceptions, if any, to paragraph 3 by listing any Default, in detail, (i) the nature of the Default, the period during which it has existed and the action which the Borrowers have taken, are taking, or propose to take with respect to each such Default or (ii) any change in GAAP or the application thereof and the effect of such change on the attached financial statements:
          The foregoing certifications, together with the computations set forth in Schedule I and Schedule II hereto and the financial statements delivered with this Certificate in support hereof, are made solely in the capacity of the undersigned as an officer of the Borrower Representative, and not individually, and delivered this ___ day of ________, 20[   ].
SCHEDULE I
SCHEDULE II
EXHIBIT E
          THIS JOINDER AGREEMENT (this ""), dated as of [   ], 20__, is entered into between [], a [](the "") and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent (the "") under that certain Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of January 3, 2011 among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and the Administrative Agent (as the same may be amended, modified, extended or restated from time to time, the ""). All capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined shall have the meanings set forth in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement.
Agreement
entity name of the new subsidiary
type of entity and jurisdiction of organization
New Subsidiary
Administrative Agent
New Parent
Amended and Restated Credit Agreement
          The New Subsidiary and the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lenders, hereby agree as follows:
          1. The New Subsidiary hereby acknowledges, agrees and confirms that, by its execution of this Agreement, the New Subsidiary will be deemed to be a Loan Party under the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and a "Loan Guarantor" for all purposes of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and shall have all of the obligations of a Loan Party and a Loan Guarantor thereunder as if it had executed the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement. The New Subsidiary hereby ratifies, as of the date hereof, and agrees to be bound by, all of the terms, provisions and conditions contained in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, including without limitation (a) all of the representations and warranties of the Loan Parties set forth in Article III of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, (b) all of the covenants set forth in Articles V and VI of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and (c) all of the guaranty obligations set forth in Article X of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing terms of this paragraph 1, the New Subsidiary, subject to the limitations set forth in Section 10.10 of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, hereby guarantees, jointly and severally with the other Loan Guarantors, to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, as provided in Article X of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, the prompt payment and performance of the Guaranteed Obligations in full when due (whether at stated maturity, as a mandatory prepayment, by acceleration or otherwise) strictly in accordance with the terms thereof and agrees that if any of the Guaranteed Obligations are not paid or performed in full when due (whether at stated maturity, as a mandatory prepayment, by acceleration or otherwise), the New Subsidiary will, jointly and severally together with the other Loan Guarantors, promptly pay and perform the same, without any demand or notice whatsoever, and that in the case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, the same will be promptly paid in full when due (whether at extended maturity, as a mandatory prepayment, by acceleration or otherwise) in accordance with the terms of such extension or renewal.
          2. If required, the New Subsidiary is, simultaneously with the execution of this Agreement, executing and delivering such Collateral Documents (and such other documents and instruments) as requested by the Administrative Agent in accordance with the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement.
          3. The address of the New Subsidiary for purposes of Section 9.01 of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement is as follows:
          4. The New Subsidiary hereby waives acceptance by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders of the guaranty by the New Subsidiary upon the execution of this Agreement by the New Subsidiary.
          5. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when so executed and delivered shall be an original, but all of which shall constitute one and the same instrument.
          6. THIS AGREEMENT AND THE RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS OF THE PARTIES HEREUNDER SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED AND INTERPRETED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
          IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Subsidiary has caused this Agreement to be duly executed by its authorized officer, and the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lenders, has caused the same to be accepted by its authorized officer, as of the day and year first above written.
EXHIBIT F
          Reference is made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), by and among Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the ""), the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, Bank of America, N.A., as Syndication Agent, and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, as sole and exclusive joint lead arrangers and joint bookrunners. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein have the meanings assigned in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement or the Restated Security Agreement referred to therein, as applicable.
Amended and Restated Credit Agreement
Borrower Representative
The undersigned, a financial officer and a legal officer, respectively, of the Borrower Representative, hereby certify (in their respective capacities as officers of the Borrower Representative and not individually) to the Administrative Agent and each other Lender as follows:
1. . (a) The exact legal name of each Grantor, as such name appears in its respective certificate of formation, is as follows:
Names
(b) Set forth below is each other legal name each Grantor has had in the past five years, together with the date of the relevant change:
(c) Except as set forth in hereto, no Grantor has changed its identity or corporate structure in any way within the past five years. Changes in identity or corporate structure would include mergers, consolidations and acquisitions, as well as any change in the form, nature or jurisdiction of organization.
Schedule 1
(d) The following is a list of all other names (including trade names or similar appellations) used by each Grantor or any of its divisions or other business units in connection with the conduct of its business or the ownership of its properties at any time during the past five years:
(e) Set forth below is the Organizational Identification Number, if any, issued by the jurisdiction of formation of each Grantor that is a registered organization:
(f) Set forth below is the Federal Taxpayer Identification Number of each Grantor:
2. (a) The chief executive office of each Grantor is located at the address set forth opposite its name below:
Current Locations.
(b) Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all locations where such Grantor maintains any books or records relating to any Accounts Receivable (with each location at which chattel paper, if any, is kept being indicated by an "*"):
(c) The jurisdiction of formation of each Grantor that is a registered organization is set forth opposite its name below:
(d) Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all the locations where such Grantor maintains any Equipment or other Collateral or warehouses or other locations pursuant to bailment or consignment arrangements (include operator or other bailee or consignee) not identified above:
(e) Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all the places of business of such Grantor not identified in paragraph (a), (b), (c) or (d) above:
(f) Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are the names and addresses of all Persons other than such Grantor that have possession of any of the Collateral of such Grantor:
3. All Accounts have been originated by the Grantors and all Inventory has been acquired by the Grantors in the ordinary course of business.
Unusual Transactions.
4. File search reports have been obtained from each Uniform Commercial Code filing office identified with respect to such Grantor in Section 2 hereof, and such search reports reflect no liens against any of the Collateral other than those reflected thereon and/or permitted under the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement.
File Search Reports.
5. . Financing statements in substantially the form of hereto have been prepared for filing in the proper Uniform Commercial Code filing office in the jurisdiction in which each Grantor is located and, to the extent any of the collateral is comprised of fixtures, timber to be cut or as extracted collateral from the wellhead or minehead, in the proper local jurisdiction, in each case as set forth with respect to such Grantor in Section 2 hereof.
UCC Filings
Schedule 5
6. Attached hereto as is a schedule setting forth, with respect to the filings described in Section 5 above, each filing and the filing office in which such filing is to be made.
Schedule of Filings.
Schedule 6
7. Attached hereto as is a true and correct list of all the issued and outstanding stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membership interests or other equity interest of the Borrower Representative and each Subsidiary and the record and beneficial owners of such stock, partnership interests, membership interests or other equity interests. Also set forth on is each equity investment of the Borrower Representative or any Subsidiary that represents 50% or less of the equity of the entity in which such investment was made (other than Permitted Investments).
Stock Ownership and other Equity Interests.
Schedule 7
Schedule 7
8. Attached hereto as is a true and correct list of all promissory notes and other evidence of indebtedness held by the Borrower Representative and each Subsidiary that are required to be pledged under the Restated Security Agreement, including all intercompany notes between the Borrower Representative and each Subsidiary and each Subsidiary of the Borrower Representative and each other such Subsidiary.
Debt Instruments.
Schedule 8
9. . Attached hereto as is (a) a true and correct list of all advances made by the Borrower Representative to any Subsidiary of the Borrower Representative or made by any Subsidiary of the Borrower Representative to the Borrower Representative or to any other Subsidiary of the Borrower Representative (other than those identified on ), which advances will be on and after the date hereof evidenced by one or more intercompany notes pledged to the Administrative Agent under the Restated Security Agreement and (b) a true and correct list of all unpaid intercompany transfers of goods sold and delivered by or to the Borrower Representative or any Subsidiary of the Borrower Representative.
Advances
Schedule 9
Schedule 8
10. [Intentionally Omitted]
11. . Attached hereto as in proper form for filing with the United States Patent and Trademark Office is a schedule setting forth all of each Grantor's Patents, Patent Licenses, Trademarks and Trademark Licenses, including the name of the registered owner, the registration number and the expiration date of each Patent, Patent License, Trademark and Trademark License owned by any Grantor. Attached hereto as in proper form for filing with the United States Copyright Office is a schedule setting forth all of each Grantor's Copyrights and Copyright Licenses, including the name of the registered owner, the registration number and the expiration date of each Copyright or Copyright License owned by any Grantor.
Intellectual Property
Schedule 11(A)
Schedule 11(B)
12. Attached hereto as is a true and correct list of each commercial tort claim in excess of $500,000 to be held by any Grantor on the Restatement
Commercial Tort Claims.
Schedule 12
Effective Date, including a brief description thereof, except those claims which are publicly filed and/or disclosed.
13. Attached hereto as is a true and correct list of deposit accounts maintained by each Grantor (other than those deposit accounts attributable to individual store locations), including the name and address of the depositary institution, the type of account, the account number and the account holder for each account.
Deposit Accounts.
Schedule 13
14. Attached hereto as is a true and correct list of securities accounts maintained by each Grantor, including the name and address of the financial institution holding the security account (including a securities intermediary or commodity intermediary), the type of account and the account number.
Securities Accounts.
Schedule 14
15. Attached hereto as is a true and correct list of each contract of the Grantors under which the rights and remedies, and all money and claims for money due or to become due to the Grantor are required to be pledged under the Restated Security Agreement.
Assigned Contracts.
Schedule 15
          IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have duly executed this certificate on this ________ day of __, ______.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110110171750.txt.gz
TIME:20110110171750
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 10, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release revising its earnings per share guidance for its full fiscal year ending July 30, 2011.  A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 JANUARY 10, 2011  Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today announces it is raising earnings per share guidance for its fiscal year ending July 30, 2011.
SUFFERN, NY
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
As a result of better than expected holiday season sales and margin performance, the Company is raising its non-GAAP diluted earnings per share guidance for fiscal 2011 to a range of $2.20 to $2.25 from its previous guidance of $2.05 to $2.15.
David R. Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer commented, We were very pleased with our sales and margin performance at each of our brands over the important holiday season.  With overall stronger than expected comp sales, we sustained our full-priced sell through rates and outperformed our expectations through excellent profitability.  This was particularly true for , which led our performance during the holiday season.  We were also very pleased with better than anticipated gross profit performance.
maurices
Justices
The Company noted that comparable store sales for the holiday season, comprising the period from Thanksgiving Day to January 2, 2011, increased 7% on a consolidated basis.  By brand, increased 4%, increased 16% and increased 4%.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
As previously announced, the Company will be participating in the 9th Annual Cowen and Company Consumer Conference, January 11, 2011 at The Westin New York at Times Square in New York, NY and the 13th Annual ICR XChange Conference on Wednesday, January 12, 2011 at the St. Regis Monarch Beach Resort in Dana Point, California.  A copy of this presentation is now available at www.ascenaretail.com in the investor relations section.
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls operating under the , and brands. The Company operates 2,489 stores.
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
 
 
 
stores offer casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 832 stores in 47 states. stores offer casual and career apparel and accessories at great values to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operate 763 stores in 44 states. stores offer trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operate 894 stores in 46 states and Puerto Rico.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
For more information, please visit , ,
www.ascenaretail.com
www.dressbarn.com
and .
www.maurices.com
www.shopjustice.com
Ascena Forward-Looking Statement Disclosure
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved.  Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available on Dress Barns most recent report on Form 10-K/A for the year ended July 31, 2010 and Form 10-Q for the quarter ended October 30, 2010.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110203152700.txt.gz
TIME:20110203152700
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 3, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release reporting its sales results for its second quarter and six month period ended January 29, 2011.  A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reported stronger than anticipated fiscal 2011 second quarter sales results.  Net sales for the thirteen week fiscal second quarter ended January 29, 2011 increased 27% to $752.1 million compared to $594.1 million for the thirteen week fiscal second quarter ended January 23, 2010.  The overall increase was primarily due to an increase of sales of $116.7 million which included thirteen weeks this year compared to the period from the merger date of November 25, 2009 to January 23, 2010 last year.  Consolidated comparable store sales during the second quarter, for stores open at least one year, increased 9%.
SUFFERN, NY  February 3, 2011 
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
Justice
Net sales for the six month period ended January 29, 2011 increased 47% to $1.465 billion compared to $998.2 million for the six month period ended January 23, 2010.  The overall increase was primarily due to an increase of sales of $407.3 million which included twenty-six weeks this year compared to the period from the merger date of November 25, 2009 to January 23, 2010 last year.  Consolidated comparable store sales during this six month period increased 6%.
Justice
The Companys net sales and comparable store sales by brand for the fiscal second quarter and six month period were as follows:
 
 
 
Commentary
David R. Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer commented, We are pleased to have sustained our sales momentum and strong rate of profitability through the holiday season.  We believe that our merchandise assortments and inventory levels are appropriate for our current business trends and are excited about our continuing opportunity to deliver better than expected results and leverage our strong market positions to create additional value."
Conference Call Information
The Company will conduct a conference call on March 2, 2011 at 9:00 AM Eastern Time to review its second quarter fiscal 2011 results followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (857) 350-1678 prior to the start time, the passcode is 19054272. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at .  A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until April 2, 2011 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 30091048.
www.ascenaretail.com
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls operating under the , and brands. The Company operates 2,478 stores.
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
stores offer casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 829 stores in 47 states. stores offer casual and career apparel and accessories at great values to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operate 761 stores in 44 states. stores offer trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operate 888 stores in 46 states and Puerto Rico.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
For more information, visit , , and .
www.ascenaretail.com
www.dressbarn.com
www.maurices.com
www.shopjustice.com
Ascena Forward-Looking Statement Disclosure
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  The Company
does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved.  Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available on Dress Barns most recent report on Form 10-K/A for the year ended July 31, 2010 and Form 10-Q for the quarter ended October 30, 2010.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110302171707.txt.gz
TIME:20110302171707
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
 
     
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
     
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4c))
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On March 2, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an investor conference call to discuss the Companys results of operations for its second quarter and six months ended January 29, 2011 and certain other information, including the contents of the Companys press release dated March 2, 2011 which was furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 8-K on March 2, 2011.  The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference.  A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
                                                                                                  
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
1
 
Final Transcript
 
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
 
 Armand Correia
 Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
 David Jaffe
 Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
 
 Janet Kloppenburg
 JJK Research - Analyst
 
 Sam Panella
 Raymond James - Analyst
 
 Neely Tamminga
 Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
 Ed Yruma
 Keybanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 Brian Tunick
 JPMorgan - Analyst
 
 Scott Krasik
 BB&T Capital Markets  - Analyst
 
 Robin Murchison
 SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
 Mark Montagna
 Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 
 PRESENTATION
 
 
 
Operator
 
 Good morning, everyone. My name is Crystal, and I will be your conference operator today. At this time, I would like to welcome everyone to the Ascena Group's second quarter earnings conference call. Today's call is being recorded and will be available for replay later today. Information on accessing this replay is available in today's press release. All lines will be in a listen-only mode until the question and answer session.
As a matter of formality, I need to remind participants that remarks made by management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause the actual results and implementation of the Company's plans to vary materially. These risks are referenced in today's press release as well as in the Company's SEC filings. I would now like to turn the conference over to your host for today, Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO. Please proceed.
 
2
 
Final Transcript
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 Thank you. Good morning, and thank you for joining us to discuss the results for our fiscal second quarter ended January 29, 2011. With me today is Armand Correia, our CFO. I'm very pleased to report another quarter of record sales and earnings results. Comp sales increased 9%, which included increases of all three brands,11% at Justice, 17% at Maurices and 1% at Dressbarn. Quarterly adjusted earnings per share grew to 54% to $0.57 compared to $0.37 in the prior year quarter. Given the better than expected earnings results and the positive trends we're seeing so far for the spring season with Feb comps up in the high single digits for all three brands, we are raising our full-year EPS guidance to $2.28 to $2.33, up from our previous guidance of $2.20 to $2.25.
 
Our brands continue to appeal to our customer in this highly competitive environment. This has given us the opportunity to reach new levels of efficiency in our operations, and we're very pleased to be showing improvement both in our gross margin and our operating margin. We believe that continued focus on merchandise that provides fashion at a great value and on operating efficiencies will drive value to shareholders.
At Justice, we continue to grow our market share with enticing merchandise assortments and a compelling value orientation. Our sales increase is driven primarily by an 11% growth in transactions, partially offset by a 2% decrease in units per transaction. Our merchandise assortment is clearly trend right with sales up in most categories, including casual and active tops, intimates, accessories and lifestyle products. Our marketing strategy at Justice reinforces our value proposition with the right balance of 40% off discount offered to our customers through direct mail, e-mail customer loyalty programs and entire store point of sale events.
We are excited about our two strategic initiatives at Justice. The expansion into the Canadian market and the launch of our boys concept. We are very excited to have just opened our first Canadian store in Ontario. This is the first of six planned store openings in Canada for the spring season. In March, we will also launch our boys concept, Brothers, via the Internet. As you know, Justice competes with the wide range of big box retailers, but we remain the only national specialty store focused on the tween girl. Therefore, our ability to truly serve this customer and to give her a special experience and a unique assortment gives us a competitive advantage.
At Maurices, we generated comp sales growth of 17% during the second quarter. An increase in transactions was the main growth driver, while average dollar sale also increased. All departments at our Maurices brand close to double digit comp sales increases with sweaters, knit tops and denim jeans category seeing the best improvement. Our marking strategy included an incremental mailer focused on denim, which drove a great performance in this category, as well as keeping our strong sales momentum going through the post holiday time period. At Maurices, our store base is now 761 locations at the end of the quarter versus 739 stores last year. We are particularly pleased with our new store performance with sales productivity above plan as we continue to expand the Maurices concept outside of our core markets.
At Dressbarn, our 1% comp sales increased in second quarter, reversed the negative trend we saw in the first quarter. During the quarter, sweaters performed well, which was the direct result of our holiday strategy to invest more in gift giving and wear now merchandise, a change from last year. Suit separates under the Jones Studio label continue to perform well, and novelty knitwear also had double digit increases compared to last year.
Our marketing efforts, including increased quantities for our direct mailers and a free gift with purchase in November drove both traffic and sales. A change in our December mailer from a postcard to a fashion foldout yielded increased traffic as well. Based on this successful response rate, we will pursue this strategy for our Mother's Day promotion. Due to the change in the timing of our Easter holiday, we are revising the spring promotional cadence to include an additional direct mailer. As I hope you can tell, operations overall are going very well. We have great teams in place at these businesses, and we're confident we can sustain our momentum through the second half of our fiscal year.
I'd like to now talk about a couple of topics that we're focused on at the corporate level. First, we are continuing to build and refine the shared infrastructure at our brands, particularly in terms of distribution and information systems. We have successfully begun shipping Dressbarn merchandise from our Justice distribution center with a full transition expected to be complete by the end of April. Also, the consolidation of our five data centers into two is currently in process and expected to be completed by the end of the fiscal year. These were two great examples of how our new structure puts our executive team in a position to implement projects to leverage each of our brand strengths.
Additionally, we are focused on strategies to minimize the impact of increases in sourcing costs. Each of our brands has a different degree of price elasticity, and the merchandising teams were evaluating the appropriate actions regarding price increases. The information we've learned about this inflationary trend in the business has only reinforced our belief that these cost increases are here to stay. This will affect the entire industry, and we will be monitoring our price increases carefully as the season progresses.
I'm also pleased to report that our efforts to accelerate the development of e-commerce for each of our brands are proceeding well. The increases we are seeing at Justice and Maurices are impressive, and we're very pleased to have launched Dressbarn's e-commerce, which is performing above plan. We continue to regard e-commerce as a major potential opportunity for us, both to generate sales and, due to the strength of the Internet as a communications media, to reinforce our brand position.
We're working to sustain our business' strong momentum. I think this is well reflected by our profitability improvement in the second quarter, which Armand will now describe in more detail.
 
3
 
Final Transcript
 
 
Armand Correia  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Thank you, David. As a reminder, reported quarterly year-over-year financial comparisons include our Justice brand for a partial period in last year's quarter. I will, however, reference in certain instances, Justice on a pro forma basis for the full quarter last year for more meaningful financial comparisons. During the quarter, there were certain costs that we believe are not indicative of ongoing operations for purposes of comparability. We have therefore provided in today's press release a reconciliation of GAAP to non-GAAP measures. As you've seen in this morning's press release, our second quarter and year-to-date record performance reflects strong top-line momentum with even stronger profit growth.
Consolidated net sales for the quarter increased 27% to $752 million compared to $594 million last year. The overall sales increase of $158 million was primarily due to the inclusion of Justice sales for the full quarter this year compared to a partial quarter in the last year, which accounted for $117 million of the increase, with Maurices accounting for $39 million of the overall increase. Total comp store sales increased 9%, marking the eighth consecutive quarter of increases. By brand, Justice sales increased 19% to $338 million compared to last year's $284 million on a pro forma basis for the full quarter. Comp sales increased 11% on top of a 19% increase in last year's comparable quarter. Geographically, Justice delivered positive comps across all regions. Increased transactions with the primary sales driver up 12%.
Justice sales also included $23 million in revenues from its e-commerce business, which has grown a strong 57% versus last year. Maurices sales increased an impressive 24% to $203 million compared to $164 million last year. This increase was primarily driven by the 17% comp increase and Maurices had increases across all regions. All key sales metrics were up with transactions leading the way, increasing 14%. Maurices quarterly sales also included approximately $7 million in revenues from its e-commerce business, well ahead of expectations.
Dressbarn sales increased 1% to $212 million with comp sales also increasing 1%. We were encouraged by the 4% comp sales increase during the holiday season, but business decelerated in January due to severe weather which impacted Dressbarn more than our other brands due to its heavier concentration of stores on the east coast. Included in Dressbarn sales during the quarter were $2 million from its e-commerce business, also well ahead of expectations in its first full quarter.
Consolidated gross profit dollars continue to outperform our year-over-year sales increase. Gross profit grew to $308 million to a rate of 41% of sales compared to last year's rate of 39.1%. The year-over-year improvement of 190 basis points was driven by favorable buy-in occupancy leverage from the strong comp sales performance and merchandise margin improvements at Justice and Maurices. By brand, the gross profit rate at Justice increased to an impressive 45% of sales, 190 basis points above the prior year's reported 43.1%. Last year's gross profit rate reflected a partial quarter. The full quarterly rate would have been 42.4%, making this year's adjusted year-over-year increase of 260 basis points even more noteworthy. The increase came from both favorable buying and occupancy leverage and increases in merchandise margin from higher initial mark-on.
At Maurices, the gross profit rate increased 200 basis points to 41.6% compared to last year's 39.6%. The increase was driven by favorable buy-in occupancy leverage and increased merchandise margin from higher initial mark-on and lower mark-downs. The gross profit rate at Dressbarn decreased 60 basis points to 34% compared to last year's 34.6%. The decrease was in merchandise margin from increased markdowns.
SG&A expenses on a non-GAAP basis came in at 27.9% of sales. In terms of dollars, SG&A increase were approximately $210 million compared to the reported $167 million last year. Accounting for Justice for the full quarter, last year's pro forma SG&A would have been $191 million, or 29.1% of sales. We believe this is a more meaningful year-over-year comparison, which shows a 120 basis points reduction from leverage and consistent with expectations we gave on last quarter's call. Depreciation expense was $22 million compared to $18 million last year. The year-over-year increase reflects Justice for the partial quarter last year. We would expect a $22 million quarterly dollar level to continue for the remainder of the two quarters of this fiscal year.
Moving down the income statement, operating income dollars on a non-GAAP basis grew 61% to $77 million compared to last year's $48 million. As a percent of sales, this year's 10.2% margin increased 220 basis points versus last year's 8%. The increase was driven by the outstanding operating performance from both Justice and Maurices. By brand and on a non-GAAP basis, Justice delivered outstanding quarterly operating income results of $55 million, or 16.2% of sales. This resulted in a $21 million increase, or approximately 60% over last year's full quarterly amount of $35 million, or 12.4% of sales. These quarterly operating income results represent an all-time record high for Justice.
Maurices also continued its outstanding performance with record second quarter operating income of $27 million, or 13.4% of sales, an increase of 70% versus last year's $16 million, or 9.8% of sales. Dressbarn posted a quarterly operating loss of $6 million compared to a loss of $5 million last year. We are disappointed with these results and look forward to a stronger spring season.
 
 
4
 
Final Transcript
 
 
Interest expense, as expected, came in at $660,000 compared to $2.5 million last year. The decrease to last year reflects the payoff of our convertible notes during January of 2010. Our quarterly effective tax rate increased to 41%, above our previous rate of approximately 39%. The increase was primarily due to certain non-deductible compensation costs. Adjusted net earnings increased 64% to $46 million, or $0.57 per diluted share, compared to last year's $28 million, or $0.37 per diluted share.
Now, moving on to the balance sheet. We ended the quarter with $441 million in cash and investments. This represents approximately $5.43 in cash and investments per average year. In terms of operating cash flow, we generated approximately $108 million during the quarter, with $81 million in free cash flow. During the quarter, we repurchased 1 million shares of our stock at an average price of approximately $26 per share, for a total of $26 million under our existing $100 million authorization. We currently have $74 million remaining under this authorization.
Cap Ex for the quarter was $27 million with the full year expected to be approximately $90 million. Merchandise inventories ended the quarter up 12% at $271 million compared to $242 million last year. The increase supports our current sales trend and our decision to bring in new spring receipts earlier, which has led to better than expected spring selling for February.
Inventories ending the quarter at Justice were well controlled coming in at $96 million, an increase of 11% over the prior year's comparable period. Inventory on an average store basis decreased 3% due to the high level of in-transit inventory. Maurices ended the quarter with inventory of $68 million, an increase of 23% versus last year's $55 million. The strong quarterly sales performance resulted in significantly less clearance than a year ago. The year-over-year inventory increase is all spring related and supports our decision to effect an earlier spring floor set. Inventory on an average store basis increased 19%.
At Dressbarn, inventory was $107 million, an increase of 6% versus last year. The inventory on an average store basis increased 7%. The seasonal mix ending the quarter included higher levels of clearance than a year ago. However, aggressive clearance combined with better than expected recent sales have resulted in less clearance levels than last year ending February.
Now, I would like to comment about our outlook for the spring season and the full year. As David mentioned, given our better than expected quarterly earnings results and the early favorable read on February spring selling, we have raised our full-year earnings per share guidance. We
anticipate comp store sales to be up in the mid-single digits for the spring season. As a reminder, last year's spring season and full-year's total sales included an extra fifty-third reporting week, which accounted for approximately $56 million in additional sales. This extra week favorably impacted earnings per share by approximately $0.05 on the year and obviously, $0.05 for Q4.
In summary, we were very pleased with our is second quarter performance and look forward to sharing our third quarter results with you towards the end of May. Thank you. Operator, we are now ready to take questions.
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
 
Operator
 
 (Operator Instructions)Today's first question comes from the line of Janet Kloppenburg with JJK Research. Please proceed.
 Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
 
 Hi, David, Hi, Armand. Congratulations on a nice quarter.
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Thank you, Janet.
 
5
 
Final Transcript
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
 
 Really, unbelievable and great start to the third quarter. A couple of questions. First on the new concept by Justice. I was wondering, I think you said e-commerce launch. I was wondering when a store might be opening and what the outlook is there for the parameters of the store, how big, et cetera. And I was also wondering if you could talk a little bit more about your February sales trend. I know that you brought in spring early, but was there also incremental marketing or perhaps a focus on different categories that are helping business to be as strong as they are? Last, with the pressure on sourcing, how should we be thinking about first margin going forward? Thank you.
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Okay. Thanks, Janet. A lot of questions there.
 Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
 I'm sorry.
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 That's okay. On the boys, we're going to launch it on e-commerce, you're absolutely right, and we're expecting to launch it next week. So, stay tuned. You can go to the Shop Justice website and you'll see it.
 Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
 
 Okay.
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 At this point, we have no plans for any brick and mortar stores. We will keep you posted but obviously, we want to see how it does in the virtual world before we go out.
With February, I think there were some minor adjustments at one of the brands in terms of the promo cadence, but nothing significant. And as a result, we had nice performance, fairly equally balanced among the three divisions. So, we're real pleased. There was early shipment of spring. That responded well. At one of the divisions, we had some clearance that we moved out. So, we ended -- as a department, we ended February in very, very good shape in terms of the currency of our inventory. We were very, very well converted, all three brands and made up for a little bit of overage that we had in January. So, I feel like we're really in good shape going into the rest of spring.
And then finally, in sourcing, I think that we've got a good shot to maintain our gross margins for spring. We think that the increases, the price increases that we're putting in place are relatively minor compared to what we think we're going to see in the fall. Again, this varies by brand. But we're not anticipating any major disruption for spring gross margin. I think the world may change a little bit more in fall and until we really have a sense of how the consumer's responding to price increases, not just at our brands but just in general, it'll be hard to determine whether those price increases for the fall that we have planned will stick and whether we're going to be able to maintain our gross margin or not.
 Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
 
 Okay, thank you very much. Good luck.
 
6
 
Final Transcript
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
Thanks, Janet.
Operator
 
 
 Our next question comes from the line of Sam Panella with Raymond James. Please proceed.
Sam Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
 
 
Hey, good morning, and congratulations.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
Thanks, Sam.
Sam Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
 
 
 Armand, with the SG&A, how much in the second quarter was attributable to projects that you're doing for future cost savings? I think in the first quarter you had called out about $13 million?
 
Armand Correia  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
 
 That's correct. However, again, most of these projects that we are doing, we are breaking them up between the GAAP and non-GAAP, and we've shown the reconciliation, both in the integration projects. I think what you're referring to in the first quarter, SG&A had increased year over year, I think at dressbarn and maurices by approximately $12 million. And the big thing there, I just want to remind everybody that the biggest item there was actually incentive comp accruals. It wasn't necessarily the increase in SG&A relative to the projects because we have, in many instances, broken out some of these projects on a what we call non-GAAP basis. I did mention and I continue to mention that SG&A does come under some pressure, and it's less now in this particular quarter, and we anticipate less in the quarters to come because of duplicate costs as we go through these transitions. And a perfect example, as David mentioned, is the distribution center. There is obviously labor in both places. There's severance, there's retention and those kind of things. And I would estimate that that kind of impact probably adds somewhere in the neighborhood to $1 million to $1.5 million on the SG&A expense line.
Sam Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
 
 
 Okay, thanks. Then with respect to the dressbarn division, you mentioned that merchandise margin was down year-over-year. Any particular categories seeing greater markdowns? And also, do you attribute this to the highly promotional environment over the holidays or more maybe having to clear through merchandise, given the deceleration in sales trends with the weather?
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 I think the dressbarn division just was a little softer than we had hoped for and had planned for in the fall in general. So, we got backed up a little bit in inventory and therefore, had to clear a little bit more aggressively to make sure we ended up the season in good shape. As I mentioned, we did, but it did cost us in gross margin. There were a few categories that were a little stronger than others as we've mentioned, but I don't think it was a singular issue that we had one particular department, though. It was terrible.
 
 
7
 
Final Transcript
 
 
Sam Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
 
 Okay, great. Thanks, and good luck.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Thanks, Sam. Operator?
 
 
Operator
 
 Neely Tamminga from Piper Jaffray, your line is open.
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
 
 Great, thanks, and congratulations.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Thanks, Neely.
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
 
 So, I've got one broader question for you, David and then just two housekeeping questions. One on the CRM initiatives. Can you talk a little bit more about that dressbarn mailing that really drove some of your traffic in transactions in your second quarter? Obviously, it sounds like the content of the mailer was improved, the actual presentation of it. But how are you guys doing on your mailing list in terms of the recipient list in the content and quality there?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Well, the first part, you're absolutely right. We had a very simple postcard with graphics on it, and we changed it into a really beautiful fold out with fashion on it, and we think that that was much more eye catching and much more compelling. So, that's what drove the response rate on that. In general, though, I'd say we continue to build our mailing list for all three brands, and we collect names, phone numbers, e-mail addresses at the store in all three brands. And as a result of that, we continue -- and as well as e-commerce, so we continue to grow our list, and we're able to select through CRM analytics the most likely to respond, et cetera and tailor our mailings appropriately. So, all three divisions are improving and growing their lists. So, I think that's going to be an ongoing process.
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
 
 That's great, thanks, David. And I just have some housekeeping questions here. First on comp trends, the current ones that you're referring to reflecting early February in terms of the mid single digit -- or high single digit for the total company.
 
8
 
Final Transcript
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Right.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
 
 Has this been largely transactionally driven by the number of transactions, or is pricing part of this early on?
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 In general, I would say that for all three, it's transaction.
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
 
 Okay. Okay. And then the pickup that you saw in dressbarn in February, if I'm reading this correctly, it's tied to better receipts and better response to spring. I'm just wondering how the margins are kicking off for that division, because you have the clearance as well.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Right, exactly. We certainly did bring in spring fastener in certain categories, but in general, we still had the clearance that we were moving out aggressively. So, it wasn't that spring led the way. It was really that we had both hitting.
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
 
 Great, thank you. Good luck.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Thanks, Sam -- I mean thanks, Neely.
 
Operator
 
 
 Our next question comes from the line of Ed Yruma with KeyBanc. Please proceed.
 
 Ed Yruma  
- Keybanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 
 Hi, thanks so much for taking my question, and congratulations on a great quarter.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Thank you, Ed.
 
9
 
Final Transcript
 
 
 Ed Yruma  
- Keybanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 Can you talk a little bit about dressbarn from a high level? I know that you had obviously an impact from weather, but clearly, results disappointed a little bit. Clearly, you've refined the promotional strategy, but what other things are you doing to improve performance at core dressbarn?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 Well, I think that's a big challenge area for us, and clearly, we were disappointed in the fall. And yes, there was weather, but I think some of the things were what I call self-inflected. We talked about Q1 on the last call, and in fact, if you look at our -- as Armand said, if you look at our holiday results, they were pretty good, up mid-single digit and then we gave some of that back in January. And yes, weather was a part of it, but in general, I'd say looking out, we think that we've got a lot of things happening that are going to favorably impact our business. As we've talked before, with the DC move, we're finally able to implement merchandise and location planning as well as our new allocation system. So, that we feel very comfortable, very confident we'll have an impact, as well as our ability with the new DC to do size replenishment.
On the merchandising side specifically, we have reorganized our team, and that's going to enable us, we believe, to do a better job of focusing on lifestyles. And there are a few key areas that will be growing our business, focusing on jewelry, petites, suit separates and knitwears, all of which have been performing very well and all of which we believe have a significant upside opportunity, as well as looking at our marketing cadence as we mentioned earlier. So, I think there's a lot going on at dressbarn. We're very optimistic about spring, and if you look back historically, spring's always been a much stronger season for us. So, we're keeping all our shoulders to the wheel to push it into positive territory.
 
 Ed Yruma  
- Keybanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 
 Great, and one housekeeping question. Your tax rate in the quarter was the highest that I've seen in a number of years. And I know that you cited non-deductible compensation expense. But how should we think about your tax rate going forward? Thank you.
 
Armand Correia  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
 I think for the next couple of quarters, I think you should look at that particular rate continuing at around the 41% level. We're certainly reviewing, obviously we're looking at some tax strategy. We're looking at structure, but for the next few quarters, I would probably feel comfortable with a 41% estimated rate.
 
 Ed Yruma  
- Keybanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 Great. Thank you.
 
Operator
 
 
 Our next question comes from the line Brian Tunick with JPMorgan. Please proceed.
 
 Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan - Analyst
 
 
 Thanks. Good morning.
 
10
 
Final Transcript
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 Good morning.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan - Analyst
 
 I guess first question on maurices. The numbers there are pretty amazing. Just want to get a sense where you think maybe that market share is coming from? Do you think that part of the country is just that much stronger than the coast? Just trying to understand where that momentum is. Second question, traditionally the late Easter, how does that have the impact on the business? I'm assuming dressbarn probably sees the most of it. Sounds like you've already assumed a slowdown from February's trend on the Easter shift.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Okay, well first, let's talk about maurices. We are actually thrilled with the performance there, and it's really coming across all the stores' geography, not just the upper midwest or some of the midwest where you think oh, agricultural commodities are doing well, although that's certainly part of it. I think what's happened is a lot of the efforts that we put in place over the last two or three years are all hitting. So, as an example, a year ago, we launched e-commerce. And we think just by getting our name out there, it's helped build the brand.
Our marketing has been stronger, our merchandising has really clicked with the consumer. We're -- all our metrics are improving so when they come in, they see merchandise they like, in improves the conversion rate. We're able to move through the merchandise faster and therefore, less markdown. So, it's kind of the, what we call the virtuous cycle. One good thing leads to another. So, we're very pleased. It may be that some of our direct competition may be struggling a little more out there. Not really sure, I'm not focused on that specifically. But if you do look at the comp sales for the people that we feel are in our market, we for the last 12 months, we actually are the number one performer. So obviously, it is some market share as well.
Switching to the late Easter, this is a problem, primarily for dressbarn, because you back right into Mother's Day. And as we look back on our records, the two-week gap there was the shortest we could find in our records, and it will put pressure on our ability to maximize Mother's Day. But in the meantime, to try and make up for some of that business, as I mentioned earlier, we moved an additional promo into early spring to try and pull some business forward because of the late Easter.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan - Analyst
 
 
 Okay, and just finally on the gross margin question. I know you've talked before about the best practices that you're borrowing from Justice, sourcing operations. Just give us an idea where are you from that perspective, and have you placed any back half orders yet, and what kind of cost increases are you seeing, if you have?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 You kind of have two different questions there. Certainly, maurices and dressbarn are looking at the Justice vertical integration direct source model and are testing it very gingerly. And there are a number of orders that are being placed, but it is not a significant portion of either maurices' or dressbarn's business for spring or fall. We think that that may be a longer term opportunity, and we're continuing to explore it. But there's nothing dramatic happening there. In general, Brian, the cost increases we're seeing for fall are in the 10% range. Some areas are more in the 5% to 10%, and some areas are more in the 10% to 15% plus. Depends on the product, depends on the percent that cotton or polyester makes as a percent of the total purchase price. So, something that's like a T-shirt, which has much less labor in it maybe, a bigger impact than something like a dress or a sweater or what have you. So, we'll be watching that carefully, and not all of the prices are locked in yet, but we do think that that 10% range is probably a pretty good range that we're going to have to be dealing with in the fall.
 
 
11
 
Final Transcript
 
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan - Analyst
 
 Terrific. Thanks so much.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Thanks, Brian.
 
Operator
 
 Our next question comes from the line of Scott Krasik with BBT Capital Markets. Please proceed.
 
 Scott Krasik  
- BB&T Capital Markets  - Analyst
 
 
 Hello, Richard, hello, Armand.
 
Armand Correia  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
 
 Hi, how are you doing?
 
Scott Krasik  
- BB&T Capital Markets  - Analyst
 
 Or David,, I guess. I did the same thing to you last time, that's funny. Just a couple of questions, first, has the pricing issue or the cost issue, has that led you to either accelerate your direct sourcing initiative or changed your approach to using domestic suppliers?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 No, not really. We've got to find the right product, and we're not going to change our approach or our process just to try and lock in a better price. One of the things that we are exploring is, does it make sense to try and lock in the raw materials, the gray goods earlier, and that's something that's under consideration.
 
 Scott Krasik  
- BB&T Capital Markets  - Analyst
 
 The pricing action that you took at Justice, I guess last year, have you accelerated that at all? I think it was all pretty positive, at least your commentary about that.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 The prices we put through in the fall were roughly about 5%, and that's about the same level that we've got for spring. And that, as you can tell from results, seemed to have no impact. We believe the customers buying the deal rather than the ticket, so we're not particularly concerned about spring. But as the big price increases that we just talked about hit in the fall, there may be a greater impact, greater pushback, and that remains to be seen.
 
12
 
Final Transcript
 
 
 Scott Krasik  
- BB&T Capital Markets  - Analyst
 
 Okay, and then at Justice, the growth in the transactions was great in the quarter. Maybe talk about, it seems like you're positioned to continue to take market share and benefit from a demographic shift here over the next few years. Is that how you see it as well?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Yes, for sure, for sure, and we continue to take market share. We've got some data from MPD that I like showing, and if I can just pull it out while we're chatting here. For the 12 months ended December, end of December, Justice market share was up 1.6% to put it very close to Target, and Wal-Mart is the leader. But both of those, Wal-Mart was down 3.8% over those 12 months and Target was down 0.2%. So, we're closing in on the second place leader there, and that's our goal to try and surpass Target as the number two market share in the tween girls category.
 
Scott Krasik  
- BB&T Capital Markets  - Analyst
 
 
 That's exceptional. And then just lastly in terms of potentially accelerating the share buyback?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Well, as you know, we look at our share buyback very opportunistically. We bought the million shares last quarter, we're certainly going to keep looking at buying more stock this quarter and go forward. But we, at this point, are just going to treat it on an opportunistic basis. We're not going to commit to a buyback program other than to say that we think our stock is a good value. In the past, we've been aggressive buyers, and it's obviously worked out very well for us.
 
Scott Krasik  
- BB&T Capital Markets  - Analyst
 
 
 Okay, thanks, guys.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Thanks.
 
Operator
 
 Our next question comes from the line of Robin Murchison with SunTrust. Please proceed.
 
Robin Murchison  
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
 Thanks very much, good morning, everybody.
 
13
 
Final Transcript
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 Hello, Robin.
 
Robin Murchison  
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
 So, dressbarn performance during the quarter, I'm just wondering if there's any -- if you have (inaudible) or if there's anything to comment on, any sort of bifurcation in terms of how maybe dressbarn performed in smaller markets versus the larger markets. And if you want to back out the northeast, that's fine, given the areas. And then I have a follow-up question.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Robin, we probably can't give you much sense of that. We don't break out our geography by small versus large markets, but it's an interesting question. It's something that we'll follow up and if there's anything there, we'll get back to you. And I think, while I hate to use the W-word, I think when you look at the northeast kind of from Boston all the way down to the Carolinas, it was weather. The poor performance was where we had bad weather. And I don't want to hide behind that, because it wasn't like our performance was so stellar in the other markets. But that was the tipping point between what, as I said, holiday was reasonably good at plus four to disappointing in January to pull it down to a plus one.
 
 Robin Murchison  
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
 
 Okay, thanks, David. And then my follow-up would be, you clearly have a lot on your plate with the back office initiatives and the boys concept within Justice. But I wanted to -- somebody's got to ask you about the acquisition market. And then also, I wanted to ask you, how should we think about the above average spend for the back office initiatives in terms of third and fourth quarter for the balance of the year, if you will. Thanks.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 Sure, I'll take the first one. We're not out looking for an acquisition, so let me dispel any rumors you may have heard about that. All of the J Crewers now can go away, because as you've heard, it closed. So, congratulations to them. But seriously, what we're trying to do is focus on developing the shared service model, all the infrastructure changes, a couple of which I talked about and I've talked about in prior calls. And as you say, we do have our plate full. So, while I think there are some interesting opportunities out there, we're not looking at them right now. Doesn't mean that in the future we won't consider an acquisition. It's just not on the front burner for the foreseeable future.
 
Armand Correia  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
 
 As far as the number of integration or strategic projects that we currently have on our plate, I see the third and fourth quarter beginning again to start significantly decreasing. I don't anticipate you're going to see as much between GAAP and non-GAAP on those particular expenditures that we've called out, both in the first quarter and second quarter. I do believe you're going to start seeing moderation. The exact numbers I really don't have available. I can certainly offline discuss it further with you.
 
Robin Murchison  
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
 
 Thanks very much. Good luck, guys.
 
14
 
Final Transcript
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Thank you.
 
Operator
 
 (Operator Instructions)And our next question comes from the line of Mark Montagna with Avondale Partners. Please proceed.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 Hi, good morning. Hi. A couple of questions. When you look at your e-commerce, do you have a projection for the year? Do you think can you hit $100 million across all three divisions?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 We're sitting here scratching our head, Mark.
 
Armand Correia  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
 
 We haven't looked at it that way, Mark. Certainly, I think it would be a stretch. I think we're going to fall short of that.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 
 Okay. And then can you just remind us of when each of the three divisions started their dot-com business?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 I don't know exactly at Justice --
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 Just the quarters, like roughly what quarter?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Well, it was around 10 years ago.
 
15
 
Final Transcript
 
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 Oh, okay.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 I can't tell you what quarter, but it's around 10 years ago. The maurices business began in the fiscal first quarter last year, so that would be fiscal 2010.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 Okay.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 And dressbarn began it in the fiscal first quarter of 2011, so just whatever that is, four months ago.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 Okay. And then just thinking about the dressbarn merchandise planning and allocation system. I guess you're working on it now, but when should that be completed, when should we see an impact, and --?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 Well, it's happening now. And I would like to think that we'll iron out the kinks this spring and be able to see a real impact for fall.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 
 So, it's fully installed across all divisions? You're not still phasing it in or anything?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 Yes, each division has its own system, and Justice and maurices are not impacted by this at all. Maurices is going to put in just one of the modules, which is more of an upgrade. But I don't think it'll have a significant impact whereas at dressbarn, it's a wholesale change, it's a paradigm shift in the way we do things. And as we get the team up and running and we get the history in our systems, I think we'll see greater impact for fall.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 
 Okay, yes, that's what I mean. So, right now, at the dressbarn division, it's not fully installed, or is it? Because normally it's in phases, you do sweaters, then jeans or whatever?
 
16
 
Final Transcript
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 It's not fully operational. It's fully installed, we're just not fully utilizing it yet.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 
 Okay, and then jus lastly, the margins and the sales keep impressing every quarter. Can you just remind us what your peak EBIT margins, what you think they can be by division?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 The EBITDA margins by division, I would like to think that maurices, and Armand, help me, because I'm looking at operating income. But EBITDA, I think maurices can easily hit 20%. I think maurice -- Justice can hit 15%, and I think dressbarn should be able to hit at least 12%.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 
 Okay, what about --
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 The other two -- the first two, maurices and Justice I think are going to be able to hit those numbers in the next year or two, and dressbarn's going to take a little longer to work its way back.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 Okay, what about on an EBIT basis?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 Can we do that offline?
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 
 Yes, sure. Absolutely.
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 
 We don't have it done that way, but Armand can give you the details. And this is just off the top of my head, I'm doing it on the back of an envelope here.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 Okay, that sounds great. All right, that was all I had.
 
17
 
Final Transcript
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 All right, thanks, Mark.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 
 Okay, thanks.
Operator
 
 
 Gentlemen, there are no other questions.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President, CEO
 
 Well, thank you all for your interest in Ascena, and we look forward to speaking to you on our third quarter quarterly call. Have a good day.
 
Operator
 
 Ladies and gentlemen, that concludes today's conference. Thank you for your participation, you may now disconnect and have a great day.
 
 
 
18
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110405161158.txt.gz
TIME:20110405161158
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4c))
o
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
Effective on April 1, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) entered into an agreement with Jay S. Levine. The agreement was an offer letter for employment with the Company which commenced on April 1, 2011. A copy of the agreement is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers: Election of Directors: Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On April 4, 2011, the Company issued a press release announcing the appointment of Jay S. Levine to serve as Senior Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Corporate Controller. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Prior to his appointment, Mr. Levine was Vice President and Corporate Controller for Polo Ralph Lauren Corporation for five years, where his responsibilities included SEC reporting, financial planning and analysis, internal controls, and shared services.  Prior to joining Polo Ralph Lauren, Mr. Levine spent twelve years at Time Warner Inc. where he led Time Warners SEC reporting and accounting policy function for eight years and last served as Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer of its former Music division. Jay started his career and spent eight years at the public accounting firm, Ernst & Young.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
                                                                                                
(Registrant)
Date:  April 5, 2011
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
March 22, 2011
Jay S. Levine, CPA
49 Geiger Lane
Warren, NJ 07059
Dear Jay,
We are pleased to offer you the position of Senior Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer at Ascena Retail Group, reporting to Armand Correia, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  This position will administer accounting policy across all divisions as well as internal and external financial reporting (SEC).  This offer is contingent on a satisfactory background check and a starting date on April 1, 2011.
This letter will provide additional details about your total compensation and benefits package.  The plan design of the companys benefits package is subject to change.
BASE SALARY, BONUS AND STOCK OPTIONS
 
DEFERRED COMPENSATION
 
 
 
EXECUTIVE SEVERANCE POLICY
TIME OFF AWARDS
 
Jay, this offer of employment does not constitute an employment contract; however, it is intended to be a statement of our intent to employ you. We believe you will be an outstanding addition to the Ascena team.  I am confident that you will find the position challenging and that you will have the opportunity to continue your professional growth.
 
If you wish to accept this offer, please sign both copies and return one full copy to me postmarked on or before March 25, 2011 in the enclosed envelope.
 
 
Sincerely,
 
 
/s/ Armand Correia
 
Armand Correia
 
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
 
If the terms of this offer are acceptable, please sign below:
AGREED AND ACCEPTED:
 
 
 
CC:  David Jaffe

Exhibit 99.1
 
NEWS RELEASE
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC. APPOINTS JAY S. LEVINE AS SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT,
 CHIEF ACCOUNTING OFFICER AND CORPORATE CONTROLLER
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. announces that Jay S. Levine has been appointed Senior Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Corporate Controller of Ascena Retail Group with responsibilities for SEC reporting, financial planning and analysis, internal controls and corporate taxes.  He will report to Armand Correia, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, effective immediately.
SUFFERN, NY - APRIL 4, 2011 
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
Mr. Levines executive career spans more than 20 years and includes multi-national retailing with Big 4 accounting experience.  Most recently, he was Vice President and Corporate Controller for Polo Ralph Lauren Corporation for five years, where his responsibilities included SEC reporting, financial planning and analysis, internal controls, and shared services.  Prior to joining Polo Ralph Lauren, Jay spent twelve years at Time Warner Inc. where he led Time Warners SEC reporting and accounting policy function for eight years and last served as Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer of its former Music division. Jay started his career and spent eight years at the public accounting firm, Ernst & Young.
Armand Correia, Executive Vice President and CFO, commented:  We are excited to welcome Jay to our senior management team.  Jay brings with him an extensive background of retail experience, leadership and technical skills that will make him a great addition to our financial team.
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. was created as public company effective January 1, 2011.  The Company is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, , and brands. The Company operates 2,478 stores.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
stores offer casual, career, special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 829 stores in 47 states. stores offer casual and career apparel and accessories at great values to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operate 761 stores in 44 states. stores offer trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operate 888 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
For more information, please visit , and .
www.dressbarn.com
www.maurices.com
www.shopjustice.com
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements, within meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is available in our most recent report on Form 10-K/A for the year ended July 31, 2010 and Form 10-Q for the quarter ended January 29, 2011.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110505171354.txt.gz
TIME:20110505171354
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 5, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release reporting its sales results for its third quarter and nine month period ended April 30, 2011.  A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
 
Exhibit 99.1
  
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reported fiscal 2011 third quarter sales results.  Net sales for the fiscal third quarter ended April 30, 2011 increased 9% to $722.8 million, compared to $665.5 million for the fiscal third quarter ended April 24, 2010.  The overall increase was primarily due to across-the-board increases in comparable store sales, as well as strong growth in e-commerce sales.  Consolidated comparable store sales during the third quarter, for stores open at least one year, increased 6%.
SUFFERN, NY  May 5, 2011 
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
Net sales for the nine month period ended April 30, 2011 increased 32% to $2.19 billion, compared to $1.66 billion for the nine month period ended April 24, 2010.  The overall increase was primarily due to strong sales performances at the and brands.  On a year-to-date basis, Ascenas consolidated sales also benefited from an extra eighteen weeks of sales volume from that are included in the current year due to the merger in the prior year closing on November 25, 2009.  Consolidated comparable store sales during this nine month period increased 6%.
maurices
Justice
Justice
The Companys net sales and comparable store sales by brand for the fiscal third quarter and nine month period were as follows:
sales for the current year-to-date period are for the thirty-nine weeks ended April 30, 2011, compared to the twenty-one week period in the prior year from the merger date of November 25, 2009 to April 24, 2010. However, comparable store sales results for the nine months are based on the full fiscal reporting period, which includes comparable store sales prior to the merger date.
Justice
Justice
 
 
 
 
Commentary
David R. Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer commented, We are pleased to have reported good comparable stores sales growth during the quarter.  We believe we have an effective merchandise plan for each of our concepts and while challenges remain, particularly related to the overall economic environment, we expect to continue to see good results. Our diversified group of retail concepts each remain positioned as fashionable, high-value destinations that attract a broad range of customers.
The Company will conduct a conference call on May 25, 2011 at 4:30 PM Eastern Time to review its third quarter fiscal 2011 results followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (617) 213-8064 prior to the start time, the passcode is 90119640. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at .  A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until June 25, 2011 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 57765981.
www.ascenaretail.com
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. was created as a public company effective January 1, 2011.  The Company is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls, operating, through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, the and brands. The Company operates through its subsidiaries nearly 2,500 stores throughout the United States and Canada, with revenues of over $2.8 billion.
dressbarn, maurices
Justice
stores offer casual, career, special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 834 stores in 47 states. stores offer casual and career apparel and accessories at great values to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operate 767 stores in 44 states. stores offer trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operate 890 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
For more information, visit , , and .
www.ascenaretail.com
www.dressbarn.com
www.maurices.com
www.shopjustice.com
Ascena Forward-Looking Statement Disclosure
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved.  Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available on Dress Barns most recent report on Form 10-K/A for the year ended July 31, 2010 and Ascena Retail Group, Inc.s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended January 29, 2011.
Investor Relations
(845) 369-4600
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110525162200.txt.gz
TIME:20110525162200
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 25, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) third quarter and nine month periods ended April 30, 2011. A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
issued a press release disclosing material non-public information regarding its results of operations for the fiscal
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
Date:  May 25, 2011
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC. REPORTS THIRD QUARTER
SALES AND RECORD EARNINGS RESULTS
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reports sales and record earnings results for its fiscal third quarter and nine months ended April 30, 2011.
SUFFERN, NY  May 25, 2011 
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
Fiscal Third Quarter Results
Net income for the fiscal third quarter increased 8% to $51.8 million, or $0.64 per diluted share, compared to net income of $48.0 million, or $0.59 per diluted share, for the third quarter of fiscal 2010.
Adjusted net income on a non-GAAP basis increased to $53.7 million, or $0.66 per diluted share, compared to net income for last years third quarter of $49.0 million, or $0.60 per share.  During the third quarter, the Company incurred a total of $3.1 million of pretax charges for certain items that management believes are not indicative of ongoing operations. The Company believes it is valuable for users of the Companys financial statements to be made aware of the non-GAAP financial information as such measures are used by management to evaluate the operating performance of the Company on a comparable basis. Accordingly, a GAAP to non-GAAP reconciliation of results is provided later in this release.
Net sales for the third quarter increased 9% to $722.8 million, compared to $665.5 million last year.  The overall increase was primarily due to across-the-board increases in comparable store sales, as well as strong growth in e-commerce sales. The sales increase included a consolidated comparable store sales increase of 6% for the quarter compared to last year.
By division, net sales for increased 5% to $255.4 million, compared to $242.5 million last year, with a comparable store sales increase of 4%. Net sales for increased 17% to $208.2 million, compared to $177.9 million last year, with a comparable store sales increase of 11%.  Net sales for increased 6% to $259.2 million, compared to $245.1 million last year, with a comparable store sales increase of 3%.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
 
 
 
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the third quarter were $213.6 million, or 29.6% of sales, compared to $194.9 million, or 29.3% of sales last year.  SG&A expenses on a non-GAAP basis were $210.8 million, or 29.2% of sales, compared to $193.3 million, or 29.0% of sales last year. The slight increase in SG&A as a percentage of sales was due in part to higher marketing costs as the Company continues to invest in its brands to drive customer traffic.
Operating income for the third quarter was $86.4 million, or 12.0% of sales, compared to $76.7 million, or 11.5% of sales last year.  On a non-GAAP basis, operating income increased 14% to $89.5 million, or 12.4% of sales, compared to $78.3 million, or 11.8% of sales last year.  The increase in operating income as a percentage of sales was due to a strong performance of all three brands, most notably .
maurices
Fiscal Nine Month Results
Net income for the nine month period increased to $142.3 million, or $1.75 per diluted share, compared to net income of $91.4 million, or $1.19 per diluted share for the first nine months of fiscal 2010.
Adjusted net income on a non-GAAP basis increased to $150.2 million, or $1.85 per diluted share, compared to net income for the nine month period of fiscal 2010 of $102.1 million, or $1.33 per diluted share. During the first nine months of fiscal 2011, the Company incurred $12.7 million of pretax charges for certain items that management believes are not indicative of ongoing operations, compared to pretax charges of $16.7 million last year.  A GAAP to non-GAAP reconciliation of these results is provided later in this release.
Net sales for the nine month period ended April 30, 2011 increased 32% to $2.19 billion, compared to $1.66 billion for last years nine month period ended April 24, 2010.  The increase was primarily due to strong sales performance at and , including the effect of accounting for a full period of sales compared to a partial period in the prior year due to the merger closing on November 25, 2009.  Comparable store sales increased 6%.
maurices
Justice
Justices
For the nine month period by division: net sales for increased 1% to $707.2 million with comparable store sales increasing 1%. Net sales for increased 19% to $593.5 million with comparable store sales increasing 12%. Net sales for were $887.5 million with comparable store sales increasing 6% during this period.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
SG&A expenses for the nine month period were $635.6 million, or 29.0% of sales, compared to $480.4 million, or 28.9% of sales in the prior years nine month period. SG&A expenses on a non-GAAP basis were $623.9 million, or 28.5% of sales, compared to $469.5 million, or 28.2% of sales in the prior nine month period. The increase in the SG&A rate of 10 basis points on a GAAP basis and 30 basis points on a non-GAAP basis was due to ongoing costs for the Companys investment in several key integration projects, increases in marketing spend, and an increase in the provision for incentive compensation relating to better-than-expected operating performance.
Operating income for the nine month period was $235.7 million, or 10.8% of sales, compared to $157.6 million, or 9.5% of sales in the prior years nine month period. On a non-GAAP basis, operating income increased to $248.4 million, or 11.4% of sales, compared to $168.5 million, or 10.1% of sales in the prior fiscal year. This increase as a percentage of sales is mainly due to improved gross profit.
 
 
 
Commentary
David R. Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented, We are very pleased to report solid gains in both sales and earnings.  In each of our concepts, we have focused on providing a compelling value proposition to consumers, the success of which is reflected by our continued, across-the-board comparable store sales increases. As we go forward, we are mindful that todays consumer is under increasing pressure, and we are working hard to ensure that we retain our leadership position for both fashion and value within each of our brands.  We are confident that we have struck the right balance of merchandise and pricing and will continue to do so.
Mr. Jaffe continued, Our new corporate organizational structure is providing us the opportunity to retain the special qualities that have brought each of our brands to prominence and to share best practices across all of our businesses.  We remain focused on evaluating a variety of strategies to further utilize our strong balance sheet and our operating infrastructure to drive enhanced returns and value to our shareholders.
Reconciliation of GAAP to Non-GAAP Net Income, Diluted EPS, SG&A Expenses and Operating Income
Net Income and diluted earnings per share are shown below on both a GAAP and a non-GAAP basis for the fiscal third quarter and nine month period ended April 30, 2011 and April 24, 2010. The following items are excluded from GAAP and are shown below as non-GAAP measures: 1) previously announced corporate reorganization and integration costs, 2) start-up expenses for the previously announced entry into Canada and entry into the Boys Market for , 3) charges related to our deferred compensation plan that result from stock market appreciation that impacts the liability for this plan, 4) merger-related costs, 5) loss on extinguishment of debt in the prior year and 6) impairment of the Studio Y trade name in the prior year. Because management believes these items may not be indicative of normal operating items, management believes these non-GAAP measures are useful to investors as an alternative for measuring the Companys operating performance and comparing it against the prior fiscal year.
Justice
 
 
 
 
 
   
Selling, general and administrative expenses:
Operating income:
 
 
 
Fiscal July 2011 Earnings Guidance
The Company has reaffirmed its earnings guidance per diluted share for the fiscal year ending July 2011 in the range of $2.28 to $2.33. This estimate is based upon various assumptions for the year, including a mid-single digit increase in comparable store sales for the remainder of the fiscal year. The Company plans to end fiscal 2011 with a total of approximately 2,500 , andstores.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
Conference Call Information
The Company will conduct a conference call today, May 25, 2011 at 4:30PM Eastern Time to review its third quarter fiscal 2011 results followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (617) 213-8064 prior to the start time, the passcode is 90119640.  The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at .  A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until June 25, 2011 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 57765981.
www.ascenaretail.com
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. was created as a public company effective January 1, 2011.  The Company is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls, operating, through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, the and brands. The Company operates through its subsidiaries nearly 2,500 stores throughout the United States and Canada, with revenues of over $2.8 billion.
dressbarn, maurices
Justice
 
stores offer casual, career, special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 834 stores in 47 states. stores offer casual and career apparel and accessories at great values to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operate 767 stores in 44 states. stores offer trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operate 890 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
 
For more information, please visit , and .
www.dressbarn.com
www.maurices.com
www.shopjustice.com
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved.  Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available on Dress Barn, Inc.s most recent report on Form 10-K/A for the year ended July 31, 2010 and Ascena Retail Group, Inc.s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended January 29, 2011.
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
 
 
.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110526144155.txt.gz
TIME:20110526144155
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On May 25, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an investor conference call to discuss the Companys results of operations for its third quarter and nine months ended April 30, 2011 and certain other information, including the contents of the Companys press release dated May 25, 2011 which was furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 8-K on May 25, 2011.  The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference.  A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
Date:  May 26, 2011
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Final Transcript
Conference Call Transcript
ASNA - Q3 2011 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
Event Date/Time: May 25, 2011 / 08:30PM  GMT
 
1
 
 
Final Transcript
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
 
 David Jaffe
 Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
 Armand Correia
 Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
 
 Sam Panella
 Raymond James & Assoc. - Analyst
 
 Edward Yruma
 KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 Janet Kloppenburg
 JJK Research - Analyst
 
 Brian Tunick
 JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
 Neely Tamminga
 Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
 Scott Krasik
 BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 Mark Montagna
 Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 Steve Marotta
 CL King & Assoc. - Analyst
 
 Robin Murchison
 SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
 Travis Williams
 Stephens Inc. - Analyst
 
 PRESENTATION
 
Operator
 Good afternoon. My name is Jeremy, and I will be your conference operator today. At this time, I would like to welcome everyone to the Ascena Retail Group's third-quarter earnings conference call.
Today's call is being recorded and will be available for replay later today. Information on assessing this replay is available in today's press release.
As a matter of formality, I need to remind participants that remarks made by management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause the actual results and implementation of the Company's plan to vary materially. These risks are referenced in today's press release as well as in the Company's most recently filed Forms 10-K and 10-Q.
I would like to turn the conference call over to your host, Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO. Please go ahead.
 
2
 
 
Final Transcript
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
Good afternoon and thanks for joining us to discuss our results for our fiscal third quarter ended April 30, 2011. With me today is Armand Correia, our CFO.
I'm very pleased to report another quarter of strong sales and record earnings results. Comp sales increased 6%, which included increases at all three brands, 3% at Justice, 11% at maurices, and 4% at dressbarn. Quarterly adjusted earnings per share grew 10% to $0.66 compared to $0.60 per share in the prior-year quarter.
We continue to focus on our core mission of providing fashion and value to our customers during these uncertain economic times. A variety of operating and strategic initiatives have allowed us to improve the efficiency of our operations, which has contributed to improvements in operating margins.
At Justice, we continue to grow our market share by giving our customers trend-right merchandise assortments at compelling values. Our sales increase was driven primarily by a 6% growth in transactions partially offset by a 4% decrease in units per transaction.
During the first half of the quarter, our spring assortment of casual tops and bottoms, along with intimates, accessories, and lifestyle products, performed well. From a regional perspective, all regions delivered positive comps with the exception of the Northeast and Midwest, which were down low single digits.
During the latter half of the quarter, Justice apparel businesses were significantly impacted by a drop in seasonal categories, specifically girls' tops and shorts. With the arrival of seasonal weather in May, these categories are performing well, up 20%-plus month-to-date.
Our marketing strategy at Justice reinforces our value opposition with the right balance of 40% discounts offered to our customers through direct mail, e-mail, customer loyalty programs, and entire store point-of-sale events. Justice executed three entire 40% off entire store POS events as well as several private sale offerings to customers during the quarter to drive traffic and transactions. These events were supported with a combination of direct mail catazines, postcards, and e-mail.
For the fourth quarter, we have a similar promotional mix planned, along with a clearance event in June prior to launch of the back-to-school season. We are excited about our strategic initiatives at Justice, including the expansion into the Canadian market and the Internet launch of our boys concept, Brothers.
Justice opened nine stores, including four stores in Canada, and closed seven stores during the third quarter, ending the quarter with a store base of 890 stores. For the fourth quarter, we plan to open a total of 16 stores, 14 in the US and 2 in Canada.
As you know, Justice competes with a wide variety of retailers, but we remain the only national specialty store focused on the tween girl. Therefore, our ability to truly serve this customer and to give her a special experience and focused assortment gives us a distinct competitive vantage.
At maurices, we generated comp sales growth of 11% during the third quarter. This marks another record sales and probability quarter for our maurices brand. An increase in average dollar sale was the main growth driver while transactions also increased. Nearly all departments in our maurices brand posted double-digit comp sales increases with sweaters, knit tops, and denim categories seeing the best improvement.
The maurices marketing strategy in the third quarter remained focused on acquiring new customers while continuing to engage current ones. In the third quarter, we increased the quantity of mailings by 5% over last year, mailing deeper into our active customer list. For the fourth quarter, we are anniversarying our Summer Mailer with quantities up approximately 15% to last year as well as introducing some new promotions to our mix.
The maurices store base ended the quarter at 767 versus 749 last year. Our new store performance continues to be very favorable with sales productivity above plan as we expand the maurices concept outside of our core market areas.
At dressbarn, our 4% comp sales increase from third quarter continued the positive trend that started in the prior quarter. During the quarter, the category's double-digit increases over the prior year were suit separates, predominately under the Jones Studio label, followed by petit tops, jewelry, knitwear, shoes, petite ready-to-wear and social.
Our marketing efforts for the quarter included increased quantities of our direct mailers, including an incremental foldout mailer in April to offset the Easter shift. We were pleased with the results and May is now benefiting from the redemption of bounce backs given out during that period.
 
3
 
 
Final Transcript
The dressbarn store base is now 834 locations at the end of the quarter versus 840 stores last year. For the quarter, we plan to open one store and close ten.
Overall, we are pleased with each brand's performance for the quarter, given the challenging economic environment and unfavorable weather. We have great teams in place that responded well to these challenges and we are confident that we can sustain this momentum in the fourth quarter of our fiscal year.
Now, I will update the corporate initiatives which we discussed last quarter. First, we have completed the transition of our dressbarn merchandise to our Etna, Ohio distribution center. Also, the consolidation of our five data centers into two is currently progressing as scheduled and is expected to be completed by the end of the fiscal year. These are just two examples, albeit important ones, of how our executive team has leveraged the expertise which resides in each of our brands to improve the efficiency of our business.
Additionally, we're focused on strategies to minimize the impact of increases in sourcing costs. Each of our brands has a different degree of price elasticity and the merchandising teams are constantly evaluating the appropriate actions regarding price increases. The information we've learned about a clear inflationary trend in the business has only reinforced our belief the cost increases are here to stay. As you know, this will affect the entire industry and this should not greatly affect our relative position. However, we will be monitoring our price increases very carefully as the season progresses.
We will continue working to sustain the strong momentum evident in our business with May month-to-date comes in the 10% to 12% range. Looking ahead, we are estimating mid single-digit comp sales increases for our fourth quarter and in July and are reaffirming our fiscal year adjusted earnings per share guidance in the range of $2.28 to $2.33.
In closing, we will be announcing our fiscal 2012 earnings per share guidance with our fourth-quarter and fiscal year-end July 2011 earnings results on September 14. Thank you. I will now turn the call over to Armand to discuss our financial results in more detail.
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
 Thank you David.
Before beginning my prepared remarks on our third-quarter financial results, it's important to note that these results do include certain costs that we believe are not indicative of ongoing operations for purposes of comparability. We have therefore provided a reconciliation of GAAP to non-GAAP measures in today's press release.
As David mentioned, we were pleased with our quarterly sales performance which converted to record quarterly earnings. We continue to achieve topline increases which have leveraged strong profit growth.
Total net sales for the quarter were $723 million, an increase of $57 million, or 9%, versus a year ago. The sales increase was primarily related to our 6% comp sales increase and the strong growth in e-commerce sales. The quarterly comp store sales increase marks the ninth consecutive quarter of increases.
Additionally, we were pleased with the growth of our e-commerce businesses at all three brands, which continues to exceed expectations. For the quarter, e-commerce sales were $24 million, up from $13 million last year. These results are not included in our comp sales results.
It's appropriate to note that, beginning with this quarter, for comparison purposes, all of last-year numbers for Justice reflect the full quarter. Justice sales for the quarter increased 6%. The overall increase was driven by a comp sales increase of 3% and better-than-expected e-commerce results. The comp increase came on top of last year's 23% increase. Justice e-commerce revenues increased a strong 38% to $13 million.
At maurices, sales for the quarter increased a strong 17% to $208 million. The increase was primarily related to an 11% increase in comp sales. maurices' quarterly sales also included approximately $7 million from its e-commerce business, which compares to $3 million last year.
 
4
 
 
Final Transcript
dressbarn sales for the quarter increased 5% to $255 million. Driving the overall increase of $13 million was a comp sales increase of 4%. We were pleased with the sales performance despite some sales softness during the all-important Easter season, which we believe was weather related. Those regions with seasonal weather performed well.
As with our Justice brand, we have seen dressbarn sales trends accelerating in May. We believe this should bode well for all three brands to continue comp sales increases into the remainder of the fourth quarter.
Overall, gross profit increased 44.4% of sales for the quarter. The 60 basis point increase was primarily related to buying and occupancy leverage. While we achieved higher initial markup percent, it offset increased markdowns from a slightly higher level of promotional activity during the quarter. The gross profit rate increased at all three brands for the quarter.
By brand, gross profit at Justice came in a strong 45.1% of sales, increasing 60 basis points. At maurices, gross profit came in at an impressive 48.1%, increasing 70 basis points. The gross profit rate at dressbarn was 40.7%, up 20 basis points from the prior year.
Moving down the income statement, total SG&A expenses on a non-GAAP basis came in at 29.2% of sales. In terms of dollars, SG&A was $211 million, an increase of 9% over last year.
The lack of leverage in the quarter was due to the following factors  increased marketing costs related to both incremental mailers and increased direct mailer quantities, as we continue to invest in building our brand to help drive customer traffic. We also had some redundant costs that were not called out as non-GAAP items associated with the consolidation of the dressbarn distribution center to Justice and the IT data center consolidation, as well as outsourcing our payroll and HRIS. These three projects are expected to be completed by the end of July. Finally, increases in the quarterly provision for incentive compensation which reflected the better-than-planned quarterly earnings results.
As far as operating income, adjusted quarterly operating income increased to a record high of $89 million or 12.4% of sales, and a year-over-year increase of 14%, or 60 basis points. By brand, Justice achieved solid operating income results, coming in at $26 million or 10% of sales. This compares to last year's $25 million or 10.1% of sales.
maurices had a quarter to remember with record operating income of $43 million, or 20.6% of sales. This is on top of an equally impressive performance of $35 million, or 19.8% of sales, last year.
dressbarn delivered increased operating income as well as coming in at $20.0 million, or 8% of sales. This compared to $18 million, or 7.6% of sales, last year. We were particularly pleased with these results given recent performance.
Our quarterly effective tax rate was 40.2%, compared to 37.7% in the prior year. The increase was primarily due to certain nondeductible compensation costs.
Net income on an adjusted basis increased to $54 million, or $0.66 per diluted share, compared to last year's $49 million, or $0.60 per diluted share.
Moving on to the balance sheet, we ended the quarter with $488 million in cash and investments. This represents approximately $6 in cash and investments per average share.
In terms of operating cash flows, we generated approximately $88 million during the quarter with free cash flows of $62 million. During the quarter, we repurchased approximately 700,000 shares of our stock at an average price of approximately $30 per share for a total of $21 million under our existing 1 million  I'm sorry, under our existing $100 million authorization. Year-to-date, we've repurchased 1.7 million shares and have $53 million remaining under this authorization.
CapEx for the quarter was $27 million with the full year estimated at $95 million.
Total inventories were up 14% at the end of the quarter. While higher than planned, much of this increase was related to sales softness experienced during April. In addition, our inventory levels support planned new store openings for the current quarter, the continued strong e-commerce businesses, and bringing inventory up to appropriate levels to avoid missing sales that we experienced last year from our Justice and maurices brands. We still expect to end the quarter on plan, given the strong sales performance during May in the range of mid to high single digits versus the prior year.
 
5
 
 
Final Transcript
By brand, inventories ending the quarter at Justice were $101 million, an increase of 20% versus last year. We were pleased with the strong May-to-date sales results that David mentioned from both stores and e-commerce which have lowered these levels. Justice inventory levels are expected to decrease to the low teens by the end of the fourth quarter.
Inventory ending the quarter at maurices was $73 million, an increase of 24%. This inventory increase supports the strong sales trends that maurices experienced during the quarter, up 17%.
At dressbarn, inventories ended the quarter at $127 million, a 5% increase versus last year, in line with recent sales trends.
As a reminder, last year's fourth quarter included an extra 53rd reporting week, which accounted for approximately $56 million in additional sales. This extra week favorably impacted earnings per share by approximately $0.05 in last year's fourth quarter, making for a tougher comparison.
In closing, we were pleased with our results during the quarter and are feeling positive about the opportunities ahead. Thank you. Operator, we are now ready to take questions.
 
6
 
Exhibit 99.1
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
Operator
 (Operator Instructions). Sam Panella, Raymond James.
 
 Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Assoc. - Analyst
 Good afternoon everyone. Congratulations on a strong quarter. With respect to the product cost increases, can you help us think about that by division a bit more and the opportunities and were you able to take prices up at any of the divisions in the quarter?
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 Sam, at all three divisions, we've been experimenting taking prices up. So while there is a little bit of different at each division, suffice it to say that we have tested higher prices, we've had a pretty good reception to those higher prices, and we feel comfortable, as we go into the back-to-school season, we should be able to hold our margins pretty flat. So between a combination, depending on the brand, of higher prices and lower markdowns, we think that our gross margins should be pretty much flat. So kind of to cut to the chase of where everybody is going with this concern, we've looked at it every which way and obviously read the GAAP release with much interest last week. We feel pretty confident that we should be in good shape.
 Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Assoc. - Analyst
 In terms of your gross margin here in the third quarter, I believe you guys mentioned you had increased markdowns. Can you give us any color there by division?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 I think we  probably let's take this off-line. Give me a call later. We typically don't get into specific details of that nature.
 Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Assoc. - Analyst
 Okay. Thanks and good luck.
 
Operator
 Edward Yruma, KeyBanc Capital Markets.
 
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 Thanks so much for taking my question, and congrats on a nice quarter. Can you talk a little bit more about some of the elevated promotions and inventory that you ran during the quarter? I know you don't want to give specific information by division, but as you think about inventory, will markdown pressure be more pronounced early in the quarter as you try to eliminate through some of those seasonal goods?
 
 
 
7
 
 
Final Transcript
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 Let me start and let Armand follow-up with some specifics. But in general, there were concerns back in April. I hate to use the "weather" word, but it was a tough April. We have been much, much relieved coming into May with the strong performance. So areas we thought would have a markdown risk for us just because we were over inventory as Armand went into some detail on, everything seems to be coming into line. We don't feel we have any significant extraordinary markdown exposure through the fourth quarter. As we said, we feel our inventory is going to be well-positioned as we head into back-to-school or the fall season.
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 I think, just to add to that, Ed, as we came off April and obviously we've already said it was disappointing, we believe it was weather related, because we've seen obviously the turnaround in sales during the month of May. We purposely did make a decision to hold off panicking, and we are pleased, now that we look back, not to panic and hit the markdown button because, quite frankly, we've held, and not only are we getting strong sales in May, but it's also coming with strong margin results.
 
 Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 Got you. One follow-up if I may? I know you've been in the process of really integrating your business together, particularly with the recent Justice acquisition. How much more is left, and kind of what type of incremental SG&A savings should we be expecting? Thank you.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 I think, as we start getting into finer details about each other's business, we're finding things that you can't always quantify. But as an example, we saw you at ICSC the last couple of days. One of the benefits there I can't quantify, though, is that we have three brands representing 2500 stores, and so when we go and meet with landlords and we present three deals, it's a much better deal, much better rate, that we'll get than if we went in just presenting one deal, one opportunity. So, those are the type of things we're learning more about and learning how to negotiate better with some of our national vendors. We are exchanging ideas on best practices, and so that's going to continue. I don't see that stopping at any point. I'd like to think we're going to continue to learn from each other, but I can't necessarily quantify that in the SG&A. I'll use the example with maurices. The business was a very solid business 6.5 years ago, and yet we've been able to continue to drive up that operating margin through best practices, through continuing to fine tune that business. I think we're going to see the same thing as we go forward with all three brands.
 
 Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 Great, thank you.
 
Operator
 Janet Kloppenburg, JJK Research.
 
 
8
 
 
Final Transcript
 
 Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 Hi everybody. Congrats on a nice quarter, really nice, nice performance. David, I just  or Armand, I just wanted you to talk a little bit about the inventory at Justice, just because it seems a little high. But do you think it'll work itself through as we go through the fall, or how are you thinking about it, David? Can you talk a little bit about maurices and the growth continues to be just well above my expectations. Is that  just because they were unproductive, I mean, they have very high margins, so maybe you could help us understand the competitive factors there or the marketing drive that you're putting in place to help that happen. Thanks very much.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 Sure. Two very different issues obviously 
 
 Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
  I know. I'm sorry.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 That's okay. I'll start with Justice inventory, and Armand, please jump in if you have any other thoughts. As Armand went through in his comments, there was a bit of a timing issue there because April was not a terrific quarter  I'm sorry, month. And so when we finished April, we had more inventory, particularly in Justice, than we would've liked. Yet as we come into May and actually we're almost done with May, we've had very, very strong performance, and so that overage has begun to disappear. So we are not completely done with it, but we feel confident that, given the trends we're seeing and given what's happening between new stores and e-commerce and wanting to have higher levels of inventory on purpose that we planned in, we should be going into the June-July  we should be in very good shape and we have no concerns whatsoever in the inventory levels at Justice. So let me (multiple speakers)
 
 Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 Maybe I heard wrong. I know that you don't  I know business has picked up and I know that the summer product is not a problem. But didn't you say that the end of the quarter was going to end up in the teens and that's where you want it to be?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 Yes, that's correct.
 
 Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 So you're feeling good about their back-to-school potential then?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 Yes. Last year, we felt we were down both with fall product as well as wear-now product. So we are making sure that there is enough inventory so that we don't lose some of that business opportunity that we felt we lost last August.
 
 
9
 
 
Final Transcript
 
 Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 The point I was confused on is where they were going to end the quarter. I knew they were doing  I sensed that the weather had helped them here in May. So  and on maurices.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 On maurices, we are very, very pleased with what's happening in maurices. I think there are a variety of things happening. First, the business is just clicking. Some of the things that didn't work last year are working this year, so we are having less mistakes as it were, less markdowns, and that always helps. We are seeing some of our new markets respond very well to some of the grand opening efforts and the marketing efforts that we put in place; we tried some new techniques and we're pleased with the results there. I mentioned earlier all those stores are performing above our expectations.
In addition, I think e-commerce is helping not just on the sales line but now that we have a presence in e-commerce, it's great for marketing. As you know, many, many shoppers go online before they go into the store. So you've got all that going on and at the same time, just to reference your comment about competition, some of the people that we feel we compete most closely with are having their own issues. It may be that maybe some of those customers have either walked away or maybe decreased their shopping with some of our competition, maybe giving us an opportunity to take a little greater share of wallet. So I think all these things are happening, but have been happening. As you know, maurices has been on a tear for a number of quarters now. So, we are kind of building on the success we've had, and we are very pleased with the business there, and we think we've got opportunities for further growth as well.
 
 Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 Lots of luck.
 
Operator
 Brian Tunick, JPMorgan.
 
 Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 Thanks. Afternoon guys. I guess a couple. The first one, on the excess cash, are you seeing any changes in valuations out there that you've been waiting for? I guess that's the first question. How's sort of your thinking on acquisitions or valuation of change?
The second one  I guess maurices and Justice have been asked. I'll ask on the dressbarn division, it seems like the results are a lot less like Coldwater or Christopher & Banks and more like Ann Taylor or Macy's. Just maybe talk through what's happening there on the dressbarn division. Finally, on the planning and allocation rollout, what's the timing of that, and is that built into any of your forecast going forward?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 First, on valuation, there is really nothing that I'm aware of that's traded since the Gymboree/J. Crew deals. And so we see the same numbers in terms of market valuations based on stock price, and we've all seen a little bit of a pullback.
But I think, to your second part of that question, we have not really thought about an acquisition at this stage. It's never far from our mind, but we are really focused on doing things internally, Brian, as we mentioned earlier. It would be great to get through this year, this calendar year, get through another Christmas and see kind of who is a survivor and who's got an opportunity to get a strong partner in, and then maybe we'll start looking with a little more gusto seven or eight months from now. So it's not high on our list.
 
10
 
At dressbarn, it is very nice to see the rebound in the business there. As we said a couple of quarters ago, some of the challenges we had in the fall were self-inflicted. So, I think we've avoided any big mistakes, and at the same time, we've been able to execute very well on our merchandise strategy. That is, as you know, giving our customer more updated contemporary fashion and continuing to eliminate more of  the more missy, the more basic looks that were a bigger part of our business in years gone by. The customer is responding well. Our marketing is working. So I think, when you look at the people that are struggling, the Talbots and Coldwaters and Christopher & Banks of the world, they are the ones that are maybe either stuck in a certain merchandising look or having their own challenges communicating their new look to their customer. I think our evolution has been very gradual and yet consistent. So while we haven't had the big POPs that some of the retailers have had, we've also, event in a tough season, we were down only 1%. So, I think we've got a very steady consistent business. I think now, with things like you mentioned our plan allocation just beginning to come online, I think we're going to see that business, the dressbarn business, continue to strengthen and build on the loyal customers we have by acquiring new customers new to the brand with our more intensified, more fashion-forward approach.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Terrific, guys. Thanks. Good luck.
 
Operator
 
Neely Tamminga, Piper Jaffray.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
Good afternoon. Let me offer my congratulations. So two separate questions, one is on real estate. You mentioned you were ISCS, and just wanted to hear from you, David, your fresh thinking coming off of this most recent event, in terms of both kind of new center development and if you're hearing or seeing any sort of pickup there would be helpful, just broadly.
Then secondly, how you guys are feeling about the B/C mall strategy.
And then a follow-up question for Armand. I know we are a quarter away from probably hearing more specific numbers here, but CapEx, just kind of curious what you're thinking about the new fiscal year in terms of CapEx, how much relative to maybe this year and then where you would spend it. Thanks.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
ICSC was definitely a more positive environment than last year. I think the landlords were feeling more secure, they weren't as nervous that they were going to go out of business perhaps or go bankrupt or whatever that we've seen in prior year. But there's not a lot of new development that we are seeing, I would say virtually none in the regional mall business. There are some outlets. They are talking a big game but I don't know if you'll see more than a handful in the next year or so. I think, in the strip center or the power center, lifestyle center, there will be some but not a lot. We are looking and talking to everyone and seeing what's out there.
But the opportunity that we really see for Ascena, as you reference, is in the B&C malls. The A malls are solid and they're pretty much fully occupied, but the B, C still has got a vacancy issue. When we look at our brands, they are being very well received by the landlords, and we see an opportunity for all three brands in the B and C malls and will continue to open up stores in the coming year in a fairly significant way.
Without tipping my hat to our guidance in September, I will tell you that we went to the landlords telling them that we were looking to open up for Ascena somewhere between 100 and 120 and 140 stores among the three brands. So, it will be a combination of all the types of centers I mentioned, but the vast majority of that I think will be in the B and C malls. So we're very bullish on that. We think we can get in there at reasonable rates. We've proven with Justice and of course with maurices that they can work for us. At dressbarn, we have a number of tests coming up, and we are working on developing our mall prototype and merchandising strategy in the coming months, so we think that could be a potential growth opportunity for dressbarn as well.
 
11
 
So with that, I'll turn it to Armand.
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
As far as CapEx, this year's CapEx, which we estimate to end at approximately $95 million, it includes a number of strategic projects that we expect (inaudible) as we said, are beginning to roll off and are expected to roll off even further into the new year.
 
As far as, again, to kind of give you a preview of our CapEx and what we are thinking of for next year, I think we'll probably be in that same range of $90 million to $100 million, but it would be skewed a little more as we anticipate probably a greater number of store openings into the next year as opposed to what we did this year. So it's just going to be shifted and probably more of it will be allocated towards the store growth.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
You guys, that's really helpful. Thanks and good luck.
 
Operator
 
Scott Krasik, BB&T Capital Markets.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Thanks for taking my questions. So a lot of the big questions have been answered, some small ones first. Armand, how much was spent on the DC and IT centers this quarter?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
We haven't given it out in the past specifically, and I don't think I want to get into specific costs of capital on each particular project.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. David, in terms of the 10- to 12-month-to-date you alluded to, any major outliers from any of the businesses?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
I'd say, right now, you have to look at it on a seasonal basis of course, but on May, right now, we've seen greater strength at Justice, and then dressbarn, and then maurices would be third, which kind of is opposite of what we've seen earlier in the quarter. (multiple speakers) season.
 
 
12
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Is there anything we should think about in terms of May versus June and July in the quarter that becomes meaningful in the comparisons for any of the divisions?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
Again, I think, if I can, David, as David mentioned, I think we left some sales on the table last June and July, particularly at Justice and maurices, because of lack of inventory. I think there's an opportunity ahead of ourselves to pick up on that. I think, if you go back into the individual comps, you will see a falloff. Certainly they were still positive last year, but you'll see a falloff in the June/July comp performance.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Thanks Armand. Then have you had any type of unit decline at Justice like this before? That was just a little bit noteworthy.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
We don't have a lot of history here, but if you're interested, follow up with Armand and Armand will check back with the Justice people.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
That's fair. Then just lastly, and it's a little bit conceptual and you hit on it some before, but you're a couple of years past putting the plus size into maurices and you've gotten the work stuff in there. Anything else? You alluded to maybe some competitors are stumbling, but anything else that you can point to that would really validate the performance of maurices, which is awesome, no question?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
You know, I tell you  give you a wise-ass answer that retail is detail and that we are executing really well. That's the truth. I don't think there's any one or two things. We've had this conversation at the maurices team. We are really pleased with the business but it's a lot of things coming together. It is not just one thing that's working; it's a lot of things that we've work very hard to execute on. I think we are taking advantage of a good time in the market for our positioning at all three brands. I think some of the ideas that we have for future growth are going to  you're going to see it in the fall and I think we've got some further legs on this momentum.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Keep it up. Great job.
 
Operator
 
Mark Montagna, Avondale Partners.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Hi. Congratulations on the quarter. Thanks for taking my call. I have a few questions. When you were talking about Justice, I caught a number you said, up 20%. Was that the seasonal categories or was that the overall division?
 
13
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
What we referred to in the comments was that these categories, the seasonal categories that were up 20%-plus month-to-date.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Can you tell us what percent of the store you would consider seasonal?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
Gosh, don't quote me on this, but I would consider probably 60% of it is seasonal now.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Then during your comments, you mentioned that maurices was expanding out of the core. Are you talking the core geography, or are you talking that you're expanding beyond those 100,000 population bases into more suburbia type areas?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
No, we are doing that also but when we say core, we mean our core markets, so we are expanding into places like Texas, so Florida or California, and that's outside of our core Midwestern markets.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Is this giving you confidence to potentially raise your limit on the number of stores you think you can place in the country for maurices?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
Right now, I think the number we are working with is 1000, and we still feel that it's easily 1000 and maybe beyond, but we haven't really focused on developing an endpoint that it's only going to be this number, that number. We think it's easily 1000, and we'll update it as we get closer.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Then looking at the B and C malls, it sounds like there could potentially be a ramp in the dressbarn store counts. It's pretty much been flat for quite a few years. Is it fair to say that you're pretty optimistic about a ramp in the total store count by looking at these B and C malls?
 
 
14
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
No, not at dressbarn, not yet. We are hopeful but we are still in a test mode at dressbarn. The number I threw out of fiscal 2012 openings of kind of 120 to 140 is primarily  the biggest chunk of that will be Justice, and then maurices, and then dressbarn. So until we prove to ourselves that we've got the mall strategies figured out and that we can successfully operate in these B/C malls, we are not going to ramp up and open up a lot of stores that we're going to be stuck with if we can't figure it out.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
What is your new store count projection for the total Company for this year? I don't have the exact numbers in front of me.
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
It's probably going to be a little over 80.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Then when you were looking at the inventory, it sounds like you held off a little bit on markdowns. I think you've done this in the past where especially in the spring where weather did not cooperate with you, and then eventually the pent-up demand seemed to catch up. It sounds like you've done that before. Is that correct? I think that the results have actually been fairly positive. Is that correct?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
I'm not exactly sure what you mean. I'm sorry.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
I'll take that off-line. The other question I had, just in terms of the EPS, you've guided to $2.28 to $2.33 for fiscal year. Such good results so far month-to-date for the month of May, and you continue to expect to do well in June and July. I'm curious why you didn't raise the overall fiscal year guidance, given you had a little bit of upside in this current quarter.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
Right. What we said was we're estimating mid single digits for the entire fourth quarter, so we are obviously off to a very strong start in May. If May were to continue in June and July, we would definitely  we will definitely beat the $2.33. But I think, from our perspective, we had a tough April. So it's great that we are seeing May much stronger. I guess we're a little bit gun shy here. What's to say that June and July don't have funny weather or bite us or gas pops up again or whatever. We didn't expect to have the challenges we had in April, so we think, by saying sticking with our mid single digits, we are out of the gates very strong, but the next few months are really going to determine whether we can beat it or not.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Just the last question I have deals with the tax rate. For this quarter and last quarter, you have been, say, above 40%. In the past, you've really hovered around 38%. Do you think, in the future, you're going to get back down to that level now that you reincorporated as Ascena? Like should we start to see a lower tax rate at some point?
 
 
15
 
 
Final Transcript
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
I think, for the foreseeable future, I think 40% is probably more realistic.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 Okay. All right. Thank you.
 
Operator
 
Steve Marotta, CL King.
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Assoc. - Analyst
 
Good evening guys. A couple of very quick questions. What is the typical sales split in the fourth quarter by month? In other words, what does May, June, July represent from a waiting standpoint (inaudible) typically?
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
Steve, I'll take that call off-line.
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Assoc. - Analyst
 
You might want to on this next one too then, Armand. Directionally, can you talk a little bit about comps in the fourth quarter by month last year? I know you don't release them specifically and quantitatively, but directionally can you speak to them?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
In terms of overall Ascena or by division?
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Assoc. - Analyst
 
Consolidated.
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
On a consolidated basis, as we look at the fourth quarter last year, we were looking at may very low single digits, June probably up kind of mid teens, and July down low single digits.
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Assoc. - Analyst
 
That's terrific. Thank you.
 
 
16
 
 
Final Transcript
   
Operator
Robin Murchison, SunTrust.
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Hi guys. Glad to get in here. Probably not too much left to ask, but a couple of questions. One is just going back to Mark Montagna asking about those expanding outside core market areas, is there a change in your [SMSA] strategy? I just want to be clear on that.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
That's a really good question. Actually, there is a slight change. We opened up a bunch of stores in non-core markets and struggled a bit. Then we took a slightly different approach and went back to many of these markets and said "Let's open up not in the smaller markets where we typically have our stores in kind of under 100,000 POPs, market POPs, but maybe in some of these county seats or regional centers or what have you?" In many cases, opened up in malls where there is a lot of traffic. So think of it as a hub-and-spoke strategy. It's worked really, really well for us. So not only do these stores in these markets where they don't know us get to discover us, because they are walking right by the store, they say oh, what's that and they walk in and it's a good experience, but then as they make the big trip to the store  to the mall, and then they go back to their little town and they see us in the town, it helps create synergy between the hub and the spoke. So that's helped us a great deal in these non-core markets, and we are continuing to roll out stores with this strategy.
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Okay, good. Then secondly, I don't know if you can elaborate on this or not, but let me try. I think you mentioned denim sales were good at maurices. I just wondered if you could tell us is there any preference, any change in silhouette, any  what it is the customer is preferring in terms of denim? Then related to that, I wanted to ask you  and this would pertain to the three divisions any changes in or additions or deletions of merchandise folks or store operation folks or change in how you're doing your store visuals? Anybody related to the store level that might be in a key position? Thank you.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
At maurices?
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
The second question was actually for any of the three divisions. The first question on denim was more related to maurices.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
Denim  to get into the detail in the silhouettes, I'd be happy to go off-line with you on it. But in general, we've got a good/better/best approach there, and it's  denim is just doing very well. As you know, at our best level, we have a few lines, particularly of Silver brand which has performed extremely well for us. Then we have our own premium line. And then our core we're actually in the process of revamping and we are really excited about some of the tweaks we've made to the new line which will be in the stores for back-to-school. So keep your eyes open for that.
 
 
17
 
 
Final Transcript
 
In terms of significant personnel, the only one I can think of is at maurices. The head of our field resigned a month or so ago, and we have an acting head in there that's doing a fabulous job. We expect to be able to make an announcement there in the near future. Beyond that, I can't think of anything that's changed.
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
Good. Good luck and thank you very much.
Operator
Travis Williams, Stephens.
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
Thanks for taking my question. We're almost up on the magical hour, so I'll be brief. I guess if you could just offer us any update on the Justice launch in Canada? I know it's been very short term, but any color there?
Then the same with the Brothers online launch? That'd be great. Thanks.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
Sure, good question. Justice in Canada has been terrific. Now, we have limited data points. We've only got four stores open now, but they are in different markets and different types of centers. We are very, very pleased that they're exceeding expectations overall, and as we open new stores, we continue to learn and we think Canada is going to be a terrific market for Justice.
As you may know, we are planning to open up our maurices stores up there in spring of '12, and then dressbarn a year after. We've got everything lined up to do that. We are starting to make deals up there. We are just getting our systems in shape to do that. So we are very, very excited about the Canadian market for all three brands and the initial four out-of-the-ground in Justice  at the Justice have done very, very well.
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
 
Did you say that the results had exceeded your initial expectations?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
That's correct.
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
And then on the Brothers?
 
18
 
 
Final Transcript
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
On the Brothers side, we launched it as a test. I would say that it is a learning experience for us. That's exactly what we wanted to do. We have learned a lot, we are tweaking, and we are going to come up with a new approach, a more refined approach, to the business that we think will be more effective. There were clearly some learnings, but I think that's why we made the right call in launching online. We want to learn a lot before we consider bringing it into brick-and-mortar. So, we've got at least another couple of seasons to go of learning, of refining, and then we'll keep you guys posted on it on a quarterly basis of course, but we are optimistic that this is a great niche for us. But right now, it's still in the laboratory phase.
 
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
Great, thank you.
 
Operator
Mark Montagna, Avondale Partners.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
I just wanted to kind of follow-up on something that Robin was talking about. When you were talking about the real estate going forward with growth opportunities, are you seeing any possibility of moving Justice into the smaller markets like you have maurices? Because it seems like the price points work well in the concept. Are you seeing any evidence from your Web sales that would give you encouragement to really expand Justice into maurices type markets?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
Certainly Justice has moved down to much smaller markets than they would have even considered prior to learning and observing the maurices business. That's one of those synergies I referenced earlier. But maurices goes into some very, very small markets, so there is definitely a trend in two smaller markets than Justice is used to, but maybe not down to the true small markets that maurices is in. So it's definitely movement, but I don't think you're going to see them in some of the 20,000 or so market POPs that Justice  that maurices operates in.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
That sounds great. Thank you.
 
Operator
At this time, there are no questions queued.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
Thank you very much operator. Thank you all for your interest, and we look forward to speaking to you on September 14.
 
 
19
 
 
Final Transcript
 
Operator
Ladies and gentlemen, that concludes today's conference. Thank you for your participation. You may now disconnect. Have a great day.
 
 
20
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110804165722.txt.gz
TIME:20110804165722
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
FORM 8-K
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
for its fiscal fourth quarter and fiscal year ended July 30, 2011.  A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
On August 4, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release reporting its sales results
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
Date:  August 4, 2011
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reported its fiscal 2011 sales results for the fourth quarter and year ended July 30, 2011.  The Company noted that fiscal 2011 represented a 52-week period, while fiscal 2010 represented a 53-week period.
SUFFERN, NY  August 4, 2011 
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
Net sales for the thirteen-week fiscal fourth quarter increased 2% to $725.8 million, compared to $710.9 million for the fourteen-week fiscal fourth quarter ended July 31, 2010.  Excluding the sales impact of the extra week included in the prior years quarter, sales increased 11%.  Consolidated comparable store sales, which includes stores open for at least one year,  increased 7% on a 13-week comparable basis for the fiscal fourth quarter.
Net sales for the fiscal year ended July 30, 2011 increased 23% to $2.91 billion, compared to $2.37 billion for the fiscal year ended July 31, 2010.  On a full year basis, the increase was primarily due to the inclusion of for the full year period compared to a partial period in the prior year, which included sales from the merger date of November 25, 2009.  Consolidated comparable store sales for the fiscal year increased 6%.  
Justice
The Companys comparable store sales and net sales by brand for the fiscal fourth quarter and year were as follows:
 
 
 
Conference Call Information
The Company will conduct a conference call on September 14, 2011 at 4:30 PM Eastern Time to review its fiscal 2011 fourth quarter results followed by a question and answer session.  Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (617) 614-3453 prior to the start time, the passcode is 50466925. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at .  A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until October 14, 2011 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 21192139.
www.ascenaretail.com
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. was created as a public company effective January 1, 2011.  The Company is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls, operating, through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, the and brands.  The Company operates through its subsidiaries approximately 2,500 stores throughout the United States and Canada, with revenues of approximately $2.9 billion.
dressbarn, maurices
Justice
 
stores offer casual, career, special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 830 stores in 47 states. stores offer casual and career apparel and accessories at value prices to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operate 784 stores in 44 states. stores offer trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operate 902 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
 
For more information, visit , , and .
www.ascenaretail.com
www.dressbarn.com
www.maurices.com
www.shopjustice.com
Ascena Forward-Looking Statement Disclosure
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved.  Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available on Dress Barns most recent report on Form 10-K/A for the year ended July 31, 2010 and Ascena Retail Group, Inc.s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 30, 2011.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110914174904.txt.gz
TIME:20110914174904
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On September 14, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) and fiscal year ended July 30, 2011 and also provided fiscal 2012 earnings guidance. A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
issued a press release disclosing material non-public information regarding its results of operations for its fiscal fourth quarter
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
Date:  September 14, 2011
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 COMPARABLE STORE SALES INCREASE 7% FOR THE QUARTER AND 6% FULL YEAR
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reported financial results for its fiscal fourth quarter and full year ended July 30, 2011.  The Company noted that, on a reported basis, comparisons between the current and prior periods were affected by the number of weeks in its fiscal year reporting calendar, whereby the fourth quarter and full year period of the prior year included an extra week due to Fiscal 2010 being a fifty-three week year.  In addition, the Company noted that Fiscal 2011 benefited from a full year of operating results, compared to a partial period in the prior year as a result of the merger closing on November 25, 2009.
SUFFERN, NY  September 14, 2011 
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
Justices
Fiscal Fourth Quarter Results
On a reported basis, net income for the fiscal fourth quarter was $28.2 million, or $0.35 per diluted share, compared to net income of $42.0 million, or $0.52 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2010.
On an adjusted basis, net income increased to $38.5 million, or $0.48 per diluted share, compared to net income for last years fourth quarter of $34.0 million, or $0.42 per diluted share.  Adjusted results exclude the effect of the extra week in Fiscal 2010 and other items that management believes are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance.  Reference should be made to the section Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures elsewhere in this release for a discussion of the non-GAAP financial measures used in this release and for the reconciliations of such non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures.
Net sales for the thirteen-week fiscal fourth quarter increased 2% to $725.8 million, compared to $710.9 million for last years fourteen-week fiscal fourth quarter.  On an adjusted basis, excluding the effect of the extra week in the prior years quarter, sales increased 11%.  This overall increase was largely due to across-the-board increases in comparable store sales, as well as strong growth in e-commerce sales.  Consolidated comparable store sales, which include stores open for at least one year, increased 7% on a thirteen-week comparable basis for the fiscal fourth quarter.  By brand, comparable store sales increased 4% at , 3% at and 14% at .
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
On a reported basis, selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the fourth quarter were $216.5 million, or 29.8% of sales, compared to $209.9 million, or 29.5% of sales last year.  On an adjusted basis, SG&A expenses were $209.4 million, or 28.9% of sales, compared to $192.5 million, or 29.4% of sales last year.  This decrease in SG&A as a percentage of sales was primarily due to better leveraging of fixed operating expenses on the higher sales base.
 
 
 
 
 
 
On a reported basis, operating income for the fourth quarter was $54.1 million, or 7.5% of sales, compared to $59.8 million, or 8.4% of sales last year.  On an adjusted basis, operating income increased 16% to $62.6 million, or 8.6% of sales, compared to $54.2 million, or 8.3% of sales last year.  The increase in adjusted operating income was due to the strong performance of all three brands, most notably .
Justice
Fiscal Full Year Results
On a reported basis, net income for the fiscal year ended July 30, 2011 increased to a record $170.5 million, or $2.11 per diluted share, compared to net income of $133.4 million, or $1.73 per diluted share for Fiscal 2010.
On an adjusted basis, net income increased to a record $188.7 million, or $2.33 per diluted share, compared to net income for Fiscal 2010 of $136.1 million, or $1.77 per diluted share.  The improved full year results in Fiscal 2011 primarily reflected strong growth in operating income at and , including a full years effect of the merger, partially offset by lower operating performance at .  Adjusted results exclude the effect of the extra week in Fiscal 2010 and other items that management believes are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance.  Reference should be made to the section Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures elsewhere in this release.
maurices
Justice
dressbarn
Net sales for the fifty-two week fiscal year ended July 30, 2011 increased 23% to a record $2.91 billion, compared to $2.37 billion for the prior fifty-three week fiscal year ended July 31, 2010.  The overall increase was primarily due to a full years effect of the merger, strong growth in e-commerce sales and across-the-board increases in comparable store sales.  Consolidated comparable store sales increased 6% on a fifty-two week comparable basis for the year.  By brand, comparable store sales increased by 2% at , 10% at and 8% at .
Justice
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
On a reported basis, SG&A expenses for the fiscal year were $852.1 million, or 29.2% of sales, compared to $690.2 million, or 29.1% of sales in the prior year. On an adjusted basis, SG&A expenses were $833.3 million, or 28.6% of sales, compared to $662.0 million, or 28.6% of sales last year.  SG&A as a percent of sales did not reflect leverage from the sales increase as a result of the costs associated with several key initiatives.
On a reported basis, operating income for fiscal 2011 was $289.8 million, or 9.9% of sales, compared to $217.5 million, or 9.2% of sales in the prior year. On an adjusted basis, operating income increased to $311.0 million, or 10.7% of sales, compared to $222.7 million, or 9.6% of sales in the prior fiscal year.  The increase in both reported and adjusted operating income was largely due to the strong performance of and , the latter of which also included a full years effect of the merger.
maurices
Justice
Commentary
David R. Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented, We are pleased to have reported a strong fiscal year and fourth quarter.  Our results were achieved in a very tough environment and we remain positioned for growth both in sales and operating profitability.  Our balance sheet and cash flow remain very strong and we have the resources to continue to pursue organic growth and to continue to search for complementary acquisitions.  We are certainly mindful of the pressures of todays macro-economic environment and we are planning our business accordingly.  Even so, we are positioned well to take advantage of a number of opportunities that we believe will allow us to continue to grow, evolve our business, and drive value to our shareholders.
 
 
 
 
 
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
To provide investors information to assist them in assessing the Companys on-going operations on a comparable basis, the Company is providing financial measures in this press release that exclude certain items detailed below from the Fiscal 2011 and Fiscal 2010 reported results.  Throughout this release, the term reported refers to information prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States (GAAP), while the term adjusted refers to non-GAAP financial information adjusted to exclude the impact of the items mentioned below.  Management believes that such items are not indicative of the underlying operating performance of the Companys businesses.
For Fiscal 2011 and Fiscal 2010, the following items and transactions have been excluded from the applicable GAAP measures for purposes of determining adjusted operating results:  (1) merger-related, integration and reorganization costs incurred in both years, (2) start-up expenses incurred in Fiscal 2011 in connection with the Companys new initiatives to expand its retail operations into Canada and to launch a new boys product line, , for , (3) market-related expenses (income) in both years related to the Companys deferred compensation plan that affects the Companys liability under the plan, (4) losses incurred in both years on the extinguishment of debt, (5) a non-cash impairment charge in Fiscal 2010 related to the Companys Studio Y trade name, (6) certain tax benefits recognized in Fiscal 2010 due to the one-time reversal of certain tax liabilities, (7) a loss on the sale of an investment and (8) the financial effects of including an extra week in Fiscal 2010 due to a shift in the Companys fiscal year reporting calendar.
Brothers
Justice
 
 
 
 
Net sales:
Selling, general and administrative expenses:
Operating income:
 
 
 
 
 
Fiscal July 2012 Earnings Guidance
The Companys guidance for earnings per diluted share for the fiscal year ending July 2012 is in the range of $2.55 to $2.65.  This estimate is based upon various assumptions for the year, including a mid-single digit increase in comparable store sales.  The Company plans to open approximately 125 to 135 stores and close 30 to 35 stores, ending fiscal 2012 with approximately 2,600 , and stores in operation.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
Conference Call Information
The Company will conduct a conference call today, September 14, 2011 at 4:30PM Eastern Time to review its fourth quarter fiscal 2011 results followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (617) 614-3453 prior to the start time, the passcode is 50466925.  The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at .  A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until October 14, 2011 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 21192139.
www.ascenaretail.com
Beginning with the first quarter of Fiscal 2012, the Company will be reporting quarterly sales in conjunction with the quarterly earnings announcement.
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. was created as a public holding company effective January 1, 2011 pursuant to a corporate reorganization, and became the successor reporting company to The Dress Barn, Inc.  The Company is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls, operating through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, the and brands.  The Company operates through its subsidiaries over 2,500 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada, with revenues of approximately $2.9 billion.
dressbarn, maurices
Justice
stores offer casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 830 stores in 47 states. stores offer casual and career apparel and accessories at value prices to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operate 784 stores in 44 states. stores offer trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operate 902 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
For more information, visit , , and .
www.ascenaretail.com
www.dressbarn.com
www.maurices.com
www.shopjustice.com
 
 
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved.  Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available in the Companys most recent annual report on Form 10-K/A for the year ended July 31, 2010 and the Companys quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 30, 2011.
Investor Relations
(845) 369-4600
ICR, Inc.
James Palczynski
Senior Managing Director
(203) 682-8229
jp@ircinc.com
 
 
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
 
 
 
.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Segment Information (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110915155050.txt.gz
TIME:20110915155050
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
  
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On September 14, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an investor conference call to discuss the Companys results of operations for its fiscal fourth quarter and fiscal year ended July 30, 2011 and certain other information, including the contents of the Companys press release dated September 14, 2011 which was furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 8-K on September 14, 2011.  The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference.  A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
Date:  September 15, 2011
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Final Transcript
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
 
 Allison Townsend
 ICR - IR
 
 David Jaffe
 Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
 Armand Correia
 Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
 
 Steven Marotta
 CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
 Brian Tunick
 JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
 Sam Panella
 Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 
 Edward Yruma
 KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 Neely Tamminga
 Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
 Scott Krasik
 BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 Mark Montagna
 Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
 Robin Murchison
 SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
 Michael Richardson
 Sidoti & Company - Analyst
 
PRESENTATION
 
Operator
  
 Good afternoon. My name is Larry, and I will be your conference operator today. At this time, I would like to welcome everyone to Ascena Retail Group's fourth-quarter and year-end earnings conference call. I would now like to turn  I would now like to introduce Allison Townsend of ICR. Ms. Townsend, please begin.
 
Allison Townsend
- ICR - IR
  
 Thank you, Larry. Today's call is being recorded and will be available for replay later today. Information on accessing this replay is available in today's press release. As a matter of formality, I need to remind participants that remarks made by management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause the actual results and implementation of the Company's plans to vary materially. These risks are referenced in today's press release as well as in the Company's most recently-filed Forms 10-K and 10-Q.
 
2
 
Final Transcript
Additionally, discussions of the Company's results for both the fourth-quarter and fiscal year 2011 and to better assist investors in assessing the Company's operations on a comparable basis, financial measures have been provided in today's press release that exclude certain items from the fourth-quarter and fiscal 2011 reported results. Throughout this call, the term reported refers to information prepared in accordance with GAAP, while the term adjusted refers to non-GAAP financial information adjusted to exclude the impact of certain items. Adjusted financial information, along with the reconciliation of this information, is contained in today's press release, and available on the Investor Information section of the Company's website, www.AscenaRetail.com. I would now like to turn this conference call over to your host, Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO. David?
  
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks, Allison. Good afternoon and thank you for joining us to discuss the results of our fiscal fourth quarter and year ended July 30, 2011, as well as our outlook for 2012. With me today is Armand Correia, our CFO. I'm pleased to report another quarter of strong sales and earnings, as well as record results for the fiscal year. We achieved these strong results by executing well and, in particular, making consistent progress in a variety of operating and strategic initiatives across the organization.
In the fourth quarter, we grew adjusted earnings per share by 14% to $0.48, compared to $0.42 per share in the prior-year quarter. Net sales increased to $726 million, with consolidated comp sales increasing 7% in the fourth quarter. Each of our brands contributed to the comp increase with Justice up 14%, maurices up 3% and dressbarn up 4%. For the fiscal year, adjusted earnings per share increased 32%, to $2.33 compared to $1.77 per share last year. We were pleased to have achieved the top-end of our EPS guidance. Fiscal year net sales increased to over $2.9 billion, with consolidated comp sales increasing 6%, which also included increases in all 3 brands with Justice up 8%, maurices up 10% and dressbarn up 2%.
Now I'd like to walk you through each of our brands in a little detail. At Justice, we continue to grow our market share by giving our customers trend-right merchandise assortments at compelling values. Our fourth-quarter sales increase was driven primarily by a 7% growth in transactions and a 3% increase in dollars per transaction. Our spring and summer assortments of casual tops and casual and active bottoms, along with ready-to-wear items such as swimwear performed well. From a regional perspective, all regions delivered positive comps, with 4 regions reporting double-digit comps. The Justice e-commerce business also continues to grow rapidly, increasing over 30% versus last year.
Our marketing strategy at Justice reinforces our value proposition, with the right balance of 40% discounts offered to our customers through direct mail and e-mail and customer loyalty programs and also store-wide point of sale events. For the fourth quarter, we ran a similar cadence of promotions as last year, which drove both traffic and transactions. Justice executed 2 40-off entire store point-of-sale events as well as 3 private sale offerings. These events were supported with a combination of direct mail catazines and postcards. We also drove sales by enriching our Fun Card loyalty program.
For the fall season, we have stepped up the cadence of our marketing events. We have added 43 POS dates compared to last year's fall season, and we are planning to increase catazine circulation by 9%. We have added a postcard circulation to support our Halloween weekend POS event, but have decreased overall postcard circulation by 4% for the fall season.
We continue to be excited about our strategic growth initiatives at Justice, including the expansion into Canada. Sales results from our first 6 stores in Canada are at the high end of chain performance and we believe that there's significant potential to expand the Justice brand throughout Canada.
In March we launched our boys concept, Brothers, on the Internet. We learned a tremendous amount during the initial season of the Brothers launch and will continue to refine this concept as we move through the back-to-school and the fall season. We believe there is a significant void in the specialty store market for this concept, and while we are in the early stages, we are excited about the market potential for this concept.
During the fourth quarter, we opened 12 Justice stores, including 2 stores in Canada, ending the year with 902 stores versus 887 last year. In the fall season, we plan to open approximately 30 stores, which includes expansion of the Justice brand into smaller markets and B and C malls.
Turning now to maurices. Sales growth moderated in the fourth quarter, but we continue to see modest increases in both transactions and average selling price. Many of our women's apparel departments at maurices posted comp sales increases, with casual fashion in tops, dresses, and denim jeans all posting double-digit growth. We also saw double-digit increase in our plus-size collection with strong performance in nearly all categories. Comp store sales increased across all regions, with the Southwest, West Coast and Northwest leading the way. E-commerce sales continue to exceed expectations as well.
 
3
 
Final Transcript
Our maurices marketing initiatives in the fourth quarter focused on a variety of strategies and employed some unique integrated programs designed to support customer acquisition and retention, and to create brand awareness. In the fourth quarter, we mailed 2.5 million customers with our May mailer, an increase of 14% over last year. We mailed deeper into our active customer segments while decreasing quantity to our inactive customers. For the fall season, we are launching a new loyalty program, maurices Take Ten. We are also anniversarying 4 of our direct mail pieces, with plans to increase quantities by 9%.
At maurices, our store base is now 784 locations at the end of the year, versus 757 stores last year. During the fourth quarter, we opened 21 new stores, and closed 4. 25 new store openings are planned for the fall season. We will continue to fill in our core market area, as well as further expand the maurices' concept into new markets, including our first Canadian store next spring.
At dressbarn, we had very strong sales in May for Mother's Day, and we carried that momentum through the quarter. Sales increases were mainly driven by 3% increase in units per transaction. During the quarter, the categories with double-digit increases over the prior year were knits and sweaters, with petites also having continued impressive growth. We also had success with growing our jewelry and accessories business. From a regional perspective, the Northeast, Midwest and Mid-Atlantic regions all performed above average. E-commerce is still in its first year of launch, and continues to exceed our growth expectations.
We continued to have positive results from our marketing efforts for the quarter. dressbarn drove traffic and sales through 3 mailers, 2 of which included gift-with-purchase offers. Response rates for all of our direct mailers outperformed last year. Our dressbarn credit card market share reached an all time high of 30% sales with double-digit growth over last year, driven by promotional activities tied to the usage of the card.
For the fall season, we have planned 1 incremental mailer, bringing the total direct mail campaigns to 6 for the season and 3 incremental gift-with-purchase promotions. We will also be increasing our customer reach with direct mail quantities up 12% versus last year. At dressbarn, our store base is 830 locations as of the end of the year versus 833 stores last year. During the fourth quarter, we opened 2 and closed 6 stores. For the fall season, we plan to open 15 stores, concentrating our efforts in power strips and testing B malls.
In general, we were pleased with our fourth-quarter operating results at all 3 brands. The results of each brand were also aided by synergies from the completion of some of our Company-wide strategic initiatives. Some of these initiatives allow us to provide more efficient back-office operations so that each brand can focus on their customer. In fiscal 2011, we completed the transition of our dressbarn distribution center into our Etna, Ohio DC. The outsourcing of our HR and payroll administration to ADP, and the consolidation of our 5 data centers into 2. The implementation of a common financial systems platform is on track for next spring, which will also lead to a reorganization of finance functions. As these projects are completed, we expect to realize leverage on SG&A.
To date for the fall season, consolidated comp sales are running in the mid-single digits. We are pleased with our results for the all important back-to-school season at Justice, while results at dressbarn and maurices are off to a slower start. Over the coming year, we will be focusing on several key initiatives that will apply best practices and take advantage of synergies across the brand in order to help drive our business. We will be outsourcing database management and will also incorporate campaign execution and customer modeling into 1 comprehensive solution. Corporate shared-services initiatives will continue with the creation of a financed shared service center and a common financial systems platform.
At Justice, we will focus on new store growth in Canada and domestic small markets. At maurices, we will be emphasizing jewelry and accessories, and begin opening stores in Canada, while at dressbarn, we will continue to focus on growing accessories and jewelry, fine tune our focus on our core dressbarn customer, and begin to utilize our new planning and allocation system to a fuller extent. For all 3 brands, we will continue to drive e-commerce growth.
Our fiscal 2012 outlook is based on consolidated comparable store sales growth in the mid-single digits for all 3 brands, with projected openings of approximately 125 new stores, and the closing of approximately 35 stores. Other assumptions include a slight decrease in gross margin due to cost pressures, and leverage on SG&A as several of our corporate initiatives are completed. Capital spending will be approximately $120 million to support both new store growth and the strengthening of our infrastructure, as we continue to grow our Company.
This outlook also includes the effect of the stock buyback of about 2.5 million shares, which will eliminate share creep. That said, for the fiscal year 2012, we expect adjusted earnings per diluted share to be in the range of $2.55 to $2.65, which represents a 9% to 14% increase over this year's $2.33 adjusted earnings per share, per diluted share. Thank you, and I'll now turn the call over to Armand to discuss our financial results in more detail.
  
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 Thank you, David, and good afternoon, everyone. I'll begin with a summary of results for the fourth quarter and full year 2011.
 
4
 
Final Transcript
And beginning with sales, total net sales for the quarter on a comparable 13-week basis increased 11% to $726 million. The overall sales increase was primarily driven by both a strong comp sales increase of 7% and growth in e-commerce sales. As for comp sales performance, this marks the 10th consecutive quarter of increases. We were particularly pleased with the growth in our e-commerce business across all 3 brands, with Justice and maurices increasing over 30% year-over-year. And dressbarn, which was launched last September, continues to exceed our expectations. E-commerce sales are not included in our comp sales results.
Moving down the income statement, the quarterly reported gross margin rate decreased 40 basis points to 40.6% of sales. The decrease reflects the net impact of a decrease in merchandise margins of 70 basis points from higher markdowns, partially offset by 30 basis points of favorable leverage on buying and occupancy costs.
By brand, the gross margin rate at Justice increased 230 basis points year-over-year to 40.7%. Of the gross margin increase, 180 basis points came from leverage on buying and occupancy costs, and 50 basis points came from increased merchandise margins.
While at maurices and dressbarn, the gross margin rate decreased, with maurices coming in at 40.1% of sales, a decrease of 250 basis points over last year. Of the decrease, the split was 50 basis points came from deleverage on buying and occupancy costs, and a 200 basis points decrease in merchandise margins from higher markdowns. dressbarn came in at 40.8%, a decrease of 130 basis points versus last year, with 60 basis points in deleverage on buying and occupancy costs, and 70 basis point decrease in merchandise margins from higher markdowns.
Turning now to SG&A. For the quarter, SG&A expenses, on an adjusted basis, were $209 million, coming in at 28.9% of sales, and decreased 50 basis points versus last year. The decrease as a percent of sales reflects leverage from sales increases. It's worth noting that costs from several of our strategic initiatives that previously put some pressure on SG&A comparisons are completed or near completion, and as a result we are beginning to see leverage from sales increases. We expect to continue to achieve leverage in the coming quarters from comp sales increases, with our goal of getting back to our historic comp sales tipping point of approximately 3%.
Adjusted quarterly operating income increased 16% to $62.6 million, or 8.6% of sales, versus last year's adjusted $54.2 million, or 8.3% of sales. By brand, the operating income rate at Justice increased to 5.7% of sales, versus last year's 0.8%. We were pleased with this strong performance, as the fourth quarter is historically the least profitable quarter at Justice. At maurices, the operating income rate decreased to 9.4% compared to last year's strong 12.6%, while dressbarn posted a solid 10.9% compared to last year's 11.7% of sales.
Our quarterly effective tax rate was 41.2%, slightly higher than the 39% we modeled. This increase was primarily due to certain non-deductible compensation costs, and compares to 30.2% in the prior year, which was favorably impacted by the closure of certain tax liabilities and benefited last year's reported quarterly earnings per share by $0.06. We expect our effective tax rate in the coming periods to be approximately 39%. Adjusted net income was $38.5 million, or $0.48 per diluted share, compared to last year's adjusted $34 million or $0.42 per share.
Turning now to a quick recap of our full-year results. Adjusted net sales for fiscal 2011 on a 52-week basis increased 26% to a record $2.9 billion with comp sales increasing 6%. Adjusted operating income for the year increased to a record $311 million and 10.7% of sales, an increase of 110 basis points year-over-year. By brand, Justice and maurices once again achieved record sales and operating results with operating income increasing at Justice to 12.6% of sales, a 340 basis point increase versus last year. Maurices came in at 14.9% of sales, increasing 100 basis points year-over-year, while dressbarn's operating income rate was 5.2% compared to last year's 7%. This year's back-half operating income results for dressbarn rebounded nicely at nearly 10% of sales.
Moving on to the balance sheet; our balance sheet remains strong and is now debt-free after paying off our mortgage on our Suffern, New York property. We ended the quarter with $436 million in cash and investments. This represents approximately $5.63 in cash and investments per average share.
As to inventories, at the end of the quarter, consolidated inventories at cost increased 14% to $365 million and 10% on a unit basis. Much of the increase was pre-planned, with earlier fall deliveries to be better positioned for the back-to-school and fall season. Some of the increase also included a conscientious decision to increase wear-now levels entering the fourth quarter, particularly for Justice and maurices.
As you might recall during our previous call, we mentioned that last year's levels of summer wear-now were light during the quarter relative to the business trends, and we believe sales were not maximized during last June and July. As for clearance levels, ending the quarter, they were slightly above last year as a percent to total inventory. We do not believe these increased levels will have any meaningful risk on margins going forward. We are estimating overall inventory levels ending the current October quarter to moderate from the ending fourth quarter levels.
 
5
 
Final Transcript
By brand, inventory ending the quarter at Justice increased 29% year-over-year in dollars and 15% in units. The dollar increase compared to the unit increase is due to both product cost increases and mix. Fall average unit cost is expected to be up low- to mid-teens versus last year. The remaining increase, in addition to the pre-planned timing of earlier fall receipts, supports new store and e-commerce growth at Justice.
At maurices, inventories increased 20% year-over-year in dollars and 14% in units, with fall average unit cost expected to be up mid- to high-single digits. Most of the increase was also pre-planned, however, some of the increase was due to some sales softness experienced during the past few months, with sales increasing in the low- to mid-single digits range.
At dressbarn, inventories decreased 3% year-over-year, both in terms of dollars and units, with AUC expected to be flat to last year. Cash flows remain very strong at all 3 brands. For the fiscal year, we generated $280 million in cash flows from operations, with $180 million of free cash flows. CapEx for the quarter came in at $28 million, with the full year at approximately $100 million.
Turning to our stock buyback program. During the fourth quarter, we repurchased 800,000 shares for a total purchase price of approximately $25 million. For the fiscal year, we repurchased 2.5 million shares, eliminating share creep from stock-based incentive plans, and have $27 million remaining under our $100 million authorization. We will be asking the Board at our next regularly scheduled meeting later this month to approve a new authorization. This will allow us to eliminate, as David said, annual share creep of approximately 2.5 million shares, and to buy back our stock on an opportunistic basis.
Before closing, I would like to remind you that, as we reported in today's press release, beginning with our first quarter ended October of 2011, the Company will be reporting quarterly sales results in conjunction with quarterly earnings. Thank you. Operator, we are now ready to take questions.
 
6
 
Final Transcript
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
Operator
Thank you. (Operator Instructions). Our first question comes from the line of Steve Marotta of CL King. Please proceed.
 
 Steven Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
Good afternoon, David and Armand. Thank you for taking my question. Can you talk about expectations for the year as relates to EPS growth. Given your guidance, is there a stronger likelihood of EPS gains in the back half or the front half, or do you feel that it will be roughly equally weighted?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
Well, let me start off by saying that we don't really give guidance on a quarterly basis, Steve. So I'm not sure what you're digging at here. But if you want to get into more detail with Armand, later, we can certainly try and give you.
 
Steven Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
I do, David. I realize that sensitivity, this had more to do with opportunities for leverage, given all of the things that are occurring within the income statement, as it relates off some of the initiative in the SG&A line, as it relates to pricing in the COGS line. Just again, sort of the opportunities. I'm very well aware you don't give quarterly guidance of course. Just wanted to talk again if there were more opportunities in the front half or the back half or relatively equal.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I think at a high level I'd say that the front half has some more obvious challenges with price increases that we've talked about in the industry hitting this fall, as well as some of the initiatives we have that are either just finishing up or just getting ramped up. So by spring, we think prices will be more under control and we think that we'll have more leverage on those  many of those, if not all of those projects. We would like to think there's more opportunity but who knows what's going to happen with the spring season, obviously it's tough to predict the economy.
 
Steven Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
Sure. I understand. Can you talk a little bit about the promotional cadence across all three brands in the first quarter of this year versus last year? Is it similar? Less so? More accelerated?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
I think what I'll do is I'll go back after the call with you. I kind of talked through that in each section about what we were doing so I'll be happy to go through that again with you later. But we.
 
Steven Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
Specific  okay. No trouble.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
Okay.
 
7
 
Final Transcript
 
Steven Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
 Sure. And lastly, with the stores that you're opening up, are they considered from a modeling standpoint of average economics or do you expect them to be a little bit better or do you expect there to be a maturity cycle with the new stores? Can you talk a little bit about new store openings?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Well, you never know how they're going to ramp up. Certainly, we've been pleased with the new stores at all three divisions this past year. They've outperformed our expectations. Doesn't mean that the new ones that we're opening up this fall will do the same. But we feel we are opening up strong stores. We're going into centers that we're comfortable with, and we're doing the right kind of marketing to support them. But we're still going to budget them at par. We're not going to take them up, just because we've had a good season. We want to be conservative in our budgeting.
 
 Steven Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
 Great. That's very helpful. Thank you very much.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks, Steve.
 
Operator
 Our next question comes from the line of Brian Tunick of JPMorgan. Please proceed.
 
 Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 Thanks. Good afternoon, guys and congrats.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks, Brian. Hi.
 
 Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 Hey. So two on Justice and then one on the balance sheet. So first, just trying to think about Justice gross margins a little here. So it sounds like you're saying AUCs are up, I think mid-teens, and then you're also talking about 43 extra days of POSing on the promos. So just trying to understand how that impacts AURs or I guess out-the-door ticket at Justice.
Second question on Justice is sort of what you're seeing off the mall, versus on the mall, clearly the legacy Limited Too stores, is there any big difference there? And then it wouldn't be an Ascena call without asking about the balance sheet, sort of how you guys think about the minimum cash position and sort of what you're seeing in the acquisition landscape. Seems like there's several people in the world out there where the stocks certainly seem ripe for anything to happen.
 
8
 
 
Final Transcript
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
 Okay. Let me start off with Justice and I'll give it to Armand in the second part of Justice. First, we're not seeing significant differences between off-mall and mall. All of our stores are performing well, and any given week, who knows, but for the season, they were very close. The one thing on the 43 extra days of POS, just to remind you, the vast majority of our sales are already being done on promotion. So we're moving things around. We want to make it more apparent to the passer-by that we've got these offers. But I'll let Armand now  it's not a huge change in our markdown outlook, but Armand, why don't you talk about the AUC?
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 Okay. So with that, Brian, as we said, the AUC we're planning at Justice for the fall to be up in kind of what I would call the mid to  the low to mid-teens. As far as AUR, we would expect AUR to be up in the mid-teens to probably in the range of 20%, with selling AUR or out-the-door as you basically call it back to kind of that 10% to 15% range.
 
 Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 Okay. So you guys think you can fully offset that. Okay.
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 Yes, we can. Again, the difference between the AUR, receipt AUR and the selling AUR is primarily that offer that obviously has resonated with the Justice customer, the 40% off.
 
 Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 Okay. Just maybe just talk about the balance sheet and the thought between share repurchase and acquisitions.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Sure. So we believe we need about $100 million for comfort to run our business. So anything over that is excess. And what we've already said is that we're going to use part of that and also of the new cash that we'll make this year, to buy back stock at a minimum level of about 2.5 million shares for share creep elimination. So anything beyond that is an opportunity for us, and we're certainly always looking at our stock price and considering that.
On the other hand, as I've talked before, Brian, I really like having a war chest so that if something does come along we can write a check or we'll have the balance sheet to be able to finance something that looks attractive to us and not just talking about these really cheap companies that you can buy for $100 million, $200 million. And you're right, I think there are a lot of cheap companies out there. We're looking at a number of them from afar. We have not done anything in terms of engaging with negotiations or whatever. We're nowhere near that. But it does pique my interest to see these businesses trading at lower multiples than they were just a month or six weeks ago. So we're going to look.
Seeing transactions like the [Mech] transaction happen, there's been some other announcements we've all seen that indicate there may be some activity ramping up. But at the end of the day, I think we are going to have a very challenging fall season, we being the industry. And therefore, I want to see what happens and it's my belief that the guys that are having challenges are probably going to be cheaper in January than they are today. And therefore, we want to watch carefully, see what happens, and maybe start sorting through the companies and see if there's any that we believe have long-term interest to us and we'll continue that process.
 
 Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 All right. Terrific. Thanks so much. Good luck, guys.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks, Brian.
 
9
 
Final Transcript
 
Operator
 Our next question comes from the line of Sam Panella of Raymond James. Please proceed.
 
 Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 Good afternoon, everyone, and let me add my congratulations on a great year.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks, Sam.
 
 Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 David, in your commentary, you had mentioned dressbarn and maurices off to a slower start and seeing strength at Justice. Can you just perhaps give us some more color on this? Are you seeing any regional differences? Is it certain categories at dressbarn and maurices? Just to help us think about this.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 I think that some of the challenges at maurices could possibly be merchandising issues. We're kind of sorting through it, and watching it pretty carefully. There is a few things that are going on that could be macro, could be internal, and I think we need more than just a month to figure it out. The business there is not nearly as back-to-school based as Justice, so as dressbarn and maurices start ramping up with the cooler weather, it will be telling if  when the big dollars start hitting, if indeed we do have a problem, whether it's macro or internal, as I said.
I feel that just the tenor out there in general, talking to our vendors, and looking around at the results that we're all reading about, it just feels like the market is a little tighter, and the customer's a little more concerned, perhaps than she was a couple of months ago. Spring, everybody seemed to have pretty strong results and over the summer and as we get into fall, it seems a little bit more challenging, and I think the value message that Justice does such a great job of communicating is all-important to that customer.
 
 Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 Okay. Thanks. And then with respect to the dressbarn division, obviously last year, you had a challenging fall and sounds like you don't have the unit cost pressure at that division as you do at the other two. What's the opportunity at the dressbarn division to perhaps improve the gross margin there, given perhaps easier comparisons year-over-year in the first half?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 I think the biggest thing is we don't have the inventory overhang and levels that we did last year. So what hurt us was that we took too much inventory into our second quarter, the calendar fourth quarter, and the markdowns to clear that really killed us. So I think our inventory's in much better shape. As Armand mentioned, we're actually going into the season with less inventory than last year so I think we're in very good shape and I think that's the biggest single opportunity is just to be able to reduce our markdowns and hold our margin throughout the season.
 
 Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 Great. Thanks, and good luck.
 
10
 
Final Transcript
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks, Sam.
 
Operator
 Our next question comes from the line of Edward Yruma of KeyBanc. Please proceed.
 
 Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 Hi, KeyBanc. Thanks, guys and congrats on a nice year.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks, Ed.
 
 Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 I guess I wanted to delve in a little bit more on dressbarn. In terms of your ability to kind of move the needle there, I know that it's been a couple quarters of soft comps. Can you talk about, to the extent possible, kind of what is self-inflicted versus what's just a really weak Missy customer and if there's an opportunity for you to kind of improve comps earlier in 2012?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Well, I think I take a little issue with what your comment was. I think dressbarn had a very solid spring season. The problem was fall and we've talked about that on past calls, that some of the issues were self-inflicted, some of it clearly was just a difficult environment, and as we've talked before, the Missy customer, mom is the first one to sacrifice. She's not going to go out and spend money when her daughter doesn't have her back-to-school outfit, or her husband lost her job, or she's nervous, or her kid's college payment isn't made or what have you. I could go on and on. So we've seen consumer confidence, the consumer sentiment index in August I think went to its lowest level since 1980.
It is a little bit challenging out there and I think the Missy business is feeling it more than certainly the Justice business or even maurices business. But I think we're well-positioned. I think we're doing things a lot smarter than last year. We talked about the inventory levels. We have started implementing our planning system. We're using the new DC so we can distribute more by item and fill back basis. As I mentioned earlier, we've got three incremental gift-with-purchase offers that we think resonate well with our customer. So we're pretty optimistic about our positioning for the fall season.
 
 Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 Great. And one housekeeping question. I know that you indicated that you're rolling off of a lot of the integration projects, which have been tying up some SG&A dollars. Should we then assume that kind of going forward we should see a reduction in difference between reported EPS and adjusted EPS? Thank you.
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 I'll take that. Yes, Ed, to answer your question. Obviously, a lot of these non-GAAP items that we've called out as kind of one-time will be rolling off, and you'll start seeing that throughout the course of the year.
 
 Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 Great. Thank you.
 
11
 
Final Transcript
 
 Operator
 Our next question comes from the line of Neely Tamminga of Piper Jaffray. Please proceed.
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 Hey, good afternoon and congrats, guys.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks.
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 A good year. Just a couple questions on maurices. I'm really intrigued on this loyalty program launch, David. Just wondering if you could talk a little bit more about the philosophy that went into it. Are you guys going to be a frequency-driving sort of loyalty program or an average volume, average dollar?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Actually, it's a program that we've already had. It was a punch program, a paper card that got punched and we've converted it to a digital program or electronic program on our POS, as we added that functionality to our POS. So what we like about it is now, you have the ability to capture all sorts of information about your customer, whether it's phone number or address or e-mail address or whatever, so that we can be able to contact her much more readily and inexpensively. So we can certainly do mailings, but now if we've got her phone number, we can also text her. If we've got her e-mail address, we can also e-mail her. It's much, much cheaper than mailing her.
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 Not necessarily a change. I'm sorry, didn't mean to talk over you. Not necessarily a change in the acquisition of loyalty and the redemption of loyalty, just the means in which you guys are doing it?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 That's correct. It's just the delivery. But because of that, we'll be able to capture the information on our customers more consistently, and track their purchases. So that is a big win, and it's a really minimal cost to do this, already done. So far, the results have been very favorable. Everybody's signing up for it, or transferring their paper card to the electronic version.
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 That's really helpful for the clarity on that. Just a little bit more specific here on dressbarn. If my notes are correct you guys  I think the dressbarn division is the first division this fall with the deliveries to have that size optimization functionality applied to the deliveries. Am I right about that? Could you talk a little bit about that initiative, and what you might have learned and  or are learning and how that might apply to the other divisions?
 
12
 
Final Transcript
 
  David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 I think we're just learning it, and the concept of it is simply make sure that we send the right sizes to the right stores and we arrange the packets that we have as such, and it's still very early in the game on that and we're optimistic but I can't really point and say oh, yes, we've gotten better sell-through on the items that we've size-optimized. So it's a good question. I got the same question for my P&A people. I hope they're listening. I'll be following up directly with them on it too.
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 Okay. That's helpful. Thanks, David, good luck.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks, Neely.
 
Operator
 Our next question comes from the line of Scott Krasik of BB&T Capital Markets. Please proceed.
 
 Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 Hi, guys. Thanks for taking my questions. Armand, just a housekeeping one, quick. The cash number that you quoted at year end, it sounded bigger than just adding up the cash and the short-term investments. Was there something else?
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 You've got to look at, we've got a classification on the balance sheet, Scott, if you turn to it, where we break out kind of the cash, which is the cash, then we have short-term investments, then we have what we call non-current investments and I believe if you add those three together, you're going to get your $436 million.
 
 Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 Okay. And the increase in non-current investments from a year ago, it was so dramatic why?
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 Last year we did not classify what I would call investments that had a maturity date of over a year into that bucket. This year, we're classifying it in that particular manner. So it's kind of apples to oranges here. But going forward, that's how we'll classify it.
 
 Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 Okay. That's helpful. Thanks.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Let's make sure you don't think that's like we're investing in.
 
 Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 Auction rate.
 
13
 
Final Transcript
 
  David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 It just happens get over that one year hurdle. We're keeping our things very short and very liquid.
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 To David's point, most of our investment portfolio is comprised of tax-free munis, highly liquid, highly gradable and obviously we want that liquidity.
 
 Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 We trust you guys.
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 Okay.
 
 Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 David, a lot has been talked about the margin opportunities at dressbarn but I guess maurices from our standpoint looked like it could potentially go the other way. So maybe give us some confidence of why a fashion mishap here or there, higher inventory you're carrying into fall, why should we feel good that you'll be able to come close to maintaining the margins that you are at now?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Well, I think there are a couple things. Every year we get smarter and our business is growing in areas that give us more opportunity. So I mentioned jewelry and accessories. We have an effort out, we call it our new jewelry focus, jewelry accessory focus, it's a special area within the store that's set up, we call it A Thing Four, we call it ATF, and this ATF program is inventory that turns over fairly rapidly because it's trend-right and then we move on to the next trend.
So this is high-margin inventory, and therefore, we don't have the exposure even though we've got the inventory looks bloated, the investment in here is fairly significant, and Armand can get you the exact dollars that we've put into this. So while we do have more inventory, it's not all things that are carryover from last year. In addition, as we look at our business, for the most part, we're able to take the trends that we've been seeing and just chase them, just follow those trends and, therefore, as we've tested products, we're following trends, there's not this huge risk that we're going into completely new areas. So yes, there's always risk in fashion, but we don't have the same concerns that we might in other businesses, because we have been following these fashion trends, and feel we're just taking them into the next season.
 
 Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 That's a good answer. And just sort of going back to your comment about quarter-to-date comps, any major difference between dressbarn and maurices and are they positive or negative?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 dressbarn is actually a little bit better than maurices, and maurices is right around flat.
 
14
 
Final Transcript
 
  Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 Okay. Okay. Thanks, guys.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks.
 
Operator
 Our next question comes from the line of Mark Montagna of Avondale Partners. Please proceed.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 Hi. Good job on yet another solid quarter.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thank you.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 I do have a couple questions just about the 3% comp for the tipping point. Is that based on beginning from day one or is that pretty much a full-year average?
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 That would be a full year average, Mark.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 Okay. And then looking t at last year with all the SG&A spend for the different efficiency projects, can you give us a dollar amount that was spent that might have impacted SG&A, and should we count on getting all of that SG&A spend back for this year?
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 Well, again, as I mentioned, as these projects roll off, and I can get into details kind of after this call with you, but a lot of these projects are rolling off, we're already beginning to see the leverage, and you really  even though we called out non-GAAP items, as I've said before, there were duplicate costs that we didn't call out, that obviously did impact comparisons of SG&A and now that these things are rolling off, you should start seeing kind of that leverage going back to that 3% comp sales tipping point. Again, it's already started, and I would anticipate that this is going to continue into the new year.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 Okay. And then just regarding the marketing, sounds like you're doing a lot more marketing in 2012 versus 2011. Is there a change in the budget in terms of percent of sales? And are you going to be doing deeper promotions or pretty much the same percentage as last year?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Well, we hope to do deeper promotions.
 
15
 
Final Transcript
 
  Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 Okay.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Obviously, the clearance promotions if things don't work out, but at this point Mark, in all seriousness we're really running very similar promotions at all three brands. There's some incremental things that we've talked about, whether it's POS events at Justice or incremental gift-with-purchases at dressbarn. We shouldn't see any significant changes and the good thing is if business does get a little slow, we have the ability to step on the gas. But right now, we're projecting out a similar cadence and depth of promo to last fall.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 Okay. Yes, the reason why I ask is because I hear of other retailers taking it steeper. If you look at the dressbarn division, the promotions have never been overly generous. Maybe because it's such a good value offering as it is, I just kind of wonder if the dressbarn message could get lost in the shuffle because $10 off a suit is not a heck of a lot.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Right. Well, I think it gets back to how you're positioned and some of those other people that have the big discounts, whether they're the big boxes or the mall guys, have more of a high-low strategy and they're marking up the products very high and taking it down pretty quickly, if not immediately, and it's just a different strategy than what we've had. So I think our customers know that and they see the value. Customer's a lot smarter than we give them credit for. While we need to be aware of what's going on out there with our competition, at this point, we want to say we're experimenting with things here and there, testing different promos, but we feel pretty comfortable with the promo schedule we've got for fall.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 And then CapEx, sounds like it's going up a bit over last year. I know you're going to have quite a few more new stores. What is the non-new store CapEx versus  for 2012, versus 2011? Is it less or more, or like can you give some sort of approximated dollars?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 We probably don't give out that kind of detail, but I'd tell you it's slightly more.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 Slightly more on the non-new store CapEx?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Yes.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 Why would that be? Because it seems like with the efficiency projects of last year, I would have expected that part of CapEx to go down.
 
16
 
Final Transcript
 
  David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 That's a piece of it for sure, but there's other CapEx that's non-store related. So if you're  one example I just signed off on was new laptops for our field supervisors. So it adds up. But the vast majority of our CapEx, you've got exactly right, is new stores, refurbishments and remodels.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 Okay. And then just the last question. Dot-com, can you tell us what kind of revenues you achieved in each of the three divisions last year?
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 Yes. I probably can. On an annual basis, Mark?
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 Yes.
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 Is that what you're looking for? On an annual basis, e-commerce, when you talk about sales as well as revenues associated with e-com, we reached a little over $100 million with Justice, just short of $70 million, maurices, $25 million, and dressbarn came in a little over $10 million.
 
 Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 Okay. All right. That was all I had. Thank you.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thanks, Mark.
 
Operator
 Our next question comes from the line of Robin Murchison of SunTrust. Please proceed.
 
 Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 Hi. Thanks very much. Congratulations, guys, and David, no iPads for your people?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Maybe some day.
 
 Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 Keep that CapEx in check.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Yes.
 
17
 
Final Transcript
 
  Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 Okay, so one housekeeping piece for Armand. I don't  you said 2.5 million shares for the full year buyback. Do you have a dollar amount associated with that?
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 It's just short of $80 million. I think we had  I think we've got probably $73 million to $75 million. I can give you the exact number after this call.
 
 Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 Okay. I'll get it later. Okay. And then you mentioned e-com is not included in same-store sales. So many retailers, not necessarily your competitors, but it does seem to weigh  it does seem to be the way that things are sort of evolving. Do you have any plans to include it in same-store sales?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 We always felt it's cleaner to do it separately and show you the numbers and the comp numbers for e-commerce alone. But if the trend is to include it and that's what the best practice is and that's what all you guys would prefer to see, we're happy to switch it. Obviously, it's growing so rapidly, it's going to boost our comp number, but I'm not sure that's the right way to analyze the business.
 
 Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 I agree with you. I think it is cleaner to do separately but there just does seem to be this other trend out there. So we appreciate it, you keeping it separate.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Okay.
 
 Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 Okay. So maurices, I just wondered, are there any thematic trends that stand out that you're comfortable talking about?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Fashion-wise?
 
 Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 Fashion-wise, denim, tops, anything that is standing out that you're seeing in terms of amped up consumer demand?
 
18
 
Final Transcript
 
  David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 I think what we're  denim is always important and certainly denim continues to be a good business for us. I think our fashion knit top business has been very good. I think there are a couple areas like sweaters that are off to a little bit slower start. That could be just timing because of the weather.
Who knows? Because we're right at the cusp now. It's kind of that inflection point over the next few weeks when the weather starts turning. So the business there is pretty much trend-right. We feel pretty good. There are a couple of areas that we're watching, and in the next two, three weeks I think we'll see the business open up, and see if we have as I said earlier a merchandising issue or if it's more of a generic issue with the industry.
 
 Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 Okay. And then just lastly, it seems like during your prepared comments, when you were mentioning some of the new stores for the year, number of new stores, you also mentioned B and C malls. And I know these are not new to you, necessarily, but I'm just sort of wondering why the call-out, and wouldn't there be positive margin implications, given presumably lower rents? Just if you can elaborate anything on?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Sure, we called out the B and C malls for Justice, because that's not historically where Justice has opened up, in certainly Cs and even in Bs. So  and in smaller markets. So we want to make sure everybody knows we're creating a new avenue of growth into these smaller markets and the B-minus and the C malls and same at dressbarn. We said we're testing B malls. We've only got out of our 840 stores, we've only got maybe a couple dozen mall stores. If we can figure out how to merchandise mall stores better, we have another runway there as well. That's the reason for calling those out, Robin.
 
 Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 Is the smaller market strategy for Justice, is that sort of tag-teaming maurices?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Well, I wouldn't say they're tag-teaming but they're certainly sharing a lot of information and it's seeming to be working very effectively for Justice, although Justice's definition of small is not quite as small as the maurices' definition.
 
 Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 Okay, great. Thank you and good luck, guys.
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 Robin, this is Armand. It will save me a call after this particular call. We actually, the exact number on the 2.5 million shares we repurchased during the fiscal year was $72.9 million. So, for your record.
 
 Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 Okay. Thank you.
 
Operator
 Our last question comes from the line of Mike Richardson of Sidoti. Please proceed.
 
19
 
Final Transcript
 
  Michael Richardson
- Sidoti & Company - Analyst
 Good afternoon, guys. Thanks for taking my question.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Hi, Mike.
 
 Michael Richardson
- Sidoti & Company - Analyst
 I was just wondering if you could comment on where you are with using the Justice sourcing platform for maurices and dressbarn? I know the plan was to go pretty slowly there.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 I'd say we're doing our plan pretty well. We're not rushing into it. We're ramping up the infrastructure to be able to support the move into the Justice sourcing infrastructure. So we have brought on a very senior person in the sourcing side on the product specking and QC at maurices, and she's building her team, and I think we'll see that business  I'm sorry, the direct business sourcing with Justice continue to increase this year at a very healthy clip.
At dressbarn, it's a little bit slower. We've got a few people on board. We need to get a few more to get up-to-speed. But we're very encouraged by the opportunity that we see, but we're going to continue to be thoughtful about it. We don't want to rush into it and I think there's certain categories that are more obvious and kind of lower-hanging fruit so I think you'll see it continue to ramp up not just this year but over the next several years.
 
 Michael Richardson
- Sidoti & Company - Analyst
 Okay. By the end of the year, what percentage of business, of maurices' business do you think you could be sourcing on that platform? Is there a number you could point to or?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 We're still kind of developing our plans but it will be bigger number than last year for sure, but it's still a relatively de minimis number. So I'm going to say single digits but I'm not in a position to tell you what number that will be exactly right now.
 
 Michael Richardson
- Sidoti & Company - Analyst
 Okay. And just one more, just with regard to gross margins. Is it fair to say that you expect most of the gross margin pressure from higher cost to be in the first half of the year?
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Yes.
 
 Michael Richardson
- Sidoti & Company - Analyst
 That's all I have. I appreciate it.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Great. Well, thank you for your interest.
 
20
 
Final Transcript
  
 Operator
 With no further questions, I would like to turn the call over to Mr. David Jaffe for final closing remarks.
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 Thank you, everyone. I appreciate your time and we look forward to speaking to you after our first-quarter results which will be sometime in end of November, we'll get that date out to everyone. Thank you, have a good day.
 
Operator
 Ladies and gentlemen, that concludes today's conference. Thank you for your participation. You may disconnect at this time. Have a great day.
 
 
21
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20110922160708.txt.gz
TIME:20110922160708
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On September 21, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the Corporation), entered into an amendment (the Amendment) to the employment agreement, dated as of May 2, 2002 and as thereafter amended, between the Corporation and David R. Jaffe, its Chief Executive Officer (the Employment Agreement).  The Amendment provides that the term of the Employment Agreement is extended through, and will not be automatically extended beyond, September 21, 2014.
The foregoing description of the Amendment does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Amendment, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
This Amendment Number Two (this ) to the employment agreement dated as of May 2, 2002, by and between Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the ) and David R. Jaffe (the ), as amended (the ), is hereby entered into between the Company and the Executive as of September 21, 2011.
Amendment
Company
Executive
Employment Agreement
 
, the Executive and the Companys predecessor, The Dress Barn, Inc., previously entered into the Employment Agreement which has been amended from time to time; and
WHEREAS
 
, the Company and the Executive desire to amend the Employment Agreement as set forth below.
WHEREAS
 
, effective as of September 21, 2011, the Employment Agreement is hereby amended as follows:
NOW, THEREFORE
 
1.           Section 2 of the Employment Agreement is amended by adding the following sentence to end thereof to read as follows:
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, effective as of September 21, 2011, the Employment Term is extended for a Renewal Term ending on September 21, 2014 (the End Date), unless sooner terminated in accordance with Section 5 below, and the Employment Term shall not be subject to automatic extension following the End Date.
 
2.           The first sentence of Section 5 of the Employment Agreement is amended in its entirety to read as follows:
 
Executives employment under this Agreement shall terminate on the End Date, unless earlier terminated under any of the circumstances set forth in this Section 5 (a) through (d).
 
3.           The second sentence of Section 5(e) is deleted in its entirety.
 
4.           Section 5(f)(i) of the Employment Agreement is amended in its entirety to read as follows:
 
(i) the End Date;
 
 
 
 
 
5.           Section 6(a) of the Employment Agreement is amended by adding the following sentence to end thereof to read as follows:
 
For the avoidance of doubt, the payments under this Section 6(c) shall not be made to Executive in the event that his employment terminates on or after the End Date.
 
, the undersigned have caused this Amendment to be executed this 21 day of September, 2011.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
st
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20111110142347.txt.gz
TIME:20111110142347
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
_________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
November 7, 2011 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
_________________________
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive Suffern, New York 10901
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4c))
o
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On November 7, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. issued a press release announcing the appointment of John J. Sullivan (58) to serve as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Prior to his appointment, Mr. Sullivan served as Executive Vice President and Chief Information Officer for QVC, Inc. for four years, where his responsibilities included oversight of all aspects of QVCs IT department, including applications development, technology, production services and telecommunications. Prior to joining QVC, Mr. Sullivan spent 11 years with Liz Claiborne, Inc., where he most recently served as Senior Vice President Sourcing, Systems and Chief Information Officer, where he was responsible for the companys global information systems, merchandise replenishment, global apparel and accessories manufacturing and customer service for both wholesale and retail operations. John began his career there as Vice President of Information Systems and Customer Service and progressed into various leadership positions. Prior to Liz Claiborne, John held various IT leadership positions at Goodys Family Clothing, Ames Department Stores, Johnson & Associates and Knapp Shoes.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
October 3, 2011
John J. Sullivan
15 Forest Drive
Morristown, NJ 07960
 
Dear John,
 
We are pleased to offer you the position of Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer at Ascena Retail Group Inc., reporting to David Jaffe, Chief Executive Officer and President. This position will oversee certain shared services (Information Technology, HRIS, and Logistics). This offer is contingent on a background check and determination of a mutually agreeable start date.
 
This letter will provide additional details about your total compensation and benefits package. The plan design of the companys benefits package is subject to change.
 
BASE SALARY, BONUS AND STOCK OPTIONS
Your annualized salary will be $575,000, paid bi-weekly. You will be eligible for annual merit evaluations beginning in October 2012.
        
 
Bonus eligibility for the EVP level is 75% of your annual base salary. You will be eligible for 100% of that bonus if the Target level of Ascena financial results and individual performance is achieved for the fiscal year (ending in July 2012). Your initial annual target level (100%) is $431,250. The maximum payout (200%) is $862,500. This amount would be prorated for the Fall season and paid out following the Compensation Committee Meeting (March 2012). The bonus stipulates that you must be employed by Ascena at the time of the bonus payout.
        
 
You will be recommended to receive 25,000 non-qualified stock options of Ascena Common Stock (symbol ASNA) under the Companys stock option plan. This recommendation will be made at the next, regularly scheduled, quarterly Compensation Committee Meeting of the Board of Directors. As of the date of this approval, these options will be granted and the price will be determined. Vesting will begin on the one year anniversary of the approval date, with 25% (6,250) vesting each subsequent year for 4 years. You will be eligible to be considered for other stock options in the fall of each year beginning in 2012.
        
 
1
At the same Compensation Committee meeting you will also be recommended to receive 5,000 Restricted Stock Units (RSUs). The full value of these shares will also begin to vest on the one year anniversary of the approval date with 50% (2,500) vesting each subsequent year for 2 years. RSUs are not typically awarded annually.
        
 
You will be eligible to participate in the Companys Long Term Incentive Plan (LTIP). This Plan awards RSUs at the end of a 3-year performance period based on the level of achievement of company financial goals established at the beginning of the performance period. The RSUs vest 100% 30 days following the approval date. You will be eligible for 100% of Opportunity Share Units in the 2014 LTI Plan (FY2012-FY2014). The Company will recommend to the Compensation Committee that your initial target (100%) is 10,000 Opportunity Share Units. The maximum target (200%) is 20,000 Opportunity Share Units. Each year the company intends to offer a new 3-year LTI Plan.
        
 
EXECUTIVE SEVERANCE POLICY
You will receive an Executive Severance Plan that provides you with severance benefits if your employment is terminated due to a Change of Control or for a termination without Cause. If you are terminated without Cause you will receive salary continuation for 12 months with 100% company paid COBRA benefits during the severance period.
        
 
DEFERRED COMPENSATION
You will be eligible to participate in the Executive Retirement Plan (ERP) in January 2012. ERP is a non-qualified deferred compensation plan for Executives and Senior Management Team members sponsored by Ascena Retail Group, Inc. The ERP provides you with the following benefits:
        
Ability to defer up to 95% of your base salary and bonus through payroll deductions
o
       
First 5% of your base salary and bonus that you defer will be matched at 100%
o
       
Earnings accumulate tax deferred
o
       
No excise tax penalties for early distribution
o
       
Over 20 self-directed investment funds
o
       
Since you are considered by the IRS to be a Highly Compensation Associate, your contribution rate is limited to 2% in the Ascena Retail Group Inc.s 401(k) plan.
        
 
TIME OFF AWARDS
you will accrue vacation time with each paycheck beginning immediately upon hire and will be eligible for up to 20 days vacation annually.
        
Vacation:
You are eligible for 5 choice time days to use by January 31, 2012. You will be eligible for 7 Choice Days on February 2, 2012 to use by January 31, 2013.
        
Choice Time:
You are eligible for the following paid Holidays: New Years Day, Memorial Day, Independence Day, Labor Day, Thanksgiving, the day after Thanksgiving and Christmas.
        
Company Holidays:
2
ASSOCIATE DISCOUNT
Upon hire, you and your eligible dependents will receive the following discount on merchandise purchased in , and locations:
        
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
40% discount off regular-priced merchandise (all brands)
o
       
40% discount off the promotional or markdown priced merchandise. Excludes entire store percent off events. Associates may not receive, redeem or be eligible for JBucks, Fun Cards, JMC Catazine coupons or any other type of coupon ()
o
       
Justice
20% discount on sales prices ()
o
       
dressbarn
20% discount of permanent markdowns and POS sale items ()
o
       
maurices
 
BENEFITS
Details of the complete benefit package are included in our Benefits Guide, see attached. At a glance, these benefits include:
        
Medical and Prescription
o
       
Dental
o
       
Vision
o
       
Life Insurance
o
       
Short-Term and Long-Term Disability
o
       
Education Assistance
o
       
Adoption Assistance
o
       
Scholarship Program
o
       
Dimes from the Heart Program
o
       
Flexible Spending Account
o
       
John, this offer of employment does not constitute an employment contract; however, it is intended to be a statement of our intent to employ you. We believe you will be an outstanding addition to the Ascena team. I am confident that you will find the position challenging and that you will have the opportunity to continue your professional growth.
If you wish to accept this offer, please sign both copies and return one full copy to me postmarked on or before October 5, 2011 in the enclosed envelope.
Sincerely,
/s/ DAVID JAFFE
David Jaffe
Chief Executive Officer and President
If the terms of this offer are acceptable, please sign below:
AGREED AND ACCEPTED:
 
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. announced today that John Sullivan has been appointed Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer. In this newly created position, Mr. Sullivan will be responsible for Information Technology, Distribution, and Human Resources Information Systems across all brands. He will report to David Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer.
SUFFERN, NY  NOVEMBER 7, 2011 -
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
Mr. Sullivans executive career spans more than 30 years. Prior to joining the Company, he served as Executive Vice President and Chief Information Officer for QVC, where he transformed the companys legacy systems. While at QVC, he architected a multi-year strategy to support its multi-channel business including a global consumer website, a comprehensive Warehouse Management System, and a Customer Relationship Management System that enabled strategic promotions, cross selling, and customer personalization.
Prior to joining QVC, Mr. Sullivan was the Senior Vice President Sourcing, Systems and Chief Information Officer for Liz Claiborne, where he was responsible for the companys global information systems, merchandise replenishment, global apparel and accessories manufacturing, and customer service for both wholesale and retail operations. During his tenure, he spearheaded a five-year plan to transform the companys supply chain and sourcing strategy. He introduced technology, processes, and created a model for the companys future stability.
David Jaffe, President and CEO, commented: We are excited to welcome John to our executive management team. His retail experience, combined with his strong strategic planning, leadership, and technical skills, make him a valuable addition to our team.
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls, operating through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, the , and brands. The Company operates through its subsidiaries over 2,500 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada, with revenues of approximately $2.9 billion.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
offers casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 836 stores in 47 states. offers casual and career apparel and accessories at value prices to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operates 797 stores in 44 states. offers trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operates 917 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
For more information, visit www.ascenaretail.com, www.dressbarn.com, www.maurices.com and www.shopjustice.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20111201163155.txt.gz
TIME:20111201163155
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On December 1, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) first quarter ended October 29, 2011.  The Company also reaffirmed its earnings per share guidance for its full fiscal year ending July 28, 2012.   A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
issued a press release disclosing material non-public information regarding its results of operations for the fiscal
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC. REPORTS FIRST QUARTER
SALES AND EARNINGS RESULTS
COMPARABLE STORE SALES INCREASE 4% 
 COMPANY REAFFIRMS FISCAL 2012 EARNINGS GUIDANCE 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reported financial results for its fiscal first quarter ended October 29, 2011.
SUFFERN, NY  December 1, 2011 
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
Fiscal First Quarter Results
On a reported basis, net income for the fiscal first quarter was$47.5 million, or $0.60 per diluted share, compared to net income of $48.0 million, or $0.60 per diluted share, for the first quarter of Fiscal 2011.
On an adjusted basis, net income increased to $51.7 million, or $0.65 per diluted share, compared to net income for last years first quarter of $50.5 million, or $0.63 per diluted share.  Adjusted results exclude items that management believes are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance.  Reference should be made to Note 3 to our consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this release for a discussion of the non-GAAP financial measures used in this release and for the reconciliations of such non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures.
Net sales for the fiscal first quarter increased 8% to $768.3 million, compared to$713.3 million for last years fiscal first quarter. This overall increase was due to comparable store sales increases and new store growth at and as well as continued strong growth in all e-commerce brand sales.  Consolidated comparable store sales, which include stores open for at least one year, increased 4% for the fiscal first quarter.  The Companys comparable store sales and net sales by brand for the fiscal first quarter were as follows:
Justice
maurices,
On a reported basis, selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the first quarter were $224.2 million, or 29.2%of sales, compared to $204.1 million, or 28.6% of sales last year.  On an adjusted basis, SG&A expenses were $217.4 million, or 28.3% of sales, compared to $200.5 million, or 28.1% of sales last year.  The increase in SG&A as a percent of sales on an adjusted basis was primarily due to an increase in marketing expenses and increased costs due to new business initiatives.
 
 
 
On a reported basis, operating income for the first quarter was $76.5 million, or 10.0% of sales, compared to $77.7 million, or 10.9% of sales last year.  On an adjusted basis, operating income increased 2% to $83.3 million, or 10.8% of sales, compared to $81.8 million, or 11.5% of sales last year.  The decrease in adjusted operating income as a percent of sales was largely due to an increase in markdowns at and .
dressbarn
maurices
Fiscal First Quarter Balance Sheet Highlights
The Company ended the first quarter with $437.6 million in cash and investments, compared to $436.1 million in cash and investments at the end of the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2011.
The Company repurchased approximately 1.1 million shares at an aggregate cost of $28.7 million during the first quarter.  Approximately $98.4 million remained available under the Companys authorized share repurchase program at the end of the first quarter.
Commentary
David R. Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented, We saw continued strength in several key areas of our business during the first quarter.  While the retail environment remained challenging, our consumers reacted favorably to compelling assortments at each of our brands and to a targeted marketing and promotional strategy that communicated our value proposition very effectively, which kept our inventory at proper levels.  As we move into our second quarter, we remain comfortable that we will achieve our plan for the year.  We also remain excited by a wide range of opportunities to drive growth in our business, value to our consumers, and returns to our shareholders.
Reaffirms Fiscal July 2012 Earnings Guidance
The Company reaffirms guidance for earnings per diluted share for the fiscal year ending July 2012 in the range of $2.55 to $2.65.  This estimate is based upon various assumptions for the year, including a mid-single digit increase in comparable store sales.  The Company plans to open approximately 125 to 135 stores and close 30 to 35 stores, ending fiscal 2012 with approximately 2,600 , and stores in operation.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
Conference Call Information
The Company will conduct a conference call today, December 1, 2011 at 4:30PM Eastern Time to review its first quarter fiscal 2012 results followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (617) 614-2706 prior to the start time, the passcode is 49439762. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at .  A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until January 1, 2012 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 37885299.
www.ascenaretail.com
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls, operating through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, the and brands.  The Company operates through its subsidiaries over 2,500 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada, with annual revenues of approximately $2.9 billion.
dressbarn, maurices
Justice
 
 
 
offers casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 836 stores in 47 states. offers casual and career apparel and accessories at value prices to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operates 797 stores in 44 states. offers trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operates 917 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
For more information, visit , , and .
www.ascenaretail.com
www.dressbarn.com
www.maurices.com
www.shopjustice.com
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved.  Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available in the Companys most recent annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended July 30, 2011.
Investor Relations
(845) 369-4600
ICR, Inc.
James Palczynski
Senior Managing Director
(203) 682-8229
jp@ircinc.com
 
 
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Segment Information (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
Note 1.  Description of Business
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (Ascena or the Company) is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls operating, through its wholly owned subsidiaries, the , , and brands.  The Company operates (through its subsidiaries) over 2,500 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada, with annual revenues of over $2.9 billion.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
The Company classifies its businesses into three segments following a brand-oriented approach: , and .  The segment includes approximately 836 specialty retail and outlet stores, as well as an e-commerce operation that was launched in the first quarter of Fiscal 2011.  The brand primarily attracts female consumers in the mid-30s to mid-50s age range and offers moderate-to-better quality career and casual fashion to the working woman. The segment includes approximately 797 specialty retail and outlet stores, and e-commerce operations.  The brand offers up-to-date fashion designed to appeal to the 17 to 34 year-old female, with stores concentrated in small markets (approximately 25,000 to 100,000 people).  The segment includes approximately 917 specialty retail and outlet stores, e-commerce operations, and certain licensed franchises in international territories.  The brand offers fashionable apparel to girls who are ages 7 to 14 in an environment designed to match the energetic lifestyle of tween girls.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
dressbarn
dressbarn
maurices
maurices
Justice
Justice
Note 2.  Basis of Presentation
Segment Information
Historically, the Company was a single-brand retailer operating under the name of . As such, all corporate overhead costs were reported historically within the operating segment.  As the Companys legal entity structure evolved with the acquisitions of the brand in Fiscal 2005 and the brand in Fiscal 2010, the Company allocated approximately $2 million of corporate overhead costs annually to each of those operating segments from the operating segment. The remainder of the corporate overhead costs continued to be reported primarily within the operating segment.
dressbarn
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
dressbarn
dressbarn
In January 2011, the Company completed an internal corporate reorganization and established a new holding company, named Ascena Retail Group, Inc., to own the interests of each of the , , and brands through wholly owned subsidiaries.  In connection therewith, beginning in Fiscal 2012, the Company implemented a new methodology to allocate corporate overhead costs to each of its operating segments on a reasonable basis.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
In order to conform to this new cost allocation methodology, the Company has recasted historically reported segment operating results in order to enhance the comparability of its segmental operating performance.  There have been no changes in total net sales or total operating income as a result of this change.
 
 
 
 
A reconciliation of the Companys operating income for each segment under the historical and recasted basis of reporting for the three months ended October 30, 2010 is as follows:
Other Reclassifications
Certain other immaterial reclassifications have been made to the prior periods financial information in order to conform to the current periods presentation.
Note 3.  Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
To provide investors information to assist them in assessing the Companys on-going operations on a comparable basis, the Company has provided financial measures in this press release that exclude certain items detailed below from its Fiscal 2012 and Fiscal 2011 reported results.  Throughout this release, the term reported refers to information prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States (GAAP), while the term adjusted refers to non-GAAP financial information adjusted to exclude the impact of the items mentioned below.  Management believes that such items are not indicative of the underlying operating performance of the Companys businesses.
For Fiscal 2012 and Fiscal 2011, the following items and transactions have been excluded from the applicable GAAP measures for purposes of determining adjusted operating results:  (1) merger-related, integration and reorganization costs incurred in both years, (2) start-up expenses incurred in Fiscal 2011 in connection with the Companys new initiatives to expand its retail operations into Canada and to launch a new boys product line, , for , (3) market-related expenses in both years related to the Companys deferred compensation plan that affects the Companys liability under the plan, (4) certain one-time, executive contractual obligation costs incurred in Fiscal 2012.
Brothers
Justice
 
 
 
 
 
Selling, general and administrative expenses:
 
Operating Income:
(in millions)
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20111202170250.txt.gz
TIME:20111202170250
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On December 1, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an investor conference call to discuss the Companys results of operations for its first quarter ended October 29, 2011and certain other information, including the contents of the Companys press release dated December 1, 2011 which was furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 8-K on December 1, 2011.  The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference.  A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
Date:  December 1, 2011
 
 
 
 

 
 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
1
 
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
 
Allison Townsend
ICR, Inc. - IR
 
David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Armand Correia
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
 
Nicole Shevins
Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
Edward Yruma
KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Scott Krasik
BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Anna Andreeva
FBR & Co. - Analyst
 
Janet Kloppenburg
JJK Research - Analyst
 
Sam Panella
Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 
Brian Tunick
JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Douglas Kass
Seabreeze Partners Management Inc. - Analyst
 
Mark Montagna
Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Steve Marotta
CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
Robin Murchison
SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Neely Tamminga
Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
Travis Williams
Stephens Inc. - Analyst
 
PRESENTATION
 
 
Operator
 
Good afternoon, ladies and gentlemen. My name is Chris and I will be your conference operator for today. At this time, I would like to welcome everyone to the Ascena Retail Group's first-quarter earnings conference call.
 
 
2
 
 
At this time, I would now like to introduce Allison Townsend of ICR. Ms. Townsend, please begin.
 
Allison Townsend
- ICR, Inc. - IR
 
Thank you, Chris. Today's call is being recorded and will be available for replay later today. Information on accessing this replay is available on today's press release.
As a matter of formality, I need to remind participants that remarks made by management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause the actual results and implementation of the Company's plan to vary materially. These risks are referenced in today's press release, as well as in the Company's most recently filed Form 10-K.
Additionally, discussions of the Company's results for its first quarter, and to better assist investors in assessing the Company operations on a comparable basis, financial measures have been provided in today's press release that exclude certain items from the first-quarter reported results. Throughout this call, the term reported refers to information prepared in accordance with GAAP, while the term adjusted refers to non-GAAP financial information adjusted to exclude the impact of certain items. Adjusted financial information, along with reconciliation of this information, is contained in today's press release and available on the investor information section of the Company's website, AscenaRetail.com.
I would now like to turn the conference call over to your host, Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO. David?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Thanks. Good afternoon and thank you for joining us to discuss the results of our fiscal first quarter. With me today is Armand Correia, our CFO.
We were pleased with our sales and earnings results for the first quarter, particularly given the absence of any meaningful improvement in the economy. Our adjusted earnings per share grew by 3% to $0.65, compared to $0.63 per share in the prior-year quarter.
Net sales increased 8% to $768 million, with consolidated comp sales increasing 4% in the first quarter. This was on top of a 4% comp sales increase last year. Comp sales by brand were Justice, up 8%; maurices, up 4%; and dressbarn was flat.
Now I'd like to walk you through each of our brands' performance.
At Justice, we continue to grow our market share by giving our customers trend-right merchandise assortments at compelling values. Our first-quarter sales increase was driven primarily by a 4% growth in transactions and a 4% increase in dollars per transaction. There was a shift in product towards apparel, which carries higher selling prices. Our assortments of casual and active tops and casual bottoms, along with accessories, performed well.
From a regional perspective, all regions delivered positive comps with three regions reporting double-digit comps. The Justice e-commerce business also continues to grow rapidly, increasing 25% over last year.
Our marketing strategy at Justice reinforces our value proposition with the right balance of 40% discounts offered to our customers through direct mail, e-mail, customer loyalty programs, and also storewide point-of-sale events.
For the first quarter, we ran a stepped-up cadence of promotions versus last year, which drove both traffic and transactions. Justice executed four 40%-off entire-store point-of-sale events versus three last year, resulting in 12 additional point-of-sale days during the quarter. These events were supplemented with a 12% increase in circulation of direct-mail catazines and an incremental Halloween weekend POS event postcard.
For the holiday season, we have added 35 POS days compared to last year's second quarter, including an incremental POS event supported by an additional catazine.
During the first quarter, we opened 15 Justice stores, ending the quarter with 917 stores versus 891 last year. In the second quarter, we plan to open approximately 16 stores, including two in Canada, and close 16.
 
 
3
 
 
Turning now to maurices, sales grew 11% as planned in the first quarter, on top of 9% comps last year. Sales increases were due both to conversion and average selling price. Many of our women's apparel departments at maurices posted comp-sales increases, with casual fashion knit tops, dresses, Wear @ Work sweaters, and denim jeans all posting double-digit growth.
We continue to see solid performance in our plus-size collection with strong performance in nearly all categories. Comp sales increased across all regions with the Southwest, Northeast, Midwest, and Northwest leading the way. Our maurices e-commerce business continued its strong growth, exceeding expectations.
Our maurices first-quarter marketing initiatives involved a variety of time-tested strategies. We had two mailers, one of which was shifted from the fourth quarter with mailing quantities up 14% over last year. We launched our electronic maurices Take 10 loyalty program and have enrolled 1.1 million customers since September.
For the second quarter, we will have three direct-mail pieces, including an incremental January mailer with an 11% planned increase in quantities.
At maurices, our store base is now 797 locations at the end of the quarter, versus 758 last year. During the first quarter, we opened 14 new stores and closed one. Nine new-store openings and three closings are planned for the second quarter. We will continue to fill in our core market area, as well as further expand the maurices concept into new markets, including our first six Canadian stores this spring.
The retail environment has been challenging overall, but we felt this predominately in the Missy sector at our dressbarn stores. At dressbarn, net sales were up 2% on flat comps, mainly driven by a 2% increase in average selling price.
During the quarter, the categories with double-digit increases over the prior year were knits, casual sweaters, and petites. From a regional perspective, the Southwest, West Coast, Midwest, and Southeast regions all had positive comps.
We continue to be pleased with our e-commerce growth, which anniversaried its launch in September.
We increased our marketing efforts in the first quarter this year, which helped maintain sales. Dressbarn increased total mail quantities by 21% over last year, including three mailings, one of which was incremental and a gift-with-purchase promotion. For the second quarter, we are anniversarying three direct-mail pieces, increasing quantities by 8%. We will also layer in new short-term promotions, both in-store and online, in order to drive traffic and sales and keep our promotional cadence fresh. Dressbarn will now have its own loyalty program, blushPERKS, which we are launching in December.
At dressbarn, our store base is 836 locations as of the end of the quarter, versus 845 last year. During the first quarter, we opened nine stores and closed three. For the second quarter, we plan to close eight stores.
In general, we are pleased with our first-quarter operating results. Overall, Ascena has seen growth in sales from new stores, e-commerce, and new markets. At Justice and maurices, we are also seeing comp-sales growth and gains in market share. Demand at Justice remains high as customers continue to respond well to our promotions and trend-right merchandise. Maurices rebounded well during the quarter with a 4% comp increase up against 9% comps last year. We believe our merchandise assortment is now better constructed for the environment and we have a solid promotional cadence in place to continue to drive sales growth.
For dressbarn, the Missy customer is spending cautiously, and we anticipate this to continue. In response, we continue to evolve our business model and are committed to remaining competitive in this environment.
In our effort to streamline our back-office operations and strengthen the Ascena executive team, we have hired John Sullivan as Ascena's Chief Operating Officer. John was most recently EVP and CIO for QVC. Prior to that, he was a Senior VP for sourcing, service, systems, and CIO for Liz Claiborne. John is responsible for IT, distribution, and HRIS across all brands and is key to driving our Ascena infrastructure development.
During the quarter, we repurchased 1.1 million shares for a total of $28.7 million. This is in keeping with our strategy of opportunistically buying back stock in order to offset share creep from stock-based incentive plans. We have $98 million remaining under the existing authorization.
As to an update on our current business, November overall sales were up mid-single digit with flat comps. The Black Friday weekend, while meaningful to some retailers, is not as meaningful to our business.
 
 
4
 
 
 
Looking ahead, we've increased our marketing efforts for this holiday season to help drive traffic and remain optimistic for a successful season. We are planning to issue a news release on our holiday selling at the beginning of January.
In closing, we are reaffirming our full-year earnings-per-share guidance of $2.55 to $2.65. While we continue to anticipate pressure on our margins this quarter from increases in product costs and our marketing spend, we remain comfortable with our earnings guidance.
Thank you, and I will now turn the call over to Armand to discuss our financial results in more detail.
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
Thank you, David, and welcome, all.
Before beginning my prepared remarks on the first-quarter financial results, it's appropriate to note that, as mentioned in today's press release and as a result of our corporate reorganization in establishing Ascena Retail Group, Inc., as a new holding company at the beginning of the calendar year, we have implemented a new method of allocating corporate overhead costs on a more reasonable basis to each of our operating brands, beginning with this first quarter.
Last year's numbers have been recasted for a more valid comparison. We expect to file an 8-K shortly that recasts last year's information for subsequent quarters. During prior reporting periods, a disproportionate share of corporate overhead cost was being absorbed by dressbarn.
Net sales for the quarter increased 8% to a record $768 million, and in line with our expectations. The overall increase was primarily driven, as David mentioned, by a comp-sales increase of 4% and strong growth in our e-commerce business. We continue to demonstrate overall consistency and sales growth with comps increasing for the 11th consecutive quarter.
From a regional perspective, the Southeast, Southwest reported the strongest comps, with the Northeast and mid-Atlantic regions underperforming the Company average, but with positive results.
We continue to be pleased with our e-commerce sales growth, increasing to $33 million compared to last year's $22 million for the quarter.
Moving down the income statement, our quarterly reported gross margin rate decreased year over year by 40 basis points to 42.3%. The decrease reflects the net impact of lower merchandise margins, down 60 basis points from higher markdowns, partially offset by 20 basis points of favorable leverage from buying and occupancy costs. The increased markdowns were due to pre-planned increased promotion activity during the quarter and clearance of slow-moving categories.
By brand, the gross margin rate at Justice was a very strong 47.2%, compared to last year's 46.5%. Justice's margins benefited primarily from price increases and strong casual tops and bottoms assortments, while at maurices and dressbarn, gross margins decreased with maurices coming in at 42.4%, decreasing 210 basis points versus last year.
The year-over-year margin decline at maurices was primarily due to increased markdowns from a deceleration in sales trends during the first half of the quarter. We were pleased to note that the sales trends have improved, although margins do also reflect pre-planned increased promotions.
The gross margin rate at dressbarn was 35.7%, decreasing 130 basis points over last year, primarily from occupancy deleverage caused by flat comps and increased markdowns.
SG&A expenses on an adjusted basis and as a percent of sales increased 20 basis points to 28.3%, primarily due to increases in marketing spend to help drive sales, as well as the impact of certain start-up costs classified as non-GAAP last year, such as Justice's entry into Canada and the startup of Brothers, our new product line.
Adjusted quarterly operating income increased 2% to $83.3 million, or 10.8% of sales, compared to last year's 11.5%. The year-over-year decrease of 70 basis points is primarily due to lower gross margin.
By brand, operating income at Justice was an outstanding 16.8% over 16.2% last year. Maurices came in at 11.9%, compared to last year's 14.3%, and Justice  I'm sorry, and dressbarn was 2.2% compared to 3.6% last year.
 
5
 
 
 
Our quarterly effective tax rate was 38.5%, same as last year. For modeling purposes, use the same percent for the next quarter.
Adjusted net income was $52 million, or $0.65 per diluted share, and compares to last year's adjusted $51 million, or $0.63 per diluted share.
Moving onto the balance sheet, our balance sheet remains strong and highly liquid and debt-free. We ended the quarter with $438 million in cash and investments. This represents approximately $5.50 in cash and investments per share.
As to inventories, at quarter-end total inventories at cost were $402 million, increasing year over year 19% in dollars and 13% in units. The increased variance between dollars and units is primarily due to product-cost increases.
The remainder of the increase was due to an accelerated receipt flow into October from November for Justice and maurices in order for our stores to be better set up for the holiday-selling season. As you may remember, inventory levels last year were below optimum, and we believe some sales were left on the table. These inventories support our plus mid single-digit comp sales planned for the second quarter, new store growth, and the strong e-commerce business. By the end of our second quarter, we estimate overall inventory levels to be up high single digits in dollars and up mid single digits in units over the prior year.
By brand, inventories ended the quarter at Justice increasing 35% year over year in dollars and 22% in units. The 13% variance between dollars and units is due to an 8% product cost increase and 5% mix. Justice is where we had the greatest deficiency in inventory last year. Inventories are expected to decrease from these levels and end the second quarter up mid-teens in dollars and high single digits in units versus last year.
Maurices' inventories increased 17% year over year in dollars and 9% in units. Maurices' inventory levels are expected to moderate during the second quarter, ending up mid to high single digits in dollars and flat in units versus last year.
At dressbarn, inventories increased 2% year over year both in dollars and units, and are expected to end the second quarter at a similar percentage increase over the prior year.
Cash flows remained very strong for the quarter. We generated $57 million in cash flows from operation with $29 million of free cash flows. CapEx for the quarter was $28 million, primarily for store maintenance projects, new store expansion, and strategic initiative projects, i.e., finance system and some carryover CapEx from a few projects that were just recently completed.
As for our weighted average diluted shares outstanding, they decreased to 79.3 million, reflecting the impact of our stock buyback program that David previously mentioned. This compares to 80.4 million last year. For modeling purposes, we estimate 78.8 million diluted shares outstanding for the second quarter.
Thank you. Operator, we are now ready to take your questions.
 
 
6
 
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
Operator
 
(Operator Instructions). Nicole Shevins, Goldman Sachs.
 
Nicole Shevins
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
My question was on maurices. We were happy to see the stabilization in sales there, but what do you think has caused the need for more promotions? Do you think there is something changing on the competitive side, like new entrants in your markets, or is it something self-inflicted? Curious to hear your thoughts.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
I think it's a little of both, Nicole. I think what we're seeing out there is a very, very competitive environment and it started with back to school, and it's maintained, and some of the promotions we all saw from Black Friday were really very, very impressive.
At the same time, as we talked earlier, there were a few miscues in the first quarter and we need to clear those out. So I think as you see both of those impacts, that's why we have a little bit of an increase in our promotional expense and our mark-down expense.
 
Nicole Shevins
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
And then, wanted to see how you feel about the M&A environment. I know before you guys had said you'd prefer to wait until spring before doing anything. Do you still stand the same way on that or has anything changed?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
At this point, Nicole, no one is going to do anything between now and the new year, so we're certainly not doing anything. We're looking around and watching how all the retailers perform in this environment. And in the spring, if it's something looks interesting, at that point maybe we'll consider getting more involved.
 
Nicole Shevins
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
Thanks.
 
Operator
 
Edward Yruma, KeyBanc Capital Markets.
 
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Thanks for taking my question. Can we talk a little bit about dressbarn? I'm trying to understand  obviously you continue to do better than some of your competitors, but that's a challenging market. In order to keep driving stronger results there, is the solution to promote more? Do you think that there's a merchandising issue or is it marketing as you've  I know you've been tweaking some of that.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Well, the easier answer is yes, but I think that the right answer and what we're focusing on is the merchandise. I think any retail, especially retail, looks like if you've got the right merchandise, the customer will buy it at any price, virtually.
 
 
7
 
 
So we're fine-tuning our merchandising approach. At the same time, we have to be cognizant that we are in a highly promotional environment. And as you heard, we launched a loyalty program called blushPERKS. So we're really trying to focus on not just one area to achieve success, but as I alluded to in my comments, we're tweaking our business model in general. We can't just sit back and do what we've always done and expect better results.
And so, we've undertaken, just last month, a number of focus groups to talk to our customers, to talk to our prospective customers, and learn what they like and don't like about dressbarn. And we're using those learnings to help us tweak our marketing, our merchandising, and all aspects of our model. So, you should expect to see continued evolution of the dressbarn brand.
 
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Some of your competitors in this space have made the decision to close stores. Is that something you've looked at for the dressbarn banner?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
You know, Ed, if you saw or heard in my comments, we are closing stores at dressbarn. So it's not something that is new to us and we close them every year.
We're down versus LY. We closed three stores the first quarter; we are going to close at least another eight this quarter. So as a percentage, still relatively small, but we are looking carefully at all of our stores all the time, and if we don't think they have long-term potential, we're not going to stay with them. But at the same time, we don't see a need to make some big announcement that we're going to close 400 stores or something like we've heard other retailers do in the past few months.
 
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Thanks very much.
 
Operator
 
Scott Krasik, BB&T Capital Markets.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Thanks for taking my question. So, I guess, to echo the thoughts, it was good to see the maurices comp accelerate from the flattish comp that you reported when you did the last call. You probably had a pretty strong end of September and a good October. Maybe talk about what's happening in November and how you get some consistency there.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Well, I think the consistency is coming back. But as you may recall, we're up against huge numbers at maurices from last year's second quarter. So we're not planning to have another huge increase, especially in this environment.
But I do think that we have gotten smarter from the first quarter and certainly from some of the challenges we had during the back-to-school period. We are in a better position on inventory. We like our promotional cadence going into the holiday. We were very comfortable with our Black Friday promotions and the results we got from them. And I think we're well positioned, having learned what type of product our customer is looking for and some of the product that maybe she's not as interested in.
So it's a constantly evolving, constantly learning situation at all of our brands. And I think right now we feel pretty good about where maurices is positioned.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
And then, just can you remind us what the cadence of the comps on a monthly basis were in Q2 last year? And the only reason I ask is you maintained your mid single-digit comp guidance for the year. And you seem to be running a little below that so far this quarter, and the comparisons don't get any easier next quarter. So just wondering if there's something easier up ahead.
 
 
8
 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
Armand?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
Without giving you specifics by month, I can tell you that November was a very strong month last year, and then it fell off into December and January. Again, primarily the fact that we just did not have enough inventory in Justice and maurices to cover the demand.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
That's really helpful. And then, just last, the 1.1 million shares you repurchased, was that what you were planning on, which was opportunistic because of where the share price was? And any intentions there.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
It is opportunistic, but having said that, we have said that we will buy back the roughly 2.5 million shares we need to eliminate share creep. So you can expect further repurchases throughout the year to at least the 2.5 million number.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Thanks, guys.
 
Operator
 
Anna Andreeva, FBR.
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR & Co. - Analyst
 
Thanks so much. I was wondering if you could give us a little bit more color around Black Friday results at Justice. I remember you had a pretty strong Black Friday at this division last year, so is it that maybe competitors were more promotional and you guys weren't? I know it's been a couple of years now that you've been doing 40%-off-of events. And how do you think about that promotional cadence going forward?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
I think, without giving you specifics, I think the Black Friday results at all three of our brands was acceptable.
When I look at Black Friday, we're really looking at that five-day period. I'm not sure it means much to us to look at one day, as I said in my comments. For us, Black Friday is just not that important, almost a nonevent for dressbarn and a little bit more so for maurices, and Justice does do huge volume, but the next four weeks at Justice are very, very large volume weeks.
So we really don't focus on the one week. We really are looking at how the business trends for the rest of the month, and even as you know the week after Christmas, between Christmas and New Year's, has become incredibly important.
So we're  as I said, I think we're very well positioned at all three brands. And who knows what happens with the promotional environment? Who knows what happens with weather? We're up against a couple of storms from last year. And while we feel very good about the promotions we've got, it is very, very aggressively promotional out there. But I feel like we are going to be in a good place.
 
 
9
 
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR & Co. - Analyst
 
And just a quick follow-up. That's helpful, thanks. Just a follow-up on inventories. You guys gave us some color by division. What are the inventories, excluding the accelerated receipts? Just the Justice number, units up 22%, obviously looks high compared to the sales trends.
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
Sure. First of all, there was approximately $15 million at cost that moved from November to October. And therefore, if you basically do the math on it, overall dollars would have been up, taking that into effect, 23% in dollars and 11% in units.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Hello? Operator.
 
Operator
 
Janet Kloppenburg, JJK Research.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
So a couple of questions, David. Did I hear right that you're looking for comps to be up mid single digits in the second quarter, or was that annual guidance?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
No, that's second quarter.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
That's for second quarter. So you look for the business to meaningfully improve, even though you had flat comps in November. So November is not that important?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
I won't say it's not that important; it certainly is. But we feel  right now, we feel pretty good about December and January, and December numbers are pretty big.
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
And again, just to add on that, Janet, as one of the  I think Scott had asked, we're up against fairly weak numbers in December and January.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Right, good. And then, for the operating margin in the second quarter, should we expect a similar level of decline, David? Or are you thinking that things get better  maybe there's less deterioration at maurices and dressbarn, or further appreciation at Justice? How should we be thinking about that?
 
 
10
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
I think what I said at some point was we expect to see some pressure on margins in the second quarter. And we're still dealing with product-cost increases. And we talked a little bit about marketing spend going up. So, I don't see that improving.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Okay. But you do think earnings per share could increase in the quarter? Or is that uncertain at this time?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
We really look at EPS guidance for the year. So we're still feeling, for the year, that we're going to hit the guidance we laid out originally, the $2.55 to $2.65.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Okay. And we should be using a share count of around 78 million, right?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
I believe I gave you  yes, I believe that's the number, yes.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
And David, just one question on maurices. It's typically been your highest operating-margin business, and now we see some contraction. In light of the ongoing promotional environment, especially for the teen and GenX retailers, would you expect that maurices can regain its operating margin over time or do you think there's been a structural change there?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
I don't think there has been a structural change. And I'm not exactly sure which numbers you're looking at, but 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
I'm looking at the operating margins. (Multiple speakers) they  the second quarter, they've come down a bit.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Right, but I'm saying if you look at the operating margin for the full year, and remember at the beginning Armand talked about the adjustment because of the overhead allocation. So you can talk to Armand offline to make sure you're looking at true LY numbers.
But anyway, my point being that we feel that the maurices business may have had a blip that we talked about earlier, in the first quarter, and some margin pressure that we're going to see, and the back half is hopefully going to be a solid back half. And so, for the year, it might be off a touch, but we see nothing structural that is going to re-establish this business at a lower operating-margin level.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
And Justice's operating margins have potential to continue to expand, right?
 
 
11
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Yes, we believe they do. And dressbarn, obviously, you didn't mention that, that's the one that (multiple speakers)
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
I was getting to dressbarn.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Okay, okay, sorry.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
No, no, no, don't be sorry. Go ahead. I want to hear what you have to say.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
That's the brand that we think has got the most potential to expand margins. That business just a few years ago was operating at 10% margins.
And we believe  it's not going to happen in the next year or two, but we believe that's got the potential to get back to 10% margins. And we're spending a lot of time and energy rethinking that business model, that approach. And I think we're going to continue to tweak it.
And we feel that over the next numerous years, we're going to rebuild that business  higher productivity and build those margins back up to at least the 10% level (multiple speakers) for a challenge.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Okay, good. Well, lots of luck for a great holiday. Thank you.
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
And Janet, just to add on to that, it wasn't that long ago that our dressbarn stores actually produced nearly a 10% operating margin, and that was this past spring. They recovered very nicely. So they're capable of getting back to that 10%.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Okay, great. Well, I'll be happy to watch that and I hope you have a good holiday.
 
Operator
 
Sam Panella, Raymond James.
 
Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 
Can you give us any, perhaps, more color on comp trends by division in the month of November?
 
 
12
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Generally, we don't do that. So we'll give you comp trends for the quarter at the end of the quarter, but we don't do it by brand in the middle of the quarter.
 
Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 
And then, Armand, perhaps could you maybe give us an update on how you see unit costs progressing as we move into the first half of calendar 2012?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
Actually, I'm going to let David take that one.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
I'm sorry, Sam, I missed the first part of it.
 
Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 
Just how are unit costs trending from the sourcing perspective as we move into the first half of calendar 2012?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
The cost situation overall has really come back into line pretty nicely. So we were  the industry was really complaining about commodity price increases for fall deliveries, holiday deliveries.
As we look at spring deliveries, we're in much better shape, and those costs have really been mitigated back down to much more similar prices to where they were a year ago.
 
Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 
Okay. And then, just lastly, can you give us any update on how accessories are doing at both dressbarn and maurices, as it appears you guys have made a bigger push into this category at both of those divisions?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Let's just say not as well as we would have liked. When I mentioned the strong areas, you will have noticed that I didn't mention either one of those at either dressbarn or maurices.
We did make big pushes. Some of the areas within the general heading of accessories were better than others. And while there were some learnings that we gained from it, there was, frankly, disappointment. We put some real money into both dressbarn and maurices into their accessories area, and we were disappointed that we didn't see stronger results.
 
Sam Panella
- Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
 
Thanks, guys, and best of luck for holiday.
 
 
13
 
  
Operator
 
Brian Tunick, JPMorgan.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Starting off with that same November flat comp, everyone's trying to get to the composition of it, right? Everyone just assumes that Justice, right, is the strongest of it and dressbarn is the weakest. But is there any other color you can give us? I mean, it just  it sounds like Missy has been weak out there, but is Justice still needing to accelerate a lot more to get to your comp guidance for the quarter?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
You know the oldest expression, never assume?
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Yes.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
So never assume. The business for all three brands is, I think, well positioned to enable us to hit these numbers overall for the quarter, Brian.
So without giving you any more color on November, as Armand said earlier November was a tough month to go up against if you look at the LY comps. And as we get into December and January, we have easier comps and we're much better positioned. Armand talked about the inventory that we've got at Justice and maurices in particular, but also dressbarn.
So I think that unless we're dead wrong, we feel that the mid single-digit comps is achievable for Ascena for the second quarter.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Two more, I guess. Can you talk more about some of the things you think John will be able to bring to the business and how the back-office synergies are already underway?
And then, the third question would be really on channel mix. A lot of other retailers talk about how e-commerce and factory outlet are more profitable and can be significant margin drivers. I don't hear you guys talk about that really much. Can you maybe enlighten us in how you view those two businesses versus the rest of your business?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Sure. So first, John Sullivan comes with a wealth of experience both at Liz and QVC, and in all the areas that we need him to help us. As I've mentioned on some of the calls before, we have all these infrastructure projects. And in past calls, you remember, I've rattled them off in some detail.
And they haven't all gone as smoothly as we would have liked. And so, bringing someone in of John's caliber and John's experience to be the point man on all these infrastructure projects, whether it's logistics or IT, or systems, or what have you, this is a guy that has done this before, that understands all the challenges that we're facing in integrating three brands.
Remember, he was at Liz when they had 42 brands, so during those acquisition days. So he's been just a great resource to bring in and he's going to have, I think, a great opportunity to drive value to Ascena by helping us run the business faster, better, cheaper.
On the second question, Brian, the e-commerce channel in general tends to be a more profitable channel on a margin basis than brick-and-mortar. And if you think about it, you don't have to pay sales help and you don't have to pay rent. So you've got other expenses, obviously, but that's a big difference. And all things being run equally, you should see a better margin.
And indeed, we've got some history at Justice. We are seeing very strong margins.
 
 
14
 
 
At dressbarn and maurices, they're still so young. Dressbarn is only a year old and maurices now is just two years old, and they're growing really nicely. We're very, very pleased with how that's ramping up, and we think that the long-term model for both of those will generate above brick-and-mortar margins. They're not quite there yet, but they're certainly on track.
The outlet business, for all our brands, is a little different than some of the big manufacturers because they are treating it as either a dump store and/or they're making up special goods for the outlets. And we treat ours, because we're  all three of our brands are value priced, we treat our outlet stores really as just another opportunity to showcase our value-priced merchandise along with a significantly increased selection of clearance goods.
So that business has been a good business for all three brands. Overall, it has a slightly higher operating contribution than our non-outlet stores. Did that cover everything for you, Brian?
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Yes, yes, yes, still trying to figure out how November shook out, but okay. Well, good luck and we'll speak to you guys soon. Thank you.
 
Operator
 
Douglas Kass, Seabreeze Partners Management Inc.
 
Douglas Kass
- Seabreeze Partners Management Inc. - Analyst
 
Thank you for taking my call. I wanted to follow up with the Goldman analyst's question on M&A. As you know, this morning Charming Shoppes indicated its intention to conduct a strategic review of its company and to consider all options, including sale of the company. And when I look at that company, especially their Catherines Plus Sizes, it represents an interesting fit with your product groups.
I wondered  my question is, have you ever looked at Charming Shoppes as a potential takeover candidate? And especially in light of that announcement today, do you plan to look at them in the near future?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
You know, I feel like a politician here, but all I can tell you is that we don't comment on market rumors or any kind of impending M&A things.
 
Douglas Kass
- Seabreeze Partners Management Inc. - Analyst
 
Thank you.
 
Operator
 
Mark Montagna, Avondale Partners.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
I have a question just about the inventory per store. I'm wondering if you could talk about how the clearance might break down by division on a per-store basis, if it's down versus last year.
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
I can tell you, Mark, that as far as clearance at all the brands, they actually went through it pretty aggressively during the quarter. And what we have now is currencies, and the mix is probably more skewed toward currencies than it was last year.
 
 
15
 
 
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
And then, just regarding the marketing, it sounds like you're doing a lot of great things there. I'm just wondering, are you sending out more mailings as far  and is each mailing  it sounds like you're doing more mailings, but are the mailings of a smaller quantity? Is the dollar spend lower this year or higher? Are you better targeting? There's a lot  it sounds like a lot of good stuff is going on there.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
I'm just going back through my notes here, but at Justice it was 12% increase in circulation. At maurices, 11%; at dressbarn, 8%  I'm sorry, first quarter, 21%. So yes, we are increasing, low double digits at all three brands, the quantities of mailers.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
But aren't you sending with greater frequency (multiple speakers)
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
You know what, Mark, give me a call later, but I went through and told you which ones we were doing and which ones were incremental.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
All right, I'll check that later. Last quick question, just regarding promotions by division. Are you running deeper promotions? And can you just update us on the market share for Justice?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
The market share for Justice, I don't have in front of me the current numbers. So call us back, and I'll ask them to get that to me so I can give you the current numbers.
And promos, I'd say overall, are maybe just a tad steeper at all three brands as we're going into the holiday season.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
That's great. Thank you.
 
Operator
 
Steve Marotta, CL King.
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
David, you intimated earlier that your unit costs are coming down a bit as you look into the back half of your fiscal year. Can you talk a little bit about your pricing strategy? And should we think about gross margin expansion? Or  you've intimated in the past that there may be heightened product investments which make up for the differential.
 
 
16
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
It really varies by brand. So at dressbarn, as I've said before, there wasn't a significant increase in costs, and that's, whether it's the vendors or manufacturer, whatever, held the line for us. So we don't see much of a change there.
And at maurices, some of those prices have come back down again, and yet, in the evolution of our merchandising, we've traded up either in quality or mix. So I don't think you're going to see a significant change in our margin. As I said, there's a little pressure on this quarter because of the costs and that little pressure goes away. It's not dramatic, but it's enough to get our margins  we believe, get our margins back to historical levels at both maurices and Justice.
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
I'm sorry, but what was that last comment on Justice? I missed that. I got dressbarn and maurices, and Justice, you flowed everything through, or most of it.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
I think what I'm saying is that at maurices and Justice, we had higher costs.
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
I understand. I got you. I wrote down just maurices. I didn't realize it was for both. I understand. That's great.
Thank you, and one other question. As you move further into  as you look to the first half of next year, are there gross margin opportunities either from a costing standpoint or a product mix standpoint in the three divisions?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
We're always trying to enhance our gross margins. I think it's going to be a challenge to  besides a small adjustment for the cost adjustments, it's going to be a challenge, really, to stretch our margins.
The key to it, as you know, is more about reducing your markdowns. So if we can do a better job of selecting the right product and selling it through on the first go-round, before we have to mark it down, that's what's going to drive our gross margins more than any other single thing.
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
Great. That's very helpful. Thank you.
 
Operator
 
(Multiple speakers), Telsey Advisory.
 
Unidentified Participant
 
Thanks for taking my questions. I was just hoping you could talk a little bit about Justice. I think when you reported your fourth quarter, they were tracking  it was implied that they were tracking in the low double digits or somewhere in that range. I know you finished the quarter with an 8% comp. So did you see a deceleration? And if so, what do you think was the driver of that?
Then, also, if you could just update us on the smaller market performance in Justice and how the tests are going along those lines.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Well, we're thrilled with the smaller market tests at Justice. I think what we've proven is that fashionable merchandise sells anywhere in America because those tween girls are interested in looking great.
 
 
17
 
 
And through TV and Internet and magazine and whatever, they're seeing the same fashions in their local Justice store that they see on TV or they see anywhere else. So, we've had a great reception there. We're very, very pleased with the performance of those stores, and we think that it's a continued growth vehicle for us.
On the Justice performance, as we were saying a little bit earlier, all three brands we looked at together for November, and that came in about flat. And we're feeling good about December and January, and we are well positioned, and we'll talk at the end of the quarter  I'm sorry, we'll talk in January about our holiday performance. We'll give you some details by brand at that point.
 
Operator
 
Robin Murchison, SunTrust.
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Thanks very much. Just a few questions here. David, I want to be clear that you're comfortable, just get your comments, about the 40%-off at Justice. And not to beat a dead horse, but we certainly are seeing some acceleration in promotional percentages off this holiday season that we haven't seen. You seem to be pretty comfortable holding the line at the 40%.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
We are, at Justice. It is still a very powerful draw for our customer. We have not seen a deterioration to that.
And yes, I agree. We've seen some crazy numbers from Black Friday on. And I would maybe argue that some of those people are being forced into it because possibly their merchandise is not as desirable and maybe they're being forced to be more aggressive to be able to move their inventory.
We're watching it very carefully and have the ability, of course, to layer on additional promotions, if necessary, and take whatever markdowns we need to to make sure we end the season in a good place. But right now, we're still feeling confident that we're going to be in a good place for the season.
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Good, good. Just  and two more, if I may. Over at dressbarn, can you just talk about the brand versus the private-label assortment, if you will, the dressbarn label and if there  how that's working for you? Would you like to have more, quote-unquote, branded product? Are you content with the split?
And then, just also within that, some of the Missy retailers  you know, it's been a dreadful category, but some have at least spoken to wear to work has worked better for them than, I suppose, casual. Wanted to get your take on that.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Well, I guess I would combine both questions. One of our strongest areas has been our Jones Wear. Jones has been terrific for us, and that's clearly a very career-oriented line. And as you know, the Jones Studio label is exclusive to us. And we have had that for a number of years and we continue to expand it, and that speaks both to the strength of the Jones brand, as well as the strength of the career category.
So, would I love to have more Jones-type labels? Sure. And we're out there looking for other strong labels to bring in the store, but we don't want to become a label store. We're very proud of our dressbarn label. We think it provides great value to our customer. So we would only bring in another label if we thought it provided the same kind of value and fashion to our customer.
Jones, we thought, did. We tested it and it's been great. And we're out there looking for other things that could do the same for us.
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
And then, just lastly for Armand, can you just give us an update on the  a quick update on the back-office initiatives? Especially the combination of the Ohio  to the  or the class, if you will, to the Ohio distribution center. Anything of note that you want to share with us.
 
 
18
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
Well, as far as the consolidation of the two DCs, Justice  the consolidation of dressbarn to Justice, it is fully ramped up. It's been fully ramped up for a number of months now, probably three months. It's working out real well.
It certainly is a little different in the way we're distributing, but it certainly is much more efficient. And we're pleased with the progress. And right now, we're still tweaking a few things here or there, but it's going along pretty well.
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Thank you very much.
 
Operator
 
Neely Tamminga, Piper Jaffray.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
Great. Thanks. Just wanted to talk a little bit  a lot has been asked and answered, so, but could we dig a little bit more into the loyalty program, David? I'm quite intrigued with the idea of loyalty as being a great driver for next year's business in terms of market-share gains.
And the adoption rate over at maurices of 1.1 million since September is actually quite compelling. So I'm just wondering how you're reading that internally, and then also what you hope to maybe drive with that business in terms of frequency or 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Right. Let's start, just as a little background, full disclosure, maurices had its Take 10 program, but it was a paper punchcard type of system. And it was a little cumbersome and, of course, people lose their cards and all that.
So converting it to electronic system was a win, both because it made it easier for the customer and the in-store associate and, at the same time, when we sign them up we were able to get more information that we could use to contact them, their e-mail address, most importantly, so we can do e-mail blasts, which, as you know, are much cheaper than sending out regular mail.
So it's all about being able to connect and contact our customer. So we're doing the same thing at dressbarn now. And this loyalty program called blushPERKS is kicking off, I think, next week or the week after, so it's imminent. And what it will do is give us an opportunity to get to know our customers and know how to contact them, and also be able to reward our frequent shoppers. So it's a way to talk to them, but also a way to thank them for being a loyal customer.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
Thanks, David. Good luck.
 
Operator
 
Travis Williams, Stephens Inc.
 
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
 
Thanks for taking my question. I'm not sure if this has been covered, and all my other brilliant questions have already been hit. But I guess, maybe if you could provide an update on the sourcing opportunity that lies with Justice in leveraging that direct-sourcing platform in the maurices and dressbarn business. I know this is something that is going to be multi-year, but maybe just an update there in any progress you've made or any further thoughts you have on that would be great. Thanks.
 
 
19
 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
Well, it's a good question, Travis, because this is a great opportunity for both dressbarn and maurices down the road. But it is going to be a slow and gradual process.
And having said that, though, we are building infrastructure as we speak, whether it's systems or people that will enable us to grow the sourcing, direct sourcing, through our Justice sourcing team at dressbarn and maurices.
So I don't think you're going to notice it in the coming quarters, but I want to assure you that it's something we're working on and we're going to do very gradually. It's obviously a huge decision, but we're going to continue to add more volume to the Justice sourcing from both dressbarn and maurices in the coming seasons.
 
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
 
Great. And then, maybe just one follow-up. I don't know if this has been touched on, either, but clearly the Missy sector is under significant pressure. Just maybe  you guys have been at that for a long time there with dressbarn and just maybe your thoughts on what's going on in the marketplace right now.
It seems everyone is struggling. At some point, it seems as if everyone is down and down and down in that space. You guys have held up pretty well, but eventually it seems like someone has got to be a winner. Maybe talk about what your thoughts are there.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Well, we certainly want to position ourselves to be a winner, and that's why we're doing all this work, as I mentioned earlier, focus groups and rethinking our model.
I do think it's very tough in Missy. The Missy customer is the one that is feeling all the economic heat out there. And I don't have to tell you about all the challenges that the 99%, as it were, is facing.
I do think that we're going to be a survivor for many reasons. And I think as we look out, we realize that we have to evolve our model and we have to make sure that we're addressing the needs of our customer, whether it's fashion or value or convenience or service or what have you. So we're looking at all angles of it.
And I think because of that and because of the approach we're taking, we're going to be a survivor. And I do think that the market will come back. There's been a fair amount of shakeout both in terms of competitors, number of stores that many of the competitors have that they've closed so many, as well as just sales volume dropping at many of these other competitors.
So I think we'll continue to plow ahead, and I'm very optimistic that over the next several years as the economy strengthens and that Missy customer comes back, we'll be well to offer her a great selection and a great value.
 
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
 
Great. Thanks for taking my question and congrats on a good quarter.
 
Operator
 
(Operator Instructions). Scott Krasik, BB&T Capital Markets.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Hi, thanks. Two quick ones. Any difference in your first-quarter comp in dressbarn between the plus size versus the Missy?
 
 
20
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
They were  we really don't give out the difference on that, Scott, but they weren't significantly different.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
So that's an improvement because I think, at least directionally, the woman customer had been lagging Missy.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
You know what, I don't have the numbers in front of me, frankly, so I'll ask Armand to give you more color on that later.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. And then, how much of the quarter does November represent? Is it about a third of sales for the quarter?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
Approximately that.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
And then, just lastly, obviously you don't want to talk about the comps, but if I remember you had a very large Justice comp in November, which led to some out-of-stocks in December, which hindered, maybe, your comp. Is that correct?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
That is correct, Scott. Yes, we did comment on that.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Thanks very much.
 
Operator
 
Robin Murchison, SunTrust.
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Just a quick one here. David, just to be clear, you indicated that spring deliveries were in better shape cost-wise. A lot of retailers that are on the traditional January calendar are saying that the lower costs really don't hit until maybe the second half of the second quarter, so  late July quarter, if you will.
Do you mean  for you spring, your April quarter, are you thinking that the average unit cost will be down or is it just a smaller rate of growth?
 
 
21
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Well, remember what they're up against. So I don't think they're going to be down versus LY, but remember, we're comparing it to the fall where you had a big increase. So I don't think you're going to see a big increase in the spring, not that it's going to be down versus last spring, but it will be down versus the fall.
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
That is all I needed. Thank you very much.
 
Operator
 
And we have no further questions at this time. I would now like to turn the presentation back over to the speakers for any closing remarks.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
Thank you very much. I appreciate everybody's interest and support of Ascena and I wish everyone a happy and healthy holiday season. See you in January.
 
Operator
 
Ladies and gentlemen, that concludes today's conference. Thank you so much for your participation. You may now disconnect. Have a great day.
 
 
22
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20111208105529.txt.gz
TIME:20111208105529
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
     Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 
     Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4c))
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07 Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
On December 7, 2011, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) held its Annual Meeting of Stockholders (the Annual Meeting).  At the Annual Meeting, the following items were voted upon: (1) the election of three directors to serve on the board of directors for three-year terms and until their successors are duly elected and qualified; (2) a proposal to consider the approval, by non-binding vote, of the compensation paid to the Companys named executive officers during fiscal 2011, known as the say-on-pay proposal; (3) a proposal to recommend, by non-binding vote, the frequency of future advisory votes on executive compensation, known as the frequency of say-on-pay proposal; and (4) the ratification of the appointment of Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Companys Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm for the fiscal year ending July 28, 2012.  The voting results at the Annual Meeting, with respect to each of the matters described above, were as follows:
1.The three directors were elected based upon the following votes:
2.The compensation paid to the Companys named executive officers , known as the say-on-pay proposal, was approved, by non-binding vote, based upon the following votes:
during fiscal 2011
 
3.One year was approved, by non-binding vote, as the frequency of future advisory votes on executive compensation, known as the frequency of say-on-pay proposal, based upon the following votes:
In light of the results of the advisory vote on the frequency of future say-on-pay votes, the board of directors has determined that the Company will hold an advisory say-on-pay vote annually.  The board of directors may reevaluate this determination after the next stockholder advisory vote on the frequency of say-on-pay votes.
4.The appointment of Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Companys Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm for the fiscal year ending July 28, 2012 was ratified based upon the following votes:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20111216140139.txt.gz
TIME:20111216140139
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01 Other Events
Effective with the beginning of its current fiscal year ending July 28, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) implemented a new corporate overhead cost allocation methodology, as further discussed below. Accordingly, this Current Report on Form 8-K is being provided to recast historically reported segment operating results for the fiscal years ended July 30, 2011 (Fiscal 2011) and July 31, 2010 (Fiscal 2010), in order to enhance the comparability of the Companys segment operating performance under the new cost allocation methodology. See attached Exhibit 99.1. There have been no changes in total net sales, total operating income or total depreciation and amortization expense in any period as a result of this change.
Background
Historically, the Company was a single-brand retailer operating under the name of . As such, all corporate overhead costs were reported historically within the operating segment.  As the Companys legal entity structure evolved with the acquisitions of the brand in Fiscal 2005 and the brand in Fiscal 2010, the Company allocated approximately $2 million of corporate overhead costs annually to each of those operating segments from the operating segment. But, the remainder of the corporate overhead costs continued to be reported primarily within the operating segment.
dressbarn
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
dressbarn
dressbarn
In January 2011, the Company completed an internal corporate reorganization and established a new holding company to own the interests of each of the , , and brands through wholly owned subsidiaries.  In connection therewith, beginning in Fiscal 2012, the Company implemented a new methodology to allocate corporate overhead costs to each of its operating segments on a reasonable basis.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
Date:  December 16, 2011
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Segment Information- Operating Income (Unaudited)
For Fiscal Years 2011 and 2010
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120301161136.txt.gz
TIME:20120301161136
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
March 1, 2012 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On March 1, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release disclosing material non-public information regarding its results of operations for its fiscal second quarter and six months ended January 28, 2012. The Company also raised its earnings per diluted share guidance for its full fiscal year ending July 28, 2012. A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
 
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
Exhibit Number     Description
 
99.1                        Press Release dated March 1, 2012.
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
 
Date: March 1, 2012
 
 
 
By:
/s/ Jay Levine                                     
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
News Release
 
ascena retail group, Inc. reports RECORD
SECOND Quarter sales and earnings results
 
 earnings Per Share increases 56% to $0.81 
 consolidated comparable store sales increase 8% 
 company RAISES fiscal 2012 earnings guidance 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reported record financial results for its fiscal second quarter and six months ended January 28, 2012.
SUFFERN, NY 
March
1, 2012 
(NASDAQ  ASNA)
 
Fiscal Second Quarter Results
 
Net income for the second quarter of Fiscal 2012 increased by 50% to $63.7 million, compared to net income of $42.5 million for the second quarter of Fiscal 2011. Earnings per share for the second quarter of Fiscal 2012 increased by 56% to $0.81 per diluted share, compared to $0.52 of earnings per diluted share for the second quarter of Fiscal 2011.
 
Net sales for the second quarter of Fiscal 2012 increased 15% to $862.0 million, compared to $752.1 million for last years second quarter. This was primarily due to an 8% increase in comparable store sales, strong growth in sales from new stores and e-commerce, and a $6 million increase in revenues relating to gift card breakageConsolidated comparable store sales include stores open for at least one year and do not include e-commerce sales results. E-commerce sales increased 61% to $52 million versus last years comparable period. The Companys comparable store sales and net sales by brand for the fiscal second quarter were as follows:
.
 
 
 
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the second quarter of Fiscal 2012 were $232.3 million, or 26.9% of sales, compared to $211.1 million, or 28.1% of sales last year. The 120 basis point improvement in SG&A expenses as a percent of sales was primarily due to leverage on higher sales.
 
Operating income for the second quarter of Fiscal 2012 increased 40% to $100.0 million, or 11.6% of sales, compared to $71.5 million, or 9.5% of sales last year. The 210 basis point increase in operating income as a percent of sales was due to higher sales and the ability to leverage both buying and occupancy costs and SG&A expenses.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Fiscal Six Month Results
 
Net income for the first six-month period of Fiscal 2012 increased by 23% to $111.2 million, compared to net income of $90.5 million for the first six months of Fiscal 2011. Earnings per share for the first six-month period of Fiscal 2012 increased by 26% to $1.41 per diluted share, compared to $1.12 of earnings per diluted share for the first six months of Fiscal 2011.
 
Net sales for the first six-month period of Fiscal 2012 increased 11% to $1.630 billion, compared to $1.465 billion for last years first six months. The overall increase was primarily due to a 6% comparable store sales increase, and strong growth in sales from new stores and e-commerceE-commerce sales increased 56% to $84 million versus last year. The Companys comparable store sales and net sales by brand for the first six months were as follows:
.
 
 
SG&A expenses for the first six-month period of Fiscal 2012 were $456.5 million, or 28.0% of sales, compared to $415.2 million, or 28.3% of sales last year. The decrease in SG&A expenses as a percent of sales was due to leverage on higher sales.
 
Operating income for the first six-month period of Fiscal 2012 increased 18% to $176.5 million, or 10.8% of sales, compared to $149.3 million, or 10.2% of sales last year. The 60 basis point increase in operating income as a percent of sales was largely due to higher sales and the ability to leverage both buying and occupancy costs and SG&A expenses.
 
Fiscal Second Quarter Balance Sheet Highlights
 
The Company ended the second quarter of Fiscal 2012 with $577.6 million in cash and investments, compared to $436.1 million in cash and investments at the end of Fiscal 2011.
 
The Company repurchased approximately 1.4 million shares at an aggregate cost of $37.2 million during the first six months of Fiscal 2012. Approximately $89.9 million remained available under the Companys authorized share repurchase program at the end of the second quarter of Fiscal 2012.
 
Commentary
 
David Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented, We are pleased to have continued to see positive acceptance for our merchandise assortments and a generally strong performance in a tough market environment. We are successfully utilizing a variety of strategies to highlight the strength of our fashion position and value we provide to drive increases in our market share. With this growth, we are working more efficiently while maintaining an intense focus on both our gross margin and our on-going expense controls. We believe we are well positioned for the spring and summer seasons in each of our concepts.
 
 
 
Raises Fiscal July 2012 Earnings Guidance
 
The Company is raising its earnings per diluted share guidance for its fiscal year ending July 2012 to the range of $2.75 to $2.80, up from its previous guidance of $2.60 to $2.70 as a result of the better-than-expected quarterly earnings results and favorable early spring sales trends. This estimate is based upon various assumptions for the Spring Season, including a mid-single digit increase in consolidated comparable store sales. The Company plans to open approximately 85 stores and close approximately 20 stores for the Spring Season; totaling approximately 145 openings and 55 closings for Fiscal 2012, ending the year with approximately 2,600 , and stores in operation.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
 
Conference Call Information
 
The Company will conduct a conference call today, March 1, 2012, at 4:30 PM Eastern Time to review its second quarter fiscal 2012 results followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (857) 350-1678 prior to the start time, the passcode is 15279848. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at www.ascenaretail.com. A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until April 1, 2012 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 83690621.
 
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls, operating through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, the and brands. The Company operates through its subsidiaries over 2,500 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn,
maurices
Justice
 
offers casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operates 825 stores in 47 states. offers casual and career apparel and accessories at value prices to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operates 803 stores in 44 states. offers trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operates 917 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
 
www.ascenaretail.comwww.dressbarn.comwww.maurices.comwww.shopjustice.com
For more information, visit
,
,
and
.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available in the Companys most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended July 30, 2011 and in its last filed Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended October 29, 2011.
 
 
 
 
      Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
CONTACT:
Investor Relations
(845) 369-4600
 
ICR, Inc.
James Palczynski
Senior Managing Director
(203) 682-8229
jp@ircinc.com
 
 
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
 
 
 
See accompanying notes.  
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
 
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
 
 
See accompanying notes. 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Segment Information (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
Note 1. Basis of Presentation
Segment Information
In January 2011, the Company completed an internal corporate reorganization and established a new holding company named Ascena Retail Group, Inc., to own the interests of each of the and brands through wholly owned subsidiaries. In connection therewith, beginning in Fiscal 2012, the Company implemented a new methodology to allocate corporate overhead costs to each of its operating segments on a reasonable basis.
dressbarn, maurices
Justice
As previously disclosed in the Companys Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 16, 2011, in order to conform to this new cost allocation methodology, the Company has recasted historically reported segment operating results in order to enhance the comparability of its segmental operating performance. There have been no changes in total net sales or total operating income as a result of this change.
A reconciliation of the Companys operating income for each segment under the historical and recasted basis of reporting for the three months and six months ended January 29, 2011 is as follows:
 
 
 
Other Reclassifications
Certain other immaterial reclassifications have been made to the prior periods financial information in order to conform to the current periods presentation.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120305142436.txt.gz
TIME:20120305142436
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
March 1, 2012 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
  
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On March 1, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an investor conference call to discuss the Companys results of operations for its second quarter ended January 28, 2012 and certain other information, including the contents of the Companys press release dated March 1, 2012 which was furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 8-K on March 1, 2012. The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference. A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
Date: March 2, 2012
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
  
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
Allison Townsend
ICR - IR
David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
Armand Correia
Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
Brian Tunick
JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
Janet Kloppenburg
JJK Research - Analyst
Anna Andreeva
FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
Edward Yruma
KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
Nicole Shevins
Goldman Sachs - Analyst
Scott Krasik
BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
Steve Marotta
CL King & Associates - Analyst
Samantha Panella
Raymond James & Associates - Analyst
Travis Williams
Stephens Inc. - Analyst
Alex Fuhrman
Piper Jaffray - Analyst
Unidentified Participant
Telsey Advisors - Analyst
 
Operator
 
Good day, ladies and gentlemen, and welcome to the second quarter 2012 Ascena Retail Group earnings conference call. My name is Kathy, and I'll be your operator for today. At this time, all participants are in a listen-only mode. Later, we will conduct a question-and-answer session.
 
(Operator Instructions)
 
As a reminder, this conference is being recorded for replay purposes. I would now like to turn the conference over to your host for today's call, to Ms. Allison Townsend of ICR. Please proceed.
 
Thank you, Kathy. Today's call is being recorded, and will be available for replay later today. Information on accessing this replay is available in today's press release. As a matter of formality, I need to remind participants that remarks made by Management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause the actual results and implementation of the Company's plans to vary materially. These risks are referenced in today's press release, as well as in the Company's most recently filed Forms 10-K and 10-Q. At this time, I'd like to turn the conference call over to your host, Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Allison. Good afternoon. Thank you for joining us to discuss the results for our fiscal second quarter. With me today is Armand Correia, our CFO. We were pleased with our record sales and earnings results for the second quarter. Our earnings per share grew by 56% to $0.81, compared to EPS of $0.52 in the prior-year quarter. Net sales increased 15% to $862 million, with consolidated comp sales increasing 8% in the second quarter. Comp sales by brand were; Justice up 12%, dressbarn up 8%, and maurices was up 3%. Given the better-than-expected earnings results for the quarter, and our positive outlook for the spring season, we are raising our full-year EPS guidance to $2.75 to $2.80, up from our previous guidance of $2.60 to $2.70.
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
Now, I'd like to walk you through each of our brands' performance. At Justice, we continue to grow our market share by giving our customers trend-right merchandise assortments at compelling values. Our second quarter sales increase of 21% was driven primarily by an 8% growth in transactions, and 3% increase in dollars per transaction, as well as strong e-commerce sales. The shift in product mix toward apparel continued, which carries higher selling prices. Our assortments of casual and active tops, and casual and active bottoms performed well. From a regional perspective, all regions delivered double-digit positive comps. The Justice e-commerce business also continues to grow rapidly, increasing 47% versus last year, and our new Canadian stores are performing above plan as well.
 
Our marketing strategy at Justice reinforces our value proposition, with the right balance of 40% discounts offered to our customers through direct mail, e-mail, customer loyalty programs, as well as store-wide point-of-sale events. For the second quarter, we ran a stepped up cadence of promotions versus last year, which drove both traffic and transactions. Justice executed 3 longer 40% off entire store POS events, versus 1 last year, resulting in 35 additional POS days during the quarter. These events were supplemented with a 37% increase in circulation of direct mail catazines, including 1 additional catazine, and the elimination of 2 post card mailings. For the third quarter, we have added 15 POS days compared to last year's third quarter, which will include 3 POS events and 4 catazines, similar to last year. During the second quarter, we opened 16 Justice stores, including 2 in Canada, and ended the quarter with 917 stores, versus 888 last year. In the third quarter, we plan to open approximately 20 stores, including 3 in Canada, and close 3.
 
Turning now to maurices. Net sales grew 11% in the second quarter, with a 3% comp growth, on top of a 17% comp last year. Comp sales increases were driven by a 3% increase in transactions. Comp store sales increased in all but one region, with the Northeast and mid-Atlantic leading the way. Sales increases were also due to the better-than-expected new store performance and strong e-commerce sales. Many of our women's apparel departments posted increases with casual wear-at-work tops, sweaters, bottoms, and dresses all posting double-digit growth. We continued to see solid performance in our plus-size collection, with denim and dresses performing well. We see opportunities for the spring, with strong trends in casual dresses, denim, casual skirts, and the introduction of colored bottoms. In addition, we continue to maximize our wear-to-work tops category.
 
Our maurices second quarter marketing initiatives involved a variety of strategies. We had 2 mailers, consistent with last year, with mailing quantities up 19%. We continue to enroll customers in our electronic maurices Take Ten loyalty program, which launched in September, and has helped to more than double the size of our e-mail database since last year. The penetration of our private label credit card is now 35%, and continues to grow. For the third quarter, we will have 2 direct mail pieces, similar to last year, with an 11% planned increase in quantities. At maurices, our store base is now 803 locations at the end of the quarter, versus 761 last year. During the second quarter, we opened 9 new stores and closed 3. 16 new store openings and 1 closing are planned for the third quarter, including our first 4 maurices in Canada.
 
Our dressbarn brand had a successful holiday season. Net sales were up 9%, including an 8% increase in comps, which was driven by both a 5% increase in transactions and a 3% increase in average selling price. From a regional perspective, all regions had positive comps, with the best performance in the Northeast and Midwest. We continue to be pleased with our e-commerce growth, which more than doubled for the quarter. We attribute our successful results to 2 key initiatives; adding more to the trend-right fashion assortments, and leveraging our new planning organization. We invested in key fashion categories; knits, suit separates under the Jones studio label, dresses and special occasion, outerwear, and petites, which all had double-digit growth. The strong performance in these areas more than offset the softness we saw in cold weather categories, particularly sweaters and accessories.
 
Our continued development of our planning organization and our successful strategy of shifting receipts from the fall into the holiday quarter resulted in supplying fresh product to our customers when she was ready to buy. Also, our ability to ship back the to stores by size and color added to these results. We have recently completed a major reorganization within merchandising, combining the dressbarn and dressbarn woman buying teams. Going forward, we are focusing on color and prints for the spring, and continue to see opportunities to grow our business in the following categories; dresses, suit separates under the Jones studio label, fashion tops, and career bottoms.
 
We varied our marketing efforts in the second quarter of this year, which helped to drive sales. Dressbarn increased total mail quantities by 5% over last year, including three mailings and two gift with purchase promotions, one of which was incremental over last year. We changed the format of our December mailer, which resulted in a 12% increase in response rates. We launched our electronic dressbarn blushPERKS loyalty program, and have enrolled approximately 1.4 million customers since December. We increased the frequency of e-mails, and our e-mail database of 2.3 million has more than doubled since last year. Our dressbarn credit card market share continues to grow, and is now at 32% of sales. For the quarter, we are anniversarying three direct mail pieces, with no planned increase in quantities. At dressbarn, our store base is 825 locations as of the end of the quarter, versus 829 last year. During the second quarter we closed 11 stores. For the third quarter we plan to open 13.
 
 
 
  
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
Looking ahead, we are mindful of the economic and competitive challenges that our businesses continue to face. Our models of providing great fashion at compelling values has appealed to our customers throughout the recession, and we are optimistic that we will have a successful spring season. Thank you. I will now turn the call over to Armand to discuss our financial results in more detail.
 
Thank you, David. The financial results of our second quarter were truly outstanding. As I go through the numbers, keep in mind that during previous reporting periods we used some non-GAAP reporting to clarify the comparability of results. We recommend that you reference our prior news releases and/or our SEC filings for the detail of these items. I'll note that this quarter a number of these non-GAAP items have decreased or are winding down, and therefore we are more comfortable that GAAP results provide a clearer view of our business.
 
Net sales increased 15% to a record $862 million. The increase was primarily driven by a strong comp sales increase of 8%, which came on top of a 9% increase last year. We also had a better than expected sales performance from our new stores, and strong growth in e-commerce. This was our twelfth consecutive quarter of positive comp store sales. We continue to drive growth through a well-executed e-commerce strategy for our three brands. During the quarter, e-commerce revenues increased 61% to $52 million, and compares to last year's $32 million.
 
Moving down the income statement, our gross profit was $358 million, an increase of 18% compared to $304 million in last year's second quarter. Our gross profit rate increased year over year by 110 basis points to 41.5%. The 110 basis points increase consisted of 110 basis points increase in leverage on buying and occupancy costs, and a 40 basis points increase from the favorable impact of approximately $6 million in revenues relating to gift card breakage for our Justice brand. These gains were partially offset by a 40 basis points decrease in merchandise margin rate from higher markdowns, as a result of pre-planned promotional activity that helped drive sales.
 
From a brand perspective, the gross profit rate at Justice was 45.8%, and adjusted to 45% to exclude the revenue benefit previously mentioned. This rate compares to last year's 44.1%. Maurices came in with a 41.3% rate, increasing 10 basis points over last year, while dressbarn came in at 34.1%, increasing 30 basis points over last year. Selling, general and administrative expenses were $232 million, increasing year over year by $21 million, or 10%. The SG&A rate of 26.9% was leveraged by 120 basis points. However, I'd note that last year's SG&A amount included approximately $5 million called out as non-GAAP. Excluding these items, our leverage was approximately 50 basis points. Operating income increased 40% to $100 million, or 11.6% of sales, compared to last year's $71.5 million, or 9.5%. The year-over-year increase was primarily due to the strong sales performance and its resulting leverage on buying occupancy and SG&A expenses.
 
By brand, Justice achieved record quarterly operating income results, delivering $77 million, or 18.9% of sales, on top of last year's $52.2 million, or 15.5% of sales. Maurices continued their solid operating income performance with $26.4 million, or 11.8% of sales. This compares to last year's $24.5 million, or 12.1%. Dressbarn made progress by reducing its quarterly operating loss to $3.4 million from $5.2 million a year ago, as a result of a strong holiday sales performance which carried into January. The January-ended second quarter is traditionally dressbarn's most challenging quarter, with the upcoming spring season its strongest, driven by Easter and Mother's Day selling.
 
The tax rate for the quarter was 36.7%, and compares to last year's 40.7%. The lower tax rate is from favorable impact of certain tax items and fewer non-deductible expenses. For modeling purposes, we would suggest a 38% rate as more normalized going forward. Net income for the quarter increased 50%, coming in at a record $63.7 million, or $0.81 per diluted share, and compares to last year's $42.5 million, or $0.52 per diluted share. This year's earnings per share reflects the previously mentioned benefit from gift card breakage revenue, which accounted for approximately $0.05 of EPS. Excluding this item, earnings per share would have been $0.76, still well ahead of expectations and last year's GAAP EPS of $0.52, and non-GAAP of $0.57.
 
Turning now to a quick recap of our year-to-date results. Net sales for the 6 month period ended January 28, 2012 increased 11% to $1.6 billion, with comp sales increasing 6%. Operating income for this period increased to $177 million, or 10.8% of sales. This compares to last year's $149 million, or 10.2% of sales, and $159 million, or 10.8% of sales on an adjusted basis. Net income for the 6 month period increased 23% to $111 million, or $1.41 per diluted share, compared to last year's $90.5 million, or $1.12 per share. On an adjusted basis, last year's net income was $96.5 million, or $1.19 per share.
 
Moving on to the balance sheet, which remains strong and highly liquid, we ended the quarter with $578 million in cash and marketable securities. This represents approximately $8.00 in cash and marketable securities per share. Cash flows were very strong for the quarter. We generated $165 million in cash provided from operations, with $141 million in free cash flows. As to inventory, at quarter end total inventories were $313 million, increasing 15% year over year in dollars, and 6% in units. The variance between dollars and units is primarily due to product cost increase and mix. Although dollar levels were higher than the single-digit increase that we expected during our first quarter earnings call, the unit increase in the mid-single digits was right in line. These overall increased levels reflect the timing of an earlier Easter, which prompted us to build up levels earlier than last year. We are comfortable with both the levels and seasonality of inventory going into the spring season. Overall inventory levels are expected to end our April third quarter up mid-to-high single digits in dollars, and low single digits in units.
 
 
 
  
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
From a brand perspective, inventory levels at Justice increased 27% in dollars, and 9% in units. The variance is primarily due to an average unit cost increase from product cost and mix. At maurices, inventories increased 26% in dollars, and 13% in units, and were higher than expected, due to the timing of receipts. At dressbarn, inventory increased 2% in dollars and in units.
 
CapEx for the quarter was $24 million, primarily for new store expansion, remodels, and ongoing strategic projects, with the full year estimated at $130 million. Weighted average shares outstanding for the second quarter decreased to 78.8 million, reflecting the impact of our stock buyback program. This compares to 81.1 million shares last year. Year to date, the Company repurchased 1.4 million shares for $37.2 million, and has approximately $90 million remaining under its existing authorization.
 
In closing, we believe this spring season presents some opportunities, given the earlier Easter shift. Thank you. This concludes our prepared remarks, and we will now accept any questions you may have. Operator?
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
Thank you, sir.
 
(Operator Instructions).
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Thanks. Good afternoon, and congrats, guys. Very impressive results.
 
Thanks, Brian.
 
So I guess a couple of questions. I guess, when we last heard from you after the November trends, it seemed to be some controversy, or a different thought process on how the December and January might shake out. So maybe just talk about whether  how you flowed inventory, or sort of how the calendar may have changed your view on what happened for the rest of the quarter. Can you talk about, and I think we saw in the release, about quarter-to-date trends, sort of what are you seeing and what are you expecting? And then on the dressbarn division, obviously very strong comps there. How did the segment profit shake out versus your expectations?
 
Jump around a little bit here. I'm not exactly sure, can you just clarify the last question on dressbarn, how did the segment  do you mean [Multiple Speakers] product?
 
How did the dressbarn EBIT margins shake out in that segment versus your expectations, the core dressbarn.
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
I'll turn that back to Armand. But to go back, quarter to date, we've got the month in, and let me start off by saying the warm weather, both in the second quarter, as well as, for the most part, in February, has really helped our businesses. So that has really provided some wind at our back, and we're very grateful to have a holiday season where we probably had very few, if any, days where we had snow storms that closed our stores, or made it very difficult for our customers to get to the stores. And just the opposite, the warm weather helps first spring selling. So that was terrific, and we're seeing, quarter to date, we're seeing numbers that are very much in line with our projections for the spring season of mid single digits. I'd say that dressbarn might be a little bit on the higher end of that range, and maurices perhaps a little bit on the lower, or just below that range, but it's still very early in the season, and we're comfortable with our projection for all 3 brands for the spring season of being in that mid single digit range.
 
As far as operating income and operating results for dressbarn stores in the second quarter, Brian, they pretty much came in right as planned. Again, the strength of coming in as planned was primarily in December, as well as November. So they started a little soft in November, and with December and January, a little stronger.
 
Okay. And if I can, just one last one. What kind of AUC cost pressures that you're seeing in the fall season, as you made some buys now?
 
Well, I would say just the opposite. We're not seeing any pressure. We may be seeing some benefit. As we've all seen, cotton has come down, so the products that are more cotton-based are seeing reversal of the trends we saw a year ago, when numbers had gone up, and we passed on some of those increases that we've talked about in the past. So for the most part, we're seeing either flat costs, or some decreases, primarily in the cotton-based product.
 
All right. Terrific. Thanks so much and good luck for spring.
 
Thanks, Brian.
 
Our next question comes from the line of Janet Kloppenburg of JJK Research. Please proceed.
 
Hi, everybody. Can you hear me.
 
Yes, hi Janet.
 
Congratulations to you all. Nice going.
 
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thank you.
 
I wanted to touch base on the transformation going on at dressbarn, and I think you talked to us about discontinuing or reducing some of the more traditional product, and increasing, maybe, some of the younger, more fashionable product. Perhaps you could talk about how far along you are in that process, David.
 
Sure. One thing I alluded to in my comments was that we combined the merchandise organization for dressbarn and dressbarn woman, so we had 2 separate buying teams. So one of the first things we did, and this is a while ago now, we said  okay, we're going to organize ourselves by lifestyles. So we said, let's organize by casual and career, instead of tops and bottoms. So we made that change, and then just recently, we made the change to merge our buying organizations. So we just have 1 buyer buying a category for both dressbarn and dressbarn woman. So now we're going to have a whole store with the same eye and the same fashion sense.
 
So this is really going to boost the dressbarn woman business in particular, which was always a little more staid than the dressbarn business, and that we're going to start seeing a little bit of impact later this spring, but certainly for fall, that will have a big impact. And as addition, if you remember our last call, I talked about at dressbarn and dressbarn woman we were eliminating that very traditional basic merchandise, and internally we talk about having a core customer, and we had our older customer, and we affectionately termed her Ethel. And we have bid adieu to Ethel. There's no longer any Ethel merchandise on the dressbarn side. By fall, you will no longer see Ethel merchandise on the dressbarn woman side. This transition, we think, positions us as a younger targeted concept. So while it's been gradual at dressbarn, we're seeing with this change, we're going to see it expedite a little more rapidly at dressbarn woman.
 
Okay. And David, then this process all began in the second quarter, so we'll watch it unfold, and won't anniversary itself for the next year almost, is that right?
 
Right. Although it's been a little more than just the second quarter. This is a process that we've undertaken very gradually over the last number of years, but it's really coming to a head this year.
 
Okay. And then my other question is just on Justice. It seems, with more POS days, that you've gotten a little bit more promotional. Is that because of the environment? Is that because you think that's how you gain further market share? Maybe you could discuss that a little bit.
 
Sure. We think that we have a formula that works really well with the customer, and the POS days are just a good way of getting it out, not to our existing customers, but also to new customers that may not be on our mailing list or our e-mail list, that we can't contact. So they've been very effective, and we still have a balance between the POS and the other ways of contacting our customer that I've mentioned. So we're doing it because it's very successful with our customer, and it helps drive our sales and, yes, the result is that we are taking market share. But all of it is planned, and our mark down rates are coming in pretty much right online. What we've undertaken is, in some cases, a shifting from a catazine, or a mailer, or a private sale, to a POS event, and in some case it's an incremental. And the result is that net-net we've been able to grow our sales in a controlled way, and been able to continue to grow our market share.
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
Lastly on maurices, I think that the brand was struggling a little bit in the fall, with a lot of the promotional pressure that it was coming up against in the malls and the value centers that it's located in. I'm wondering if you've seen any modification in that, or if maurices has new strategies to confront that with. Thank you.
 
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
I just can give you  as you look at dressbarn, and you look at how important Easter is, and you look at Easter last year being that third week of April, toward the end of April, and this year it's the first week of April. And again, as David said it really  weather plays a big factor, but all things being equal, dressbarn last year, with Easter being so late, its comps were a low single digit plus, so the opportunity, I feel, is just tremendous for the dressbarn stores with the earlier Easter, but certainly weather's got to cooperate as well.
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
Not great, Nicole. Accessories has been a bit of a disappointment at both divisions. I'm not quite sure we have our arms around why that is. It seems like it's a little bit of a slowdown. Not sure if the consumer had just kind of gotten filled up on accessories, or there's more competition for accessories. Maybe we had the wrong product. But in both divisions, I would say those were areas that we were disappointed in. We felt they underperformed. And frankly, we've kind of gone back to the drawing board, and are rethinking our approach at both divisions.
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
 
 
MARCH 01, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q2 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
 
  


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120308144716.txt.gz
TIME:20120308144716
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
March 8, 2012 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4c))
 
 
 
Item 8.01 Other Events
 
On March 8, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. issued a press release announcing that its Board of Directors approved a two-for-one common stock split payable on April 3, 2012 to stockholders of record at the close of business on March 20, 2012. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit No. 99.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this item 8.01.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
  
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
  
Date: March 8, 2012
 

 
 
NEWS RELEASE
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC. ANNOUNCES TWO-FOR-ONE STOCK SPLIT 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Incannounced that the Board of Directors today declared a two-for-one stock split of its common stock. Stockholders of record as of March 20, 2012 will receive one additional share of common stock for each share of common stock they own on that date. The additional shares will be distributed on April 3, 2012. The Company had 76,885,796 shares of common stock outstanding as of March 7, 2012. The Company expects the adjusted number of shares outstanding and adjusted per-share stock price to be reported by the NASDAQ Stock Market, effective April 4, 2012.
SUFFERN, NY  March 8, 2012 -
.
(NASDAQ - ASNA)
 
Elliot S. Jaffe, Chairman of the Board, commented, We are pleased to take this action as a result of our strong operating results and solid stock price performance. This is our Companys sixth stock split since our 1983 initial public offering and is intended to make Ascenas shares more accessible as well as increasing our stockholder base and market liquidity. Todays action reflects our belief in the long-term strategy of our Company and underscores our ongoing commitment to enhancing stockholder value.
 
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls, operating through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, the , and brands. The Company operates through its subsidiaries over 2,500 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
  
offers casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operating 825 stores in 47 states. offers casual and career apparel and accessories at value prices to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operates 803 stores in 44 states. offers trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operates 917 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
  
For more information, visit www.ascenaretail.com, www.dressbarn.com, www.maurices.com and www.shopjustice.com.
  
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120313142048.txt.gz
TIME:20120313142048
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
March 8, 2012 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
 
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
_________________________
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
  
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On March 8, 2012, Armand Correia, the Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company), gave one years advance notice to the Board of Directors of the Company of his retirement as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company. Mr. Correia, age 66, has been employed as the Chief Financial Officer of the Company since 1991 and has held the position of Executive Vice President since 2009.
  
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120502172913.txt.gz
TIME:20120502172913
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 1.01 Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On May 1, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Ascena"), Colombia Acquisition Corp., a Pennsylvania corporation and wholly owned subsidiary of Ascena ("Merger Sub"), and Charming Shoppes, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the "Company"), entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Merger Agreement"), pursuant to which, among other things, Merger Sub will commence a cash tender offer for all of the outstanding shares of common stock of the Company, par value $0.10 per share (the "Company Common Stock"), pursuant to the terms and subject to the conditions of the Merger Agreement. The Boards of Directors of each of the Company, Ascena and Merger Sub have unanimously approved the Merger Agreement and the transactions contemplated thereby.
Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, Merger Sub will commence a tender offer (the "Offer") to purchase all outstanding shares of Company Common Stock at a price of $7.35 per share (the "Offer Price"), net to the selling shareholders in cash, without interest, subject to any applicable withholding tax. Following the consummation of the Offer, subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions set forth in the Merger Agreement, Merger Sub will be merged with and into the Company (the "Merger"), with the Company surviving the Merger as a wholly owned subsidiary of Ascena. At the effective time of the Merger, each share of Company Common Stock not purchased in the Offer (other than shares held directly or indirectly by the Company, Ascena, Merger Sub or any of their respective wholly owned subsidiaries (which will automatically be canceled and retired and will cease to exist) or any shareholder of the Company who is statutorily entitled to exercise appraisal rights and who duly complies with Pennsylvania law concerning the right of holders of Company Common Stock to dissent from the Merger and seek appraisal of their shares) will be converted into the right to receive an amount, in cash and without interest, equal to the Offer Price. On the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Merger Agreement, any unexercised options to purchase Company Common Stock and rights to receive appreciation with respect to shares of Company Common Stock (other than options issued under the Company's employee stock purchase plan) outstanding immediately prior to the effective time of the Merger will, at the effective time of the Merger, automatically be cancelled and converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest, equal to product of the aggregate number of shares of Company Common Stock issuable upon exercise of such option or right multiplied by the positive excess (if any) of the Offer Price over the per share exercise price of such option or base amount of such right, less any taxes required to be withheld. In addition, on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Merger Agreement, any restricted stock unit awards, restricted stock awards, performance share unit awards or other rights, contingent or accrued, to acquire or receive shares of Company Common Stock or benefits measured by the value of shares of Company Common Stock (other than the options and stock appreciation rights described above and options issued under the Company's employee stock purchase plan), and each award payable under any Company stock plan outstanding immediately prior to the effective time of the Merger will, at the effective time of the Merger, automatically be cancelled and (except with respect to performance share unit awards that are forfeited at the effective time of the Merger in accordance with the terms thereof) converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest, equal to the product of the aggregate number of shares of Company Common Stock issuable upon the exercise of such award or right multiplied by the Offer Price, less any taxes required to be withheld, and subject, with respect to holders of restricted stock awards, to their right to exercise statutory appraisal rights.
Completion of the Offer is subject to various conditions, including that at least a majority of the shares of Company Common Stock then outstanding on a fully diluted basis are tendered in the Offer. The Offer will expire at midnight, New York time, on the twentieth business day following and including the commencement date of the Offer, unless extended in accordance with the terms of the Offer and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). The consummation of the Offer is subject to certain other customary conditions, including the expiration or termination of the applicable Hart-Scott-Rodino waiting period and the absence of any Company Material Adverse Effect (as defined in the Merger Agreement) with respect to the Company's business. The Offer is not subject to a financing condition. The closing of the Merger is subject to various additional conditions, including, if required under Pennsylvania law, approval of the Merger Agreement by the Company's shareholders.
The parties have agreed that if after the purchase of shares of Company Common Stock pursuant to the Offer and any subsequent offering period, and after giving effect to any shares of Company Common Stock purchased pursuant to the top-up option described in the next paragraph, Merger Sub owns at least 80% of the outstanding shares of Company Common Stock, then once the other conditions to completion of the Merger are satisfied or waived, Merger Sub will merge with and into the Company pursuant to a "short-form" merger in accordance with the applicable provisions of Pennsylvania law, which would not require a vote of the Company's shareholders.
In the Merger Agreement, the Company has granted Merger Sub an option (the "Top-Up Option") to purchase, at a price per share equal to the Offer Price, that number of newly issued shares of Company Common Stock equal to the lowest number of shares that, when added to the number of shares of Company Common Stock owned, directly or indirectly, by Ascena or Merger Sub at the time of exercise of the Top-Up Option, constitutes one share more than 80% of the outstanding shares of Company Common Stock (after giving effect to the issuance of all shares subject to the Top-Up Option). Merger Sub may exercise the Top-Up Option, in whole or in part only if upon exercise of the Top-Up Option, Ascena will directly or indirectly own one share more than 80% of the outstanding shares of Company Common Stock after giving effect to the issuance of shares of Company Common Stock pursuant to exercise of the Top-Up Option and if the exercise does not violate applicable law or require the issuance of more shares than are authorized and unissued by the Company, and at any time on or after the consummation of the Offer and prior to the earlier to occur of (i) the effective time of the Merger and (ii) the termination of the Merger Agreement in accordance with its terms.
The Merger Agreement includes customary representations, warranties and covenants of the parties. The Company has agreed, among other things, to operate its business in the ordinary course until the Merger is consummated or, if earlier, the date that Ascena has exercised its right to designate a majority of the directors of the Company. Under the Merger Agreement, the Company has agreed not to solicit or initiate discussions with third parties regarding other proposals to acquire the Company and has agreed to certain restrictions on its ability to respond to such proposals, subject to the fulfillment of the fiduciary duties of the Company's board of directors.
The Merger Agreement contains certain termination rights for both Ascena and the Company, and further provides that, upon termination of the Merger Agreement under specified circumstances, the Company may be required to pay Ascena a termination fee of $30,000,000.
In addition, pursuant to the terms of the Merger Agreement, effective upon the purchase of shares of Company Common Stock pursuant to the Offer, Ascena will be entitled to designate a number of directors, rounded up to the next whole number, on the Company's Board of Directors and, upon Ascena's request, committees of the Company's Board of Directors and Company subsidiary Boards of Directors equal to the product of (i) the total number of directors on the Company's Board of Directors, Board committee or subsidiary Board, as applicable, and (ii) the percentage that the number of shares of Company Common Stock beneficially owned by Ascena and/or Merger Sub bears to the number of shares then outstanding.
The foregoing description of the Merger Agreement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Merger Agreement, which is attached hereto as Exhibit 2.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Important Information
The Merger Agreement has been included to provide investors and stockholders with information regarding its terms. Except for its status as a contractual document that establishes and governs the legal relations among the parties thereto with respect to the transaction described in this Current Report on Form 8-K, the Merger Agreement is not intended to be a source of factual, business or operational information about the parties. The contractual representations and warranties made by the parties in the Merger Agreement may be subject to a standard of materiality different from what stockholders of Ascena may view as material to their interests. The representations and warranties contained in the Merger Agreement have been negotiated with the principal purpose of establishing the circumstances in which Merger Sub may have the right not to consummate the Offer or a party may have the right to terminate the Merger Agreement, if the representations and warranties of the other party prove to be untrue due to a change in circumstance or otherwise, and allocates risk between the parties, rather than establishing matters as facts. Investors in Ascena's securities are not third-party beneficiaries under the Merger Agreement and should not rely on the representations, warranties and covenants or any descriptions thereof as characterizations of the actual state of facts or condition of the parties or any of their affiliates.
The Offer for the outstanding shares of the Company Common Stock has not yet commenced. This Current Report on Form 8-K is not a recommendation, an offer to purchase or a solicitation of an offer to sell shares of the Company. At the time the Offer is commenced, Merger Sub will file a tender offer statement on Schedule TO, and the Company will file a solicitation/recommendation statement on Schedule 14D-9, with respect to the tender offer with the SEC. Investors and Company shareholders are strongly advised to read carefully the tender offer statement (including the offer to purchase, the letter of transmittal and the related tender offer documents) and the related solicitation/recommendation statement when they become available, as they will contain important information, including the various terms of, and conditions to, the Offer. Such materials, when prepared and ready for release, will be made available to the Company's shareholders at no expense to them. In addition, when prepared and ready for release, such materials will be available for free from the SEC's website at www.sec.gov.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this report are forward-looking statements, which includes all statements other than those made solely with respect to historical fact. Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made, and we undertake no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in the statements, including the following: (a) the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstance that could give rise to the termination of the Merger Agreement; (b) the inability to complete the transaction due to the failure to satisfy conditions to the transaction; (c) the risk that the proposed transaction disrupts current plans and operations; (d) the risk that anticipated synergies and opportunities as a result of the transaction will not be realized; (e) difficulties or unanticipated expenses in integrating the Company into Ascena; (f) the risk that the acquisition does not perform as planned, including the risk that the Company will not achieve anticipated revenue and profitability improvements; and (g) potential difficulties in employee retention following the closing of the transaction.
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 2, 2012, during its previously announced investor call to discuss the entry into the Merger Agreement, Ascena reported that it continues to be comfortable with its previous full year earnings guidance in the range of $1.37 - $1.40, post split. However, there will likely be a shift whereby third quarter estimated earnings per share will be less than analyst expectations, and fourth quarter estimated earnings per share will be stronger by a similar amount. While Ascenas quarterly same store sales are in line with expectations of plus mid-single digits, Ascena has taken the opportunity to take markdowns and move out some slow moving goods as it enters its fourth quarter.
The information in Item 2.02 of this Current Report on Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On May 2, 2012, Ascena and the Company issued a joint press release relating to the Merger Agreement. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
On May 2, 2012, Ascena issued an internal announcement to its employees relating to the Merger Agreement. A copy of the internal announcement is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
On May 2, 2012, David R. Jaffe, President and Chief of Executive Officer of Ascena, made a presentation to employees of the Company. A copy of the presentation is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.3 and is incorporated herein by reference.
On May 2, 2012, Ascena held an investor conference call relating to the Merger Agreement. A copy of the transcript of the investor conference call is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.4 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 2.1
EXECUTION COPY
          This Agreement and Plan of Merger (this ""), is entered into as of May 1, 2012 by and among Charming Shoppes, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ""), Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), and Colombia Acquisition Corp., a Pennsylvania corporation and a wholly owned Subsidiary of Parent (""). Capitalized terms used herein (including in the immediately preceding sentence) and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in hereof.
Agreement
Company
Parent
Merger Sub
Section 9.01
          WHEREAS, Parent desires to acquire the Company on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement;
          WHEREAS, in furtherance thereof and pursuant to this Agreement, Merger Sub has agreed to commence a tender offer (as it may be amended from time to time as permitted under this Agreement, the "") to purchase all of the outstanding common shares, par value $0.10 per share, of the Company (the ""), at a price per share of Company Common Stock of $7.35 (such amount or any different amount per share that may be paid pursuant to the Offer, the ""), net to the seller in cash, without interest, on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement;
Offer
Company Common Stock
Offer Price
          WHEREAS, following the consummation of the Offer, Merger Sub shall be merged with and into the Company with the Company surviving that merger as a wholly owned Subsidiary of Parent (the ""), in accordance with the Pennsylvania Business Corporation Law of 1988, as amended (the ""), pursuant to which each issued and outstanding share of Company Common Stock, other than (i) shares of Company Common Stock owned directly or indirectly by Parent, Merger Sub or the Company and (ii) the Dissenting Shares, shall be cancelled and converted into the right to receive an amount equal to the Merger Consideration, on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement;
Merger
BCL
          WHEREAS, the board of directors of the Company (the "") has, on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein, (i) determined that the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby are fair to and in the best interests of the Company and its shareholders, (ii) approved and declared advisable this Agreement, the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby and (iii) resolved to recommend acceptance of the Offer, and, if required, approval of the Merger by the Company's shareholders;
Company Board
          WHEREAS, the respective boards of directors of Parent and Merger Sub have approved this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, including the Offer and the Merger, on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein; and
          WHEREAS, the parties desire to make certain representations, warranties, covenants and agreements in connection with the Offer and the Merger and the transactions contemplated hereby and also to prescribe certain conditions to the Offer and the Merger.
          NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and of the representations, warranties, covenants and agreements contained in this Agreement, the parties, intending to be legally bound, agree as follows:
          Section 1.01     The Offer.
          (a)          Provided that this Agreement shall not have been terminated pursuant to , Merger Sub shall (and Parent shall cause Merger Sub to) use its reasonable best efforts to commence (within the meaning of Rule 14d-2 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (the "")) the Offer within three (3) Business Days (and shall commence such Offer in any event within ten (10) Business Days) of the date of this Agreement.
Article VIII
Exchange Act
          (b)          The obligation of Merger Sub to, and of Parent to cause Merger Sub to, accept for payment and pay for any shares of Company Common Stock validly tendered and not validly withdrawn pursuant to the Offer shall be subject to: (i) there being validly tendered in the Offer and not validly withdrawn prior to any then scheduled Expiration Time that number of shares of Company Common Stock which, together with the shares beneficially owned by Parent or Merger Sub (if any), represents at least a majority of the Fully Diluted Shares as of immediately prior to the expiration of the Offer (as it may be extended and re-extended in accordance with this ) (the ""); and (ii) the satisfaction, or waiver by Parent or Merger Sub, of the other conditions and requirements set forth in , as such conditions may be modified in accordance with this Agreement (together with the Minimum Condition, the ""). For purposes of determining whether the Minimum Condition has been satisfied, any shares tendered in the Offer pursuant to guaranteed delivery procedures shall be included only if such shares have been delivered pursuant to such procedures. Subject to the prior satisfaction of the Minimum Condition and the satisfaction, or waiver by Parent or Merger Sub, of the other Offer Conditions as of the Expiration Time, Merger Sub shall, and Parent shall cause Merger Sub to, consummate the Offer in accordance with its terms and accept for payment and pay for all shares of Company Common Stock validly tendered and not validly withdrawn pursuant to the Offer as promptly as
Section 1.01
Minimum Condition
Exhibit A
Offer Conditions
practicable after the Expiration Time. The Offer Price payable in respect of each share of Company Common Stock validly tendered and not validly withdrawn pursuant to the Offer shall be paid net to the seller in cash, without interest (subject to any withholding of tax pursuant to ), on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement.
Section 3.05
          (c)          The Offer shall be made by means of an offer to purchase (the "") that describes the terms and conditions of the Offer as set forth in this Agreement, including the Offer Conditions. Parent and Merger Sub expressly reserve the right (in their sole discretion) to waive, in whole or in part, any Offer Condition, to increase the Offer Price or to make any other changes in the terms and conditions of the Offer; , that unless otherwise provided by this Agreement or as previously approved in writing by the Company, Merger Sub shall not (i) reduce the number of shares of Company Common Stock subject to the Offer, (ii) reduce the Offer Price or change the form of consideration payable in the Offer, (iii) change, modify or waive the Minimum Condition, (iv) add to the conditions set forth in or modify or change any Offer Condition in any manner adverse to any shareholders of the Company, (v) except as otherwise provided in this , extend or otherwise change the expiration date of the Offer or (vi) otherwise amend, modify or supplement any of the other terms of the Offer in any manner adverse to any shareholder of the Company.
Offer to Purchase
provided, however
Exhibit A
Section 1.01
          (d)          Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Offer shall expire at midnight (New York City time) on the date that is twenty (20) Business Days following the commencement (within the meaning of Rule 14d-2 under the Exchange Act) of the Offer (the "") or, in the event the Initial Expiration Time has been extended pursuant to this Agreement, the date and time to which the Offer has been so extended (the Initial Expiration Time, or such later date and time to which the Initial Expiration Time has been extended pursuant to this Agreement, is referred to as the "").
Initial Expiration Time
Expiration Time
          (e)          Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, unless this Agreement has been terminated in accordance with its terms, Merger Sub shall, and Parent shall cause Merger Sub to, (i) extend the Offer on one or more occasions, in consecutive increments of up to five (5) Business Days (or such longer period as the parties hereto may agree) each, if on any then-scheduled Expiration Time any of the Offer Conditions (other than the Minimum Condition) shall not be satisfied or waived, until such time as such condition or conditions are satisfied or waived; , , that the maximum number of days that the Offer may be extended pursuant to this clause (i) shall be twenty (20) Business Days, (ii) extend the Offer on one or more occasions, in consecutive increments of up to five (5) Business Days each, if on any then-scheduled Expiration Time each Offer Condition (other than the Minimum Condition) shall have been satisfied or waived, and the Minimum Condition shall not have been satisfied; , , that the maximum number of days that the Offer may be extended pursuant to this clause (ii) shall be twenty (20) Business Days, (iii) extend the
provided
however
provided
however
Offer, at the request of the Company, until the expiration of a twenty (20)-day cure period after a breach of this Agreement by the Company, if on any then-scheduled Expiration Time any of the Offer Conditions (other than the Minimum Condition) shall not be satisfied due to a breach of this Agreement by the Company that is capable of being cured (it being understood that a willful failure to comply with in any material respect shall be deemed incapable of being cured), and (iv) extend the Offer for the minimum period required by applicable Law, any interpretation or position of the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ""), the staff thereof, the NASDAQ Stock Market ("") or the Chicago Stock Exchange, Inc. applicable to the Offer, and until any waiting period (and any extension thereof) applicable to the consummation of the Offer under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended (the "") and any other applicable foreign antitrust, competition or similar Law shall have expired or been terminated; that in no event (A) shall Merger Sub be required to extend the Offer beyond November 1, 2012 (the "") or (B) shall this be construed or deemed to impair, limit or otherwise restrict in any manner the right of the parties to terminate this Agreement pursuant to . Merger Sub expressly reserves the right to, in its sole discretion, following the Offer Closing, make available one (1) or more "subsequent offering periods" in accordance with Rule 14d-11 under the Exchange Act, and the Offer Documents may, in Merger Sub's sole discretion, provide for such a reservation of right. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this , the rights of Company to cause an extension of the Offer are cumulative so that, if at any time any of the foregoing is applicable, the Offer will be so extended further.
Section 6.04
SEC
NASDAQ
HSR Act
provided, however,
Outside Date
Section 1.01(e)
Article VIII
Section 1.01(e)
          (f)          On the terms and subject to the satisfaction or waiver by Merger Sub of the Offer Conditions as of the Expiration Time, Merger Sub shall, and Parent shall cause Merger Sub to, accept and pay the Offer Price (subject to any withholding of tax pursuant to ) pursuant to for all shares of Company Common Stock validly tendered and not validly withdrawn pursuant to the Offer as soon as practicable after the Expiration Time (as it may be extended and re-extended in accordance with this ). Parent shall provide or cause to be provided to Merger Sub, on a timely basis, the funds necessary to pay for any shares of Company Common Stock that Merger Sub becomes obligated to accept for payment pursuant to the Offer and shall cause Merger Sub to fulfill all of Merger Sub's obligations under this Agreement. Acceptance for payment of shares of Company Common Stock pursuant to and subject to the Offer Conditions upon the Expiration Time is referred to in this Agreement as the "" and the date on which the Offer Closing occurs is referred to in this Agreement as the "."
Section 3.05
Section 1.01(b)
Section 1.01
Offer Closing,
Offer Closing Date
          (g)           Merger Sub shall not terminate the Offer prior to any scheduled Expiration Time without the prior written consent of the Company, except in the event that this Agreement is terminated pursuant to . If the Offer is terminated or withdrawn by Merger Sub, or this Agreement is terminated pursuant to , prior to the acceptance for payment of the Company Common Stock tendered in the
Article VIII
Article VIII
Offer, Merger Sub shall promptly return (and in any event within three (3) Business Days), and shall cause any depository acting on behalf of Merger Sub to promptly return, all tendered Company Common Stock to the registered holders thereof.
          (h)          As soon as practicable on the date of the commencement of the Offer, Parent and Merger Sub shall file with the SEC a Tender Offer Statement on Schedule TO with respect to the Offer (together with all amendments, supplements and exhibits thereto, the ""). The Schedule TO shall include, as exhibits, the Offer to Purchase and a form of letter of transmittal and summary advertisement (such Schedule TO and the documents included therein pursuant to which the Offer will be made, together with any amendments and supplements thereto, the ""). The Company shall promptly furnish to Parent and Merger Sub in writing all information concerning the Company and its Subsidiaries that may be required by applicable Laws or reasonably requested by Parent or Merger Sub for inclusion in the Offer Documents. Parent and Merger Sub shall take all steps necessary to cause the Offer Documents to be filed with the SEC and disseminated to the shareholders of the Company, in each case as and to the extent required by the Exchange Act. Parent and Merger Sub, on the one hand, and the Company, on the other hand, shall promptly correct any information provided by it for use in the Offer Documents if and to the extent that such information shall have become false or misleading in any material respect or as otherwise required by applicable Law. Parent and Merger Sub shall take all steps necessary to cause the Offer Documents, as so corrected, to be filed with the SEC and disseminated to the shareholders of the Company, in each case as and to the extent required by the Exchange Act. Parent and Merger Sub shall promptly notify the Company upon the receipt of any comments from the SEC, or any request from the SEC for amendments or supplements, to the Offer Documents, and shall promptly provide the Company with copies of all correspondence between them and their Representatives, on the one hand, and the SEC, on the other hand, relating to the Offer Documents. Prior to the filing of the Offer Documents (including any amendments or supplements thereto) with the SEC or dissemination thereof to the shareholders of the Company, or responding to any comments of the SEC with respect to the Offer Documents, Parent and Merger Sub shall provide the Company and its counsel a reasonable opportunity to review and comment on such Offer Documents or response, and Parent and Merger Sub shall give reasonable and good faith consideration to any such comments.
Schedule TO
Offer Documents
          Section 1.02     Company Actions.
          (a)          On the date the Schedule TO is filed with the SEC, the Company shall file with the SEC a Solicitation/Recommendation Statement on Schedule 14D-9 with respect to the Offer (together with all amendments, supplements and exhibits thereto, the "") that shall, subject to the provisions of , contain and reflect the recommendation described in . The Company shall take all steps necessary to cause the Schedule 14D-9 to be prepared and filed with the SEC and disseminated to the shareholders of the Company, in each case as and to the extent
Schedule 14D-9
Section 6.04
Section 4.03(d)
required by the Exchange Act. Parent and Merger Sub shall promptly furnish to the Company in writing all information concerning Parent and Merger Sub that may be required by applicable Laws or reasonably requested by the Company for inclusion in the Schedule 14D-9. The Company, on the one hand, and Parent and Merger Sub, on the other hand, shall promptly correct any information provided by it for use in the Schedule 14D-9 if and to the extent that such information shall have become false or misleading in any material respect or as otherwise required by applicable Law. The Company shall take all steps necessary to cause the Schedule 14D-9, as so corrected, to be filed with the SEC and disseminated to the shareholders of the Company, in each case as and to the extent required by the Exchange Act. The Company shall promptly notify Parent and Merger Sub upon the receipt of any comments from the SEC, or any request from the SEC for amendments or supplements, to the Schedule 14D-9, and shall promptly provide Parent and Merger Sub with copies of all correspondence between it and its Representatives, on the one hand, and the SEC, on the other hand, relating to the Schedule 14D-9. Unless the Company Board has effected a change in the recommendation described in , prior to the filing of the Schedule 14D-9 (including any amendments or supplements thereto) with the SEC or dissemination thereof to the shareholders of the Company, or responding to any comments of the SEC with respect to the Schedule 14D-9, the Company shall provide Parent, Merger Sub and their counsel a reasonable opportunity to review and comment on such Schedule 14D-9 or response, and the Company shall give reasonable and good faith consideration to any such comments. The Company hereby consents to the inclusion in the Offer Documents of the Company Board Recommendation contained in the Schedule 14D-9.
Section 4.03(d)
          (b)          In connection with the Offer, the Company shall promptly furnish or cause to be furnished to Parent and Merger Sub mailing labels, security position listings and any other available listings or computer files containing the names and addresses of all record holders or beneficial owners of the shares of Company Common Stock, in each case as of the most recent practicable date, and shall furnish Parent and Merger Sub with such information and assistance (including lists of record holders or beneficial owners of the shares of Company Common Stock, updated from time to time upon Parent's, Merger Sub's or either of their respective agents' reasonable request, and the addresses, mailing labels and lists of security positions of such record holders or beneficial owners) as Parent, Merger Sub or either of their respective agents may reasonably request for the purpose of communicating the Offer to the record holders and beneficial owners of the shares of Company Common Stock. Subject to the requirements of applicable Law, and except for such steps as are necessary to disseminate the Offer Documents and any other documents necessary to consummate the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby, Parent and Merger Sub shall hold in confidence the information contained in any such labels, listings and files in accordance with the Confidentiality Agreement and shall use such information only in connection with the Offer and the Merger and, if this Agreement shall be terminated, shall promptly deliver (and shall use their respective commercially reasonable efforts to cause their agents and Representatives
to deliver) to the Company or destroy all copies and any extract or summaries of such information then in their possession or control.
          Section 1.03          Directors.
          (a)          Effective upon the Offer Closing and from time to time thereafter, Parent shall be entitled to designate the number of directors, rounded up to the next whole number, on the Company Board that equals the product of (i) the total number of directors on the Company Board (giving effect to the election of any additional directors pursuant to this and (ii) the percentage that the number of shares of Company Common Stock beneficially owned by Parent and/or Merger Sub (including shares accepted for payment) bears to the total number of shares of Company Common Stock outstanding, and the Company shall cause Parent's designees to be elected or appointed to the Company Board, including by increasing the number of directors and seeking and accepting resignations of incumbent directors. At such time, the Company shall also cause individuals designated by Parent to constitute the number of members, rounded up to the next whole number, on (A) each committee of the Company Board requested by Parent, and (B) each board of directors of each Subsidiary of the Company (and each committee thereof) as reasonably requested by Parent, in each case that represents the same percentage as such individuals represent on the Company Board.
Section 1.03(a))
          (b)          The Company's obligations to appoint Parent's designees to the Company Board shall be subject to Section 14(f) of the Exchange Act and Rule 14f-1 promulgated thereunder. The Company shall promptly take all actions reasonably required to effect the appointment of Parent's designees, including mailing to its shareholders information with respect to the Company and its officers and directors, as Section 14(f) and Rule 14f-1 require in order to fulfill its obligations under this , which, unless Parent otherwise elects, shall be mailed together with the Schedule 14D-9. Parent shall supply to the Company in writing and be solely responsible for any information with respect to itself and its nominees, officers, directors and Affiliates required by Section 14(f) and Rule 14f-1 and the Company's obligations under hereof shall be subject to the receipt of such information.
Section 1.03(b)
Section 1.03(a)
          (c)          Following the election or appointment of Parent's designees pursuant to and until the Effective Time, the approval of a majority of the directors of the Company then in office who were not designated by Parent (the "") (or the approval of the sole Independent Director if there shall only be one Independent Director) shall be required to authorize (and such authorization shall constitute the authorization of the Company Board and no other action on the part of the Company, including any action by any other director of the Company, shall be required to authorize) (i) any termination of this Agreement by the Company, (ii) any amendment of this Agreement (including any decrease or change in the form of the Offer Price), (iii) any extension of time for performance of any obligation or action hereunder by Parent or Merger Sub and (iv) any waiver of compliance with any of the agreements or conditions
Section 1.03(a)
Independent Directors
contained herein for the benefit of the Company; that if there shall be no Independent Directors as a result of such individuals' deaths, disabilities, resignations or refusals to serve, then such actions may be effected by a majority vote of the Company Board. The Independent Directors will have the authority to retain counsel (which may include current counsel to the Company) and other advisors at the reasonable expense of the Company as determined appropriate by the Independent Directors for the purpose of fulfilling their obligations hereunder. Following the election or appointment of Parent's designees pursuant to and until the Effective Time, any action by the Company to enforce any obligation of Parent or Merger Sub under this Agreement shall be effected only by the action of a majority of the Independent Directors (or the approval of the sole Independent Director if there shall only be one Independent Director); that if there shall be no Independent Directors as a result of such individuals' deaths, disabilities, resignations or refusals to serve, then such actions may be effected by a majority vote of the Company Board.
provided
Section 1.03(a)
provided
          
Section 1.04          Top-Up Option.
          (a)          The Company hereby grants to Merger Sub an irrevocable option (the ""), exercisable only on the terms and conditions set forth in this , to purchase at a price per share equal to the Offer Price paid in the Offer, that number of shares of Company Common Stock (the "") equal to the lowest number of shares of Company Common Stock that, when added to the number of shares of Company Common Stock owned by Parent and its Subsidiaries at the time of exercise of the Top-Up Option, shall constitute one share more than 80% of the Fully Diluted Shares immediately after the issuance of the Top-Up Shares (the ""); , that the Top-Up Option will not be exercisable unless, immediately after such exercise and the issuance of Top-Up Shares pursuant thereto, the Short Form Threshold would be reached (after giving effect to the issuance of the Top-Up Shares); , that (i) the Top-Up Option shall not be exercisable for a number of shares of Company Common Stock in excess of the shares of Company Common Stock authorized and unissued or held in the treasury of the Company at the time of exercise of the Top-Up Option (giving effect to the shares of Company Common Stock issuable pursuant to all then-outstanding stock options, restricted stock units and any other rights to acquire Company Common Stock as if such shares were outstanding) and (ii) the exercise of the Top-Up Option and the issuance and delivery of the Top-Up Shares shall not be prohibited by any Law or Order. The Top-Up Option shall be exercisable only once, in whole but not in part, at any time following the Offer Closing and prior to the earliest to occur of (A) the close of business on the fifth Business Day following the Offer Closing, (B) the Effective Time and (C) the termination of this Agreement in accordance with its terms.
Top-Up Option
Section 1.04
Top-Up Shares
Short Form Threshold
provided
provided, further
          (b)          In the event Merger Sub wishes to exercise the Top-Up Option, Merger Sub shall notify the Company in writing, and shall set forth in such notice (i) the number of shares of the Company Common Stock owned by Parent and its Subsidiaries at the
time of such notice (giving effect to the Offer Closing) and (ii) a place and a time for the closing of such purchase which shall, unless the Independent Directors otherwise agree, be at the Company's principal offices not less than one (1) Business Day after receipt of such notice. The Company shall, promptly following receipt of such notice, deliver written notice to Merger Sub specifying, based on the information provided by Merger Sub in its notice, the number of Top-Up Shares to be purchased by Merger Sub. At the closing of the purchase of Top-Up Shares, the aggregate purchase price owed by Merger Sub to the Company for the Top-Up Shares (calculated by multiplying the number of such Top-Up Option Shares by the Offer Price) shall be paid to the Company at Parent's election, either (i) entirely in cash, by wire transfer of same-day funds or (ii) by issuing to the Company a promissory note having a principal amount equal to the aggregate purchase price pursuant to the Top-Up Option (the ""). The Promissory Note (i) shall bear simple interest at a rate of three percent (3.0%) per annum, (ii) shall mature on the first anniversary of the date of execution of the Promissory Note, (iii) shall be full recourse to Parent and Merger Sub, (iv) may be prepaid, at any time, in whole or in part, without premium or penalty, and (v) shall have no other material terms. The Company shall cause to be issued to Merger Sub a certificate representing the Top-Up Shares or, if the Company does not then have certificated shares of Company Stock, the applicable number of Book-Entry Shares. Such certificates or Book-Entry Shares may include any legends that are required by federal or state securities Laws.
Promissory Note
          (c)          Parent and Merger Sub acknowledge that any Top-Up Shares issued upon exercise of the Top-Up Option will not be registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (the "") and that all such shares will be issued in reliance upon an applicable exemption from registration under the Securities Act. Each of Parent and Merger Sub hereby represents and warrants to the Company that Merger Sub is, and will be, upon the purchase of the Top-Up Shares, an "accredited investor," as defined in Rule 501 of Regulation D under the Securities Act. Merger Sub agrees that the Top-Up Option and the Top-Up Shares to be acquired upon exercise of the Top-Up Option are being and will be acquired by Merger Sub for the purpose of investment and not with a view to, or for resale in connection with, any distribution thereof (within the meaning of the Securities Act).
Securities Act
          (d)          Any dilutive impact on the value of the shares of Company Common Stock as a result of the issuance of the Top-Up Shares or the payment by Merger Sub to the Company of consideration for the Top-Up Shares, will not be taken into account in any determination of the fair value of any Dissenting Shares pursuant to Subchapter 15D of the BCL as contemplated by .
Section 3.03
          (e)          Without the prior written consent of the Company, the right to exercise the Top-Up Option granted pursuant to this Agreement may not be assigned by Merger Sub other than to Parent or a direct or indirect wholly owned Subsidiary of Parent, including by operation of Law or otherwise, and any attempted assignment in violation of this will be null and void.
Section 1.04(e)
          (f)          Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, if, at any time after the Offer Closing and the exercise of the Top-Up Option, if applicable, the shares of Company Common Stock beneficially owned by Parent or Merger Sub, together with any shares of Company Common Stock beneficially owned by Parent's other Affiliates, equal or exceed the Short Form Threshold, then each of Parent, Merger Sub and the Company will take all actions necessary and appropriate to cause the Merger to become effective as soon as practicable after the consummation of the Offer without a meeting of the Company's shareholders, in accordance with Section 1924(b) of the BCL.
           On the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, and in accordance with the BCL, at the Effective Time Merger Sub will merge with and into the Company. As a result of the Merger, the separate corporate existence of Merger Sub will cease and the Company will, as provided in the BCL, continue its corporate existence as the surviving corporation in the Merger (sometimes referred to herein as the "").
Section 2.01     The Merger.
Surviving Corporation
           Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein, the closing of the Merger (the "") will take place as soon as practicable on the date of satisfaction or, to the extent permitted hereunder, waiver of all conditions to the Merger set forth in (other than those conditions that by their nature are to be satisfied at the Closing, but subject to the satisfaction or, to the extent permitted hereunder, waiver of all such conditions), unless this Agreement has been terminated pursuant to its terms or unless another time or date is agreed to in writing by the parties hereto. The Closing shall be held at a place mutually agreed to in writing by the parties hereto, and the actual date of the Closing is hereinafter referred to as the ""
Section 2.02     Closing.
Closing
Article VII
Closing Date.
           Subject to the provisions of this Agreement, as soon as practicable on the Closing Date, the Company, Parent and Merger Sub will cause a certificate of merger (the "") to be executed, acknowledged and filed with the Department of State of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania in accordance with the relevant provisions of the BCL and shall make all other filings or recordings required under the BCL. The Merger will become effective at such time as the Certificate of Merger has been duly filed with the Department of State of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or at such later date or time as may be agreed by the Company and Parent in writing and specified in the Certificate of Merger in accordance with the BCL (the effective time of the Merger being hereinafter referred to as the "").
Section 2.03     Effective Time.
Certificate of Merger
Effective Time
           The Merger shall have the effects set forth herein and in the applicable provisions of the BCL. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, and subject thereto, from and after the Effective Time, all property, rights, privileges, immunities, powers, franchises, licenses and authority of the Company and Merger Sub shall vest in the Surviving Corporation, and all debts, liabilities, obligations, restrictions and duties of each of the Company and Merger Sub shall become the debts, liabilities, obligations, restrictions and duties of the Surviving Corporation, all as provided under the BCL.
Section 2.04     Effects of the Merger.
           At the Effective Time, (i) the articles of incorporation of Merger Sub as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the articles of incorporation of the Surviving Corporation until thereafter amended in accordance with the terms thereof or as provided by applicable Law, except that upon the filing of the Certificate of Merger, the name of the Surviving Corporation shall be "Charming Shoppes, Inc." and the common stock of the Surviving Corporation shall have a par value of $0.01 per share, and (ii) the by-laws of Merger Sub as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the by-laws of the Surviving Corporation until thereafter amended in accordance with the terms thereof, the articles of incorporation of the Surviving Corporation or as provided by applicable Law.
Section 2.05     Articles of Incorporation; By-laws.
           The directors of Merger Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the initial directors of the Surviving Corporation, each to hold office in accordance with the articles of incorporation and by-laws of the Surviving Corporation. The officers of the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the initial officers of the Surviving Corporation, each to hold office in accordance with the articles of incorporation and by-laws of the Surviving Corporation.
Section 2.06     Directors and Officers.
           At the Effective Time and subject to the provisions of this Agreement, as a result of the Merger and without any action on the part of Parent, Merger Sub or the Company or the holder of any capital stock of Parent, Merger Sub or the Company:
Section 3.01     Effect of the Merger on Capital Stock.
          (a)           Each share of Company Common Stock that is owned by Parent, Merger Sub or the Company (as treasury stock or otherwise) or any of their respective direct or indirect wholly owned Subsidiaries will automatically be cancelled and retired and will cease to exist, and no consideration will be delivered in exchange therefor.
Cancellation of Certain Company Common Stock.
          (b)           Each share of Company Common Stock issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other
Conversion of Company Common Stock.
than (i) shares to be cancelled and retired in accordance with , and (ii) Dissenting Shares) will be converted into the right to receive, in cash and without interest, an amount equal to the Offer Price (the ""). At the Effective Time, all shares of Company Common Stock will no longer be outstanding and all shares of Company Common Stock will be cancelled and retired and will cease to exist, and, subject to , each holder of a certificate formerly representing any such shares (each, a "") will cease to have any rights with respect thereto, except the right to receive the Merger Consideration in accordance with hereof.
Section 3.01(a)
Merger Consideration
Section 3.03
Certificate
Section 3.02
          (c)           Each common share, no par value per share, of Merger Sub issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be converted into and become one (1) newly issued, fully paid and non-assessable common share of the Surviving Corporation.
Conversion of Merger Sub Capital Stock.
          
Section 3.02     Surrender and Payment.
          (a)          Prior to the Effective Time, Parent shall appoint the Company's transfer agent (or such other financial institution to which the Company and Parent agree) (the "") to act as the agent for the purpose of exchanging the Merger Consideration for: (i) the Certificates, and (ii) book-entry shares which immediately prior to the Effective Time represented the shares of Company Common Stock (the ""). At or prior to the Effective Time, Parent shall deposit, or cause Merger Sub to deposit, with the Exchange Agent to be held in trust for the benefit of the holders of Certificates and Book-Entry Shares, sufficient funds to pay the aggregate Merger Consideration that is payable in respect of all of the outstanding shares of Company Common Stock represented by the Certificates and the Book-Entry Shares (the ""). The Exchange Agent shall invest the Payment Fund as directed by Parent; , that such investments shall be in obligations of or guaranteed by the United States of America or in commercial paper obligations rated "A-1" or "P-1" or better by Moody's Investors Service, Inc. or Standard & Poor's Corporation, respectively, or a combination of the foregoing and, in any such case, no such instrument shall have a maturity exceeding three (3) months. Any interest and other income resulting from such investments shall be paid to, or as directed by, Parent. If for any reason (including losses) the Payment Fund is inadequate to pay the amounts to which holders of shares shall be entitled under , Parent shall take all steps necessary to enable or cause the Surviving Corporation promptly to deposit in trust additional cash with the Exchange Agent sufficient to make all payments required under this Agreement, and Parent and the Surviving Corporation shall in any event be liable for the payment thereof. The Payment Fund shall not be used for any other purpose. The Surviving Corporation shall pay all charges and expenses, including those of the Exchange Agent, in connection with the exchange of shares of Company Common Stock for the Merger Consideration. As soon as practicable, but in event no later than five (5) Business Days following the Effective Time, Parent shall send, or shall cause the Exchange Agent to send, to each record holder
Exchange Agent
Book-Entry Shares
Payment Fund
provided
Section 3.01(b)
of shares of Company Common Stock at the Effective Time, (i) a letter of transmittal (which shall be in customary form and have such other provisions as Parent and the Company shall reasonably agree and shall specify that the delivery shall be effected, and risk of loss and title shall pass, only upon proper delivery of the Certificates, or Loss Documentation in lieu thereof as provided in , or transfer of the Book-Entry Shares to the Exchange Agent), and (ii) instructions for effecting the surrender of Certificates or Book-Entry Shares for the Merger Consideration.
Section 3.06
          (b)          Each holder of shares of Company Common Stock that have been converted into the right to receive the Merger Consideration shall be entitled to receive the Merger Consideration in respect of the Company Common Stock represented by a Certificate or Book-Entry Share upon (i) surrender to the Exchange Agent of a Certificate, together with a duly completed and validly executed letter of transmittal and such other documents as may reasonably be requested by the Exchange Agent, or (ii) receipt of an "agent's message" by the Exchange Agent (or such other evidence, if any, of transfer as the Exchange Agent may reasonably request) in the case of Book-Entry Shares. Until so surrendered or transferred, as the case may be, and subject to the terms set forth in , each such Certificate or Book-Entry Share, as applicable, shall represent after the Effective Time for all purposes only the right to receive the Merger Consideration payable in respect thereof. No interest shall be paid or accrued on the cash payable upon the surrender or transfer of any Certificate or Book-Entry Share. Upon payment of the Merger Consideration pursuant to the provisions of this , each Certificate or Certificates so surrendered shall immediately be cancelled.
Section 3.03
Article III
          (c)          If any portion of the Merger Consideration is to be paid to a Person other than the Person in whose name the surrendered Certificate or the transferred Book-Entry Share, as applicable, is registered, it shall be a condition to such payment that (i) such Certificate shall be properly endorsed or shall otherwise be in proper form for transfer or such Book-Entry Share shall be properly transferred, and (ii) the Person requesting such payment shall pay to the Exchange Agent any transfer or other Tax required as a result of such payment to a Person other than the registered holder of such Certificate or Book-Entry Share, as applicable, or establish to the reasonable satisfaction of the Exchange Agent that such Tax has been paid or is not payable.
          (d)          All Merger Consideration paid upon the surrender of Certificates or transfer of Book-Entry Shares in accordance with the terms hereof shall be deemed to have been paid in full satisfaction of all rights pertaining to the shares of Company Common Stock formerly represented by such Certificate or Book-Entry Shares. At the Effective Time, the stock transfer books of the Surviving Corporation shall be closed and thereafter there shall be no further registration of transfers of shares of Company Common Stock on the stock transfer books of the Surviving Corporation. If, after the Effective Time, Certificates or Book-Entry Shares are presented to the Surviving Corporation, they shall be cancelled and exchanged for the Merger Consideration provided for, and in accordance with the procedures set forth, in this .
Article III
          (e)          Any portion of the Payment Fund (including any interest or other amounts earned with respect thereto) that remains unclaimed by the holders of shares of Company Common Stock 180 days after the Effective Time shall be returned to Parent, upon demand, and any such holder who has not exchanged shares of Company Common Stock for the Merger Consideration in accordance with this prior to that time shall thereafter look only to Parent for payment of the Merger Consideration. Notwithstanding the foregoing, none of Parent, Merger Sub, the Company or the Exchange Agent shall be liable to any person in respect of any amounts that would otherwise have been payable in respect of any Certificate or Book-Entry Share from the Payment Fund delivered to a public official pursuant to applicable abandoned property, escheat or similar Laws. Any amounts remaining unclaimed by holders of shares of Company Common Stock prior to such time as such amounts would otherwise escheat to or become property of any Governmental Entity shall, to the extent permitted by applicable Law, immediately prior to such time become the property of Parent free and clear of any claims or interest of any Person previously entitled thereto.
Section 3.02
          Section 3.03     Dissenting Shares.
          (a)          Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, including , any issued and outstanding shares of Company Common Stock held by a Dissenting Shareholder ("") shall not be converted into the Merger Consideration. At the Effective Time, all Dissenting Shares shall no longer be outstanding and shall automatically be cancelled and shall cease to exist, and each Dissenting Shareholder shall cease to have any rights with respect thereto, except that the Dissenting Shareholders shall have the right to receive such consideration as may be determined to be due to such Dissenting Shareholder pursuant to the BCL; , , that each share of Company Common Stock outstanding immediately before the Effective Time and held by a Dissenting Shareholder who, after the Effective Time, effectively withdraws or loses his or her dissenters rights pursuant to the BCL, shall be deemed to be converted as of the Effective Time into the right to receive the Merger Consideration in accordance with , without any interest thereon, upon surrender of such Certificate formerly representing such share or transfer of such Book Entry Share, as the case may be. As used in this Agreement, the term "" means any record holder or beneficial owner of shares of Company Common Stock who is statutorily entitled to exercise appraisal rights and who duly complies with all provisions of the BCL concerning the right of holders of Company Common Stock to dissent from the Merger and seek appraisal of their shares.
Section 3.01
Dissenting Shares
provided
however
Section 3.01(b)
Dissenting Shareholder
          (b)          The Company shall give Parent (i) prompt notice of any demands for appraisal pursuant to the applicable provisions of the BCL received by the Company, withdrawals of such demands, and any other instruments served pursuant to the BCL and received by the Company and (ii) the opportunity to participate in and, after the Offer Closing, direct all negotiations and proceedings with respect to dissenters rights under the
BCL. The Company shall not, except with the prior written consent of Parent, make any payment with respect to any such demands for appraisal or offer to settle or settle any such demands.
           Without limiting the other provisions of this Agreement, if at any time during the period between the date of this Agreement and the Effective Time, any change in the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company shall occur (other than the issuance of additional shares of capital stock of the Company as permitted by Section 6.01(c)), including by reason of any reclassification, recapitalization, stock split (including reverse stock split) or combination, exchange or readjustment of shares, or any stock dividend or distribution paid in stock, the Offer Price and the Merger Consideration (as applicable) and any other amounts payable pursuant to this Agreement shall be appropriately adjusted to fairly reflect such change.
Section 3.04     Adjustments.
           Each of the Exchange Agent, Parent, Merger Sub and the Surviving Corporation shall be entitled to deduct and withhold from the Offer Price and the Merger Consideration, as the case may be, otherwise payable to any Person pursuant to this Agreement such amounts as may be required to be deducted and withheld with respect to the making of such payment under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the ""), and applicable Treasury Regulations issued pursuant thereto, or any provision of state, local or foreign Tax law. To the extent that amounts are so deducted and withheld by the Exchange Agent, Parent, Merger Sub or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, such amounts shall be treated for all purposes of this Agreement as having been paid to the Person in respect of which the Exchange Agent, Parent, Merger Sub or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, made such deduction and withholding.
Section 3.05     Withholding Rights.
Code
           If any Certificate shall have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Parent by the Person claiming such Certificate to be lost, stolen or destroyed and, if required by Parent, the posting by such Person of a bond, in such amount as Parent may reasonably direct (such affidavit and, if requested by Parent, posting of a bond, the ""), as indemnity against any claim that may be made against it with respect to such Certificate, the Exchange Agent will issue, in exchange for such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate, the Merger Consideration to be paid in respect of the shares of Company Common Stock formerly represented by such Certificate as contemplated under this .
Section 3.06     Lost Certificates.
Loss Documentation
Article III
          
Section 3.07     Treatment of Stock Options and Other Stock-based Compensation.
          (a)          At the Effective Time, each option to acquire shares of Company Common Stock (other than an option issued under the ESPP) and each right to receive appreciation with respect to shares of Company Common Stock (each, a "") that is outstanding and unexercised immediately prior to the Effective Time, whether or not then vested or exercisable, shall be, by virtue of the Merger and without any action on the part of Parent, Merger Sub, the Company, the holder of that Company Stock Right or any other Person, cancelled and converted into the right to receive from Parent and the Surviving Corporation, as promptly as reasonably practicable after the Effective Time (and in any event within five (5) Business Days thereof), an amount in cash, without interest, equal to the product of (x) the aggregate number of shares of Company Common Stock subject to such Company Stock Right as of immediately prior to the Effective Time, multiplied by (y) the positive excess, if any, of the Merger Consideration over the per share exercise price (with respect to stock options) or base amount (with respect to stock appreciation rights) under such Company Stock Right, less any Taxes required to be withheld in accordance with . In the event that the per share exercise price (with respect to stock options) or base amount (with respect to stock appreciation rights) of such Company Stock Right is equal to or greater than the Merger Consideration, such Company Stock Right will be cancelled without consideration and have no further force or effect.
Company Stock Right
Section 3.05
          (b)          At the Effective Time, each restricted stock unit award, restricted stock award, performance share unit award and other right, contingent or accrued, to acquire or receive shares of Company Common Stock or benefits measured by the value of such shares, and each award of any kind consisting of shares of Company Common Stock held, awarded, outstanding, or payable under any Company Stock Plan, other than Company Stock Rights and options issued under the ESPP to acquire shares of Company Common Stock (each, a "") immediately prior to the Effective Time, whether or not then vested or exercisable, shall be, by virtue of the Merger and without any action on the part of Parent, Merger Sub, the Company, the holder of that Company Stock Award or any other Person, cancelled and, except with respect to performance share unit awards that are forfeited at the Effective Time without payment in accordance with the terms and conditions of the applicable award agreements on the date hereof, converted into the right to receive from Parent and the Surviving Corporation, as promptly as reasonably practicable after the Effective Time (and in any event within five (5) Business Days thereof), an amount in cash, without interest, equal to the product of (x) the aggregate number of shares of Company Common Stock in respect of such Company Stock Award as of immediately prior to the Effective Time multiplied by (y) the Merger Consideration, less any Taxes required to be withheld in accordance with , subject, however, with respect to holders of restricted stock awards, to any rights of such holder pursuant to . For purposes of this , the performance share unit awards that are forfeited at the Effective Time without payment shall include all performance share unit awards other than those performance share unit
Company Stock Award
Section 3.05
Section 3.03
Section 3.07(b)
awards that vest at target level in accordance with the terms and conditions of the applicable award agreements in effect on the date hereof.
          (c)          At or prior to the Effective Time, the Company, the Company Board and the compensation committee of such board, as applicable, shall adopt any resolutions and amendments and shall use reasonable best efforts to obtain any employee consents that may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this .
Section 3.07
          (d)          The Company shall take all necessary and appropriate actions so that as of the Effective Time (i) there shall be no outstanding options issued or exercisable pursuant to the Company's Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the ""), (ii) the ESPP shall terminate (without the commencement of any new offering or purchase periods thereunder), in accordance with the terms of the ESPP, and (iii) all Company Stock Plans shall terminate.
ESPP
Each warrant to purchase shares of Company Common Stock that is listed on of the Company Disclosure Letter (collectively, the "") and that is issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Offer Closing shall terminate as of the Offer Closing in accordance with the terms of such Warrants.
          Section 3.08     Treatment of Warrants.
Section 3.08
Warrants
          Except (i) as disclosed in the Annual Report on Form 10-K of the Company for the year ended January 28, 2012 (the "") and the Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and the Current Reports on Form 8-K, in each case, filed from the date of the filing of the Company Form 10-K to the date of this Agreement (other than disclosures in the "Risk Factors" or "Forward Looking Statements" sections (or similar sections specifically referencing the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) of such reports) or (ii) as disclosed in the disclosure letter, dated the date of this Agreement and delivered by the Company to Parent prior to the execution of this Agreement (the "") the relevance of which disclosure to the appropriate representation or warranty in this is reasonably apparent on its face without the necessity of repetitive disclosure or cross-reference, the Company hereby represents and warrants to Parent and Merger Sub as of the date hereof as follows:
Company Form 10-K
Company Disclosure Letter
Article IV
               
Section 4.01
Organization; Standing and Power; Charter Documents; Minutes; Subsidiaries.
          (a)           The Company and each of its Subsidiaries is a corporation, limited liability company or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing (except, in the case of any indirect
Organization; Standing and Power.
Subsidiary of the Company, where such failure to be in good standing may be remedied by making customary public filings and paying related fees that, in any event, are immaterial in amount) under the Laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and has the requisite corporate, limited liability company or other organizational, as applicable, power and authority to own, lease and operate its assets and properties and to carry on its business as now conducted. The Company has delivered, made available or offered for inspection to Parent a true, complete and correct copy of the articles of incorporation (including any certificate of designations), by-laws or like organizational documents, each as amended to date (collectively, the ""), of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries. The Company has made available to Parent true, correct and complete copies of the minutes (or in the case of draft minutes, the most recent drafts thereof) of all meetings and all actions by written consent of the shareholders of the Company, the Company Board and each committee of the Company Board held since February 1, 2009; , that in each case, the Company shall have the right to redact from the minutes all discussions regarding, and other references to, the exploration of strategic alternatives, including negotiations with Parent and Merger Sub related to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or any other Person regarding a similar transaction. The Company and each of its Subsidiaries is duly qualified or licensed to do business as a foreign corporation, limited liability company or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction where the character of the assets and properties owned, leased or operated by it or the nature or conduct of its business makes such qualification or license necessary, except where the failure to be so qualified or licensed or to be in good standing, has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect, and all such jurisdictions (other than jurisdictions of incorporation or organization) are set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter.
Charter Documents
provided
Section 4.01(a)
          (b)           of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a complete and accurate list of each of the Subsidiaries of the Company and its place of organization, and the authorized and outstanding capital stock of, or other equity or voting interests in, each Subsidiary of the Company. All of the outstanding shares of capital stock of, or other equity or voting interests in, each Subsidiary of the Company are owned directly or indirectly by the Company, have been validly issued, were issued free of pre-emptive rights and are fully paid and non-assessable, and are free and clear of all Liens, including any restriction on the right to vote, sell or otherwise dispose of such capital stock or other equity or voting interests, except for any Liens imposed by applicable securities Laws. Except for the capital stock of, or other equity or voting interests in, Subsidiaries of the Company (or of another direct or indirect Subsidiary of the Company), the Company and each of its Subsidiaries do not own, or hold the right to acquire, directly or indirectly, any capital stock of, or other equity or voting interests (including any partnership interest or joint venture interest) in, any Person. There are no contractual obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to make in the future
Subsidiaries.
Section 4.01(b)
any loan to, or any investment (in the form of a capital contribution or otherwise) in, any Person other than a direct or indirect wholly-owned Subsidiary of the Company.
               
Section 4.02
Capital Structure.
          (a)           The authorized capital stock of the Company consists of: (i) 300,000,000 shares of Company Common Stock and (ii) 1,000,000 preferred shares, par value $1.00 per share, of the Company (the ""). As of the close of business on April 27, 2012 (the ""), (A) 116,825,954 shares of Company Common Stock were issued and outstanding, (B) 38,617,180 shares of Company Common Stock were issued and held by the Company in its treasury and (C) no shares of Company Preferred Stock were issued and outstanding or held by the Company in its treasury. Since the Measurement Date, no shares of Company Common Stock or shares of Company Preferred Stock have been issued, other than the issuance of shares of Company Common Stock upon the exercise or settlement of Company Equity Awards outstanding as of the Measurement Date. All of the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company are duly authorized and validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable and not subject to any pre-emptive rights. No Subsidiary of the Company owns any shares of Company Common Stock. Other than the Company Equity Awards, the Warrants, the Convertible Notes and the Top-Up Option, as of the date hereof, there are no outstanding, and there has not been reserved for issuance any, (A) shares of capital stock or other securities of the Company, (B) shares of capital stock or other securities of the Company convertible into or exchangeable for Voting Debt or shares of capital stock, voting securities or other ownership interests in the Company, (C) options, warrants or other agreements or commitments to acquire from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to issue, any Voting Debt or shares of capital stock, voting securities or other ownership interests in (or securities convertible into or exchangeable for shares of capital stock, voting securities or other ownership interests in) the Company, (D) restricted shares, restricted stock units, stock appreciation rights, performance shares, profit participation rights, contingent value rights, "phantom" stock or similar securities or rights that are derivative of, or provide economic benefits based on, directly or indirectly, the value or price of, any shares of capital stock or voting securities of or other ownership interests in the Company, in each case, that have been issued by the Company, or (E) equity equivalent interest in the ownership or earnings of the Company or other similar right (the items in clauses (A), (B), (C), (D) and (E), together with the capital stock of the Company, being referred to collectively as ""). All outstanding shares of Company Common Stock, all outstanding Company Equity Awards, all outstanding Warrants, all outstanding Convertible Notes, and all outstanding shares of capital stock, voting securities or other ownership interests in any Subsidiary of the Company, have been issued or granted, as applicable, in compliance in all material respects with all applicable securities Laws. Except as set forth in the Warrants, the indenture governing the Convertible Notes or the Company Stock Plans, there are no outstanding Contracts
Capital Stock.
Company Preferred Stock
Measurement Date
Company Securities
requiring the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any Company Securities or Company Subsidiary Securities. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is a party to or bound by any voting agreement, voting trust or other agreement or understanding with respect to any Company Securities or Company Subsidiary Securities, including the voting, purchase, transfer or registration thereof or preemptive rights with respect thereto.
          (b)          
Stock Awards.
                        (i)          As of the close of business on the Measurement Date, an aggregate of 9,378,430 shares of Company Common Stock were subject to issuance pursuant to Company Stock Rights or Company Stock Awards granted under the Company's 2010 Stock Award and Incentive Plan, 2004 Stock Award and Incentive Plan, 2003 Incentive Compensation Plan, 2003 Non-Employee Directors Compensation Plan, Non-Employee Directors Compensation Program, 2000 Associates' Stock Incentive Plan, 1999 Associates' Stock Incentive Plan, 1993 Employees' Stock Incentive Plan and 1988 Key Employee Stock Option Plan (the plans referred to immediately above and the award or other applicable agreements entered into thereunder, in each case as amended, are collectively referred to herein as the ""), and since the Measurement Date, no Company Equity Awards have been granted and no additional shares of Company Common Stock have become subject to issuance under the Company Stock Plans. of the Company Disclosure Letter sets forth as of the close of business on the Measurement Date a complete and accurate list of each outstanding Company Equity Award granted under the Company Stock Plans and (A) the number of shares of Company Common Stock subject to such outstanding Company Equity Award, (B) the exercise price, purchase price or similar pricing of such Company Equity Award, (C) the date on which such Company Equity Award was granted or issued, (D) with respect to Company Stock Rights, the date on which each such Company Stock Right expires and (E) the Company Stock Plan (if any) under which the Company Equity Award was granted or issued. All shares of Company Common Stock subject to issuance under the Company Stock Plans, upon issuance in accordance with the terms and conditions specified in the instruments pursuant to which they are issuable, will be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
Company Stock Plans
Section 4.02(b)(i)
                        (ii)          Except for the Company Stock Plans, and as set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter, there are no Contracts to which the Company is a party obligating the Company to accelerate the vesting of any Company Equity Award as a result of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (whether alone or upon the occurrence of any additional or subsequent events.
Section 3.07
Section 4.02(b)(ii)
          (c)           Except for the Convertible Notes, no bonds, debentures, notes or other indebtedness issued by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (i) having the right to vote on any matters on which shareholders or equityholders of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries may vote (or which is convertible into, or exchangeable for, securities having such right), or (ii) the value of which is directly based
Voting Debt; Warrants.
upon or derived from the capital stock, voting securities or other ownership interests of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, are issued or outstanding (collectively, ""). As of the date hereof, no options, warrants or other rights to acquire capital stock of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or any other contractual obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, are issued or outstanding that (without exercise or conversion, as applicable) provide to the holder thereof or counterparty thereto the right to vote on any matter on which shareholders or equityholders of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries may vote.
Voting Debt
          (d)          As of the date hereof, there are no outstanding, and there has not been reserved for issuance any, (i) securities of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company convertible into or exchangeable for Voting Debt or shares of capital stock, voting securities or other ownership interests in any Subsidiary of the Company, (ii) options, warrants or other agreements or commitments to acquire from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to issue, any Voting Debt, capital stock, voting securities or other ownership interests in (or securities convertible into or exchangeable for capital stock, voting securities or other ownership interests in) any Subsidiary of the Company, (iii) restricted shares, restricted stock units, stock appreciation rights, performance shares, profit participation rights, contingent value rights, "phantom" stock or similar securities or rights that are derivative of, or provide economic benefits based on, directly or indirectly, the value or price of, any capital stock or voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, any Subsidiary of the Company, in each case that have been issued by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) equity equivalent interest in the ownership or earnings of any Subsidiary of the Company or other similar right (the items in clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv), together with the capital stock, voting securities or other ownership interests of such Subsidiaries, being referred to collectively as "").
Company Subsidiary Securities.
Company Subsidiary Securities
               
Section 4.03
Authority; Non-contravention; Governmental Consents.
          (a)           The Company has all requisite corporate power and authority to enter into and to perform its obligations under this Agreement and each other agreement and instrument required by this Agreement to be entered into and performed by the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (collectively, with this Agreement, the ""), and, subject to, in the case of the consummation of the Merger, adoption of this Agreement by the affirmative vote or consent of a majority of the votes cast by all shareholders entitled to vote on this Agreement (the "") if required by applicable Law, to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby. The authorization, execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and each other Company Transaction Document by the Company and the consummation by the Company of the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by each Company Transaction Document, have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the
Authority.
Company Transaction Documents
Requisite Company Vote
Company and the Company Board and no other corporate proceedings on the part of the Company or the Company Board are necessary to authorize the execution and delivery of this Agreement or to consummate the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby, subject only, in the case of consummation of the Merger, to the receipt of the Requisite Company Vote if required by applicable Law. If approval of the holders of Company Common Stock is required by applicable Law, the Requisite Company Vote is the only vote or consent of the holders of any class or series of the Company's capital stock necessary to approve and adopt this Agreement, approve the Merger and consummate the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by each Company Transaction Document. This Agreement and each other Company Transaction Document have been duly executed and delivered by the Company (or, in the case of any Company Transaction Document to be executed and delivered hereafter, each such Company Transaction Document will have been duly executed and delivered as of the Closing Date) and, assuming due execution and delivery by Parent and Merger Sub, this Agreement and each other Company Transaction Document constitute (or, in the case of any Company Transaction Document to be executed and delivered hereafter, each such Company Transaction Document will constitute) the valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their respective terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, moratorium and other similar Laws affecting creditors rights generally and by general principles of equity.
          (b)           The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the other Company Transaction Documents by the Company, and the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, including the Offer and the Merger, do not and will not, directly or indirectly (with or without notice or the passage of time or both), (i) contravene or conflict with, or result in any violation or breach of, the Charter Documents or any effective resolutions of the Company Board, any committee thereof or the shareholders of the Company; (ii) subject to compliance with the requirements set forth in clauses (i) through (v) of and, in the case of the consummation of the Merger, obtaining the Requisite Company Vote if required by applicable Law, conflict with or violate any Law applicable to the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective properties or assets in any material respect; (iii) contravene or conflict with, or result in any violation or breach of, the Charter Documents or any effective resolutions of the board of directors (or equivalent body), any committee thereof or the shareholders (or equivalent body) of any of the Company's Subsidiaries; (iv) require any consent, approval or other action of any Person, that, if not granted or made, would result in any breach of or constitute a default (or an event that with or without notice or lapse of time or both would become a breach or default) under, any Company Material Contract described in ; (v) other than any required consents, approvals or other actions contemplated by clause (iv) above, conflict with, result in any material breach of or constitute a material default (or an event that with or without notice or lapse of time or both would become such a breach or default) under, any Company Material Contract described in ; (vi)
Non-contravention.
Section 4.03(c)
Section 4.13(a)(i)
Section 4.13(a)(i)
require any consent, approval or other action of any Person under, or conflict with, result in any breach of or constitute a default (or an event that with or without notice or lapse of time or both would become a breach or default) under any Company Material Contract described in through , except, in the case of this clause (vi), for any conflicts, breaches or defaults, or where the failure to obtain any consents or approvals or take any actions, in each case, would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect; or (vii) result in the creation, imposition or modification of a Lien (other than Permitted Liens) on or with respect to any of the material properties or assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
Sections 4.13(a)(ii)
(xxii)
          (c)           No consent, approval, order, exemption, authorization or other action of, or registration, declaration or filing with, or notice to (any of the foregoing being a ""), any federal, state, local or foreign government, or any instrumentality, subdivision, court, administrative agency or commission thereof or other governmental or quasi-governmental authority (including any governmental agency, branch, department, court or tribunal, or other entity) (a "") is required to be obtained or made by the Company in connection with the execution, delivery and performance by the Company of this Agreement and the other Company Transaction Documents or the consummation by the Company of the Offer, the Merger and other transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, except for: (i) the filing of the Certificate of Merger with the Department of State of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania; (ii) the filing with the SEC in accordance with the Exchange Act of (A) the Schedule 14D-9, (B) if required by applicable Laws, the letter to the shareholders of the Company, notice of meeting, proxy statement and forms of proxy (collectively, the ""), and (C) such filings under the Exchange Act as may be required in connection with this Agreement, the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (iii) such Consents as may be required under (A) the HSR Act or (B) any foreign Laws that are designed or intended to prohibit, restrict or regulate actions having the purpose or effect of monopolization or restraint of trade or significant impediments or lessening of competition or creation or strengthening of a dominant position through merger or acquisition ("" and, together with the HSR Act, the ""), in any case that are applicable to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (iv) such Consents as may be required under applicable state securities or "blue sky" Laws or the rules and regulations of NASDAQ; (v) the other Consents of Governmental Entities listed on of the Company Disclosure Letter; and (vi) such other Consents with or to any state (other than the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania), local or foreign Governmental Entity which if not obtained or made would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect.
Governmental Consents.
Consent
Governmental Entity
Company Proxy Statement
Foreign Antitrust Laws
Antitrust Laws
Section 4.03(c)
          (d)           The Company Board, by resolutions duly adopted by vote at a meeting of the Company Board duly called and held and, as of the date hereof, not subsequently rescinded or modified in any way, has, as of the date hereof (i)
Board Approval.
unanimously determined that this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, including the Offer and the Merger, are fair to, and in the best interests of, the Company's shareholders, (ii) approved and declared advisable this Agreement and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including the Offer and the Merger, in each case, in accordance with the BCL, (iii) if required by applicable Laws, directed that this Agreement be submitted to Company's shareholders for adoption, and (iv) resolved to recommend that Company's shareholders accept the Offer, tender their shares of Company Common Stock pursuant to the Offer and, if required by applicable Laws, adopt this Agreement and approve the Merger (collectively, the "").
Company Board Recommendation
          (e)           Except for an exemptive filing under the Pennsylvania Takeover Disclosure Law, no Takeover Statute (other than Sections 1921 through 1930 of the BCL and provisions of the BCL generally applicable to the powers of a corporation and the duties and powers of its board of directors in a takeover context, including Sections 1502(a)(18), 1525(b), 1715 and 2513) applies to the Company with respect to the Offer, the Merger, this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. The Company Board has taken all action so that Parent will not be prohibited from entering into a "business combination" (as such term is used in the BCL) with the Company as a result of this Agreement, the Offer, the Merger or the consummation of the other transactions contemplated hereby, without any further action on the part of the Company's shareholders or the Company Board.
Takeover Statutes.
               
Section 4.04
SEC Filings; Financial Statements; Internal Controls; Certain Loans.
          (a)           The Company has timely filed with or furnished to, as applicable, the SEC all reports, schedules, forms, statements, certifications and other documents (including exhibits and all other information incorporated by reference) required to be filed or furnished by it with the SEC since January 1, 2010 (such documents, as supplemented or amended since the time of filing, and together with all information incorporated by reference therein, the ""). As of their respective filing dates (or, if amended or superseded by a subsequent filing, as of the date of the last such amendment or superseding filing prior to the date hereof), each of the Company SEC Documents (including any financial statements, schedules or exhibits included or incorporated by reference therein) complied as to form in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, and the rules and regulations of the SEC thereunder applicable to such Company SEC Documents. None of the Company SEC Documents, including any financial statements or schedules included or incorporated by reference therein, at the time they were filed (or, if amended or superseded by a subsequent filing, as of the date of the last such amendment or superseding filing prior to the date hereof), contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made,
SEC Filings.
Company SEC Documents
not misleading. None of the Company's Subsidiaries is required to file or furnish any reports, schedules, forms or other documents with the SEC.
          (b)           Each of the consolidated financial statements (including, in each case, any related notes and schedules thereto) contained in the Company SEC Documents: (i) was prepared in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved ("") (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto and, in the case of unaudited interim financial statements, as may be permitted by the SEC for Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q); and (ii) fairly presented in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries at the respective dates thereof and the consolidated results of the Company's operations and cash flows for the periods indicated therein, subject, in the case of unaudited interim financial statements, to normal and year-end audit adjustments as permitted by GAAP and the applicable rules and regulations of the SEC. The books of account and other financial records of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries are true and complete in all material respects. Other than as disclosed in the Company SEC Documents, there has been no material change in the Company's accounting methods or principles that would be required to be disclosed in the Company's financial statements in accordance with GAAP.
Financial Statements.
GAAP
          (c)           Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has or is subject to any "off-balance sheet arrangement" (as defined in Item 303(a)(4)(ii) of Regulation S-K promulgated under the Securities Act), where the result, purpose or intended effect of such arrangement is to avoid disclosure of any material transaction involving, or material liabilities of, the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company in the Company's or such Subsidiary's published financial statements or other Company SEC Documents.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements.
          (d)           The Company maintains a system of "internal controls over financial reporting" (as defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) of the Exchange Act) that is designed to provide reasonable assurance (i) that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with GAAP, (ii) that receipts and expenditures of the Company and its Subsidiaries are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and the Company Board, (iii) regarding prevention or timely detection of the unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the Company's and its Subsidiaries' assets that could have a material effect on the Company's consolidated financial statements, (iv) that access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization and (v) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.
Internal Controls.
          (e)           Since January 1, 2010, the Company has not received any written notification of a (i) "reportable condition" or (ii)
Reportable Condition; Material Weakness.
"material weakness" in the Company's internal controls over financial reporting. The terms "reportable condition" and "material weakness" shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Statements of Auditing Standards 112, as in effect on the date of this Agreement.
          (f)           The Company has provided or made available to Parent copies of all correspondence sent to or received from the SEC by the Company or its Subsidiaries or their respective counsel or accountants on behalf of the Company since January 1, 2010. As of the date of this Agreement, there are no outstanding or unresolved comments in comment letters received from the SEC staff with respect to any Company SEC Documents.
SEC Correspondence.
          (g)           The Company's "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) of the Exchange Act) are designed to provide reasonable assurance that all information (both financial and non-financial) required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the rules and forms of the SEC, and that all such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure and to make the certifications of the chief executive officer and chief financial officer of the Company required under the Exchange Act with respect to such reports.
Disclosure Controls and Procedures.
          (h)          Since January 1, 2010, no attorney representing the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, whether or not employed by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, has reported to the Company's chief legal counsel or chief executive officer evidence of a material violation of securities Laws, breach of fiduciary duty or similar violation by the Company or any of its officers, directors, employees or agents pursuant to Section 307 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (the ""). Since January 1, 2010, to the Knowledge of the Company, no employee of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has provided or is providing information to any Governmental Entity regarding the commission or possible commission of any crime or the violation or possible violation of any applicable legal requirements of the type described in Section 806 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
          (i)           The audited balance sheet of the Company dated as of January 28, 2012 contained in the Company SEC Documents filed prior to the date hereof is hereinafter referred to as the "." Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any Liabilities of a nature required to be set forth on a balance sheet prepared in accordance with GAAP or described in the notes thereto other than Liabilities that (i) are reflected or recorded on the Company Balance Sheet (including in the notes thereto), (ii) were incurred since the date of the Company Balance Sheet in the ordinary course of business, (iii) are incurred in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (iv) have been discharged or paid in full prior to the date of this Agreement, or (v) are not and would not reasonably be expected
Undisclosed Liabilities.
Company Balance Sheet
to be, individually or in the aggregate, material to the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
               Since the date of the Company Balance Sheet, except in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, (a) the business of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has been conducted in all material respects in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, (b) there has not been or occurred any event, occurrence, fact, effect, development, condition or change that has had, or would reasonably be expected to have, either individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect and (c) none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has taken any action that, if taken after the date of this Agreement, would constitute a breach of any of the covenants set forth in .
Section 4.05
Absence of Certain Changes or Events.
Section 6.01
               
Section 4.06
Taxes.
          (a)           The Company and each of its Subsidiaries have duly and timely filed or caused to be filed (giving effect to all extensions) all federal Tax Returns and material state, local or other Tax Returns required to be filed by them. Such Tax Returns were and are true, complete and correct in all material respects. All federal Taxes and material state, local or other Taxes due and owing by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (whether or not shown on any Tax Return) have been timely and fully paid or, where payment is not yet due, an adequate provision for such Taxes has been made in the Company's financial statements (in accordance with GAAP). The Company's most recent financial statements reflect an adequate reserve (in accordance with GAAP) for all federal Taxes and material state, local or other Taxes payable by the Company and its Subsidiaries through the date of such financial statements. Since the date of the Company's most recent financial statements, no federal Taxes or material state, local or other Taxes have accrued with respect to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries other than Taxes arising in the ordinary course of business.
Tax Returns and Payment of Taxes.
          (b)          The Company and each of its Subsidiaries has, in all material respects, withheld, and paid over as required, each Tax required to have been withheld in connection with amounts paid or owing to any Employee, independent contractor, creditor, customer, shareholder or other party, and complied with all information reporting and backup withholding provisions of applicable Law.
Withholding.
          (c)           There are no Liens for federal Taxes or material state, local or other Taxes upon any of the assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries other than for current Taxes not yet due or for Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which adequate reserves, to the extent required by GAAP, have been established.
Liens.
          (d)          No deficiency for any amount of federal Taxes or material state, local or other Taxes has been proposed, asserted or assessed in writing by any taxing authority against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries during the past five (5) years and no such earlier deficiency remains unpaid. There are no waivers or extensions of any statute of limitations currently in effect with respect to material Taxes of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. There are no audits, suits, proceedings, investigations, claims, examinations or other administrative or judicial proceedings ongoing or pending with respect to any Taxes of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
Tax Deficiencies and Audits.
          (e)           From January 1, 2009 to the date hereof, no material claim has been made in writing by any taxing authority of a jurisdiction where the Company and its Subsidiaries do not file Tax Returns that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is or may be subject to Taxes in that jurisdiction.
Tax Jurisdictions.
          (f)           Neither Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has agreed to make, nor is it required to make, any adjustment under Section 481(a) of the Code or any similar provision of state, local or foreign Tax law by reason of a change in accounting method or otherwise and there is no application pending with any taxing authority requesting permission for any change in any accounting method for Tax purposes and no taxing authority has proposed any such adjustment or change in accounting method.
Change in Accounting Method.
          (g)           Neither Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has been a "distributing corporation" or a "controlled corporation" (within the meaning of Section 355(a)(1)(A) of the Code) in connection with a distribution of stock qualifying for tax-free treatment under Section 355 of the Code prior to the date of this Agreement or in a distribution which could otherwise constitute part of a "plan" or "series of related transactions" (within the meaning of Section 355(e) of the Code) in conjunction with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Section 355.
          (h)           Neither Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has been a party to, or a promoter of, a "reportable transaction" within the meaning of Section 6707A(c)(1) of the Code and Treasury Regulations Section 1.6011-4(b).
Reportable Transactions.
          (i)           The Company has made available to Parent correct and complete copies of all federal and unitary and combined state income Tax Returns filed for Company and its Subsidiaries for the taxable years ended in January 2009, 2010, and 2011.
Income Tax Returns.
          (j)           Neither Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has requested a ruling in respect of Taxes during the past five (5) years from any Governmental Entity.
Pending Tax Ruling Requests.
          (k)          . No closing agreement pursuant to Section 7121 of the Code (or any similar provision of state, local or foreign Law) or any ruling with respect to Taxes has been entered into by or issued with respect to the Company or any of
Closing Agreements
its Subsidiaries, in each case, that will bind the Company or any of its Subsidiaries for any taxable period after the Closing.
          (l)          . Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is a party to or bound by any Tax Sharing Agreement (other than one exclusively between or among the Company and its Subsidiaries).
Tax Sharing Agreements
          (m)        . Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries (i) has, since January 1, 2006, been a member of an affiliated or similar group filing a consolidated, combined, unitary or similar income Tax Return, other than the affiliated groups of which the Company is the common parent corporation, or (ii) has any liability for Taxes of any person (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries) under Treasury Regulations Section 1.1502-6 (or any similar provision of state, local or foreign law), as a transferee or successor, by agreement or otherwise.
Consolidated Tax Groups
          (n)          . The Company and all of its Subsidiaries are classified as corporations or as disregarded entities for U.S. federal income tax purposes.
Entity Classification
          (o)           The Company and each of its Subsidiaries has, since January 1, 2009, complied in all material respects with all statutes and regulations relating to the accounting for and paying over of unclaimed or abandoned funds or other property.
Unclaimed Funds.
          (p)           Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries will be required to include in gross income of a taxable period ending on or after the Closing Date income or gain attributable to cash received, an account receivable that arose or an installment sale or other transaction that was consummated, in a prior taxable period, or an election under Section 108(i) of the Code that was made with respect to a prior taxable period.
Tax Deferral.
          (q)          The Company and each of its Subsidiaries has, since January 1, 2009, complied in all material respects with all statutes and regulations relating to customs duties and has fully paid all customs duties that were due.
Customs Duties.
          (r)           As of January 28, 2012, the amounts of the net operating loss carryovers, general business credit carryovers and charitable contribution limitation carryovers of the Company and its Subsidiaries for federal income tax purposes, and the unitary state net operating loss carryovers of the Company and its Subsidiaries, were as set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter, and no such attribute is subject to a limitation under Section 382 of the Code except as set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter.
Tax Attributes.
Section 4.06(r)
Section 4.06(r)
          (s)          . The Company does not track the tax basis of its Subsidiaries as a matter of regular practice and does not have Knowledge of any material excess loss account, within the meaning of Treasury Regulations Section 1.1502-19, or similar account or amount under any state or local Tax law, that exists with respect to any Subsidiary of the Company.
Excess Loss Accounts
          (t)          . To the Company's Knowledge, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any material deferred gain or loss arising from a deferred intercompany transaction, within the meaning of Treasury Regulations Section 1.1502-13, or with respect to the stock or obligations of any member of the Company's affiliated group, as provided for in Treasury Regulations Section 1.1502-13.
Deferred Intercompany Transactions
               
Section 4.07
Intellectual Property.
          (a)           of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a true, complete and accurate list, as of the date hereof, of all material Company-Owned IP that is the subject of any issuance, registration, certificate, application or other filing by, to or with any Governmental Entity or authorized private registrar, including all registered trademarks, registered copyrights, issued patents, domain name registrations and pending applications for any of the foregoing.
Certain Company-Owned IP.
Section 4.07(a)
          (b)           The Company or one of its Subsidiaries is the sole and exclusive owner of all right, title and interest in and to, or has the valid right to use all Intellectual Property used or held for use in or necessary for the conduct of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries as currently conducted (""), free and clear of all Liens (other than Permitted Liens), except for any such failures to own, be licensed or otherwise possess rights as would not have a Company Material Adverse Effect. Other than as would not, individually or in the aggregate, be material to the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not result in the loss or impairment of rights in or to use any Company IP or payment of any additional amounts with respect to any Company IP, nor will the consummation of such transactions require the consent of any other Person in respect of any Company IP.
Right to Use; Title.
Company IP
          (c)           The Company or one of its Subsidiaries is the sole and exclusive beneficial and record owner of all material Company-Owned IP, and all such Company-Owned IP is valid and subsisting and, to the Knowledge of the Company, enforceable. All such Company-Owned IP that has been registered (or for which applications for registration are currently pending) has been properly maintained by all requisite filings, renewals and payments, except as would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect.
Validity and Enforceability.
          (d)           of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a true, complete and accurate list of all material Company IP Agreements, other than licenses for shrink-wrap, clickwrap or other similar commercially available off-the-shelf software that is licensed to the Company and/or a Subsidiary involving future one-time or annual fees of less than $150,000.
Company IP Agreements.
Section 4.07(d)
          (e)           There are no Legal Actions pending or, to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened in writing: (i) alleging any infringement,
IP Legal Actions and Orders.
misappropriation or other violation of the Intellectual Property of any Person by or on behalf of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries; (ii) alleging infringement, misappropriation or other violation of any of the Company IP by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries against any Person; or (iii) challenging the validity, enforceability or ownership of any Company-Owned IP or the Company or any of its Subsidiaries' rights to use any Company IP (including interference, reexamination, opposition, nullity or cancellation proceedings) that, in the case of clauses (i) through (iii), if settled or adversely determined, in each case, would reasonably be expected to result, individually or in the aggregate, in material liability or cost to the Company or the loss or impairment of material rights in or to any of the material Company IP. The operation of the business and the exploitation of products thereof has not and does not in any material respect infringe on or misappropriate the Intellectual Property rights of any other Person. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received any written claim or request that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries must license or refrain from using any Intellectual Property of any other Person), and neither
the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received in writing any claim or notice of any such infringement claims, except for such infringement, claims or notices thereof that would not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to be material to the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole. The Company and its Subsidiaries are not subject to any outstanding Order, settlement agreement or covenant not to sue that limits, restricts or impairs in any manner any material rights of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to use, license, transfer or enforce of any Company-Owned IP.
          (f)          The Company and its Subsidiaries have taken all commercially reasonable steps to maintain and protect the secrecy, confidentiality and value of all material proprietary information and trade secrets used in the Company's and its Subsidiaries' businesses, including requiring all consultants and contractors with access to trade secrets or proprietary information of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to execute binding confidentiality agreements and, to the Knowledge of the Company, no such consultant or contractor is in breach of any such confidentiality agreement.
Confidentiality; Assignment.
          (g)         Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has granted to any Person an exclusive license or equivalent right with respect to any Company-Owned IP, or assigned or conveyed to any Person any ownership interest (including joint ownership rights) therein, and no third party owns or holds any such right, license or interest.
Grant of Rights.
          (h)          The Company's and its Subsidiaries' practices are, and since January 1, 2010 have been, in compliance in all material respects with their then-current privacy policies, including the privacy policies posted on the Company's and its Subsidiaries' websites. The Company and its Subsidiaries have conducted their businesses and maintained their data at all times since January 1, 2010 in compliance in all material respects with all applicable Laws, including the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard, the Fair Credit Reporting Act and the Graham-Leech Bliley Act.
Privacy Practices.
          (i)          All data which has been collected, stored, maintained or otherwise used by the Company and any of its Subsidiaries has been collected, stored, maintained and used in compliance in all material respects with all applicable U.S. and foreign Laws. None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has received written notice of noncompliance with applicable data protection Laws. The Company and its Subsidiaries have made all material registrations that Company and its Subsidiaries are required to have made in relation to the processing of data, and are in good standing with respect to such registrations, with all fees due as of the date hereof and the Closing Date duly made.
Data Storage and Usage.
          (j)          The Company and its Subsidiaries have implemented commercially reasonable practices to ensure the physical and electronic protection of its information assets from unauthorized disclosure, use or modification. There has been no breach of security involving any information assets.
Information Assets.
          (k)          The Company Proprietary Software has not been delivered or made available to any Person (other than the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and employees of the Company or any Subsidiaries and any other Persons in connection with their provision of services to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries) in source code form, and the Company and its Subsidiaries have not agreed to, or undertaken to provide, the Company Proprietary Software in source code form to any other Person. There are no third parties entitled to: (i) be enrolled as a beneficiary under a technology escrow arrangement or otherwise with respect to the source code for the Company Proprietary Software or (ii) receive the source code for the Company Proprietary Software (including receiving the source code as a result of an event (including a change of control of ownership of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, bankruptcy of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or otherwise) under an escrow arrangement or otherwise).
Proprietary Software.
               
Section 4.08
Compliance; Permits.
          (a)           The Company and each of its Subsidiaries is and, since January 1, 2010, has been in compliance in all material respects with, all Laws or Orders applicable to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or by which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective businesses or properties is bound. None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has, since January 1, 2009, been threatened in writing to be charged with or been given any written notice of, nor, to the Company's Knowledge, is under investigation with respect to, any violation of any applicable Law, other than any such that have been resolved or as would not, individually or in the aggregate, be material to the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
Compliance.
          (b)           The Company and its Subsidiaries hold, to the extent legally required to operate their respective businesses as such businesses are being operated as of the date hereof, all permits, licenses, registrations, certificates, consents and approvals from Governmental Entities (collectively, ""), except for any Permits for which
Permits.
Permits
the failure to obtain or hold would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect. The Company and each of its Subsidiaries is and, since January 1, 2010, has been in compliance with the terms of all Permits, except where the failure to be in such compliance would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect. All Permits necessary for the Company and its Subsidiaries to operate their respective businesses as currently conducted are in full force and effect, except for any Permits for which the failure to be in full force and effect would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect. Since January 1, 2010, none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has received written notice that the Person issuing or authorizing any material Permit intends to terminate, or will not renew or reissue, any material Permit upon its expiration.
               There is no claim, action, suit, arbitration, proceeding or governmental investigation (each, a ""), overtly pending, or to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened in writing against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective properties, assets or businesses or any executive officer, director or employee of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in their capacities as such, in each case, by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Entity, that (i) if settled or adversely determined, would reasonably be expected to result in a settlement or adverse judgment in an amount (including reasonable attorney's fees) in excess of $500,000, or (ii) challenges any Company Transaction Document or the transactions contemplated thereby. None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is subject to any order, writ, assessment, decision, injunction, decree, ruling, award or judgment of a Governmental Entity or arbitrator, whether temporary, preliminary or permanent (""), which would be reasonably expected to prevent, delay or materially and adversely affect the Company's ability to consummate the transactions contemplated by any Company Transaction Document. As of the date of this Agreement, there is no material Legal Action by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries currently pending or which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries intends to initiate.
Section 4.09
Litigation.
Legal Action
Order
               
Section 4.10
Employee Matters.
          (a)           of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a complete and accurate list, as of the date hereof, of all "employee benefit plans" as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA, and all other material medical, dental, life insurance, equity, bonus or other incentive compensation, disability, salary continuation, severance, retention, retirement, pension, deferred compensation, vacation, sick pay or paid time off plans or policies, and any other material plans, agreements (including material employment, consulting and collective bargaining agreements) policies, trust funds or any other similar arrangements (whether written or unwritten, insured or self-insured) established, sponsored, maintained or contributed to (or with respect to which any obligation to contribute has been undertaken) by the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or any ERISA
Section 4.10(a)
Affiliate for the benefit of any current or former employee, director or other service provider of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or their beneficiaries (each, a ""), or with respect to which the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or any ERISA Affiliate has or may have any material Liability (contingent or actual) (collectively, together with any such agreements that are not material, the "").
Company Employee
Company Employee Plans
          (b)          As of the date hereof, the Company has made available to Parent: (i) copies of all material documents setting forth the terms of each Company Employee Plan (other than documents relating to agreements that are not material, whether individually or in the aggregate), including all amendments thereto and all related trust documents; (ii) the three (3) most recent annual reports (Form Series 5500), if any, required under ERISA or the Code in connection with each Company Employee Plan; (iii) the three (3) most recent actuarial reports (if any) for each Company Employee Plan; (iv) the most recent summary plan description, if any, required under ERISA with respect to each Company Employee Plan; (v) all material written contracts, instruments or agreements relating to each Company Employee Plan (other than a Company Employee Plan that is not material), including administrative service agreements and group insurance contracts (if any) with respect to each such Company Employee Plan; (vi) the most recent IRS determination or opinion letter (if any) issued with respect to each Company Employee Plan intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code; and (vii) any and all filings pending or made within the past three (3) years under the IRS' Employee Plans Compliance Resolution System ("") or any of its predecessors or the Department of Labor Delinquent Filer Program or other government correction program with respect to any Company Employee Plan, and any documents relating to the self-correction of any Company Employee Plan made within the past three (3) years under EPCRS or other government correction program.
EPCRS
          (c)          All Company Employee Plans (other than agreements that are not individually or in the aggregate material) comply in form and have been maintained and administered in all material respects in compliance with their terms and applicable Laws, including the provisions of ERISA and the Code. With respect to each Company Employee Plan, (i) each such plan that is intended to be qualified within the meaning of Section 401(a) of the Code is so qualified and is the subject of a favorable determination or opinion letter as to its qualification, and nothing has occurred, whether by action or failure to act, that caused or, to the Knowledge of the Company, would reasonably be expected to cause the loss of such qualification; (ii) all contributions required under the terms of each Company Employee Plan (including any collective bargaining agreement or other agreement) or under applicable Law have been made within the time required by such Laws, the terms of such Company Employee Plan and GAAP, as applicable; (iii) there have been no "prohibited transactions" (as described in Section 4975 of the Code or in Part 4 of Subtitle B of Title I of ERISA), and, to the Knowledge of the Company, none are reasonably expected to occur, with respect to any Company Employee Plan (other than those for which an administrative, statutory or regulatory exemption is available);
(iv) there are no material inquiries, proceedings, claims or suits pending or, to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened in writing against any Company Employee Plan (other than claims for benefits and appeals of such claims), or, with respect to their capacities in relation to the Company Employee Plans only, against any trustee or fiduciaries of the Company Employee Plans, any employee, director or other service provider of the Company or its Subsidiaries (whether current or former or retired), or any of the assets of any trust of any of the Company Employee Plans; (v) except as set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter, no Company Employee Plan is under, and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received any notice of, an audit or investigation by the Internal Revenue Service, Department of Labor or any other Governmental Entity, and no such audit completed in the last two (2) years, if any, has resulted in the imposition of any material Tax or penalty; (vi) with respect to each Company Employee Plan that is funded mostly or partially through an insurance policy, none of the Company, its Subsidiaries or any ERISA Affiliate currently has any material liability in the nature of retroactive rate adjustment, loss sharing arrangement or other actual or contingent material liability arising wholly or partially out of events occurring on or before the date of this Agreement or is reasonably expected to have such liability with respect to periods through the Effective Time; and (vii) there are no loans by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to any of their respective executive officers or directors, except to the extent such loans were made consistent with the terms of a plan that is intended to be a "qualified plan" for purposes of Section 401(a) of the Code.
Section 4.10(c)(v)
          (d)          Except as set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter, none of the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or any ERISA Affiliate, or any of their predecessors, contributes (or is obligated to contribute) to a "multiemployer plan" (as such term is defined in ERISA Section 3(37)), a "defined benefit plan" (as such term is defined in ERISA Section 3(35)) or any "single-employer plan" (as such term is defined in ERISA Section 4001(a)(15)) and, during the six-year period ending on the Effective Time, none of the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or any ERISA Affiliate, or any of their predecessors, has contributed or been obligated to contribute to, or has had any material liabilities (contingent or otherwise) under, such a plan.
Section 4.10(d)
          (e)          Except as otherwise provided in this Agreement, the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein, alone or in combination with any other event, will not give rise to any material liability, whether individually or in the aggregate, under any Company Employee Plan, including (i) entitling any Company Employee to severance pay or any other payment upon termination or (ii) accelerating the time of payment or vesting of, or increase the amount of, compensation or benefits due to any such individual. No amount payable (whether in cash or property or the vesting of property) as a result of the consummation of the Merger to any employee, director or other service provider of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries under any Company Employee Plan or otherwise would not be deductible by reason of Section 162(m) or Section 280G of the Code or would be subject to an excise tax under Section 4999 of the Code. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any indemnity obligation on or after the
Effective Time for any Taxes imposed under Section 4999 or 409A of the Code. The Company has provided materially correct estimates (based on the assumptions stated in such estimates) of the following to Parent: (A) the maximum amount that could be paid to each individual who could reasonably be a "disqualified individual" (as such term is defined in Treasury Regulations Section 1.280G1) entitled to receive a "parachute payment" (as such term is defined in Treasury Regulations Section 1.280G-1) in connection with the Merger under all employment, severance and termination agreements currently in effect and under all other compensation arrangements and Company Employee Plans currently in effect, assuming that the individual's employment with the Company or its Subsidiaries is terminated immediately following the Effective Time, (B) the "base amount" (as defined in Section 280G(b)(e) of the Code) for each such individual as of the date of this Agreement, and (C) the vesting schedule (including any acceleration provisions with respect thereto) for each outstanding Company Stock Right and Company Stock Award or other equity award held by each such individual as of the date of this Agreement.
          (f)          Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has unfunded liabilities pursuant to any Company Employee Plan that is not intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code that are not fully reflected on the Company's financial statements. Each Company Employee Plan that is a "nonqualified deferred compensation plan" (as defined under Section 409A(d)(1) of the Code) has been operated and administered in all material respects in compliance with Section 409A of the Code and, if any amendments were reasonably necessary, has been timely amended to comply with Section 409A of the Code.
          (g)           No Taxes have been incurred by any Company Employee Plan and no events have taken place that would subject any Company Employee Plan to any Tax under Section 4980B of the Code or under Section 4980D of the Code. All Company Employee Plans have been operated in all material respects in compliance, including documental compliance, with all requirements applicable to each individual plan under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010) and under Part 7 of ERISA. Neither the Company nor any ERISA Affiliate has contributed to a nonconforming group health plan (as defined in Section 5000(c) of the Code) and no ERISA Affiliate has incurred a Tax under Section 5000(a) of the Code which is or could reasonably be expected to become a Liability of the Company or an ERISA Affiliate.
          (h)          Other than such continuation of benefit coverage under group health plans as is required by applicable Law, no Company Employee Plan provides and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries maintains any other arrangement or plans providing for post-retirement health and welfare benefits for any current or former Company Employee or any beneficiary of any such employee after the employee's termination of employment.
          (i)          None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or, to the Knowledge of the Company, any employee, director or other service provider of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, has made any promises or commitments to create any additional Company Employee Plan or to modify or change in any material way any existing Company Employee Plan.
          (j)          Except as would not be expected to give rise to a material liability, individually or in the aggregate, (i) any individual who performs services for the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and who is not treated as an employee for federal income Tax purposes by the Company or its Subsidiaries is not an employee under applicable federal Law or Company Employee Plan purposes; (ii) the Company and its Subsidiaries have no liability by reason of an individual who performs or performed services for the Company or its Subsidiaries in any capacity being improperly excluded from participating in a Company Employee Plan; and (iii) each employee of the Company and its Subsidiaries has been properly classified as "exempt" or "non-exempt" under applicable Law.
          (k)         Each Company Stock Right (i) has an exercise or base price at least equal to the fair market value of Company Common Stock on a date no earlier than the date of the corporate action authorizing the grant, (ii) no Company Stock Right has had its exercise date or grant date delayed or "back-dated" and (iii) all Company Stock Rights have been issued in compliance in all material respects with all applicable Laws and properly accounted for in all material respects in accordance with GAAP.
          (l)          Except as set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter, no Company Employee Plan is mandated by a government other than the United States or is subject to the Laws of a jurisdiction outside of the United States. With respect to each Company Employee Plan that is mandated by a government other than the United States or subject to the Laws of a jurisdiction outside of the United States (each, a ""), the fair market value of the assets of each funded Foreign Company Plan, the liability of each insurer for any Foreign Company Plan funded through insurance or the book reserve established for any Foreign Company Plan, together with any accrued contributions, is sufficient to procure or provide for the accrued benefit obligations, as of the date of this Agreement, with respect to all current and former participants in such Foreign Company Plan according to the actuarial assumptions and valuations most recently used to determine employer contributions to such Foreign Company Plan, and no transaction contemplated by this Agreement shall cause such assets or insurance obligations to be less than such benefit obligations.
Section 4.10(l)
Foreign Company Plan
          (m)         The Company and each of its Subsidiaries: (i) is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable Laws respecting hiring, employment, termination of employment, plant closing and mass layoff, employment discrimination, harassment, retaliation and reasonable accommodation, leaves of absence, wages and hours of work, employee health and safety, worker's compensation, leasing and supply of temporary and contingent staff, engagement of independent contractors,
Employment Law Matters.
including proper classification of same and immigration with respect to Company Employees; and (ii) is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable Laws relating to the relations between it and any labor organization, trade union, work council or other body representing Company Employees, other than as would not, individually or in the aggregate, be material to the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
          (n)          Neither Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is party to, or subject to, any collective bargaining agreement or other agreement with any labor organization, trade union or work council with respect to any of its or their operations. No material work stoppage, slowdown or labor strike against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to employees who are employed within the United States is pending, threatened in writing or has occurred since January 1, 2009. To the Knowledge of the Company, no material work stoppage, slowdown or labor strike against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to employees who are employed outside the United States is pending, threatened in writing or has occurred since January 1, 2009. As of the date hereof, none of the Company Employees are represented by a labor organization, trade union or work council and, to the Knowledge of the Company, there is no organizing activity, Legal Action, election petition, union card signing or other union activity or union corporate campaigns of or by any labor organization, trade union or work council directed at the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or at any Company Employees.
Labor.
          (o)          There are no (and during the past three (3) years there have not been any) Legal Actions or labor grievances pending, or the Knowledge of the Company, threatened in writing relating to any employment-related matter involving any Company Employee or applicant, including charges of unlawful discrimination, retaliation or harassment, failure to provide reasonable accommodation, denial of a leave of absence, failure to provide compensation or benefits, unfair labor practices or other alleged violations of Law, other than as would not, individually or in the aggregate, be material to the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
Labor and Employment Claims.
          Section 4.11     Real Property and Personal Property Matters.
          (a)          The Company or one of its Subsidiaries has good and marketable fee simple title to each parcel of Owned Real Estate, free and clear of all Liens other than the Permitted Liens. of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a complete and accurate list of the street address of each parcel of Owned Real Estate and, except as disclosed on of the Company Disclosure Letter, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries owns any other real property in fee simple. of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a complete and accurate list of the most recent title insurance policies issued to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries relating to the Owned Real Estate. To the Company's Knowledge, there are no tax abatements or exemptions specifically affecting any Owned Real Estate. Except as set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter, the Company or one of
Owned Real Estate.
Section 4.11(a)
Section 4.11(a)
Section 4.11(a)
Section 4.11(a)
its Subsidiaries is in possession of each parcel of Owned Real Estate, and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries currently leases to any third party or allows any third party to occupy all or any part of the Owned Real Estate. The Company has provided or made available to Parent true, complete and correct copies of the most recent tax bills for each parcel of Owned Real Estate. No Owned Real Estate is comprised of or includes a tax lot that also encompasses property that is not wholly a part of such Owned Real Estate. There is no condemnation, eminent domain or similar Legal Action affecting any Owned Real Estate or any portion thereof overtly pending, or to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened in writing against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. The Company has not received any written notice of any action, claim or proceeding that is reasonably likely to result in the termination of the existing access to any parcel of Owned Real Estate.
          (b)           Except as are not and would not reasonably be expected to be material, individually or in the aggregate, to the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, the Company or one of its Subsidiaries has a valid and subsisting leasehold estate in each parcel of Leased Real Estate, free and clear of all Liens other than Permitted Liens. of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a complete and accurate list of the street address of each parcel of Leased Real Estate (other than Leased Real Estate subject to a Store Lease) and the identification of the lessee and lessor thereunder and, except as disclosed on of the Company Disclosure Letter and except for the Store Leased Real Estate, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is the lessee or sublessee of any real property. The Owned Real Estate and the Leased Real Estate comprise all of the material real property used in the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries (other than adjunct facilities that are not material to the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries (e.g., storage lockers)). of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a complete and accurate list of the most recent title insurance policies issued to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries relating to the Ground Leased Real Estate. Each Lease (except to the extent it has previously expired in accordance with its terms) is valid and in full force and effect, and constitutes a valid and binding obligation of the Company or its applicable Subsidiary and, to the Company's Knowledge, each other party thereto, enforceable against the Company or its applicable Subsidiary and, to the Company's Knowledge, each other party thereto in accordance with its terms in all material respects, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy Laws, other similar Laws affecting creditors' rights and general principles of equity. The Company or one of its Subsidiaries is in possession of each parcel of Leased Real Estate and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries currently leases to any third party or allows any third party to occupy all or any part of the Leased Real Estate. Except as are not and would not reasonably be expected to be material, individually or in the aggregate to the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, (i) neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is or is alleged to be in violation of any Lease or in default in respect thereof, nor has there occurred any event or condition which (with or without notice or lapse of time or both)
Leased Real Estate.
Section 4.11(b)
Section 4.11(b)
Section 4.11(b)
would constitute a violation thereof or a default thereunder, and (ii) to the Company's Knowledge, no other party to any Lease is or is alleged to be in violation thereof or in default in respect thereof in any material respect, nor has there occurred any event or condition which (with or without notice or lapse of time or both) would constitute a material violation thereof or a material default thereunder. Except as set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received written notice of termination or cancellation of any Lease (except upon expiration thereof in accordance with its terms), or written notice of a material breach or default under any Lease which remains uncured. Except as otherwise provided in in connection with the Store Leases, the Company has provided or made available to Parent true, complete and correct copies of each Lease affecting any Leased Real Estate, including all amendments and supplements thereto. None of the Leases is guaranteed by a third party other than the Company. Except for (A) the Store Leases, (B) Leases in respect of properties that constitute less than 1,000 square feet, or (C) as set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter, none of the rights of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries under any Lease will be subject to termination or modification as the result of the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and upon consummation of the Merger, the Surviving Corporation will have succeeded to all of the rights, title and interest of the Company or its Subsidiaries either directly or indirectly by ownership of the Company's Subsidiaries under each such Lease. Except as would not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, none of the rights of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries under any Store Lease will be subject to termination or modification as the result of the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and upon consummation of the Merger, the Surviving Corporation will have succeeded to all of the rights, title and interest of the Company or its Subsidiaries either directly or indirectly by ownership of the Company's Subsidiaries under each Store Lease. To the Company's Knowledge, there are no material tax abatements or exemptions specifically affecting the Ground Leased Real Estate. There is no condemnation, eminent domain or similar Legal Action affecting any Ground Leased Real Estate or any portion thereof overtly pending, or to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened in writing against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. The Company has provided or made available to Parent true, complete and correct copies of the most recent tax bills for each parcel of Ground Leased Real Estate. No Ground Leased Real Estate is comprised of or includes a tax lot that also encompasses property that is not wholly a part of such Ground Leased Real Estate. The Company has not received any written notice of any action, claim or proceeding that is reasonably likely to result in the termination of the existing access to the Ground Leased Real Estate.
Section 4.11(b)
Section 4.11(c)
Section 4.11(b)
          (c)          . Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of , (i) the Company Disclosure Letter does not contain a list of the street address of each parcel of Store Leased Real Estate or the identity of the lessor and lessee thereunder, (ii) the Company and/or certain of its Subsidiaries is the
Disclosure with respect to Store Leases
Section 4.11(b)
lessee or sublessee of the Store Leased Real Estate in addition to the Leased Real Estate listed in of the Company Disclosure Letter and (iii) the Company has not provided Parent with copies of each Store Lease, other than as required under the Confidentiality Agreement Addendum referenced in .
Section 4.11(b)
Section 4.11(d)
          (d)          . Pursuant to the Opus Addendum to Confidentiality Agreement dated December 15, 2011 (the ""), between the Company and Opus Law Group PLLC (""), the Company has provided the Opus Report referred to therein. The information set forth in the Opus Report (as defined in the Confidentiality Agreement Addendum) is, as of the date thereof, true, correct and complete in all material respects with respect to all of the Store Leases covered therein. Any additional information and/or materials provided or made available prior to, on or after the date hereof by the Company to Opus and/or Parent, including Store Leases, pursuant to the Confidentiality Agreement Addendum, are, and to the extent provided after the date hereof, shall be, true, correct and complete in all material respects.
Opus Report
Confidentiality Agreement Addendum
Opus
          (e)          . There are no leases, license agreements, occupancy agreements or other rights of occupancy affecting or relating to Real Estate with respect to which the Company or one of its Subsidiaries is the landlord or licensor, either pursuant to any agreement or as successor to any prior landlord or licensor.
Occupancy Agreements
          (f)           The Company and each of its Subsidiaries has good title to, or a valid and binding leasehold interest in, all material personal property owned or leased by it, free and clear of all Liens, other than Permitted Liens.
Personal Property.
All references in this to the Company (except when used with respect to "Knowledge") shall include each entity comprising the Company and any Subsidiaries thereof.
          Section 4.12     Environmental Matters.
Section 4.12
                        (a)          All of the operations of the Company and any Predecessors thereof, including at or from any Real Estate or any real property formerly owned, used, leased or operated by the Company or any Predecessors thereof (the ""), comply, and have at all times since January 1, 2009 been in compliance, in all material respects with all applicable Environmental Laws. Since January 1, 2009, neither the Company nor, to the Knowledge of the Company, any Predecessors of the Company or other Person has engaged in, authorized or allowed any operations or activities upon any of the Real Estate or Former Real Estate for the purpose of or in any way involving the management, manufacture, use, containment, storage, recycling, reclamation, reuse, treatment, generation, discharge, transportation, processing, production, disposal, remediation, emission, dumping or release of any Hazardous Materials at, on or under the Real Estate or the Former Real Estate, except in material compliance with all applicable Environmental Laws.
Former Real Estate
                        (b)          Neither the Real Estate nor, to the Knowledge of the Company, the Former Real Estate contains any Hazardous Materials in, on, under or at it in
concentrations that would currently violate Environmental Laws in any material respect or impose material Environmental Liabilities on the Company requiring any investigation, corrective action, remediation, monitoring, removal or closure relating to any Hazardous Materials in, on, under or at such Real Estate or Former Real Estate. None of such Real Estate nor, to the Knowledge of the Company, any Former Real Estate is listed or proposed for listing on the National Priorities List pursuant to the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, 42 U.S.C.  9601 ., or any similar inventory of sites requiring investigation or remediation maintained by any state.
et seq
                        (c)          The Company has not received written notice of, and there is no Legal Action pending, or to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened in writing, against the Company, alleging any Environmental Liability. The Company is not subject to any Order or written agreement by or with any Governmental Entity or third party imposing any material Environmental Liability.
                        (d)          The Company has all material Permits necessary for the conduct of its business and operations that are required under applicable Environmental Laws and is in material compliance with the terms and conditions of all such Permits.
                        (e)          The Company has provided or made available to Parent all material environmental reports, assessments, audits, studies, investigations and data in its custody or possession concerning the Company and its assets and the Real Estate and Former Real Estate.
                        (f)          None of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or the Company Transaction Documents will trigger any filing requirement or other action under any applicable Environmental Law, including any environmental transfer law, including the New Jersey Industrial Site Recovery Act (N.J.S.A.  13:1K-6, ), as amended, and any rules or regulations promulgated thereunder and any successor laws and regulations, including the New Jersey Site Remediation Reform Act (N.J.S.A.  58:10C-1, ) and the Connecticut Real Property Transfer Act (C.G.S.A. 22a 134 ), except as would not reasonably be expected to prevent, delay, impede or negate the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
et seq.
et seq.
et seq.
                        (g)          The Company and its products are and at all times since January 1, 2009 have been in compliance in all material respects with all applicable requirements under California's Safe Drinking Water and Toxic Enforcement Act of 1986 (Proposition 65).
                        (h)          None of the matters disclosed on the Company Disclosure Letter or in the Company SEC Reports with respect to this , individually or in the aggregate, is reasonably likely to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
Section 4.12
          Section 4.13     Material Contracts.
          (a)           For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean the following Contracts to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective assets or properties are bound (excluding any Store Leases and excluding any Contract or agreement solely between or among the Company and/or one or more of its Subsidiaries):
Material Contracts.
Company Material Contract
                        (i)          any Contract that is a "material contract" (as such term is defined in Item 601(b)(10) of Regulation S-K of the Securities Act), whether or not filed by the Company with the SEC;
                        (ii)         any Contract that purports to limit in any respect the right of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (or, at any time after the consummation of the Merger, Parent or any of its Subsidiaries) (x) to engage in any line of business, or (y) to compete with any Person or operate in any geographical location or industry;
                        (iii)        any Contract that contains any provision that requires the purchase of all (or substantially all) of the Company's or any of its Subsidiaries' requirements for a given product or service from a given third party, which product or service is material to the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole;
                        (iv)        any Contract that obligates the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to conduct business on an exclusive or preferential basis with any third party or upon consummation of the Merger will obligate Parent, the Surviving Corporation or any of their respective Subsidiaries to conduct business on an exclusive or preferential basis with any third party;
                        (v)         any Contract that creates a partnership, joint venture or similar arrangement with respect to any business of the Company;
                        (vi)        any Contract with the Company's top twenty (20) suppliers based upon dollar volume during the year ended January 28, 2012, on a consolidated basis, other than individual purchase orders entered into pursuant to a master sourcing agreement;
                        (vii)       any Contract that is a collective bargaining or employee association agreement;
                        (viii)      any indenture, credit agreement, loan agreement, security agreement, guarantee, pledge, note, mortgage, letter of credit or other Contract evidencing indebtedness, whether secured or unsecured;
                        (ix)        any Contract for the sale of any of the Company's assets or properties after the date of this Agreement outside the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice;
                        (x)          any Contract with respect to the acquisition or disposition of any Person or business or material portion thereof pursuant to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has any continuing indemnification, "earn-out" or other contingent payment obligation, in each case that could result in a payment or payments in excess of $250,000;
                        (xi)         any Contract pursuant to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries agrees to indemnify or hold harmless any director or executive officer of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (other than the Charter Documents of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries);
                        (xii)        any settlement or conciliation Contract or similar Contract with a Governmental Entity or Order or Consent of any Governmental Entity to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party involving future performance by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries;
                        (xiii)       any Contract with a Governmental Entity;
                        (xiv)       any broker, distributor, dealer, agency, promotion, market research, e-commerce, consulting or advertising Contract that involves aggregate payments of more than $500,000, other than any such Contracts cancellable without payment of a penalty or premium on less than 30 days notice;
                        (xv)        any Contract with an independent contractor or consultant that involves aggregate annual payments of more than $250,000, other than any such Contracts cancellable without payment of a penalty or premium on less than 30 days notice;
                        (xvi)       any employment Contract, non-competition Contract or similar Contract with the Company's present or former officers, directors or employees, or Persons related to one or more of or that is an Affiliate of one of the foregoing, in each case that would involve future payments by the Company in excess of $50,000 per annum, other than (A) any such Contracts cancellable without payment of a penalty or premium on less than 30 days notice or (B) severance pay in accordance with the Company's existing severance policies;
                        (xvii)      any Contract for capital expenditures providing for payment in excess of $500,000 that is not contemplated by the Company's capital expenditure budget, which has been provided or made available to Parent;
                        (xviii)     any Contract relating to or evidencing capitalized lease obligations of, for the benefit of, or payable to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (or any guaranty of capitalized lease obligations by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries) providing for annual payments in excess of $250,000;
                        (xix)       any Contract relating to the rental or use of equipment, involving payment of fixed or contingent rentals or sums in excess of $250,000 per annum;
                         (xx)       any Contract not made in the ordinary course of business, consistent with past practice and which is material to the Company and its Subsidiaries, considered in the aggregate;
                         (xxi)     any material Company IP Agreement; and
                         (xxii)    any other Contract (other than any Contract not required to be disclosed pursuant to another subsection of this because it fails to meet the minimum dollar threshold required for disclosure, any Company Transaction Document or purchase orders) under which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is reasonably likely to make or is reasonably likely to receive payments in excess of $1,000,000 in the aggregate, other than any such Contract cancellable without payment of a penalty or premium on 60 days or less notice and any such Contract terminable or cancellable without payment of a penalty or premium on an annual or other basis prior to such $1,000,000 payment threshold being exceeded.
Section 4.13(a)
          (b)           of the Company Disclosure Letter sets forth a true, complete and accurate list as of the date hereof of all Company Material Contracts. The Company has made available to Parent true, correct and complete copies of all Company Material Contracts, including any amendments thereto. Subject to any applicable confidential treatment request, all Contracts that are required to be described in the Company SEC Documents or required to be filed as exhibits thereto have been described or filed as required.
Schedule of Material Contracts; Documents. Section 4.13(b)
          (c)           Each of the Company Material Contracts (i) is the legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company or the Subsidiary of the Company party thereto, and to the Company's Knowledge, the other parties thereto, and (ii) is enforceable against the Company or the applicable Subsidiary and, to the Company's Knowledge, the other parties thereto, in accordance with its terms in all material respects, except as such enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, moratorium and other similar Laws affecting creditors rights generally and by general principles of equity.
Full Force and Effect.
          (d)           Except for such violations, breaches, failures to perform and other defaults as have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries nor, to the Knowledge of the Company, any third party has breached, defaulted under or violated any provision of (and no event has occurred or not occurred that through the Company's or any of its Subsidiaries' action or inaction or, to the Company's Knowledge, through the action or inaction of any third Person, that with notice or the lapse of time or both would constitute a breach or violation of or default under), or failed to perform any obligation required under the provisions of, any Company Material Contract.
No Breach.
of the Company Disclosure Letter sets forth a true, correct and complete list of all bank accounts maintained by the
          Section 4.14     Bank Accounts.
Section 4.14
Company and its Subsidiaries (other than any bank accounts (a) maintained by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries solely for petty cash or similar purposes or (b) with less than $25,000 on deposit therein).
of the Company Disclosure Letter sets forth a true, correct and complete list (a) of the names of the top twenty (20) largest suppliers by cost dollar volume of merchandise inventory purchased by the Company and its Subsidiaries during the most recent full fiscal year and (b) indicates the cost dollar volume purchased by the Company and its Subsidiaries from each supplier during such fiscal year. Except for letters of credit for outstanding purchase orders, none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is required to provide any bonding or other financial security arrangements in connection with any transactions with any supplier in the ordinary course of its respective business. Since December 31, 2011, there has been no termination of the business relationship of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with any such supplier required to be listed in of the Company Disclosure Letter, nor has any such supplier indicated in writing an intent to so terminate its business relationship with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
          Section 4.15     Suppliers.
Section 4.15
Section 4.15
All inventory reflected on the Company Balance Sheet is, as of the date of the Company Balance Sheet, in all material respects, of a quality and quantity generally maintained and sold by the Company and its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business, net of reserves determined in accordance with GAAP in the amounts reflected on the Company Balance Sheet. The future purchase commitments of the Company and its Subsidiaries with respect to the store brands identified on of the Company Disclosure Letter do not exceed six (6) months' of anticipated needs for any of the Company's brands (as such commitments may be reduced for existing planned store closures) in the ordinary course of business.
          Section 4.16     Inventory.
Section 4.16
of the Company Disclosure Letter contains a true, complete and correct list of all material policies of insurance existing on the date hereof relating to the assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries and the business and employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries (except for any such policies maintained to provide benefits to employees under a Company Employee Plan). All such insurance policies are in full force and effect, and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is in default in any material respect with respect to its obligations under any such insurance policies. All premiums and other payments due from the Company and its Subsidiaries prior to the date of this Agreement under or on account of any such insurance policies have been paid as of the date of this Agreement. There is no material insurance claim by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pending under any of the policies.
          Section 4.17     Insurance.
Section 4.17
The Company has no Knowledge that any current or former officer, director, shareholder or Affiliate of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party to any material Contract or transaction with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or has any material interest in any material asset or property used by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or in a Person that is party to any Company Material Contract.
          Section 4.18     Affiliated Transactions.
The Company Proxy Statement, if any (and any amendment thereof or supplement thereto), at the date first mailed to the Company's shareholders and at the time of any meeting of Company shareholders to be held in connection with the Merger (the ""), and at the time of any amendment or supplement thereof, will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no representation or warranty is made by the Company with respect to statements made or incorporated by reference therein supplied by Parent or Merger Sub or their Representatives expressly for inclusion or incorporation by reference in the Company Proxy Statement. The Company Proxy Statement will comply as to form in all material respects with applicable federal securities Laws and the rules and regulations thereunder.
          Section 4.19     Information in the Proxy Statement.
Company Shareholders Meeting
The written information supplied by the Company expressly for inclusion in the Offer Documents (and any amendment or supplement thereto) will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The Schedule 14D-9 will comply as to form in all material respects with the provisions of Rule 14d-9 of the Exchange Act and any other applicable federal securities Laws and will not, when filed with the SEC or distributed or disseminated to the Company's shareholders, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except that the Company makes no representation or warranty with respect to statements made in the Schedule 14D-9 based on information furnished by Parent or Merger Sub expressly for inclusion therein.
          Section 4.20     Information in the Offer Documents and the Schedule 14D-9.
The Company has received the opinion of the Company Financial Advisor (and, if it is in writing, has provided a signed copy of such opinion to Parent) to the effect that, as of the date of this Agreement and based upon and subject to the qualifications and assumptions set forth therein, the
          Section 4.21     Opinion of Financial Advisor.
consideration to be received in the Offer and the Merger by the holders of shares of Company Common Stock (other than Parent and Merger Sub) is fair, from a financial point of view, to the holders of shares of Company Common Stock.
Except for fees payable to Barclays Capital Inc. (the "") pursuant to an engagement letter listed on of the Company Disclosure Letter, the Company has not incurred, nor will it incur, directly or indirectly, any Liability for brokerage or finders' fees or agents' commissions or any similar charges in connection with this Agreement or any transaction contemplated hereby.
          Section 4.22     Brokers' and Finders' Fees.
Company Financial Advisor
Section 4.22
Except for the representations and warranties contained in this , neither the Company nor any other Person on behalf of the Company makes any express or implied representation or warranty with respect to the Company or its Subsidiaries or their respective businesses, operations, assets, liabilities, condition (financial or otherwise) or prospects or with respect to any other information provided to Parent or Merger Sub in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby, including the accuracy, completeness or currency thereof. Neither the Company nor any other Person will have or be subject to any liability or indemnification obligation to Parent, Merger Sub or any other Person resulting from the distribution or failure to distribute to Parent or Merger Sub, or Parent's or Merger Sub's use of, any such information, including any information, documents, projections, forecasts of other material made available to Parent or Merger Sub in the electronic data room for Project Chrysalis run by Merrill Corporation and maintained by the Company for purposes of the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement (the "") or management presentations in expectation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, unless and to the extent any such information is expressly included in a representation or warranty contained in this .
          Section 4.23     No Other Representations or Warranties.
Article IV
Electronic Data Room
Article IV
          Parent and Merger Sub hereby jointly and severally represent and warrant to the Company as follows:
Each of Parent and Merger Sub is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the Laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, and has the requisite corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its assets and properties and to carry on its business as now conducted. Each of Parent and Merger Sub is duly qualified or licensed to do business as a foreign
          Section 5.01     Organization.
corporation and is in good standing in each jurisdiction where the character of the assets and properties owned, leased or operated by it or the nature or conduct of its business makes such qualification or license necessary, except where the failure to be so qualified or licensed or to be in good standing, has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
As of the date of this Agreement, the authorized share capital of Merger Sub consists of 1,000 shares, no par value per share, all of which are validly issued and outstanding. All of the issued and outstanding share capital of Merger Sub is, and at the Effective Time will be, owned directly or indirectly by Parent. Merger Sub was formed solely for the purpose of engaging in the transactions contemplated hereby, and it has not conducted any business prior to the date hereof and has no, and prior to the Effective Time will have no, assets, liabilities or obligations of any nature other than those incident to its formation and pursuant to this Agreement and the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
          Section 5.02     Capital Structure of Merger Sub.
          Section 5.03     Authority; Non-contravention; Governmental Consents.
(a)           Each of Parent and Merger Sub has all requisite corporate power and authority to enter into and to perform its obligations under this Agreement and each other agreement and instrument required by this Agreement to be entered into and performed by Parent or Merger Sub in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (collectively, with this Agreement, the "") and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and each other Parent Transaction Document by Parent and Merger Sub, as applicable, and the consummation by Parent and Merger Sub of the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by each Parent Transaction Document have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of Parent and Merger Sub and no other corporate proceedings on the part of Parent or Merger Sub are necessary to authorize the execution and delivery of this Agreement or to consummate the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby. This Agreement and each other Parent Transaction Document have been duly executed and delivered by Parent and Merger Sub, as applicable (or, in the case of any Parent Transaction Document to be executed and delivered hereafter, each such Parent Transaction Document will have been duly executed and delivered as of the Closing Date) and, assuming due execution and delivery by the Company, this Agreement and each other Parent Transaction Document constitute (or, in the case of any Parent Transaction Document to be executed and delivered hereafter, each such Parent Transaction Document will constitute) the valid and binding obligations of Parent and Merger Sub, enforceable against Parent and Merger Sub in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, moratorium and other similar Laws affecting creditors rights generally and by general principles of equity.
          
Authority.
Parent Transaction Documents
No vote of any of the holders of capital stock of Parent is required to authorize or consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
          (b)           The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the other Parent Transaction Documents by Parent and Merger Sub, as applicable, and the consummation by Parent and Merger Sub of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, including the Offer and the Merger, do not and will not directly or indirectly (with or without the giving of notice or the passage of time or both): (i) contravene or conflict with, or result in any violation or breach of, the certificate of incorporation or by-laws of Parent or Merger Sub or any effective resolutions of the board of directors of Parent or Merger Sub or any committee thereof; (ii) subject to compliance with the requirements set forth in clauses (i) through (iv) of , conflict with or violate any Law applicable to Parent or Merger Sub or any of the respective properties or assets owned, used or purported to be owned or used by them; (iii) require any consent, approval or other action of any Person under, or conflict with, result in any breach of or constitute a default (or an event that with or without the giving of notice or lapse of time or both would become a breach or default) under, any Contract to which Parent or its Subsidiaries, including Merger Sub, are a party or otherwise bound; or (iv) result in the creation, imposition or modification of any Lien (other than Permitted Liens) on or with respect to any of the material properties or assets of Parent or Merger Sub, except, in the case of each of clauses (ii), (iii) and (iv), for any contraventions, conflicts, violations, breaches, defaults or Liens, or where the failure to obtain any Consents, in each case, would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
Non-contravention.
Section 5.03(c)
          (c)           No Consent of any Governmental Entity is required to be obtained or made by Parent or Merger Sub in connection with the execution, delivery and performance by Parent and Merger Sub of this Agreement and the other Parent Transaction Documents or the consummation by Parent and Merger Sub of the Offer, the Merger and other transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, except for: (i) the filing of the Certificate of Merger with the Department of State of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania; (ii) such filings with the SEC as may be required to be made by Parent or Merger Sub in accordance with the Exchange Act in connection with this Agreement, the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby; (iii) such Consents as may be required under Antitrust Laws, in any case that are applicable to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (iv) such Consents as may be required under applicable state securities or "blue sky" laws or the rules and regulations of NASDAQ; and (v) such other Consents which if not obtained or made would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
Governmental Consents.
None of the information with respect to Parent or Merger Sub that Parent or any of its Representatives supplies in writing to the Company for use in the Company Proxy Statement, if any (and any
          Section 5.04     Information in the Proxy Statement.
amendment or supplement thereto), at the date such Company Proxy Statement is first mailed to the Company's shareholders or at the time of the Company Shareholders Meeting, or at the time of any amendment or supplement thereof, will contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
The Offer Documents (and any amendment thereof or supplement thereto) will not, when filed with the SEC and at the time of distribution or dissemination thereof to the Company's shareholders, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no representation or warranty is made by Parent or Merger Sub with respect to statements made therein supplied by the Company or its Representatives expressly for inclusion in the Offer Documents. The Offer Documents will comply as to form in all material respects with applicable federal securities Laws and the rules and regulations thereunder.
          Section 5.05     Information in the Offer Documents.
Parent has, or will have as of the Offer Closing, and will cause Merger Sub to have, at the Offer Closing and prior to the Effective Time, sufficient funds (including cash, cash equivalents, available lines of credit or other sources of immediately available funds) to pay the aggregate Offer Price and the Merger Consideration contemplated by this Agreement and to perform the other obligations of Parent and Merger Sub contemplated by this Agreement. Parent has delivered to the Company a true, correct and complete copy of the Commitment Letter. As of the date hereof, the Commitment Letter is in full force and effect and has not been withdrawn or terminated or otherwise amended, supplemented or modified in any respect. The Commitment Letter, by its terms, shall remain in effect through at least November 1, 2012. The Commitment Letter, in the form so delivered, is a legal, valid and binding obligation of Parent and Merger Sub and, to the knowledge of Parent as of the date hereof, the other parties thereto. There are no side letters or other agreements, contracts or arrangements (except for customary fee letters and engagement letters, complete copies of which have been provided to the Company (in the case of such fee letters, with only the fee amounts and certain other terms (none of which concern or would adversely affect the amount, availability, timing or conditionality of (or contain any conditions precedent to) the Financing) redacted)) relating to the Commitment Letter. As of the date hereof, no event has occurred which, with or without notice, lapse of time or both, would or would reasonably be expected to constitute a default or breach on the part of Parent or Merger Sub under any term, or a failure of any condition, of the Commitment Letter. Assuming the accuracy in all material respects of the representations and warranties set forth in and compliance by the Company with its covenants and agreements hereunder
          Section 5.06     Financing.
Article IV
in all material respects, as of the date of this Agreement neither Parent nor Merger Sub has any reason to believe that Merger Sub would be unable to satisfy on a timely basis any term or condition of the Commitment Letter required to be satisfied by it. Parent and/or Merger Sub have fully paid any and all commitment fees or other fees required by the Commitment Letter to be paid on or before the date of this Agreement. As of the date hereof, Parent has no knowledge of any direct or indirect limitation or other restriction on the ability of the lender parties to the Commitment Letter to provide financing for other potential purchasers of the Company.
There is no Legal Action pending or, to the knowledge of Parent, threatened in writing, against Parent or any of its Subsidiaries, including Merger Sub, or any of their respective assets, nor is there any Order imposed upon Parent or any of its Subsidiaries, including Merger Sub, whether temporary, preliminary or permanent, which would reasonably be expected to prevent, delay or materially and adversely affect Parent or Merger Sub's ability to consummate the transactions contemplated by any Parent Transaction Document.
          Section 5.07     Legal Proceedings.
Except as disclosed by Parent to the Company in writing prior to the date of this Agreement, as of the date of this Agreement, neither Parent nor any of its Affiliates has entered into any contract, arrangement or understanding (in each case, whether oral or written), or authorized, committed or agreed to enter into any contract, arrangement or understanding (in each case, whether oral or written), (a) with any officer or director of the Company in connection with any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or (b) pursuant to which (i) any shareholder of the Company would be entitled to receive consideration of a different amount or nature than the Offer Price or the Merger Consideration or any shareholder of the Company (A) agrees to tender its shares of Company Common Stock in the Offer or to vote to adopt this Agreement or the Merger or (B) agrees to vote against, or not to tender its shares of Company Common Stock in, any Superior Proposal or (ii) any third party has agreed to provide, directly or indirectly, equity capital to Parent or the Company to finance in whole or in part the Offer or the Merger. Parent has, prior to the date of this Agreement, delivered or made available to the Company a complete and correct copy (or, in the case of any oral agreement or arrangement, a written summary) of any agreement or arrangement required to be disclosed by Parent to the Company pursuant to the preceding sentence.
          Section 5.08     Absence of Certain Agreements.
Neither Parent or Merger Sub is, nor at any time during the last three (3) years has either Parent or Merger Sub been, an "interested shareholder" of the Company as defined in Section 2553 of the BCL. As of the date hereof, none of Parent, Merger Sub or other Affiliates of Parent, owns any Company Common Stock, whether beneficially or of record.
          Section 5.09     BCL Section 2553.
As of the date of this Agreement, neither Parent nor any of its Affiliates beneficially owns (as defined in Rule 13d-3 of the Exchange Act) or is the owner of record of any shares of Company Common Stock or other securities of the Company or any options, warrants or other rights to acquire Company Common Stock or other securities of, or any other economic interest (through derivative securities or otherwise) in, the Company.
          Section 5.10     Ownership of Company Common Stock.
Neither Parent nor Merger Sub has incurred, nor will they incur, directly or indirectly, any Liability for brokerage or finders' fees or agents' commissions or any similar charges in connection with this Agreement or any transaction contemplated hereby for which the Company could become liable or obligated.
          Section 5.11     Brokers' and Finders' Fees.
Parent and Merger Sub acknowledge that, as of the date hereof, they and their Representatives (a) have received access to (i) such books and records, facilities, equipment, contracts and other assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries which they and their Representatives, as of the date hereof, have requested to review and (ii) the Electronic Data Room, and (b) have had full opportunity to meet with the management of the Company and to discuss the business and assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries. Parent and Merger Sub each acknowledges and agrees that, except for the representations and warranties expressly set forth in this Agreement (a) neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries makes, or has made, any representation or warranty relating to itself or its business or otherwise in connection with the Offer and the Merger, and Parent and Merger Sub are not relying on any representation or warranty except for those expressly set forth in this Agreement, (b) no Person has been authorized by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to make any representation or warranty relating to itself or its business or otherwise in connection with the Offer and Merger, and if made, such representation or warranty must not be relied upon by Parent or Merger Sub as having been authorized by such entity, and (c) any estimate, projection, prediction, data, financial information, memorandum, presentation or any other materials or information provided or addressed to Parent, Merger Sub or any of their Representatives, including any materials or information made available in the Electronic Data Room or in connection with presentations by the Company's management, are not and shall not be deemed to be or include representations or warranties unless and to the extent any such materials or information is the subject of any express representation or warranty set forth in .
          Section 5.12     Acknowledgement of Disclaimer of Other Representations and Warranties.
Article IV
Except for the representations and warranties contained in this , none of Parent, Merger Sub or any Person on behalf of Parent or Merger Sub makes any representation or warranty, express or implied.
          Section 5.13     No Other Representations or Warranties.
Article V
The Company shall, and shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, during the period from the date of this Agreement until the earlier of (i) the Effective Time and (ii) the first date on which Parent shall have exercised rights under to designate at least a majority of the Board, except as expressly permitted by this Agreement, as set forth on to the Company Disclosure Letter or as required by applicable Law or with the prior written consent of Parent (not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), conduct its business in all material respects in the ordinary course of business, consistent with past practice (including with respect to future purchase commitments for each of the Company's brands; that such future purchase commitments will be reduced appropriately to account for any planned store closures) and, to the extent consistent therewith, the Company shall, and shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, use reasonable best efforts to maintain and preserve intact its and its Subsidiaries' business organization, to keep available the services of its and its Subsidiaries' current officers and employees, to preserve its and its Subsidiaries' present relationships and goodwill with customers, suppliers, lessors, distributors, licensors, licensees and other Persons having material business relationships with it or its Subsidiaries (it being agreed and understood that no action by the Company or its Subsidiaries with respect to matters specifically addressed by any other provision of this shall be deemed to be a breach of the foregoing unless such action would constitute a breach of such other provision of this Agreement). Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, between the date of this Agreement and the Effective Time, except as otherwise expressly permitted by this Agreement or as set forth on of the Company Disclosure Letter, the relevance of which disclosure to the appropriate subsection in this is reasonably apparent on its face without the necessity of repetitive disclosure or cross-reference, or as required by applicable Law, the Company shall not, nor shall it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, without the prior written consent of Parent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed):
          Section 6.01     Conduct of Business of the Company.
Section 1.03
Section 6.01
provided
Section 6.01
Section 6.01
Section 6.01
          (a)          amend or propose to amend its or any of its Subsidiaries' Charter Documents;
          (b)          (i) adjust, split, combine, reclassify or make any like change in any Company Securities or Company Subsidiary Securities, (ii) repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire, or offer to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire, any Company Securities (other than the Convertible Notes as contemplated by the terms thereof) or Company Subsidiary Securities, (iii) declare, set aside or pay any dividend or distribution (whether in cash, stock, property or otherwise) in respect of, or enter into any Contract with respect to the voting of, any Company Securities or Company Subsidiary Securities (other than dividends from a direct or indirect wholly owned Subsidiary of the Company to its parent);
          (c)          issue, deliver, sell, pledge, dispose of, transfer, modify or encumber any Company Securities or Company Subsidiary Securities, other than (i) the issuance of shares of Company Common Stock upon the exercise of any Company Equity Award outstanding as of the date of this Agreement in accordance with its terms, (ii) the issuance of shares of Company Common Stock in respect of other equity compensation awards outstanding under Company Stock Plans as of the date of this Agreement in accordance with their terms, (iii) the issuance of shares of Company Common Stock upon exercise of any Warrant that is outstanding as of the date of this Agreement, or (iv) the issuance of shares of Company Common Stock upon the conversion of Convertible Notes;
          (d)          (i) except as required by applicable Law or required or permitted by any Company Employee Plan or written Contract existing prior to the date of this Agreement that has been disclosed or made available to Parent, increase the compensation payable or that could become payable by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to directors or officers, other than increases in compensation made in the ordinary course of business consistent in all material respects with past practice, or enter into any new or amend in any material respect, any existing employment or consulting, bonus, severance, retirement, retention, change in control or similar agreement with any of its past or present officers, directors or consultants or establish, adopt, enter into, amend, terminate or take any action to accelerate any material rights under any Company Employee Plans or collective bargaining agreement or any plan, agreement, program, policy, trust, fund or other arrangement that would be a Company Employee Plan if it were in existence as of the date of this Agreement, or make any contribution to any Company Employee Plan, other than amendments and contributions required by Law or the terms of such Company Employee Plans as in effect on the date hereof, or (ii) hire any new employees, except (A) in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice with respect to employees with an annual base salary not to exceed $150,000, or (B) to replace existing employees whose employment has terminated, at compensation levels and with benefits consistent in all material respects with that of the employee replaced;
          (e)          acquire, by merger, consolidation, acquisition of stock or assets, or otherwise, or invest in, any business or Person or division thereof or make any loans, advances or capital contributions to or investments in any Person (other than the Company or one or more of its Subsidiaries), in any transaction or series of transactions, in excess of $250,000 in the aggregate, except (A) pursuant to existing Contracts that have been disclosed or made available to Parent and in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, (B) employee loans or advances for travel, business, relocation or other reimbursable expenses made in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice;
          (f)          (i) transfer, license, sell, lease, sublease, subject to any Lien (other than Permitted Liens) or otherwise dispose of any assets or properties (whether by way of merger, consolidation, sale of stock or assets, or otherwise), including the capital stock or other equity interests in any Subsidiary of the Company, any Owned Real Estate, any Lease or any Leased Real Estate, except (A) dispositions of obsolete, surplus or worn out
assets or assets that are no longer useful in the conduct of the business of the Company, (B) transfers among the Company and its Subsidiaries, or (C) pursuant to existing Contracts or otherwise in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice (which for the avoidance of doubt and without limitation to the foregoing shall be deemed to include the sale or other disposition, including at discounted prices, of supplies and inventory), or (ii) adopt or effect a plan of complete or partial liquidation, dissolution, restructuring, recapitalization or other reorganization;
          (g)          repurchase, prepay or incur any indebtedness for borrowed money or guarantee any such indebtedness of another Person, issue or sell any debt securities or options, warrants, calls or other rights to acquire any debt securities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, guarantee any debt securities of another Person, enter into any "keep well" or other Contract to maintain any financial statement condition of any other Person or enter into any arrangement having the economic effect of any of the foregoing, other than, in each case, borrowings and repayments under the Company's existing revolving credit facility in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, or take any action (other than the entry into this Agreement and the other Company Transaction Documents) that would reasonably be expected to result in any material amendment, modification or adverse change to any term of, or material default under, any material indebtedness of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries;
          (h)          (i) enter into any new line of business or make or agree to make any new capital expenditure in excess of $250,000 or that, in the aggregate, are in excess of $500,000, other than (A) as contemplated by the Company's capital expenditure budget, which has been provided or made available to Parent, or (B) in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, (ii) except in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, modify, amend or terminate any Company Material Contract or waive, release or assign any material rights or claims thereunder or (iii) dispose of, grant, obtain or permit to lapse any material Company IP;
          (i)          discharge, settle, compromise, assign or satisfy any material claim, whether or not pending before a Governmental Entity, (i) outside the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice or (ii) relating to or arising from any securities class action claims or related derivative claims, in each case except to the extent such claim is fully covered by the Company's insurance policies (other than any applicable deductible), but only if the discharge, settlement, compromise, assignment or satisfaction of such claim would not result in the imposition of any material restriction on the business or operations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or a material increase in the Company's insurance premiums;
          (j)          enter into any Contract of a type referenced in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), (v) or (viii) of ;
Section 4.13(a)
          (k)          make any material change in any method of financial accounting principles or practices, in each case except for any such change required by a change in GAAP or applicable Law;
          (l)          make, revoke or amend any federal Tax election or material state, local or other Tax election, adopt or change any method of tax accounting other than as described on of the Company Disclosure Letter, extend or waive the application of any statute of limitations regarding the assessment or collection of any federal Tax or material state, local or other Tax, settle or compromise any federal Tax liability or refund, settle or compromise any material state, local or other Tax liability or refund, enter into any material agreement relating to federal, state, local or other Taxes, file any amended federal Tax Return or material state, local or other Tax Return or claim for refund or otherwise make a material change in the Tax compliance practices of the Company, except that no consent shall be required with respect to settlement of a pending Tax claim for no more than 110% of the amount, as of the date of this Agreement, of the FIN 48 reserves applicable to that claim;
Section 4.06(f)
          (m)          acquire or materially alter any Owned Real Estate or any Ground Leased Real Estate;
          (n)          enter into any Store Leases other than in the ordinary course of business consistent in all material respects with past practice; or
          (o)          agree or commit to do any of the foregoing.
From the date of this Agreement until the earlier to occur of the Effective Time or the termination of this Agreement in accordance with the terms set forth in , except as otherwise expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement, the Company and Parent shall not, and shall not permit any of their respective Subsidiaries to, take, or agree or commit to take, any action that would reasonably be expected to, individually or in the aggregate, prevent, materially delay or materially impede the consummation of the Offer, the Merger or the other transactions contemplated hereby on a timely basis.
          Section 6.02     Other Actions.
Article VIII
          Section 6.03     Access to Information; Confidentiality.
          (a)          From the date of this Agreement until the earlier to occur of the Offer Closing or the termination of this Agreement in accordance with the terms set forth in , the Company shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, afford to Parent, Merger Sub and their financing sources who have agreed with Parent to comply with the applicable confidentiality terms and conditions in the Confidentiality Agreement (it being understood and agreed that Parent shall be liable to the Company for any breach thereof by such financing sources) and respective Representatives (including environmental consultants) reasonable access, during normal business hours and in a manner as shall not unreasonably interfere with the business or operations of the Company or any Subsidiary thereof, to the officers, employees, accountants, agents, suppliers, properties, offices and other facilities and to all books, records, Permits, Contracts and other assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries (including continued access to the Electronic Data Room),
Article VIII
and the Company shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, furnish promptly to Parent such other information concerning the business and properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries as Parent may reasonably request from time to time. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this Agreement, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries shall be required to provide access to or disclose information if doing so would, in the reasonable good faith judgment of the Company, (i) violate any Contract or Law to which the Company or its Affiliates is a party or is subject, or (ii) would reasonably be expected to result in the loss of the attorney-client or work product privilege; that the parties hereto will make reasonable and appropriate substitute disclosure arrangements under circumstances in which the restrictions of the preceding sentence apply. In addition, the Company shall facilitate any meetings or discussions with third parties with whom the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has a material contractual relationship that requires such third party's consent in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or that could reasonably be expected to otherwise materially restrict the business or operations of Parent or the Surviving Corporation following the Effective Time, in each case, as reasonably requested by Parent. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, to the extent not in conflict with any Contract or Law to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or is subject, the Company shall promptly provide access to all Store Leases (including all amendments and supplements thereto, and all material written notices delivered or received thereunder in possession or control of the Company or any of its Affiliates), regardless of the limitations of the Confidentiality Agreement Addendum, and shall cooperate with Parent and Merger Sub in providing such notices or seeking such Consents (as defined in the Confidentiality Agreement Addendum) thereunder as Parent or Merger Sub may reasonably request in a timely manner.
provided
          (b)          Parent and the Company shall comply with, and shall cause their respective Representatives to comply with, all of their respective obligations under the Confidentiality Agreement, dated December 15, 2011, between Parent and the Company, as amended by the Confidentiality Agreement Addendum (the ""), including without limitation the provisions applying to the solicitation and hiring of employees, which shall survive the termination of this Agreement in accordance with the terms set forth therein. All information provided by or on behalf of the Company pursuant to this will be subject to the confidentiality provisions of the Confidentiality Agreement.
Confidentiality Agreement
Section 6.03(b)
          Section 6.04     No Solicitation.
          (a)          The Company shall not, and shall cause its Subsidiaries not to, and shall instruct and use its reasonable best efforts to cause their respective Representatives not to, directly or indirectly, (i) whether publicly or otherwise, initiate, solicit, knowingly encourage or knowingly facilitate any inquiry with respect to, or the making, submission or announcement of, any proposal, inquiry, offer or indication of interest that constitutes or would reasonably be expected to lead to a Takeover Proposal, (ii) participate in or
knowingly encourage any negotiations or discussions regarding, or furnish to any Person access to the business, properties, assets, books or records or provide any material non-public information or data with respect to, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in connection with any proposal, inquiry, offer or indication of interest that constitutes or would reasonably be expected to lead to a Takeover Proposal, (iii) approve, endorse or recommend, or propose publicly to approve, endorse or recommend, any Takeover Proposal, (iv) amend or grant any waiver or release under, or fail to enforce, any standstill or similar contract with respect to any class of equity securities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (v) take any action to make the provisions of any Takeover Statute (including any transaction under, or a Person becoming an "interested shareholder" under, the BCL), or any restrictive provision of any applicable anti-takeover provision in the Company's Charter Documents, inapplicable to any transactions contemplated by a Takeover Proposal (and, to the extent permitted thereunder, the Company shall promptly take all steps necessary to terminate any waiver that may have been previously granted to any Person other than Parent or any of its Affiliates under any such provisions), or (vi) execute or enter into any agreement in principle, letter of intent, term sheet, acquisition agreement, merger agreement, option agreement, joint venture agreement, partnership agreement or other Contract relating to a Takeover Proposal (other than an Acceptable Confidentiality Agreement in connection with the actions contemplated by, and pursuant to, (any such Contract referred to in this clause (vi), a "") or resolve, agree, approve, recommend or publicly propose to take such action. Except as otherwise expressly permitted by this , neither the Company Board nor any committee thereof shall (A) fail to make the Company Board Recommendation, (B) approve, endorse or recommend, or propose publicly to approve, endorse or recommend, any Takeover Proposal or enter into any Company Acquisition Agreement or resolve, agree, approve, recommend or publicly propose to take any such action, or (C) withdraw, amend, modify or qualify, in a manner adverse to Parent or Merger Sub, or propose publicly to withdraw, amend, modify or qualify in a manner adverse to Parent or Merger Sub, the Company Board Recommendation (any of the foregoing clauses (A), (B) and (C) above, a ""); it being understood and agreed that any "stop-look-listen" communication by the Company Board to the shareholders of the Company pursuant to Rule 14d-9(f) of the Exchange Act (or any related communication to shareholders of the Company) will not be deemed a Company Adverse Recommendation Change. The Company shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, and shall direct and use reasonable best efforts to cause its and their respective Representatives to, immediately cease and cause to be terminated, and shall not authorize or knowingly permit any of its or their Representatives to continue, any and all existing discussions or negotiations, if any, with any third party conducted prior to the date hereof with respect to any Takeover Proposal and shall request and use its reasonable best efforts to cause any such third party (or its agents or advisors) in possession of non-public information in respect of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that was furnished by or on behalf of the Company and its Subsidiaries to promptly return or destroy (and confirm
Section 6.04(b))
Company Acquisition Agreement
Section 6.04
Company Adverse Recommendation Change
destruction of) all such information to the extent the Company has the contractual right to do so under the applicable confidentiality agreement.
          (b)          Notwithstanding , prior to the Offer Closing, the Company Board, directly or indirectly through any Representative, may, subject to compliance with and, (i) (A) in response to a bona fide written Takeover Proposal made after the date hereof that the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with the Company's outside legal counsel and the Company Financial Advisor, constitutes, or would reasonably be expected to result in, a Superior Proposal, and which Takeover Proposal did not result from a breach of , (1) contact the Person making such Takeover Proposal solely for the purpose of clarifying the proposal and any material contingencies and the likelihood of consummation to make the determinations described in the definition of "Superior Proposal," (2) furnish non-public information relating to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to the Person making such Takeover Proposal and its Representatives pursuant to an executed confidentiality agreement that constitutes an Acceptable Confidentiality Agreement, and (3) engage or participate in negotiations or discussions with such Person and its Representatives regarding such Takeover Proposal, and (B) if requested by a third party that has entered into a confidentiality, standstill or similar agreement with the Company prior to the date hereof (including where such request is prohibited under the terms of the applicable confidentiality and standstill agreement), waive any prohibition with respect to the submission of a Takeover Proposal or amendment thereto in any such agreement, in any such case, if the Company Board determines, in good faith, after consultation with the Company's outside legal counsel and the Company Financial Advisor, that failure to do so would be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under applicable Law, (ii) make a Company Adverse Recommendation Change in response to a material event, development or change in circumstance (other than in connection with a Takeover Proposal) that is unknown by the Company Board as of the date of this Agreement, if the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with the Company's outside legal counsel and the Company Financial Advisor, that the failure to do so would be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under applicable Law; that the Company shall provide Parent with no fewer than four (4) days' notice of any Company Adverse Recommendation Change prior to such change (and during such four (4) day period, the Company agrees that the Company and its Representatives shall negotiate in good faith with Parent and its Representatives regarding any such revisions to the terms of the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement proposed by Parent), (iii) if the Company Board determines in response to a Takeover Proposal that such proposal is a Superior Proposal, and the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with the Company's outside legal counsel and the Company Financial Advisor, that the failure to do so would be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under applicable Law, terminate this Agreement pursuant to and/or make a Company Adverse Recommendation Change and, in the case of a termination, the Company shall, substantially concurrently with the termination of this Agreement, enter
Section 6.04(a)
Sections 6.04(c)
6.04(d)
Section 6.04(a)
provided
Section 8.04(a)
into the Company Acquisition Agreement implementing such Superior Proposal (, that in the event of any such termination, the Company complies with its obligations to pay the Termination Fee in ) and/or (iv) take any action that any court of competent jurisdiction orders the Company to take (which order remains unstayed). Nothing contained herein shall prevent the Company Board from disclosing to the Company's shareholders a position contemplated by Rule 14d-9 and Rule 14e-2(a) or Item 1012(a) of Regulation M-A promulgated under the Exchange Act or from making any disclosure to the shareholders of the Company with regard to a Takeover Proposal, if the Company Board determines in good faith, after consultation with the Company's outside legal counsel, that failure to do so could reasonably be expected to violate applicable Law or would be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under applicable Law.
provided
Section 8.06(b)
          (c)          The Company shall, as promptly as possible and in any event within twenty-four (24) hours after receipt thereof, (i) notify Parent in writing of the receipt by the Company or any of its Representatives of any Takeover Proposal or request for information or inquiry, in each case, from any third party, that expressly contemplates or that the Company believes would reasonably be expected to lead to a Takeover Proposal, and (ii) the material terms and conditions of such Takeover Proposal, request or inquiry (including any change to the financial terms, conditions or other material terms thereof and the terms of any and all agreements in connection therewith (including any financial arrangements)). The Company shall keep Parent reasonably informed, on a prompt basis, of any related material developments, discussions and negotiations related to any such Takeover Proposal or inquiry and shall make available to Parent all material non-public information made available to any Person making any such Takeover Proposal at substantially the same time as it provides such information to such other Person.
          (d)          The Company may not enter into (or permit any Subsidiary to enter into) a Company Acquisition Agreement, unless: (i) the Company promptly notifies Parent, in writing, at least four (4) days (the "") before entering into (or causing a Subsidiary to enter into) a Company Acquisition Agreement, of its intention to take such action with respect to a Superior Proposal, which notice shall state expressly that the Company has received a Takeover Proposal that the Company Board intends to declare a Superior Proposal and that the Company intends to enter into a Company Acquisition Agreement; (ii) the Company attaches to such notice the most current version of the proposed agreement (which version shall be updated on a prompt basis); (iii) the Company shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause its and its Subsidiaries' Representatives to, during the Notice Period, negotiate with Parent in good faith to make such adjustments in the terms and conditions of this Agreement so that such Takeover Proposal ceases to constitute a Superior Proposal, if Parent, in its discretion, proposes to make such adjustments (it being agreed that in the event that, after commencement of the Notice Period, there is any material revision to the terms of a Superior Proposal, including any revision to price or form of consideration or any material change to other terms of such Superior Proposal occurring prior to the Company's effecting a Company Adverse Recommendation Change or
Notice Period
terminating this Agreement pursuant to , the Notice Period shall be extended, if applicable, to ensure that at least two (2) Business Days remain in the Notice Period subsequent to the time the Company notifies Parent of any such material revision (it being understood that there may be multiple extensions)); and (iv) the Company Board determines in good faith, after consulting with its outside legal counsel and its Company Financial Advisor, that such Takeover Proposal continues to constitute a Superior Proposal after taking into account any adjustments made by Parent during the Notice Period in the terms and conditions of this Agreement.
Section 8.04(a)
          Section 6.05     Shareholders Meeting; Preparation of Proxy Materials.
          (a)          Subject to the terms set forth in this Agreement, if the adoption of this Agreement by the Company's shareholders is required under applicable Law, the Company shall take all action necessary to duly call, give notice of, convene and hold the Company Shareholders Meeting as soon as reasonably practicable after the Offer Closing, and, in connection therewith, the Company shall mail the Company Proxy Statement to the holders of Company Common Stock in advance of such meeting. The record date for the Company Shareholders Meeting shall be determined in prior consultation with and subject to the prior written approval of Parent (which prior written approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed). Except to the extent that the Company Board shall have effected a Company Adverse Recommendation Change as permitted by hereof, the Company shall (i) solicit or cause to be solicited from its shareholders proxies in favor of adoption of this Agreement, and (ii) take all other action necessary or advisable to secure the Company Requisite Vote (including, at the request of Parent, postponing or adjourning the Company Shareholders Meeting to obtain a quorum or solicit additional proxies). Except to the extent that the Company Board shall have effected a Company Adverse Recommendation Change as permitted by hereof, the Company Proxy Statement shall include the Company Board Recommendation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if following the Offer and any subsequent offering period and the exercise, if any, of the Top-Up Option, Parent, Merger Sub and their respective Subsidiaries shall hold, in the aggregate, at least 80% of the outstanding shares of Company Common Stock, the parties hereto shall take all necessary and appropriate action, including with respect to the transfer to Merger Sub of any shares of Company Common Stock held by Parent or any Subsidiary of Parent, to cause the Merger to become effective as soon as practicable after the Offer Closing without the Company Shareholders Meeting in accordance with Section 1924(b)(1)(ii) of the BCL. If the adoption of this Agreement by the Company's shareholders is required by applicable Law, unless this Agreement shall be terminated in accordance with its terms, the Company shall be obligated to call, give notice of, convene and hold the Company Shareholders Meeting, and submit this Agreement to its shareholders for adoption, regardless of whether a Company Adverse Recommendation Change has occurred.
Section 6.04(b)
Section 6.04(b)
          (b)          If the adoption of this Agreement by the Company's shareholders is required by applicable Law, the Company shall as soon as practicable prepare and file the Company Proxy Statement with the SEC. Parent, Merger Sub and the Company will cooperate and consult with each other in the preparation of the Company Proxy Statement. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each of Parent and Merger Sub shall promptly furnish to the Company all information concerning Parent and Merger Sub required by the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder to be set forth in the Company Proxy Statement. The Company shall not file the Company Proxy Statement, or any amendment or supplement thereto, without providing Parent, Merger Sub and their counsel a reasonable opportunity to review and comment thereon (which comments shall be reasonably considered in good faith by the Company). The Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to resolve, and each party agrees to consult and cooperate with the other party in resolving, all SEC comments with respect to the Company Proxy Statement as promptly as practicable after receipt thereof and to cause the Company Proxy Statement in definitive form to be cleared by the SEC and mailed to the Company's shareholders as promptly as reasonably practicable following filing with the SEC. The Company shall consult with Parent prior to responding to SEC comments with respect to the preliminary Company Proxy Statement. Each of Parent, Merger Sub and the Company shall promptly correct any information provided by it for use in the Company Proxy Statement if and to the extent that such information shall have become false or misleading in any material respect and the Company shall promptly prepare and mail to its shareholders an amendment or supplement setting forth such correction. The Company shall as soon as reasonably practicable (i) notify Parent of the receipt of any comments from the SEC with respect to the Company Proxy Statement and any request by the SEC for any amendment to the Company Proxy Statement or for additional information and (ii) provide Parent with copies of all written correspondence between the Company and its Representatives, on the one hand, and the SEC, on the other hand, with respect to the Company Proxy Statement.
          (c)          Parent will cause all shares of Company Common Stock purchased by Parent or Merger Sub pursuant to the Offer and all other shares of Company Common Stock owned by Parent or Merger Sub to be voted in favor of the adoption of this Agreement at the Company Shareholders Meeting. Parent and Merger Sub will not, and they will cause their direct and indirect Subsidiaries not to, sell, transfer, assign, encumber or otherwise dispose of the shares of Company Common Stock beneficially owned by Parent or Merger Sub prior to the Company Shareholders Meeting, if required.
The Company shall notify Parent and Merger Sub, and Parent and Merger Sub shall notify the Company, promptly of (a) any material notice or other communication from any Person alleging that the consent of such Person is or may be required in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (including a copy of such notice or communication to the extent in writing), (b) any notice or other written communication from any Governmental Entity in
          Section 6.06     Notices of Certain Events.
connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (including a copy of such notice or communication to the extent in writing), (c) any Legal Actions commenced, or to such party's knowledge, threatened, against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or Parent or its Subsidiaries, as applicable, that are related to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and (d) any change that would reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect or a Parent Material Adverse Effect, as applicable. In addition, the Company shall notify Parent and Merger Sub, and Parent and Merger Sub shall notify the Company, promptly after obtaining knowledge of (i) the occurrence, or non-occurrence, of any event that would be likely to cause any condition (including any of the conditions set forth in ) to the obligations of the other party to effect the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement not to be satisfied, or (ii) the failure of the Company or Parent, as the case may be, to comply with or satisfy any covenant, condition or agreement to be complied with or satisfied by it pursuant to this Agreement that would reasonably be expected to result in any condition to the obligations of the other party to effect the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement not to be satisfied; , , that the delivery of any such notice shall not cure any breach of any representation or warranty, the failure to comply with any covenant, the failure to meet any condition or otherwise limit or affect the remedies available hereunder to the party receiving such notice.
Exhibit A
provided
however
          Section 6.07     Employees; Benefit Plans.
          (a)          . This Section shall apply to each employee of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries who is classified by the Company or such Subsidiary as a regular full-time employee, whose terms and conditions of employment are not subject to a collective bargaining agreement and who is employed in such capacity by the Company or such Subsidiary at the Effective Time (collectively, the "").
Continuing Employees
Company Continuing Employees
          (b)           For the period beginning at the Offer Closing and ending on a date not earlier than the first anniversary of the Effective Time, Parent shall cause the Surviving Corporation and its Subsidiaries, as applicable, to provide to each Company Continuing Employee base salary, wages, bonus opportunities (but without regard to the timing of the payment of any bonus, performance goals or targets or duration of the performance period to which the bonus relates) and employee benefits (other than equity-based compensation arrangements), that in the aggregate are substantially comparable to the pay, bonus opportunities and employee benefits (other than equity-based compensation arrangements) provided to such employee immediately prior to the Effective Time. If the employment of any Company Continuing Employee is terminated at or within one year of the Effective Time, Parent shall cause the Surviving Corporation and its Subsidiaries, as applicable, to provide to such terminated employee severance benefits that are no less than the severance benefits that would have been provided to such employee upon such a termination of employment immediately
Comparability of Compensation and Benefits.
prior to the Effective Time. For the avoidance of doubt, all severance and termination agreements with Company Continuing Employees listed on of the Company Disclosure Letter shall remain in full force and effect solely to the extent provided in such agreements and subject to the terms and conditions of such agreements.
Section 6.07(b)
          (c)          
Service Credit and Paid Time Off.
                         (i)          Parent shall, or shall cause the Surviving Corporation and its Subsidiaries, as applicable, to give each Company Continuing Employee full credit for purposes of eligibility, vesting and determination of level of benefits (but not benefit accrual under any employee pension benefit plan within the meaning of Section 3(2) of ERISA) under the employee benefit plans and arrangements (including employee benefit plans within the meaning of Section 3(3) of ERISA, vacation, paid time off and severance plans or arrangements) maintained or sponsored by Parent or any of its Subsidiaries in which such Company Continuing Employees participate after the Effective Time for services rendered by such Company Continuing Employees to Company and its Subsidiaries prior to the Effective Time provided, however, that no such credit shall result in an unintended duplication of benefits or be required to be recognized under a newly established plan for which prior service is not taken into account for employees of Parent or any of its Subsidiaries or the Surviving Corporation generally. In addition, and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, and subject only to any required approval of the applicable insurance provider: (a) each Company Continuing Employee shall be eligible to participate in any and all compensation and benefit plans, programs, agreements and arrangements of Parent, the Company, the Surviving Corporation or any respective Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof providing benefits to the Company Continuing Employees after the Effective Time (the "") to the extent coverage under such New Plan replaces coverage under a comparable Company Benefit Plan in which such Company Continuing Employee participated immediately before the replacement without any waiting time to participate in any New Plan other than any New Plan that includes a cash or deferred feature intended to satisfy the provisions of Section 401(k) of the Code (the ""), and with a waiting period of up to the first payroll date following the first full month following the Effective Time for any New 401(k) Plan; and (b) for purposes of each New Plan providing medical, dental, pharmaceutical and/or vision benefits to any Company Continuing Employee, Parent shall cause all pre-existing condition exclusions and actively-at-work requirements of such New Plan to be waived for such employee and his or her covered dependents, and Parent shall cause any eligible expenses incurred by such employee and his or her covered dependents under a Company Benefit Plan during the portion of the plan year prior to the Effective Time to be taken into account under such New Plan for purposes of satisfying all deductible, co-insurance, co-payment and maximum out-of-pocket requirements applicable to such employee and his or her covered dependents for the applicable plan year as if such amounts had been paid in accordance with such New Plan.
New Plans
New 401(k) Plan
                         (ii)         Parent shall, or shall cause the Surviving Corporation and its Subsidiaries, as applicable, as of the Effective Time, to, by operation of law or otherwise,
assume, honor and be responsible for paying, providing and satisfying when due, including payment in respect thereto upon any subsequent termination of employment of such employees by Parent or its Subsidiaries after the Effective Time, all vacation, personal days, sick pay and other paid time off for Company Continuing Employees accrued, but unused, through the Effective Time on terms and conditions not less favorable than the terms and conditions in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time, except to the extent such satisfaction would result in an unintended duplication of benefits.
          (d)          Unless otherwise notified by Parent in writing prior to the Offer Closing Date, the Company shall terminate any and all Company Employee Plans intended to qualify under Section 401(a) of the Code that include a cash or deferred arrangement intended to satisfy the provisions of Section 401(k) of the Code (""), effective immediately prior to the Offer Closing. If Parent provides notice to the Company not to terminate the Company 401(k) Plans pursuant to the foregoing sentence, then if requested by Parent prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall terminate any and all Company 401(k) Plans, effective not later than the day immediately preceding the Effective Time. In either case, if the Company 401(k) Plans are terminated, the Company shall provide Parent with evidence of such termination pursuant to resolution of the Company Board (the form and substance of which shall be subject to review and approval, which will not be unreasonably withheld, by Parent) not later than the day immediately preceding the Offer Closing Date or the Effective Time, as applicable. In the event of any such termination, Parent shall use commercially reasonable efforts to cause any New 401(k) Plan to accept direct rollovers from such Company 401(k) Plan with respect to accounts of the Company Continuing Employees, which rollover may consist of cash, a promissory note (as described below) or any combination thereof from such Company 401(k) Plan. The Company shall ensure that the Company 401(k) Plan does not permit any new loans on or after the termination date and does not place any then existing loans of any Company Continuing Employees under the Company 401(k) Plan in default solely by reason of the termination of such plan so long as such participant continues to repay the loan and transfers such participant's account balance under such terminated Company 401(k) Plan, together with the promissory note evidencing the plan loan and the applicable loan documentation, to the New 401(k) Plan through a direct rollover in accordance with procedures established by the New 401(k) Plan.
Company 401(k) Plans.
Company 401(k) Plans
          (e)           Notwithstanding , the provisions of this are intended to be for the sole benefit of, and will be enforceable by, the parties hereto, and nothing in this , whether express or implied, shall create any third-party beneficiary or other rights in any other Person, including any employees or former employees of the Company or its Subsidiaries, any participant in any New Plan or any dependent or beneficiary thereof.
Third Party Beneficiaries.
Section 9.09
Section 6.07
Section 6.07
          (f)          . Nothing contained herein, express or implied (i) shall be construed to establish, amend or modify any benefit plan, program, agreement or
Limitations
arrangement or (ii) shall alter or limit the ability of the Surviving Corporation, Parent or any of their respective Affiliates to amend, modify or terminate any benefit plan, program, agreement or arrangement at any time assumed, established, sponsored or maintained by any of them, so long as any such amendment, modification or termination is consistent with the provisions of this . If (A) a party other than the parties hereto makes a claim or takes other action to enforce any provision in this Agreement as an amendment to any New Plan, and (B) such provision is deemed to be an amendment to such New Plan even though not explicitly designated as such in this Agreement, then, solely with respect to such New Plan, such provision shall lapse retroactively and shall have no amendatory effect with respect thereto. The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that the terms set forth in this shall not create any right in any Company Employee or any other Person to any continued employment with the Surviving Corporation, Parent or any of their respective Affiliates.
Section 6.07
Section 6.07
          Section 6.08     Directors' and Officers' Indemnification and Insurance.
(a)          All rights to indemnification, advancement of expenses and exculpation by the Company now existing in favor of any Person who is now, or has been at any time prior to the date hereof or who becomes prior to the Effective Time an officer or director of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or at any time is or has been serving at the request of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as a director, officer, fiduciary or trustee of a Company Employee Plan (each an "") as provided in the Company Charter Documents, in each case as in effect on the date of this Agreement, or pursuant to any other Contracts in effect on the date hereof and as provided or made available to Parent prior to the date hereof and disclosed on of the Company Disclosure Letter, shall be assumed by the Surviving Corporation in the Merger, without further action, at the Effective Time and shall survive the Merger and shall remain in full force and effect in accordance with their terms until the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations with respect to any claims against such Indemnified Parties, and, in the event that any proceeding is pending or asserted or any claim made during such period, until the final disposition of such proceeding or claim.
          
Indemnified Party
Section 6.08
          (b)           For six (6) years after the Effective Time, to the fullest extent permitted under applicable Law, Parent and the Surviving Corporation (the "") shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless each Indemnified Party against all losses, claims, damages, liabilities, fees, expenses (including legal fees and disbursements), obligations, judgments, fines and settlements (in the case of settlements, with the approval of an Indemnifying Party (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld) (collectively, "") arising in whole or in part out of actions or omissions in their capacity as such occurring at or prior to the Effective Time (including in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement), and shall promptly advance to each Indemnified Party any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Indemnified Party in connection with investigating or defending any such Losses as such expenses are incurred, subject to the Surviving Corporation's receipt of an
Indemnifying Parties
Losses
undertaking by such Indemnified Party to repay such legal and other fees and expenses paid in advance if it is ultimately determined in a final and non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction that such Indemnified Party is not entitled to be indemnified under applicable Law. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Indemnifying Party shall be required to indemnify any Indemnified Party pursuant hereto if it shall be determined by a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction that the Indemnified Party acted in bad faith and not in a manner such Indemnified Party believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company.
          (c)          The Company shall purchase, at or prior to the Effective Time, a "tail" directors' and officers' liability insurance policy with a claims period of six (6) years from the Effective Time with at least the same coverage and amounts and containing terms and conditions that are not less advantageous to the directors and officers of the Company and its Subsidiaries than those of the directors' and officers' insurance policy in effect on the date of this Agreement; , , that the premium therefor is not in excess of 200% of the last annual premium paid prior to the date of this Agreement (which aggregate premiums with respect to 2011 are hereby represented and warranted by the Company to be approximately $765,000). Such tail policy may not be amended, modified, cancelled or revoked after the Offer Closing by the Company, Parent or the Surviving Corporation in any manner that is adverse to the beneficiaries.
provided
however
          (d)          The obligations of Parent and the Surviving Corporation under this shall survive the consummation of the Merger and shall not be terminated or modified in such a manner as to adversely affect any Indemnified Party to whom this applies without the consent of such affected Indemnified Party (it being expressly agreed that the Indemnified Parties to whom this applies shall be third party beneficiaries of this , each of whom may enforce the provisions of this ).
Section 6.08
Section 6.08
Section 6.08
Section 6.08
Section 6.08
          (e)          In the event Parent, the Surviving Corporation or any of their respective successors or assigns (i) consolidates with or merges into any other Person and shall not be the continuing or surviving corporation or entity in such consolidation or merger or (ii) transfers all or substantially all of its properties and assets to any Person, then, and in either such case, proper provision shall be made so that the successors and assigns of Parent or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, shall assume all of the obligations set forth in this . The agreements and covenants contained herein shall not be deemed to be exclusive of any other rights to which any Indemnified Party is entitled, whether pursuant to Law, Contract or otherwise. Nothing in this Agreement is intended to, shall be construed to or shall release, waive or impair any rights to directors' and officers' insurance claims under any policy that is or has been in existence with respect to the Company or its officers, directors and employees, it being understood and agreed that the indemnification provided for in this is not prior to, or in substitution for, any such claims under any such policies.
Section 6.08
Section 6.08
 
          Section 6.09 Reasonable Best Efforts.
          (a)          Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement (including those contained in this , each of the parties hereto shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, use its reasonable best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all actions, and to do, or cause to be done, and to assist and cooperate with the other parties in doing, all things necessary, proper or advisable to consummate and make effective, and to satisfy all conditions to, in the most expeditious manner practicable, the Offer, the Merger and the transactions contemplated hereby, including (i) the obtaining of all necessary permits, waivers, consents, approvals and actions or nonactions from Governmental Entities and the making of all necessary registrations and filings (including filings with Governmental Entities) and the taking of all steps as may be necessary to obtain an approval or waiver from, or to avoid an action or proceeding by, any Governmental Entities, (ii) the obtaining of all material consents or waivers from third parties, and (iii) the execution and delivery of any additional instruments reasonably requested by the other party hereto or necessary to consummate the Offer, the Merger and to fully carry out the purposes of this Agreement. Each party hereto shall, subject to applicable Law, promptly (x) cooperate and coordinate with the other in the taking of the actions contemplated by clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) immediately above and (y) supply the other with any information that may be reasonably required in order to effectuate the taking of such actions. To the extent reasonably practicable, the parties or their Representatives shall have the right to review in advance and each of the parties will consult the others on, all the information relating to the other and each of their respective Subsidiaries that appears in any filing made with, or written materials submitted to, any Governmental Entity in connection with the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, except that confidential competitively sensitive business information may be redacted from such exchanges. Each party hereto shall promptly inform and provide a copy to the other party or parties hereto, as the case may be, of any communication from any Governmental Entity regarding any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. If any party hereto receives a request for additional information or documentary material from any Governmental Entity with respect to any filing or submission or with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, then it shall use reasonable best efforts to make, or cause to be made, as soon as reasonably practicable and after consultation with the other party, an appropriate response in compliance with such request. Each party hereto shall give the other reasonable prior notice of any communication to, and any proposed understanding, undertaking or agreement with, any Governmental Entity regarding any such filing or any such transaction. To the extent reasonably practicable, no party hereto shall, nor shall they permit their respective Representatives to, participate independently in any meeting or engage in any substantive conversation with any Governmental Entity in respect of any such filing, investigation or other inquiry without giving the other party reasonable prior notice of such meeting or conversation and, to the extent permitted by applicable Law, without giving the opportunity of the other party to attend or participate. To the extent
Section 6.09)
permitted by applicable Law, the parties to this Agreement will consult and cooperate with one another in connection with any analyses, appearance, presentations, memoranda, briefs, arguments, opinions and proposals made or submitted by or on behalf of any party to this Agreement in connection with proceedings under or related to the HSR Act. Any action taken by the Company that is permissible under shall not be a violation of this
Section 6.04
Section 6.09(a).
          (b)          Without limiting the generality of the undertakings pursuant to hereof, the parties hereto shall (i) provide or cause to be provided as promptly as reasonably practicable to Governmental Entities with jurisdiction over the Antitrust Laws (each such Governmental Entity, a "") information and documents requested by any Governmental Antitrust Authority as necessary, proper or advisable to permit consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including preparing and filing any notification and report form and related material required under the HSR Act and any additional consents and filings under any other Antitrust Laws as promptly as practicable following the date of this Agreement ( in the case of the filing under the HSR Act, such filing shall be made within five (5) Business Days of the date of this Agreement) and thereafter to respond as promptly as practicable to any request for additional information or documentary material that may be made under the HSR Act or any other applicable Antitrust Laws and (ii) use their reasonable best efforts to take such actions as are necessary or advisable to obtain prompt approval of the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement by any Governmental Entity or expiration of applicable waiting periods.
Section 6.09(a)
Governmental Antitrust Authority
provided that
          (c)          In the event that any administrative or judicial action or proceeding is instituted (or threatened to be instituted) by a Governmental Entity or private party challenging the Offer, the Merger or any other transaction contemplated by this Agreement, or any other agreement contemplated hereby, each of the parties hereto shall use its reasonable best efforts to contest and resist any such action or proceeding and to have vacated, lifted, reversed or overturned any Order, whether temporary, preliminary or permanent, that is in effect and that prohibits, prevents or restricts consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; , , that in no event shall Parent, the Company or any of their respective Affiliates be obligated to sell, transfer or otherwise divest any of its assets, properties or businesses (including assets, properties or businesses that were assets, properties or businesses of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries prior to the Effective Time) or enter into any agreements providing for any such sale, transfer or other divesture or restricting or limiting in any way or to any extent the Company or its Subsidiaries or Affiliates from engaging in any business anywhere in the world, other than the sale, transfer or divestiture of no more than five (5) store locations of the Company or Parent or any of their respective Subsidiaries that Parent, in its reasonable discretion, determines is to the business or operations of the Company or Parent, as applicable, taken as a whole.
provided
however
de minimis
          
Section 6.10     Financing.
          (a)          Parent and Merger Sub acknowledge and agree that the Company and its Affiliates and its and their respective Representatives shall not incur any liability to any Person under, nor (except as expressly set forth in below) have any obligations with respect to, any financing that Parent and Merger Sub may raise in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement except that at the Effective Time, the Company and its Subsidiaries may become liable in respect of the debt financing documents contemplated by the executed commitment letter from JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Bank of America, N.A., and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, including any related fee letter with only the fee amounts and certain other terms (none of which concern or would adversely affect the amount, availability, timing or conditionality of (or contain any conditions precedent to) the Financing) redacted (collectively, the ""), pursuant to which, and subject to the terms and conditions thereof, the lender parties thereto have committed to lend the amounts set forth therein on the terms set forth therein to Parent for the purpose of funding the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (the ""). Further, Parent and Merger Sub shall, on a joint and several basis, indemnify and hold harmless the Company and its Affiliates and its and their respective Representatives from and against any and all losses, damages, claims, costs or expenses suffered or incurred by any of them in connection with the Financing, except to the extent arising from fraud, gross negligence, willful misconduct or intentional misrepresentation of the Company, its Affiliates and/or any of its Representatives.
Section 6.11
Commitment Letter
Financing
          (b)          Each of Parent and Merger Sub shall use their respective reasonable best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all actions and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary, proper or advisable to arrange and obtain the proceeds of the Financing on the terms and conditions described in the Commitment Letter, including using their respective reasonable best efforts to: (i) enter into definitive agreements with respect thereto on the terms and conditions contained in the Commitment Letter as promptly as practicable after the date hereof, (ii) satisfy, or cause their respective Representatives to satisfy, on a timely basis all conditions applicable to Parent, Merger Sub or their respective Representatives that are within their respective control in such definitive agreements, and (iii) subject to the terms and conditions of the Commitment Letter, cause the lenders and any other Persons providing the Financing to fund the Financing at the Offer Closing (with respect to amounts required to consummate the Offer) and the Closing (with respect to amounts required to consummate the Merger).
          (c)          Parent shall not agree to any amendment or modification to, or grant any waiver of, any condition or other provision under the Commitment Letter without the prior written consent of the Company if such amendment, modification or waiver would (i) reduce the aggregate amount of the Financing such that Parent would not have sufficient funds (including cash, cash equivalents, available lines of credit or other sources of immediately available funds) to pay the aggregate Offer Price and the Merger Consideration contemplated by this Agreement and to perform the other obligations of Parent and Merger Sub contemplated by this Agreement or (ii) impose new or additional
conditions that would reasonably be expected to prevent or delay in any material respect the ability of Parent to consummate the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Parent shall not release or consent to the termination of the obligations of the lenders under the Commitment Letter, except for assignments and replacements of an individual lender under the terms of or in connection with the syndication of the Financing or as otherwise expressly contemplated by the Commitment Letter.
          (d)          In the event that any portion of the Financing becomes unavailable in the manner or from the sources contemplated in the Commitment Letter, (i) Parent shall promptly so notify the Company upon obtaining knowledge thereof and (ii) Parent and Merger Sub shall use their respective reasonable best efforts to arrange and obtain, and to negotiate and enter into definitive agreements with respect to, alternative financing from alternative financial institutions in an amount, together with other sources available to Parent, sufficient to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement upon conditions not materially less favorable to Parent, Merger Sub and the Company than those in the Commitment Letter, as promptly as practicable following the occurrence of such event (and in any event no later than the Offer Closing Date or the Closing Date, as applicable). The definitive agreements entered into pursuant to the first sentence of this are referred to in this Agreement, collectively, as the ""
Section 6.10(d)
Financing Agreements.
          (e)          Each of Parent and Merger Sub acknowledges and agrees that neither the obtaining or consummation of the Financing or any alternative financing, is a condition to the Offer Closing or the Closing, and reaffirms its obligation to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement irrespective and independently of the availability of the Financing or any alternative financing, or the completion of any such issuance, subject to the Offer Conditions and the applicable conditions set forth in , the breach of which obligation will give rise to the remedies set forth in .
Section 7.01
Section 9.13
          (f)          Parent shall (i) furnish the Company complete, correct and executed copies of the Financing Agreements or any alternative financing agreement promptly upon their execution, (ii) give the Company prompt notice of any material breach or material threatened breach by any party of any of the Commitment Letter, any alternative financing commitment, the Financing Agreements, or any alternative financing agreement of which Parent or Merger Sub becomes aware or any termination thereof or refusal to provide in full, or stated intent to refuse to provide in full, in each case, to the extent required to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the financing contemplated by the Financing Agreements, and (iii) otherwise keep the Company reasonably informed of the status of its efforts to arrange the Financing (or any alternative financing), provided that Parent shall be under no obligation to disclose any information that is subject to an attorney-client or similar privilege.
           Subject to , the Company shall and shall cause its Subsidiaries, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause their respective Representatives to, at Parent's sole expense, reasonably cooperate in connection with the arrangement of the Financing or alternative financing as may be reasonably requested by Parent (provided that such requested cooperation does not unreasonably interfere with the ongoing operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries or utilize an undue amount of the Company's or Subsidiaries' personnel time). Subject to the immediately preceding sentence, such cooperation by the Company and its Subsidiaries and their respective Representatives shall include, at the reasonable request of Parent, (a) participating in a reasonable number of meetings and presentations with prospective lenders (including using reasonable best efforts to make available the Company's senior management for participation in such meetings), (b) using reasonable best efforts to provide information (including any information necessary to facilitate preparation of projections and the pro forma financial statements required pursuant to the Securities Act (including Article XI of Regulation S-X) in connection with the Merger), documents, authorization letters, opinions and certificates, enter into agreements and take other actions that are customary in connection with the Financing or alternative financing or necessary or desirable to permit Parent to fulfill conditions or obligations under the definitive documentation for the Financing or the alternative financing, (c) furnishing the report of the Company's auditor on the most recently available audited consolidated financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries and using its reasonable best efforts to obtain the consent of such auditor to the use of such report in accordance with normal custom and practice, (d) using reasonable best efforts to assist in the preparation of one or more confidential information memoranda and other marketing and syndication materials reasonably requested by Parent and (e) using commercially reasonable efforts to assist in procuring any necessary rating agency ratings or approvals. The Company hereby consents to the reasonable use of its logos in connection with the Financing or any alternative Financing, provided that such use is disclosed to the Company in writing prior to the time that it is so used, such logos are used in a manner that could not reasonably be expected to harm or disparage the Company, its Subsidiaries or their marks and on such other customary terms and conditions as the Company or applicable Subsidiary shall reasonably impose. Parent shall, promptly upon termination of this Agreement, reimburse the Company for all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses and costs incurred in connection with the Company's or its Affiliates' obligations under this . Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries shall be required to pay any commitment or other similar fee or enter into any definitive agreement or incur any other liability or obligation in connection with the Financing (or any alternative financing) prior to the Effective Time. All material non-public information provided by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their Representatives pursuant to this shall be kept confidential in accordance with the Confidentiality Agreement, except that Parent and Merger Sub shall be permitted to disclose such information to the lenders in respect of the Commitment Letter and other potential sources of capital, rating agencies and prospective lenders and
Section 6.11     Financing Cooperation.
Section 6.10(a)
Section 6.11
Section 6.11
investors during syndication of the Financing or any alternative Financing subject to the lenders, potential sources of capital, ratings agencies and prospective lenders and investors entering into customary confidentiality undertakings with respect to such information (including through a notice and undertaking in a form customarily used in confidential information memoranda for senior credit facilities).
           The initial press release with respect to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby shall be a release mutually agreed to by the Company and Parent. Thereafter, each of the Company, Parent and Merger Sub shall consult with and obtain the approval of each other before issuing any press release or other public announcements with respect to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby and shall not issue any such press release or public announcement prior to such consultation and approval, except as may be required by applicable Law or any listing agreement related to the trading of the shares of either party on any securities exchange or national securities quotation system, in which case, the party proposing to issue such press release or make such public announcement shall use reasonable best efforts to consult in good faith with the other party before issuing any such press release or making any such public announcement; that neither consultation nor approval shall be required with respect to any release or announcement permitted by .
Section 6.12     Public Announcements.
provided
Section 6.04
           If any "control share acquisition," "fair price," "moratorium" or other anti-takeover Law becomes or is deemed to be applicable to the Company, Parent, Merger Sub, the Offer, the acquisition of shares of Company Common Stock pursuant to the Offer, the Merger or any other transaction contemplated by this Agreement, then each of the Company, Parent, Merger Sub, and their respective boards of directors shall grant such approvals and take such actions as are necessary so that the transactions contemplated hereby may be consummated as promptly as practicable on the terms contemplated hereby and otherwise act to render such anti-takeover Law inapplicable to the foregoing. Neither Parent nor the Company will take any action that would cause this Agreement, the Offer, the Merger or the other transactions contemplated hereby to be subject to requirements imposed by any such Laws.
Section 6.13     Takeover Statutes.
           Parent shall (a) cause Merger Sub to perform its obligations under this Agreement and to consummate the Offer and the Merger on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement and (b) ensure that, prior to the Effective Time, Merger Sub shall not conduct any business or make any investments other than as specifically contemplated by this Agreement, or incur or guarantee any indebtedness.
Section 6.14     Merger Sub.
           Nothing contained in this Agreement is intended to give Parent, directly or indirectly, the right to control or direct the Company's or its Subsidiaries' operations prior to the Offer Closing. Prior to the Offer Closing, the Company shall exercise, consistent with the terms and conditions of this Agreement, complete control and supervision over its and its Subsidiaries' operations.
Section 6.15 No     Control of the Company's Business.
           Prior to the Effective Time, Parent and the Company shall take all such steps as may be required to cause to be exempt under Rule 16b-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act any dispositions of shares of Company Common Stock (including derivative securities with respect to such shares) that are treated as dispositions under such rule and result from the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby by each director or officer of the Company who is subject to the reporting requirements of Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act with respect to the Company.
Section 6.16     Section 16 Matters.
           Prior to the Offer Closing, the Company (acting through the compensation committee of the Company Board) shall take all such steps as may be required to cause each agreement, arrangement or understanding entered into by the Company or a Subsidiary of the Company on or after the date hereof with any of its officers, directors or employees pursuant to which consideration is paid to such officer, director or employee to be approved as an "employment compensation, severance or other employee benefit arrangement" within the meaning of Rule 14d-10(d)(1) under the Exchange Act and to satisfy the requirements of the non-exclusive safe harbor set forth in Rule 14d-10(d) under the Exchange Act. The Company Board has determined that Company's compensation committee is composed solely of "independent directors" in accordance with the requirements of Rule 14d-10(d)(2) of the Exchange Act and the instructions thereto.
Section 6.17     Rule 14d-10(d) Matters.
          Section 6.18     Convertible Notes.
          (a)          The Company shall settle in cash any conversion requests made by holders of Convertible Notes that become payable in connection with this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby unless holders of Convertible Notes become entitled to receive a combination of cash and shares of Company Common Stock as set forth in the Indenture, dated April 30, 2007, between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee (the ""). The Company shall not make an irrevocable Physical Settlement Election (as such term is defined in the Indenture).
Indenture
          (b)          The Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to timely deliver or cause to be delivered all notices and opinions of counsel required to be delivered, and timely take all other actions required to be taken, by the Indenture, in respect of the Merger or the other transactions contemplated hereby including, for the avoidance of
doubt, any notices or opinions of counsel and other actions necessary to allow Parent to execute a supplemental indenture and become the Company's successor under the Indenture in accordance with its terms. The Company shall provide Parent, Merger Sub and their counsel with a reasonable opportunity to review and comment on all such notices and other communications to holders of the Convertible Notes, the Trustee or any depository, prior to their delivery, and the Company shall give reasonable and good faith consideration to any comments made by Parent, Merger Sub and their counsel. The Company shall provide Parent with copies of all such notices and other communications. The Company shall provide Parent and Merger Sub with advance notice of any election proposed to be made by the Company under the Indenture, and the Company shall give reasonable and good faith consideration to any comments made by Parent, Merger Sub and their counsel regarding any such election. The Company shall use its reasonable best efforts not to cause or permit a Default (as such term is defined in the Indenture) or Event of Default (as such term is defined in the Indenture) to occur prior to the Effective Time. The Company shall promptly provide Parent, Merger Sub and their counsel with (i) any written communications that the Company or its counsel may receive from any holder of the Convertible Notes, the Trustee or any depository promptly after receipt of those communications, and (ii) a reasonable opportunity to participate with the Company or its counsel in any material discussions or meetings with any holder of the Convertible Notes, the Trustee or any depository.
           The Company shall give Parent the opportunity to participate in the defense or settlement of any litigation against the Company and/or its directors relating to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and no such settlement shall be agreed to without Parent's prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), except to the extent such settlement is fully covered by the Company's insurance policies (other than any applicable deductible), but only if such settlement would not result in the imposition of any restriction on the business or operations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or a material increase in the Company's insurance premiums.
Section 6.19     Shareholder Litigation.
           From time to time, as and when requested by any party hereto and at the requesting party's expense, any other party shall execute and deliver, or cause to be executed and delivered, all such documents and instruments and shall take, or cause to be taken, all such further or other actions as the requesting party may reasonably deem necessary or desirable to evidence and effectuate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Section 6.20     Further Assurances.
           The Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to deliver to Parent no later than three (3) Business Days prior to the Closing Date a pay-off letter from the Agent under the Company's Loan Agreement, customary as to form and substance, addressed to the Company and Parent and signed by the Agent, which
Section 6.21     Payoff Letter.
pay-off letter shall be updated, as necessary, on the Closing Date to specify the aggregate amount of Obligations (under and as defined in the Loan Agreement) outstanding as of immediately prior to the Closing.
           The respective obligations of each party to this Agreement to effect the Merger is subject to the satisfaction or waiver on or prior to the Closing Date of each of the following conditions:
Section 7.01     Conditions to Each Party's Obligation to Effect the Merger.
          (a)           To the extent required by applicable Law, this Agreement will have been duly adopted by the Requisite Company Vote.
Company Shareholder Approval.
          (b)           No Governmental Entity having jurisdiction over any party hereto shall have enacted, issued, promulgated, enforced or entered any Laws or Orders, that make illegal, enjoin, restrain, prevent or otherwise prohibit consummation of the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
No Injunctions, Restraints or Illegality.
          (c)           The applicable waiting period (and any extension thereof) under the HSR Act shall have expired or been earlier terminated.
Antitrust.
          (d)           Merger Sub shall have previously accepted for payment all shares of Company Common Stock validly tendered and not validly withdrawn pursuant to the Offer (including pursuant to any "subsequent offering period" provided by Merger Sub pursuant to this Agreement).
Purchase of Company Common Stock in the Offer.
          Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this , none of Company, Parent or Merger Sub may rely on the failure of any condition set forth in to be satisfied if such failure was proximately caused by such party's breach of any representation, warranty, covenant or agreement set forth in this Agreement.
Section 7.01
Section 7.01
           This Agreement may be terminated, and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement may be abandoned, at any time prior to the Effective Time (notwithstanding any approval of this Agreement by the shareholders of the Company) by mutual written consent of Parent, Merger Sub and the Company.
Section 8.01     Termination By Mutual Consent.
           This Agreement may be terminated, and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement may
Section 8.02     Termination By Either Parent or the Company.
be abandoned, at any time prior to the Effective Time (notwithstanding any approval of this Agreement by the shareholders of the Company) by either Parent or the Company:
          (a)          if the Offer Closing shall not have occurred on or before the Outside Date; that the right to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this shall not be available to any party whose breach of any representation, warranty, covenant or agreement set forth in this Agreement has been the proximate cause of, or resulted in, the failure of the Offer Closing to have occurred on or before the Outside Date;
provided, however,
Section 8.02(a)
          (b)          if any Governmental Entity of competent jurisdiction shall have enacted, issued, promulgated, enforced or entered any Law or Order making illegal, enjoining, restraining, preventing or otherwise prohibiting the consummation of the Offer or the Merger or the other transactions contemplated hereby, and such Law or Order shall have become final and nonappealable; that the right to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this shall not be available to any party whose breach of any representation, warranty, covenant or agreement set forth in this Agreement has been the proximate cause of, or resulted in, the issuance, promulgation, enforcement or entry of any such Law or Order; or
provided, however,
Section 8.02(b)
          (c)          if the adoption of this Agreement by the Company's shareholders is required by applicable Law, if the Requisite Company Vote is not obtained at the Company Shareholders Meeting duly convened therefor (or at any adjournment or postponement thereof permitted by this Agreement) at which a quorum is present and the vote to adopt this Agreement is taken.
           This Agreement may be terminated, and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement may be abandoned, at any time prior to the Effective Time (notwithstanding any approval of this Agreement by the shareholders of the Company) by Parent:
Section 8.03     Termination By Parent.
          (a)          if, prior to the Offer Closing (i) a Company Adverse Recommendation Change shall have occurred or if the Company fails to publicly reconfirm the Company Board Recommendation if so requested by Parent within seven (7) Business Days following such request (provided such request may only be made in the event the Company has received a public announcement of an Acquisition Proposal or any amendment to an Acquisition Proposal), (ii) if there is a material breach of or or (iii) if the Company Board shall have resolved to do any of the foregoing or publicly announced its intention to do so; or
Section 6.04
Section 6.05(a)
          (b)          if, prior to the Offer Closing, the Company shall have breached or failed to perform any of its representations, warranties, covenants or other agreements set forth in this Agreement, which breach or failure to perform would give rise to the failure of a condition set forth in paragraphs (e) and (f) of (and in each case such breach or failure to perform is incapable of being cured by the Outside Date, or if curable through
Exhibit A
use of reasonable best efforts, has not been cured in all material respects by the Company within twenty (20) Business Days after its receipt of written notice thereof from Parent (or, if less than twenty (20) Business Days prior to the Outside Date, prior to the Outside Date).
                This Agreement may be terminated by the Company at any time prior to the Effective Time (notwithstanding, in the case of immediately below, any approval of this Agreement by the shareholders of the Company):
Section 8.04
Termination By the Company.
Section 8.04(b)
          (a)          if, prior to the Offer Closing, the Company Board authorizes the Company, in compliance with the terms of this Agreement, to enter into a Company Acquisition Agreement (other than an Acceptable Confidentiality Agreement) in respect of a Superior Proposal; the Company shall have paid any amounts due pursuant to hereof in accordance with the terms, and at the times, specified therein; and provided further that in the event of such termination, the Company substantially concurrently enters into such Company Acquisition Agreement; or
provided that
Section 8.06(b)
          (b)          if, prior to the Offer Closing, Parent or Merger Sub shall have breached or failed to perform any of its representations, warranties, covenants or other agreements set forth in this Agreement and in each case such breach or failure to perform (i) is incapable of being cured by the Outside Date, or if curable through use of reasonable best efforts, has not been cured in all material respects by Parent or Merger Sub within twenty (20) Business Days after its receipt of written notice thereof from the Company (or, if less than twenty (20) Business Days prior to the Outside Date, prior to the Outside Date), and (ii) in any way would reasonably be expected to prevent, materially impede or materially delay the consummation by Parent or Merger Sub of the Offer, the Merger or the other transactions contemplated hereby.
                The party desiring to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this (other than pursuant to shall deliver written notice of such termination to each other party hereto specifying with particularity the reason for such termination, and any such termination in accordance with this shall be effective immediately upon delivery of such written notice to the other party. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to this , it will become void and of no further force and effect, with no liability on the part of any party to this Agreement (or any stockholder or shareholder, director, officer, employee, agent or Representative of such party) to any other party hereto, except (i) with respect to , this , and (and any related definitions contained in any such Sections or Article), which shall remain in full force and effect and (ii) with respect to any liabilities or damages incurred or suffered by a party, to the extent such liabilities or damages were the result of a knowing breach by another party of this Agreement or fraud. A "knowing" breach will be deemed to have
Section 8.05
Notice of Termination; Effect of Termination.
Article VIII
Section 8.01)
Section 8.05
Article VIII
Section 6.03(b)
Section 8.05
Section 8.06
Article IX
occurred if the other party took or failed to take action with actual knowledge that the action so taken or omitted to be taken constituted a breach of this Agreement applicable to such party.
          
Section 8.06     Fees and Expenses Following Termination.
          (a)          If this Agreement is terminated by Parent pursuant to , then the Company shall pay to Parent (by wire transfer of immediately available funds), within two (2) Business Days after such termination, a fee in an amount equal to the Termination Fee.
Section 8.03(a)
          (b)          If this Agreement is terminated by the Company pursuant to , then the Company shall pay to Parent (by wire transfer of immediately available funds), at or prior to such termination, the Termination Fee.
Section 8.04(a)
          (c)          If this Agreement is terminated by the Company or Parent pursuant to or , and (A) prior to such termination, a Takeover Proposal that has not been withdrawn shall have been made to the Company Board or the Company or publicly announced or publicly renewed or shall have otherwise become publicly known or any Person shall have publicly announced an intention to make an Acquisition Proposal, in each case whether or not conditional, and (B) within twelve (12) months following the date of such termination of this Agreement the Company shall have entered into a Company Acquisition Agreement with respect to a Takeover Proposal, or a Takeover Proposal shall have been consummated, then in any such event the Company shall pay to Parent (by wire transfer of immediately available funds), immediately prior to and as a condition to consummating such transaction, the Termination Fee (it being understood for all purposes of this , all references in the definition of Takeover Proposal to 20% shall be deemed to be references to "50% or more" instead).
Section 8.02(a)
Section 8.02(c)
Section 8.06(c)
          (d)          The Company acknowledges and hereby agrees that the provisions of this are an integral part of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and that, without such provisions, Parent and Merger Sub would not have entered into this Agreement. If the Company shall fail to pay in a timely manner the amounts due pursuant to this , and, in order to obtain such payment, Parent makes a claim against the Company that results in a judgment against the Company, the Company shall pay to Parent the reasonable costs and expenses of Parent (including its reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses) incurred or accrued in connection with such suit, together with interest on the amounts set forth in this at the prime lending rate prevailing during such period as published in . Any interest payable hereunder shall be calculated on a daily basis from the date such amounts were required to be paid until (but excluding) the date of actual payment, and on the basis of a 360-day year. The parties acknowledge and agree that in no event shall the Company be obligated to pay the Termination Fee on more than one occasion.
Section 8.06
Section 8.06
Section 8.06
The Wall Street Journal
          (e)          Except as otherwise provided in this Agreement, all Expenses incurred in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby will be paid by the party incurring such Expenses.
           Subject to applicable Law and except as otherwise provided in this Agreement including pursuant to , this Agreement may be amended or supplemented in any and all respects, whether before or after the Offer Closing or any vote or consent of the Company's shareholders contemplated hereby, by written agreement signed by each of the parties hereto; that following the Offer Closing, no amendment shall be made which decreases the Merger Consideration and no other amendment shall be made without the approval of the Independent Directors and, after adoption of this Agreement by the holders of Company Common Stock, no amendments shall be made which by Law requires further approval by such holders without obtaining such further approval.
Section 8.07     Amendment.
Section 1.03(c)
provided, however,
           At any time prior to the Effective Time, Parent or Merger Sub, on the one hand, or the Company, on the other hand, may, subject to , (a) extend the time for the performance of any of the obligations of the other party(ies), (b) waive any inaccuracies in the representations and warranties of the other party(ies) contained in this Agreement or in any document delivered under this Agreement, or (c) waive compliance with any of the covenants, agreements or conditions contained in this Agreement; , that after adoption of this Agreement by the holders of Company Common Stock, no waiver shall be made which by Law requires further approval by such holders without obtaining such further approval. Any agreement on the part of a party to any extension or waiver will be valid only if set forth in an instrument in writing signed by such party. The failure of any party to assert any of its rights under this Agreement or otherwise will not constitute a waiver of such rights.
Section 8.08     Extension; Waiver.
Section 1.03(c)
provided, however
           For purposes of this Agreement, the following terms will have the following meanings when used herein with initial capital letters:
Section 9.01     Definitions.
          "" means a confidentiality agreement that contains provisions as to the treatment of confidential information that, taken as a whole, are no less favorable in any material respect to the Company than those contained in the Confidentiality Agreement (except for such changes specially necessary for the Company to comply with its obligations under this Agreement).
Acceptable Confidentiality Agreement
          "" means, with respect to any Person, any other Person that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by or is under common control with, such first Person.
Affiliate
For the purposes of this definition, "control" (including, the terms "controlling," "controlled by" and "under common control with"), as applied to any Person, means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of that Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by Contract or otherwise.
          "" means Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as administrative agent under the Loan Agreement.
Agent
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Preamble.
Agreement
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Antitrust Laws
Section 4.03(c)
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals.
BCL
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Book-Entry Shares
Section 3.02(a)
          "" means any day, other than Saturday, Sunday or any day on which banking institutions located in New York City are authorized or required by Law or other governmental action to close.
Business Day
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Certificate
Section 3.01(b)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Certificate of Merger
Section 2.03
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Charter Documents
Section 4.01(a)
"" has the meaning set forth in .
          
Closing
Section 2.02
"" has the meaning set forth in .
          
Closing Date
Section 2.02
          "" means the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, as amended, and as codified in Section 4980B of the Code and Section 601 et. seq. of ERISA.
COBRA
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Code
Section 3.05
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Commitment Letter
Section 6.10(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Preamble.
Company
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company 401(k) Plans
Section 6.07(d)
"" has the meaning set forth .
          
Company Acquisition Agreement
Section 6.04(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Adverse Recommendation Change
Section 6.04(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Balance Sheet
Section 4.04(i)
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals.
Company Board
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Board Recommendation
Section 4.03(d)
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals.
Company Common Stock
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Continuing Employees
Section 6.07(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in the introductory language in .
Company Disclosure Letter
Article IV
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Employee
Section 4.10(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Employee Plans
Section 4.10(a)
          "" means a Company Stock Right or a Company Stock Award or a phantom stock award, as the case may be.
Company Equity Award
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Financial Advisor
Section 4.22
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Form 10-K
Article IV
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company IP
Section 4.07(b)
          "" means all licenses, sublicenses, development agreements, reseller agreements, distribution agreements, settlement agreements, consent-to-use or standstill agreements, source code escrow agreements, outsourcing agreements, standalone indemnification agreements, covenants not to sue and permissions and other Contracts under which the Company's or any Subsidiary's ownership of or right to use any Company IP arose or pursuant to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries license, sublicense or otherwise distribute or permit the use of any of such Company IP to or by any third party, or that would otherwise relate to the Company IP, including the right to receive royalties or any other consideration.
Company IP Agreements
          "" means any event, occurrence, fact, effect, development, condition or change that is, or would reasonably be expected to become, individually or in the aggregate, materially adverse to (i) the business, properties, assets, results of operations or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (ii) the ability of the Company to consummate the
Company Material Adverse Effect
transactions contemplated hereby on a timely basis; that, for the purposes of clause (i), a Company Material Adverse Effect shall not be deemed to include events, occurrences, facts, effects, developments, conditions or changes arising out of or resulting from: (a) general economic, regulatory or political conditions, and conditions in the banking, financial, credit or securities markets, including acts of God, war, terrorism, natural disasters, epidemics and pandemics; (b) economic or other conditions affecting the industries in which the Company operates, as a whole; (c) the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the announcement, pendency or consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (d) changes in applicable Law or accounting regulation or principles (or interpretations thereof); (e) any changes in the market price or trading volume of shares of Company Common Stock or any failure to meet internal or published projections, forecasts or revenue or earnings predictions of the Company (provided that the underlying causes of such changes shall not be excluded); (f) any litigation brought by shareholders of the Company relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby; (g) (A) any action taken by Parent or any of its Affiliates or (B) the omission of an action that was required to be taken by Parent or any of its Affiliates; (h) compliance by the Company with its covenants and agreements in this Agreement or any action taken by the Company or any of its Affiliates at the request or with the consent of Parent or any of its Affiliates or (i) resulting from the identity of Parent or any of its Affiliates as the acquirer of the Company or any facts or circumstances concerning Parent or its Affiliates; , however, that any event, change and effect referred to in clauses (a), (b) or (d) immediately above shall be taken into account only to the extent such event, occurrence, fact, effect, development, condition or change has a disproportionate effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, compared to other participants in the industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries conduct their businesses.
provided, however,
provided further
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Material Contract
Section 4.13(a)
          "" means all Company IP owned or purported to be owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
Company-Owned IP
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Preferred Stock
Section 4.02(a)
          "" means all Software developed by or on behalf of the Company that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries owns or purports to own, other than any web-based Software for which the source code is customarily accessible to end-users, and all Intellectual Property embodied in or related thereto.
Company Proprietary Software
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Proxy Statement
Section 4.03(c)
          "" has the meaning set forth in.
Company SEC Documents
Section 4.04(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Securities
Section 4.02(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Stock Award
Section 3.07(b)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Stock Right
Section 3.07(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Stock Plans
Section 4.02(b)(i)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Shareholders Meeting
Section 4.19
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Subsidiary Securities
Section 4.02(c)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Company Transaction Documents
Section 4.03(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Confidentiality Agreement
Section 6.03(b)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Confidentiality Agreement Addendum
Section 4.11(d)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Consent
Section 4.03(c)
          "" means any contracts, agreements, licenses, notes, bonds, mortgages, indentures, leases, powers of attorney, letters of credit, binding undertakings, covenants not to compete, obligations, purchase or sales orders, arrangements, or other binding instruments or binding commitments, whether oral or written, and shall include each amendment, supplement and modification to the foregoing.
Contracts
          "" means the 1.125% Senior Convertible Notes due May 1, 2014 issued by the Company.
Convertible Notes
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Dissenting Shares
Section 3.03(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Dissenting Shareholder
Section 3.03(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
EPCRS
Section 4.10(b)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Effective Time
Section 2.03
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Electronic Data Room
Section 4.23
          "" means any applicable Law, and any Order (including any legally binding judicial or administrative interpretations, directives or opinions of a Governmental Entity) or binding agreement with any Governmental Entity: (i) relating to pollution (or the cleanup thereof) or the protection of natural resources, endangered or threatened species, or the environment (including ambient air, soil, surface water or groundwater, or subsurface strata); (ii) concerning the presence of, release of, exposure to, or the management, manufacture, use, containment, storage, recycling, reclamation,
Environmental Laws
reuse, treatment, generation, discharge, transportation, processing, production, disposal, remediation, emission or dumping of any Hazardous Materials; or (iii) relating to the protection of human health or the environment (with respect to exposure to Hazardous Materials).
          "" means any Liabilities, claims, judgments, damages (including punitive damages), losses, penalties, fines, Liens, costs and expenses (including attorneys' and consultants' fees) of investigation, remediation or defense of any matter relating to human health or the environment (with respect to exposure to Hazardous Materials) the environment of whatever kind or nature by any party, entity or authority, (a) that are incurred as a result of (i) the existence of Hazardous Materials in, on, under, at or emanating from any Real Estate or Former Real Estate, (ii) the offsite transportation, treatment, storage or disposal of Hazardous Materials generated by the Company, any of its Subsidiaries, or any Predecessors thereof or (iii) the violation of any Environmental Laws, or (b) that arise under the Environmental Laws.
Environmental Liabilities
          "" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.
ERISA
          "" means any Person that, together with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, would be treated as a single employer within the meaning of Section 414(b), (c), (m), or (o) of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
ESPP
Section 3.07(d)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Exchange Act
Section 1.01(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in.
Exchange Agent
Section 3.02(a)
          "" means, with respect to any Person, all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket fees and expenses (including all fees and expenses of counsel, accountants, financial advisors and investment bankers of such Person and its Affiliates), incurred by such Person or on its behalf in connection with or related to the authorization, preparation, negotiation, execution and performance of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, any litigation with respect thereto, the preparation, printing, filing and mailing of the Schedule TO, Schedule 14D-9 and Proxy Statement, the filing of any required notices under the HSR Act or Foreign Antitrust Laws, or in connection with other regulatory approvals, and all other matters related to the Offer, the Merger other transactions contemplated hereby.
Expenses
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Expiration Time
Section 1.01(d)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Financing
Section 6.10(a)
"" has the meaning set forth in .
          
Financing Agreements
Section 6.10(d)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Foreign Antitrust Laws
Section 4.03(c)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Foreign Company Plan
Section 4.10(l)
"" has the meaning set forth in .
          
Former Real Estate
Section 4.12(a)
          "" means, as of a particular date, all outstanding securities entitled generally to vote in the election of directors of the Company on a fully diluted basis, after giving effect to the exercise or conversion of all then exercisable or convertible options, rights and securities exercisable or convertible into such voting securities regardless of the conversion or exercise price, or other terms and conditions thereof (other than the Top-Up Option); provided that shares issuable pursuant to the Warrants shall be included as Fully Diluted Shares as of a particular date only to the extent that a notice of exercise thereof has been received by the Company as of such date.
Fully Diluted Shares
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
GAAP
Section 4.04(b)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Governmental Antitrust Authority
Section 6.09(b)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Governmental Entity
Section 4.03(c)
          "" means the Leased Real Estate that consists of one or more parcels of land and the buildings, structures, fixtures and improvements thereon.
Ground Leased Real Estate
          "" means petroleum, petroleum products, petroleum-derived substances, radioactive materials, hazardous wastes, polychlorinated biphenyls, lead based paint, radon, urea formaldehyde, asbestos or any materials containing asbestos, and any wastes, materials or substances regulated or defined as or included in the definition of "hazardous substances," "hazardous materials," "hazardous constituents," "hazardous wastes," "toxic substances," "pollutants," "contaminants" or any similar denomination intended to classify or regulate substances by reason of toxicity, carcinogenicity, ignitability, corrosivity or reactivity, under any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
HSR Act
Section 1.01(e)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Indemnified Party
Section 6.08(a)
"" has the meaning set forth in .
          
Indemnifying Parties
Section 6.08(b)
"" has the meaning set forth in.
          
Indenture
Section 6.18(a)
"" has the meaning set forth in .
          
Independent Directors
Section 1.03(c)
"" has the meaning set forth in .
          
Initial Expiration Time
Section 1.01(d)
          "" means all intellectual property rights throughout the world, including (i) all rights relating to the protection of inventions, including patents, patent application and invention disclosures, (ii) registered and unregistered trademarks, service marks, trade names, corporate names, logos, trade dress, brand names, designs and packaging, together with all goodwill associated therewith, (iii) all rights in works of authorship, copyrightable works, registered and unregistered copyrights, any other rights that may be known as or referred to as moral rights therein, and registrations and applications for registration thereof, (iv) Internet domain names and registrations and applications for registration thereof, (v) all rights relating to the protection of trade secrets, know-how and proprietary information, (vi) all computer software programs or applications (including data and related documentation) in both source and object code forms (the ""), (vii) all tangible or intangible proprietary information or materials that are currently used in or held for use in the Company's and any of its Subsidiaries' businesses, (viii) all rights to obtain renewals, reissues, reexaminations, continuations, continuations-in-part, divisions or other extensions of legal protections pertaining thereto, (ix) all actions and rights to sue at law or in equity for past, present or future infringement or other impairment of any of the foregoing, including the right to receive all proceeds and damages therefrom and (x) any right analogous to those set forth herein.
Intellectual Property
Software
          "" means, when used with respect to the Company, the knowledge of Anthony Romano, Eric Specter, Colin Stern, Brian P. Woolf, Marla C. Anderson, Carol L. Williams and MaryEllen H. MacDowell, including the knowledge of facts which such individuals should have had after reasonable due inquiry.
Knowledge
          "" means any domestic (federal, state or local) or foreign laws (including common law), statutes, ordinances, rules, regulations, codes, Orders or legally enforceable requirements enacted, issued, adopted, promulgated, enforced, ordered or applied by any Governmental Entity.
Laws
          "" shall mean all leases, subleases and other agreements under which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries leases, uses or occupies, or has the right to use or occupy, any real property.
Lease
          "" shall mean all real property that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries leases, subleases or otherwise uses or occupies, or has the right to use or occupy, pursuant to a Lease.
Leased Real Estate
          "" has the meaning set forth in
Legal Action
Section 4.09.
          "" shall mean any liability, indebtedness, obligation or commitment of any kind (whether known or unknown, accrued or unaccrued, absolute or contingent, asserted or not asserted, fixed or unfixed, matured or unmatured, disputed or undisputed, liquidated or unliquidated, secured or unsecured, joint or several, or otherwise, whenever
Liability
or however incurred or arising and whether or not required to be recorded or reflected on a balance sheet under GAAP or disclosed in the notes thereto).
          "" means, with respect to any property or asset, all pledges, liens, mortgages, charges, encumbrances, easements, hypothecations, claims, options, leases, rights of first refusal, rights of first offer, other offers or agreements to sell, lease or purchase, and security interests of any kind or nature whatsoever, including any restriction on use, voting, transfer, receipt of income or exercise of any other attribute of ownership.
Liens
          "" means the Fourth Amended and Restated Loan and Security Agreement, dated as of July 14, 2011, by and among the Company, Charming Shoppes of Delaware, Inc., Catherines Stores Corporation, Lane Bryant, Inc. and FB Apparel, Inc., as borrowers, Charming Shoppes of Delaware, Inc., as administrative borrower, certain other Subsidiaries of the Company, as guarantors, the lenders and issuing banks from time to time party thereto, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as administrative agent, Wells Fargo Capital Finance, LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, as joint lead arrangers and bookrunners, Bank of America, N.A., as syndication agent, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and U.S. Bank National Association, as co-documentation agents, as amended, modified or supplemented through the date of this Agreement.
Loan Agreement
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Losses
Section 6.08(b)
           "" has the meaning set forth in .
Loss Documentation
Section 3.06
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Measurement Date
Section 4.02(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals.
Merger
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Merger Consideration
Section 3.01(b)
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Preamble.
Merger Sub
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Minimum Condition
Section 1.01(b)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
NASDAQ
Section 1.01(e)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
New 401(k) Plan
Section 6.07(c)(i)(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
New Plans
Section 6.07(c)(i)(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Notice Period
Section 6.04(d)
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals.
Offer
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Offer Closing
Section 1.01(f)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Offer Closing Date
Section 1.01(f)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Offer Conditions
Section 1.01(b)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Offer Documents
Section 1.01(h)
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals.
Offer Price
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Offer to Purchase
Section 1.01(c)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Opus
Section 4.11(d)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Order
Section 4.09
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Outside Date
Section 1.01(e)
          "" shall mean any real estate owned in fee by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, together with all buildings, structures, fixtures and improvements thereon and all of the Company's and its Subsidiaries' rights thereto, including all easements, rights of way and appurtenances relating thereto.
Owned Real Estate
          "" has the meaning set forth in the Preamble.
Parent
          "" shall mean any event, occurrence, fact, effect, development, condition or change that does, or would reasonably be expected to, individually or in the aggregate, prevent or materially delay or impair Parent from performing its obligations under this Agreement in any material respect or the consummation of the Offer, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement or the other agreements and instruments contemplated hereby.
Parent Material Adverse Effect
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Parent Transaction Documents
Section 5.03(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Payment Fund
Section 3.02(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Permits
Section 4.08(b)
          "" means collectively, (i) Liens for current Taxes, assessments and governmental or utility company charges and levies which may be paid without penalty, interest or other additional charge or which are being contested in good faith by appropriate Legal Action and are adequately reserved for to the extent required by GAAP on the Company Balance Sheet; (ii) materialmen's, mechanics', carriers', warehousemen's, landlords', workmen's, repairmen's, or other like Liens arising or incurred in the ordinary course of business or by operation of Law which are not delinquent or which are being contested by appropriate Legal Action and are reserved for
Permitted Liens
to the extent required by GAAP on the Company Balance Sheet; (iii) Liens incurred or deposits made in the ordinary course of business in connection with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance, social security and other like laws, or to secure the performance of construction contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety, appeal or performance bonds; (iv) with respect to the Real Estate (x) any conditions that may be shown by a current, accurate survey, provided that such conditions, individually and in the aggregate, do not impair in any material respect the occupancy, use or operation of any Owned Real Estate or any Leased Real Estate for the purposes for which it is currently used in connection with the Company's and its Subsidiaries' businesses, (y) easements, encroachments, restrictions, rights-of-way and any other non-monetary title defects, whether or not of record, provided that such easements, encroachments, restrictions, rights-of-way and other non-monetary title defects, individually and in the aggregate do not impair in any material respect the occupancy, use or operation of any Owned Real Estate or any Leased Real Estate for the purposes for which it is currently used in connection with the Company's and its Subsidiaries' businesses, and (z) zoning, building, land use, environmental regulations and other similar restrictions; (v) with respect to the Leased Real Estate (other than the Ground Leased Real Estate), any Lien affecting the interest of any landlord; (vi) with respect to the Ground Leased Real Estate, any Lien affecting the interest of any landlord, that such Liens, individually and in the aggregate, do not impair in any material respect the occupancy, use or operation of any Ground Leased Real Estate for the purposes for which it is currently used in connection with the Company's and its Subsidiaries' businesses, or (vii) other imperfections of title or liens, if any, that would not reasonably be likely to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect.
provided
          "" means any individual, corporation, limited or general partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, trust, association, joint venture, Governmental Entity and other entity and group (which term will include a "group" as such term is defined in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act).
Person
means any Person to the liabilities of which, pursuant to the Environmental Laws, contractually, by common law or by operation of law, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries have succeeded.
          "Predecessor"
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Promissory Note
Section 1.04(b)
          "" means the Owned Real Estate and the Leased Real Estate.
Real Estate
          "" means, as to any Person, the directors, officers, employees, advisors or investment bankers of such Person.
Representatives
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Requisite Company Vote
Section 4.03(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
Section 4.04(h)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Schedule 14D-9
Section 1.02(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Schedule TO
Section 1.01(h)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
SEC
Section 1.01(e)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Securities Act
Section 1.04(c)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Short Form Threshold
Section 1.04(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in the definition of Intellectual Property.
Software
          "" means a Lease under which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries leases, uses or occupies real property for the operation of a retail store in connection with the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Store Lease
          "" means the real property that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries leases, subleases or otherwise uses or occupies in connection with its business pursuant to a Store Lease.
Store Leased Real Estate
          "" means, when used with respect to any party, any corporation or other organization, whether incorporated or unincorporated, a majority of the securities or other interests of which having by their terms ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or others performing similar functions with respect to such corporation or other organization is directly or indirectly owned or controlled by such party or by any one or more of its subsidiaries, or by such party and one or more of its subsidiaries.
Subsidiary
          "" means a bona fide written Takeover Proposal which Takeover Proposal did not result from a breach of (on its most recently amended or modified terms, if amended or modified) (except that references in the definition of "Takeover Proposal" to 20% shall be replaced by 100%) that the Company Board determines in its good faith business judgment (after consultation with the Company's outside legal counsel and the Company Financial Advisor) to be more favorable to the holders of Company Common Stock that the transactions contemplated by this Agreement from a financial point of view (taking into account all of the terms and conditions of such proposal and this Agreement, including any changes to the terms of this Agreement proposed by Parent in response to such offer or otherwise) and is reasonably capable of being consummated, taking into account all financial (including as to the terms and conditionality of any financing), legal, regulatory and other aspects of such proposal; , , that if any Company Acquisition Agreement in respect of a Takeover Proposal contains any contingency with respect to the financing or funds to be used in connection with such transaction, in order for such Takeover Proposal to constitute a Superior Proposal, such Company Acquisition Agreement must provide for the payment by the third-party acquirer of a termination, reverse break-up or similar fee,
Superior Proposal
Section 6.04(a)
provided
however
in an amount reasonable for the size and nature of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement determined in good faith in consultation with the Company's outside legal counsel and the Company Financial Advisor, to the Company in the event that such Company Acquisition Agreement is terminated due to the failure of such third-party acquirer to obtain such financing or funds to be used in connection with such transaction.
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Surviving Corporation
Section 2.01
          "" means any inquiry, proposal, offer or indication of interest from any Person (other than Parent and its Subsidiaries, including Merger Sub) made after the date hereof relating to any (i) direct or indirect acquisition of assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (including any voting equity interests of Subsidiaries, but excluding sales of assets in the ordinary course of business) equal to 20% or more of the consolidated assets, net revenues or net income of the Company, taken as a whole, or 20% or more of the voting equity interests of the Company, (ii) tender offer or exchange offer that if consummated would result in any Person beneficially owning (within the meaning of Section 13(d) of the Exchange Act) 20% or more of the voting equity interests of the Company, (iii) merger, consolidation, reorganization, recapitalization, sale, lease, contribution, partnership, joint venture, liquidation, dissolution, other business combination or similar transaction involving the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to which such Person would own 20% or more of the consolidated assets, net revenues or net income of the Company, taken as a whole, in each case, in one transaction or a series of related transactions.
Takeover Proposal
          "" means any restrictive provision of any applicable "fair price," "moratorium," "control share acquisition," "interested shareholder" or other similar anti-takeover Law, including Sections 2541 through 2588 (inclusive) of the BCL.
Takeover Statute
          "" or "" means all federal, state, local, foreign and other income, gross receipts, sales, use, production, ad valorem, transfer, franchise, registration, profits, license, lease, service, service use, withholding, payroll, employment, unemployment, estimated, excise, severance, environmental, stamp, occupation, premium, property (real or personal), real property gains, windfall profits or other taxes, fees, assessments or charges of any kind whatsoever, together with any interest, additions or penalties with respect thereto and any interest in respect of such additions or penalties.
Tax
Taxes
          "" means any return, declaration, report, claim for refund, information return or statement or other document required to be filed with or provided to any taxing authority in respect of Taxes or the administration of any Laws, regulations or administrative requirements relating to any Tax, including any schedule or attachment thereto, and including any amendment thereof.
Tax Returns
          "" means any Tax sharing, Tax allocation, Tax indemnity, or similar agreement, arrangement or understanding.
Tax Sharing Agreement
          "" means $30,000,000.
Termination Fee
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Top-Up Option
Section 1.04(a)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Top-Up Shares
Section 1.04(a)
          "" means the U.S. Treasury regulations promulgated under the Code.
Treasury Regulations
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Voting Debt
Section 4.02(c)
          "" has the meaning set forth in .
Warrants
Section 3.08
          Section 9.02     Interpretation; Construction.
          (a)          The table of contents and headings herein are for convenience of reference only, do not constitute part of this Agreement and shall not be deemed to limit or otherwise affect any of the provisions hereof. Where a reference in this Agreement is made to a Section, Exhibit or Schedule, such reference shall be to a Section of, Exhibit to or Schedule of this Agreement unless otherwise indicated. Whenever the words "include," "includes" or "including" are used in this Agreement, they shall be deemed to be followed by the words "without limitation." A reference in this Agreement to $ or dollars is to U.S. dollars. The words "hereof," "herein" and "hereunder" and words of similar import when used in this Agreement shall refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement. References to "this Agreement" shall include the Company Disclosure Letter. An accounting term not otherwise defined in this Agreement has the meaning ascribed to it in accordance with GAAP. For purposes of this Agreement, only information that was posted in the Electronic Data Room prior to the date hereof will be deemed to have been "made available" by the Company to Parent (other than with respect to Store Leases, which will be available immediately following the date hereof as follows: (i) physical copies of the Store Leases will be made available to Opus pursuant to the terms of the Confidentiality Agreement Addendum, and (ii) remote access to the Company's lease software system will be granted to Opus, pursuant to which Opus will have complete online access to the Store Leases and physical access to certain other information related thereto.
          (b)          The parties have participated jointly in negotiating and drafting this Agreement. In the event that an ambiguity or a question of intent or interpretation arises, this Agreement shall be construed as if drafted jointly by the parties, and no presumption or burden of proof shall arise favoring or disfavoring any party by virtue of the authorship of any provision of this Agreement.
None of the representations and warranties contained in this Agreement or in any instrument delivered under this Agreement will survive the
          Section 9.03 Survival.
Effective Time. This does not limit any covenant of the parties to this Agreement which, by its terms, contemplates performance after the Effective Time. The Confidentiality Agreement will survive termination of this Agreement in accordance with its terms.
Section 9.03
This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania without giving effect to any choice or conflict of law provision or rule (whether of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or any other jurisdiction) that would cause the application of Laws of any jurisdiction other than those of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.
          Section 9.04     Governing Law.
          Section 9.05     Submission to Jurisdiction.
          (a)          Each of the parties hereto irrevocably agrees that any legal action or proceeding with respect to this Agreement and the rights and obligations arising hereunder, or for recognition and enforcement of any judgment in respect of this Agreement and the rights and obligations arising hereunder brought by any other party hereto or its successors or assigns shall be brought exclusively and determined in any state court in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, or in the event (but only in the event) that such court does not have subject matter jurisdiction over such action or proceeding, in the federal district court in The Eastern District of Pennsylvania. Each of the parties hereto agrees that mailing of process or other papers in connection with any such action or proceeding in the manner provided in or in such other manner as may be permitted by applicable Laws, will be valid and sufficient service thereof. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably submits with regard to any such action or proceeding for itself and in respect of its property, generally and unconditionally, to the personal jurisdiction of the aforesaid courts and agrees that it will not bring any action relating to this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in any court or tribunal other than the aforesaid courts. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense, counterclaim or otherwise, in any action or proceeding with respect to this Agreement and the rights and obligations arising hereunder, or for recognition and enforcement of any judgment in respect of this Agreement and the rights and obligations arising hereunder (i) any claim that it is not personally subject to the jurisdiction of the above named courts for any reason other than the failure to serve process in accordance with this , (ii) any claim that it or its property is exempt or immune from jurisdiction of any such court or from any legal process commenced in such courts (whether through service of notice, attachment prior to judgment, attachment in aid of execution of judgment, execution of judgment or otherwise), and (iii) to the fullest extent permitted by the applicable Law, any claim that (x) the suit, action or proceeding in such court is brought in an inconvenient forum, (y) the venue of such suit, action or proceeding is improper, or (z) this Agreement, or the subject matter hereof, may not be enforced in or by such courts.
Section 9.07
Section 9.05
          (b)          Notwithstanding anything in the immediately preceding paragraph or elsewhere set forth herein to the contrary, each of the parties hereto irrevocably agrees that all disputes or controversies arising out of or relating to the Financing or any alternative financing in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including all disputes and controversies arising out of or relating in any way to the Commitment Letter, the definitive documentation for the Financing or any alternative financing or the performance thereof, shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of New York, without giving effect to any choice or conflict of law provision or rule (whether of the State of New York or any other jurisdiction) that would cause the application of Laws of any jurisdiction other than those of the State of New York, and any legal action or proceeding against the financing sources, including the financial institutions party to the Commitment Letter, including but not limited to any dispute or controversy arising out of or relating in any way to the Commitment Letter, any definitive documentation for the Financing or any alternative financing or the performance thereof, shall be brought exclusively in and determined in the federal court of the United States of America sitting in the borough of Manhattan or, if such federal court shall not have the jurisdiction, in the New York State court sitting in the borough of Manhattan, and any appellate court from any thereof.
EACH PARTY ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT ANY CONTROVERSY WHICH MAY ARISE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT IS LIKELY TO INVOLVE COMPLICATED AND DIFFICULT ISSUES AND, THEREFORE, EACH SUCH PARTY IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY WAIVES ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LEGAL ACTION ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED BY THIS AGREEMENT. EACH PARTY TO THIS AGREEMENT CERTIFIES AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT (A) NO REPRESENTATIVE OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER IN THE EVENT OF A LEGAL ACTION, (B) SUCH PARTY HAS CONSIDERED THE IMPLICATIONS OF THIS WAIVER, (C) SUCH PARTY MAKES THIS WAIVER VOLUNTARILY, AND (D) SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 9.06.
          Section 9.06     Waiver of Jury Trial.
All notices, requests, consents, claims, demands, waivers and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been given (i) when delivered by hand (with written confirmation of receipt), (ii) when received by the addressee if sent by a nationally recognized overnight courier (receipt requested), (iii) on the date sent by facsimile (with confirmation of transmission) if sent during normal business hours of the recipient, and on the next Business Day if sent after
          Section 9.07     Notices.
normal business hours of the recipient, or (iv) on the third Business Day after the date mailed, by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid. Such communications must be sent to the respective parties at the following addresses (or at such other address for a party as shall be specified in a notice given in accordance with this ):
Section 9.07
or to such other Persons, addresses or facsimile numbers as may be designated in writing by the Person entitled to receive such communication as provided above.
This Agreement (including the Exhibits to this Agreement), the Company Disclosure Letter and the Confidentiality Agreement constitute the entire agreement among the parties with respect to the subject matter of this Agreement and supersede all other prior agreements and understandings, both written and oral, among the parties to this Agreement with respect to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any inconsistency between the statements in the body of this Agreement, the Company Disclosure Letter (other than an exception expressly set forth as such in the Company Disclosure Letter) and the Confidentiality Agreement, the statements in the body of this Agreement will control.
          Section 9.08     Entire Agreement.
This Agreement is for the sole benefit of the parties hereto and their permitted assigns and respective successors and, except as provided in hereof (which shall be to the benefit of the parties referred to in such section), nothing herein, express or implied, is intended to or shall confer upon any other Person or entity any legal or equitable right, benefit or remedy of any nature whatsoever under or by reason of this Agreement; , , that the Company shall have the right to pursue damages on behalf of its shareholders in the event of Parent's or Merger Sub's breach or wrongful termination of this Agreement. Notwithstanding anything in the immediately preceding sentence to the contrary, the parties hereto acknowledge and agree that the financing sources, including the financial institutions party to the Commitment Letter, shall be express third-party beneficiaries of and . The representations and warranties in this Agreement are the product of negotiations among the parties hereto and are for the sole benefit of the parties hereto. Any inaccuracies in such representations and warranties are subject to waiver by the parties hereto in accordance with without notice or liability to any other Person. The representations and warranties in this Agreement may represent an allocation among the parties hereto of risks associated with particular matters regardless of the knowledge of any of the parties hereto. Accordingly, Persons other than the parties hereto may not rely upon the representations and warranties in this Agreement as characterizations of actual facts or circumstances as of the date of this Agreement or as of any other date.
          Section 9.09     No Third Party Beneficiaries.
Section 6.08
provided
however
Section 9.05(b)
Section 9.06
Section 8.08
If any term or provision of this Agreement is invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction, such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability shall not affect any other term or provision of this Agreement or invalidate or render unenforceable such term or provision in any other jurisdiction. Upon such determination
          Section 9.10    Severability.
that any term or other provision is invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the parties hereto shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible in a mutually acceptable manner in order that the transactions contemplated hereby be consummated as originally contemplated to the greatest extent possible.
This Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns. Neither party may assign its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the other party, except that Merger Sub may assign, in its sole discretion, any or all of its rights, interests and obligations under this Agreement to any direct wholly-owned Subsidiary of Parent without the consent of the Company. No assignment shall relieve the assigning party of any of its obligations hereunder. Any attempt at assignment not in compliance with this shall be null and void and without legal effect.
          Section 9.11    Assignment.
Section
9.11
Except as otherwise provided in this Agreement, any and all remedies expressly conferred upon a party to this Agreement will be cumulative with, and not exclusive of, any other remedy contained in this Agreement, at Law or in equity. The exercise by a party to this Agreement of any one remedy will not preclude the exercise by it of any other remedy.
          Section 9.12    Remedies.
The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur if any provision of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with the terms hereof and that the parties shall be entitled to an injunction or injunctions to prevent breaches or threatened breaches of this Agreement or to enforce specifically the performance of the terms and provisions hereof in any federal court located in the Eastern District of Pennsylvania or any Pennsylvania state court, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at Law or in equity. None of the parties shall oppose the granting of an injunction, specific performance and other equitable relief sought in accordance with this on the basis that any other party has an adequate remedy at law or that any award of equitable relief is not an appropriate remedy for any reason at law or in equity. Any party seeking an injunction or injunctions in accordance with this Agreement to prevent breaches of this Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of this Agreement shall not be required to provide any bond or other security in connection with any such injunction or order.
          Section 9.13    Specific Performance.
Section 9.13
This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, all of which will be one and the same agreement. This Agreement will become effective when each party to this Agreement will have received counterparts signed by all of the other parties.
          Section 9.14    Counterparts; Effectiveness.
          IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed and delivered as of the date first written above by their respective officers thereunto duly authorized.
          Notwithstanding any other term of the Offer or this Agreement, Merger Sub shall not be required to, and Parent shall not be required to cause Merger Sub to, accept for payment or, subject to any applicable rules and regulations of the SEC, including Rule 14e-1(c) promulgated under the Exchange Act (relating to Merger Sub's obligation to pay for or return tendered shares of Company Common Stock promptly after the termination or withdrawal of the Offer), pay for any shares of Company Common Stock tendered pursuant to the Offer if immediately prior to acceptance of shares of Company Common Stock for payment in the Offer any of the following conditions exists:
                    (a)     any applicable waiting period (or any extension thereof) under the HSR Act relating to the purchase of shares of Company Common Stock pursuant to the Offer or the consummation of the Merger shall not have expired or otherwise been terminated;
                    (b)     a Company Material Adverse Effect shall have occurred since the date of this Agreement;
                    (c)     a Governmental Entity shall have issued, promulgated, enforced or entered any Order which is then in effect (i) challenging or seeking to make illegal, delay materially or otherwise directly or indirectly restrain or prohibit the making of the Offer, the acceptance for payment of or payment for some or all of the shares of Company Common Stock by Parent or Merger Sub or the consummation of the Offer or the Merger, (ii) seeking to obtain material damages in connection with the Offer or the Merger, (iii) seeking to restrain, prohibit or limit Parent's, the Company's or any of their respective Affiliates' ownership or operation of all or any material portion of the business or assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) seeking to impose material limitations on the ability of Parent, Merger Sub or any of Parent's other Affiliates effectively to acquire, hold or exercise full rights of ownership of any shares of Company Common Stock or any shares of common stock of the Surviving Corporation, including the right to vote the shares of Company Common Stock or the shares of common stock of the Surviving Corporation acquired or owned by Parent, Merger Sub or any of Parent's other Affiliates on all matters properly presented to the Company's shareholders;
                    (d)     any Law is enacted, entered, enforced, issued, in effect or deemed applicable to the Offer or the Merger that, in the good faith judgment of Parent (after consultation with outside counsel), is likely, directly or indirectly, to result in any of the consequences referred to in clauses (i) through (iv) of paragraph (c) above;
                    (e)     (i) any of the representations and warranties of the Company (without giving effect to any materiality or "Company Material Adverse Effect" qualifications therein), other than the representations and warranties in
Section 4.02
(Capital Structure) or (Information in the Offer Documents and the Schedule 14D-9), shall not be true and correct, as of the Offer Closing as if made as and as of such time (except to the extent expressly made as of an earlier date, in which case as of such date), except for such failures to be so true and correct as has not had and would not be reasonably expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect, or (ii) any of the representations and warranties in (Capital Structure) or (Information in the Offer Documents and the Schedule 14D-9) shall not be true and correct in all material respects as of the Offer Closing as if made at and as of such time;
Section 4.20
Section 4.02
Section 4.20
                    (f)     the Company shall have failed to perform or comply in all material respects with any of its agreements, obligations or covenants under this Agreement; or
                    (g)     this Agreement shall have been terminated in accordance with its terms.
          Immediately prior to the expiration of the Offer, the Company shall deliver to Parent a certificate, signed on behalf of the Company by its chief executive officer and chief financial officer and dated as of the Offer Closing Date, certifying that none of the conditions set forth in paragraphs (b), (e) and (f) above shall be continuing as of the expiration of the Offer.
          The foregoing conditions are for the sole benefit of Parent and Merger Sub, may be asserted by Parent or Merger Sub regardless of the circumstances giving rise to any such conditions, and, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and applicable Law, may be waived by Parent and Merger Sub, in whole or in part, at any time and from time to time in their sole discretion (other than the Minimum Condition). The failure by Parent or Merger Sub at any time to exercise any of the foregoing rights shall not be deemed a waiver of any such right and each such right shall be deemed an ongoing right that may be asserted at any time and from time to time.

E 99.1
XHIBIT
SUFFERN, NY  May 2, 2012 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. and Charming Shoppes, Inc. today jointly
(NASDAQ: ASNA)
(NASDAQ: CHRS)
 
announced that they have entered into a definitive agreement under which Ascena will acquire Charming Shoppes in a cash transaction valued at approximately $890 million. Ascena has agreed to make a cash tender offer for all outstanding shares of Charming Shoppes common stock at a price of $7.35 per share. The tender offer is expected to commence within 10 business days. Subject to customary conditions and approvals, the transaction is expected to close during the second calendar quarter of 2012.
Founded in 1940 and headquartered in Bensalem, Pennsylvania, Charming Shoppes is a leading apparel retailer specializing in women's plus-size apparel. Charming Shoppes is the parent company of three distinct brands  Lane Bryant, Catherines Plus Sizes and Fashion Bug  and operates over 1,800 retail stores nationwide and store-related e-commerce websites. Charming Shoppes also operates Figi's, a direct marketing business.
"Charming Shoppes is a superb strategic fit for Ascena," said Ascena President and CEO David Jaffe. "A key component of our growth strategy over the past several years has been to make highly selective and powerful acquisitions. We've built a family of retail brands, each serving a unique customer niche, with a culture that embraces the sharing of resources, new ideas and talented team members. Over the past few years, we have welcomed into our family new brands and new team members while delivering increasing value to shareholders. We believe that Charming Shoppes will be no exception."
"The Board of Directors of Charming Shoppes is pleased with this transaction, which represents the outcome of the strategic review and extensive sale process we commenced on December 1, 2011," said Michael Goldstein, Chairman of the Board of Charming Shoppes. "In addition to partnering with a buyer that can support
the future growth and development of our businesses, the $7.35 per share consideration represents a premium of 25% to the closing market price of Charming Shoppes common stock on May 1, 2012 and an 89% premium to the unaffected share price of Charming Shoppe's common stock on November 30, 2011, the day prior to our announcement of our strategic review process. We are confident that this transaction is in the best interests of our shareholders."
Anthony M. Romano, President and Chief Executive Officer of Charming Shoppes said, "I would like to say how pleased we are to join the Ascena Retail Group. David and his team have an excellent track record of acquiring and seamlessly integrating brands with a strong market niche and growth potential, hallmarks of our Charming Shoppes' brands. While we are proud of our progress and accomplishments and believe our brands are now poised for growth, this business combination is extremely powerful, offers a compelling premium in recognition of our significant progress and is in the best interests of our shareholders. The Ascena team are some of the best retail executives in the business, and they have built a world-class specialty retailing organization."
The tender offer is subject to customary conditions, including that the holders of a minimum of a majority of the fully diluted shares of Charming Shoppes tender, and do not withdraw, their shares prior to the expiration of the tender offer. Simultaneously with the acceptance of the tendered shares, Ascena will have the option, if less than 80% of the outstanding shares of Charming Shoppes are tendered, to acquire additional, newly issued shares of Charming Shoppes such that, after giving effect to the exercise of the option, Ascena will own more than 80% of the outstanding shares, whereupon Ascena will be able to merge its acquisition subsidiary into Charming Shoppes in a short-form merger that will not require any further vote of shareholders. Holders who do not tender their shares will receive the same consideration, $7.35 per share, in the merger. The consummation of the transaction is not subject to financing, and Ascena has obtained commitments for financing that, together with cash on hand, will be sufficient to fund the transaction. The boards of directors of both companies have unanimously approved the terms of the transaction. Upon completion of the acquisition, Charming Shoppes will operate as a separate subsidiary of Ascena. Charming Shoppes is currently led by CEO Anthony Romano. "Tony and his team are talented retailers and we look forward to their partnership as we move forward in this process," Jaffe said.
BofA Merrill Lynch is acting as financial advisor and Proskauer Rose LLP as legal advisors for Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Barclays is acting as financial advisor and Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP and Schulte Roth & Zabel LLP as legal advisors to Charming Shoppes, Inc.
Conference Call Information
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. and Charming Shoppes, Inc. will conduct a joint conference call later this morning, May 2, 2012 at 10:30 AM Eastern Time to review the transaction. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at 617-213-8845 five minutes prior to the start time, the passcode is 78812084. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at www.ascenaretail.com and www.charmingshoppes.com. A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until June 2, 2012 by dialing 617-801-6888, the passcode is 40317428.
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls, operating through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, the and brands. The Company operates through its subsidiaries over 2,500 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn,
maurices
Justice
dressbarn
offers casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operates 836 stores in 48 states. offers casual and career apparel and accessories at value prices to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operates 810 stores in 44 states and Canada. offers trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operates 920 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
maurices
Justice
For more information, visit www.ascenaretail.com, www.dressbarn.com, www.maurices.com and www.shopjustice.com.
About Charming Shoppes, Inc.
Charming Shoppes, Inc. (NASDAQ: CHRS) is a leading apparel retailer specializing in women's plus-size apparel. At April 28, 2012, Charming Shoppes, Inc. operated 1,832 retail stores in 48 states under the names LANE BRYANT, CACIQUE, LANE BRYANT OUTLET, FASHION BUG, FASHION BUG PLUS and CATHERINES PLUS SIZES. The company also operates the Figi's family of brands, including the holiday food and gifts catalog Figi's Gifts in Good Taste, the home and gifts catalog Figi's Gallery and its wholesale unit Figi's Business Services. For more information about Charming Shoppes and its brands, please visit www.charmingshoppes.com, www.lanebryant.com, www.cacique.com, www.fashionbug.com, www.catherines.com, www.loop18.com, www.figis.com and www.figisgallery.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward-looking statements, which include all statements other than those made solely with respect to historical fact. Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made, and neither Ascena nor Charming Shoppes undertakes any obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in the statements, including the following: (a) the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstance that could give rise to the termination of the Merger Agreement; (b) the inability to complete the transaction due to the failure to satisfy conditions to the transaction; (c) the risk that the proposed transaction disrupts current plans and operations; (d) the risk that anticipated synergies and opportunities as a result of the transaction will not be realized; (e) difficulties or unanticipated expenses in connection with integrating Charming Shoppes into Ascena; (f) the risk that the acquisition does not perform as planned, including the risk that the combined business will not achieve anticipated revenue and profitability improvements; and (g) potential difficulties in employee retention following the closing of the transaction.
The tender offer described herein has not yet been commenced. The description contained herein is neither an offer to purchase nor a solicitation of an offer to sell securities of Charming Shoppes. At the time the tender offer is commenced, Ascena and its wholly owned subsidiary intend to file a Tender Offer Statement on Schedule TO containing an offer to purchase, forms of letters of transmittal and other documents relating to the tender offer, and Charming Shoppes intends to file a Solicitation/Recommendation Statement on Schedule 14d-9 with respect to the tender offer. Ascena, its wholly owned subsidiary and Charming Shoppes intend to mail these documents to the shareholders of Charming Shoppes. These documents will contain important information about the tender offer, and shareholders of Charming Shoppes are urged to read them carefully when they become available. Shareholders of Charming Shoppes will be able to obtain a free copy of these documents (when they become available) and other documents filed by Charming Shoppes or Ascena with the SEC at the website maintained by the SEC at www.sec.gov. In addition, shareholders will be able to obtain a free copy of these documents (when they become available) from Ascena by contacting Ascena at 30 Dunnigan Drive, Suffern, NY 10901, attention: Investor Relations, or from Charming Shoppes by contacting Charming Shoppes at 3750 State Road, Bensalem, PA 19020, attention: Investor Relations.
INVESTOR CONTACTS:

Exhibit 99.2
Good morning,
Today we celebrate a significant milestone in our business. We have signed a merger agreement with Charming Shoppes. This merger will be completed in the coming months. At that time our family of brands will include: Lane Bryant, Cacique, Catherines, Fashion Bug, and Figi's.
ascena
A key component of our growth strategy has been to make highly selective acquisitions that strengthen our customer positioning. We've built a group of retail brands  each serving a unique customer niche, with cultures focused on providing differentiated experiences to well defined target customers. Together, we embrace new ideas, innovation, and talented team members.
I'm excited to share this news. It's another chapter in our history, further positioning us as a leading force in serving distinct customer segments through leading fashion, value prices, and excellent customer experiences:
The strategic fit of these brands into our enterprise is excellent. Let's take a closer look:
We will continue to grow with a focus on uniting powerful retailers 
ascena
retailers with great fashion, great prices, and a tremendous focus on the customer.
Charming Shoppes' market position, accomplishments, and business model align with our strategic vision, making for a strong addition to our portfolio. After this acquisition is completed, we will be among the largest specialty retailers.
Together, our footprint will include:
ascena
We respect the management team at Charming Shoppes. Their hard work has improved their market positions. We look forward to partnering with them in continuing to grow and develop these strong businesses. Over the short 
term, we will work to drive productivity and efficiency across all of our brands, while investigating ways to integrate the shared service group at Charming Shoppes.
This acquisition will have no direct impact on our existing brands 
our focus at and remains the same: growing our business by providing the right fashion at compelling values with a differentiated customer experience.
dressbarn, Justice,
maurices
This merger will be our largest acquisition to date. That's why we're committed to moving forward with a spirit of cooperation, understanding, trust, and respect 
all of which are important in achieving an effective, timely, and comprehensive integration process.
You will receive ongoing updates as details unfold. We anticipate that this announcement will trigger outside interest. Please refer any inquiries to Armand Correia
at 845-369-4600
.
Please join me in welcoming our newest members into the family.
On Wednesday, I will meet with Charming Shoppes associates in Bensalem, near Philadelphia. Later that day, I'll be in Columbus to visit with Lane Bryant associates. I'll be sharing the story and walking them through the impressive results we've all accomplished.
ascena
Thursday morning I will visit Justice to give associates an update, and then return to Suffern to share the news with and associates via videoconference. It will be a great way to celebrate the good news across our company. There will also be call in number available for field and overseas associates (details to follow).
dressbarn
maurices
Thank you for your continued dedication and hard work. I sincerely appreciate each and every one of you.
Let's remain focused on providing our customers with the most current fashions at a great value, helping her look and feel her very best along the way, and most of all, helping women and girls to feel good about themselves!
Sincerely,

Exhibit 99.3
David Jaffe
President & CEO
Our Business Model
Our History
1962:   
              
began
2011: We become               
2009: partnership begins
2005:                   joins the family
1983:   
               
becomes a public company
2012: We welcome to the family
Common Threads
We love to learn.
We consider "giving back" a responsibility.
We are customer-obsessed.
We have fun!
Our Brands
Our
Values
are at the
"heart"
of everything we do.
be driven.
perform high, set goals, achieve results.
be creative.
encourage innovation, leverage new ideas.
be ethical.
always do the right thing.
be balanced.
have fun, enjoy life, take care of you.
be focused.
customer first  in everything we do.
0%
5.0%
10.0%
15.0%
20.0%
Justice Market Share
Tween girls 7-12 apparel market, 12 ME Dec 11, 10
Source  NPD Group
Dotted line represents 2010 Market Share
(110 bps)
40 bps
140 bps
50 bps
(10 bps)
(80 bps)
20 bps
2011
13.9%
10.6%
10.4%
7.9%
6.1%
4.5%
3.3%
2010
15.0%
10.2%
9.0%
7.4%
6.2%
5.3%
3.1%
Justice Peer Group Comp Sales
9%
3%
2%
2%
Flat
1%
(3%)
(3%)
(4%)
Justice
TGT
GYMB
JCP
KSS
WMT
Old Navy
Gap
PLCE
-4%
-2%
0%
2%
4%
6%
8%
10%
Twelve Months Ended January 2012
Justice Locations
917 Stores in 46 States, Puerto Rico & Canada
National presence in medium to large markets
1,100 store potential
65 new stores planned in FY12
Justice Merchandise Mix
Mix
Fashion Level
Our Vision:
Simply the best hometown specialty store.
Customer Obsession
Teamwork & Collaboration
Leadership at all Levels
Accountability
Continuous Learning
Mind the Bottom Line
Our Values:
maurices Peer Group Comp Sales
9%
7%
6%
2%
2%
(3%)
(4%)
(8%)
1%
2%
maurices Locations
803 Stores in 44 States
Small market focus:
25K to 150K population
1,100 store potential
60 new stores planned in FY12
maurices Merchandise Mix
Lifestyle
Fashion Level
maurices Customer Demographics
Age: 17  34
Life Stage: Ranges from
school, to work, to family
Single, married, young moms
Mostly employed
HH Income: $55K+
Our Mission
Inspiring Women to
Look and Feel
Beautiful
Our Values
dressbarn Peer Group Comp Sales
8%
7%
5%
4%
4%
2%
(8%)
(3%)
(22%)
(2%)
1%
(1%)
2%
825 Stores in 47 States
National presence in medium to large markets
1,000 store potential
22 new stores planned in FY12
dressbarn Locations
dressbarn Merchandise Mix
Lifestyle
Fashion Level
dressbarn Customer Demographics
Age: 35 - 55
Life Stage: Balancing work & family
Mostly married with children
Mostly employed
HH Income: $65+ married/partner
Consistent Performance
Quarterly Comps
Historic Net Income Performance
10-Year Net Income (Non-GAAP)
$M
Justice
Merger
maurices
Merger
2 for 1 Stock Split
March 31, 2006
$47.95 pre-split
2 for 1 Stock Split
May 31, 2002
$31.65 pre-split
*$100 invested on 8/1/01 in stock or 7/31/01 in index, including reinvestment of dividends.  Indexes calculated on month-end basis.
Stock Performance
10-Year Cumulative Total Returns*
Our Intent
Develop even greater efficiency by integrating shared service areas where possible.
Keep people engaged through the transition process.
Transparency in communication
Involvement in integration plans
Manage this change well-beyond the closing.
Respect each individual in this process.
Questions?
?

Exhibit 99.4
PRESENTATION
Operator
Good day, ladies and gentlemen and welcome to the Ascena Retail Group conference call to discuss the agreement to acquire Charming Shoppes, Incorporated. My name is Shaquanah and I will be your operator for today. At this time, all participants are in a listen-only mode. Later, we will conduct a question-and-answer session. As a reminder, this conference is being recorded for replay purposes. I would now like to turn the conference over to your host for today's call, Ms. Allison Townsend of ICR. Please proceed.
Allison Townsend
- ICR - IR
Thank you, Shaquanah. Today's call is being recorded and will be available for replay later today. Information on accessing this replay is available on today's press release.
As a matter of formality, I need to remind participants that remarks made by management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause the actual results and implementation of the Company's plans to vary materially. These risks are referenced in today's press release, as well as in the Company's most recently filed Forms 10-K and 10-Q.
2
At this time, I would like to turn the conference call over to your host Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO of Ascena Retail Group. David?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Thanks, Allison. I am going to ask Gayle Coolick, VP of Investor Relations at Charming Shoppes, to review the Safe Harbor language.
Gayle Coolick
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - VP, IR
Thanks and good morning. Certain statements in these remarks are forward-looking statements, which include all statements other than those made solely with respect to historical fact. Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and we undertake no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements.
These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in the statements, including the following  the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstance that could give rise to the termination of the merger agreement; the inability to complete the transaction due to the failure to satisfy conditions to the transaction; the risk that the proposed transaction disrupts current plans and operations; the risk that the anticipated synergies and opportunities as a result of the transaction will not be realized; difficulties or unanticipated expenses in connection with integrating Charming Shoppes into Ascena; the risk that the acquisition does not perform as planned, including the risk that the combined business will not achieve anticipated revenue and profitability improvements; and potential difficulties in employee retention following the closing of the transaction. I will turn the call back to David Jaffe.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Thanks, Gayle. Good morning to everyone and thank you for joining us to discuss our planned transaction with Charming Shoppes. Joining me today is Anthony Romano, CEO of Charming Shoppes; Armand Correia, our CFO; Eric Specter, CFO of Charming Shoppes; and as you just heard, Gayle Coolick, VP of Investor Relations for Charming. We are all very excited to be making this announcement and to the opportunities to combine two families of exceptional, exceptional retail brands.
A key component of Ascena's growth strategy over the past several years has been to make highly selective and powerful acquisitions. We have built a family of retail brands, each serving a unique customer niche with a culture that embraces the sharing of resources, new ideas and talented team members.
Over the past few years, we have welcomed into that family strong brands and new team members while delivering tremendous value to shareholders. We believe that Charming Shoppes will be no exception. There is both an ongoing revenue growth opportunity and a profitability opportunity. We are well-positioned for this acquisition and expect the process to be facilitated by our holding company structure.
More importantly, our shared service model is designed with acquisitions in mind. This should enable us to work with the associates at Charming Shoppes to continue to improve their margin and eliminate redundancy.
Charming Shoppes has a number of powerful concepts. Lane Bryant is a century-old deeply ingrained and iconic brand that, like our other concepts, has built a leading market position by providing great fashion and great value. The operational and strategic fit of the Lane Bryant, Catherines and Cacique businesses into our organization is excellent. Collectively, they have a very strong relationship with and understanding of their customer. With those concepts, Charming Shoppes has become the clear category-leading specialty retailer for the plus size customer. An apparel market that continues growing at a significant rate.
With respect to Fashion Bug, the management at Charming Shoppes previously disclosed their intention to divest this business. We will review our options and Charming Shoppes prior plan before taking any definitive direction.
3
With respect to Figi's, it is clearly a different type of business than our other brands. I will note that it appears to have a good business slot and a viable market opportunity with a dedicated infrastructure. Given those variables, we are exploring our options.
Armand Correia will summarize the terms of the deal in a minute, but I want to make clear that we expect the transaction prior to any one-time or transaction-related items to be neutral or slightly accretive to our earnings in the first full fiscal year and increasingly accretive over time.
Charming Shoppes' back-office and administrative function, along with the Catherines and Fashion Bug brands, will remain in Bensalem, Pennsylvania and Lane Bryant will continue to operate out of Columbus, Ohio. Toning this team are talented retailers and we look forward to their partnership as we move ahead in this process. The team has made excellent progress and certainly has already turned the corner on elevating the fashion component of apparel offerings and focusing on the customer leading to improved operating profitability. We look forward to supporting their work in developing Charming Shoppes' brands to their full potential. We will be working to develop a very specific integration plan for post-closing.
While this process will take some time, we believe there is great opportunity to expand the long-term potential of these leading brands. We will work with Tony and his team to make smart choices regarding streamlining the operation and focusing the business.
Ascena has been able to maintain an excellent balance sheet with ready access to a significant amount of cash. At the end of our just completed third quarter, we had cash and marketable securities of approximately $600 million and no debt. We will use cash and $475 million of debt to fund the acquisition.
So by closing this planned acquisition, by nearly any measure, we will be among the very largest specialty retailers. Initially, we will be operating in excess of 4400 stores with over 54,000 associates anchored by extremely well-positioned concepts. Just as we have done in the past, we expect to improve this sales productivity, margin and cash flow of the acquired businesses and to essentially liberate their earnings power.
Additionally, as has been the case with each of our prior acquisitions, this is a great learning opportunity for both companies to identify, share and implement best practices. I would now like Armand to detail the terms of the agreement.
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP & CFO
Thank you, David. As noted in our press release this morning, we have agreed to pay $7.35 per share for Charming Shoppes' common stock for a total purchase price of approximately $890 million. This represents a premium of 25% to yesterday's closing market price and an 89% premium with where the stock was trading just prior to Charming Shoppes' December 1, 2011 announcement to begin a strategic review process.
We are utilizing a two-step transaction structure. A newly formed wholly-owned subsidiary of Ascena will make a tender offer for the outstanding shares of Charming Shoppes at a price per share of $7.35. This tender offer is subject to customary conditions and approvals, including the holders of a majority of the fully diluted shares of Charming Shoppes' tender and do not withdraw their shares prior to the expiration date of the tender offer.
Simultaneously with the acceptance of the tender shares, Ascena will have the option, if less than 80% of the outstanding shares of Charming Shoppes are not tendered, to acquire additional newly issued shares of Charming Shoppes so that, after giving effect to this exercise of the option, Ascena will own more than 80% of the outstanding shares, at which point, Ascena will be able to merge its acquisition subsidiary into Charming Shoppes in a short form merger that will not require a vote of the stockholders.
Holders who do not tender their shares will receive the same consideration of $7.35 per share in the merger. Upon the successful completion of the transaction, Charming Shoppes will become a wholly-owned subsidiary of Ascena. The completion of this transaction is not subject to financing and Ascena has obtained commitments for financing that, together with cash on hand, will be sufficient to fund this transaction.
Following the transaction, Ascena's balance sheet will remain strong with comfortable amounts of debt and strong levels of cash flow expected to be generated going forward. The tender offer has not yet commenced. This presentation is not a recommendation, an offer to purchase or a solicitation of an offer to sell shares of the Company.
4
At the time the tender offer is commenced, Ascena's acquisition subsidiary will file a tender offer statement on Schedule TO and Charming Shoppes will file a Solicitation/Recommendation Statement on Schedule 14d-9 with respect to the tender offer with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Investors and Charming Shoppes shareholders are strongly advised to read carefully the tender offer statements, including the offer to purchase, the letter of transmittal, the related tender offer documents, and the related Solicitation/Recommendation Statement when they become available. They will contain important information, including the various terms of and conditions to the tender offer. Such material, when prepared and ready for release, will be made available to Charming Shoppes' shareholders at no expense to them.
In addition, when prepared and ready for release, such material will be available for no cost from the Securities and Exchange website at www.sec.gov. I will now turn the call back over to David.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Thank you, Armand. With that, I would like to turn it to Tony so he may share his thoughts.
Anthony Romano
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CEO
Thank you, David. I would like to first say how pleased we are to join the Ascena Retail Group. David and his team have an excellent track record of acquiring and seamlessly integrating brands with strong market niches and growth potential  hallmarks of our Charming Shoppes brands. While we are proud of our progress and accomplishments and believe our brands are now poised for growth, this business combination is extremely powerful, offers a compelling premium in recognition of our significant progress and is in the best interests of our shareholders.
The Ascena team are some of the best retail executives in the business and they have built a world-class specialty retailing organization. The Charming Shoppes has made excellent operational progress in the past year and has achieved increased operating profitability. I would like to recognize the efforts of our talented Charming Shoppes associates who have made important contributions to our recent success.
Our ability to capitalize on Ascena's powerful platform will allow us to quickly extend and enhance some of the initiatives we already have underway and provide for some opportunities that do not exist for us as a stand-alone company. At the same time, those elements that address product, brand and merchandising will receive much more focus.
Our primary mission continues to be to offer the best product and shopping experience to our customer in any channel she wishes to transact with us. Joining the Ascena team will allow for us to provide greater emphasis on our customer who will connect emotionally and help her look, feel and be her best.
We look forward to working with David and his team to leverage the benefits of our combined company. Our powerful combination will help to accelerate the achievement of continuing our mission, which is to be the plus size authority for fit, fashion and value, profitably serving as the destination for all her lifestyle needs. We are excited to have delivered a very compelling agreement to our existing shareholders and once we complete the transaction, to have that opportunity to continue to enhance value for Ascena's shareholders. David?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Thanks, Tony. It is really very gratifying and rewarding on many levels to have the continuing opportunity to build these types of partnerships. I think we really owe our success on this front to an organizational culture that is truly collegial, collaborative and welcoming. I think in a lot of very healthy ways, we have become the biggest, small family business in the country. We have come to look forward to each opportunity to welcome new members into the family. That attitude fosters a spirit of cooperation, understanding, trust and respect, all of which are critical in achieving an effective, timely and comprehensive integration process.
5
I know I speak for the entire Company when I say how eagerly we look forward to welcoming all the associates, store managers, corporate employees and especially the senior management team of Charming Shoppes.
This transaction presents a unique opportunity for us at Ascena. It has the potential to be incredibly powerful. At the same time, we definitely recognize and are prepared for the fact that it is the largest and most complex deal we have executed to date and ultimately going to involve a tremendous amount of thoughtful hard work. At the same time, we think the path is relatively clear and the benefits very compelling.
To summarize, we believe that, with this transaction, the additional market-leading concepts of Charming Shoppes will enhance our already strong group of powerful retail brands. The plus size niche will extend our focus to a clearly defined and generally non-overlapping customer. The diversification and scale of our business will be enhanced further leveraging our holding company structure and our shared service platform.
We are confident that we have developed the core skill set and the processes to integrate successfully. We believe this transaction carries a strong premium for the Charming Shoppes shareholders and an excellent ongoing value-creation opportunity for our senior shareholders.
We can address your questions in just a moment. I would like to note that there is, of course, a lot of publicly available information about the past performance of Charming Shoppes and Ascena. And I would remind you that while we have announced the deal, we haven't yet formally launched the tender offer, the process associated with it and the deal is subject to a number of closing conditions.
While we are a little constrained as to what we can share right now, we will do our best to be helpful. Once we reach closing as we did with Tween Brands, we will share more detailed information. Thanks for your attention and I would like to turn it back to Armand for a few more comments.
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP & CFO
Thank you, David. I would like to take advantage of this opportunity to give you all a quick update on what we are seeing in our Ascena business today. We continue to be comfortable with our previous full-year earnings guidance in the range of $1.37 to $1.40 post-split. However, there will likely be a shift whereby Q3 estimated earnings per share will be less than Street expectations and Q4 stronger by a similar amount.
While our Q3 quarterly comp sales are in line with expectations of plus mid-single digits, we have taken the opportunity to take markdowns and move out some slow-moving goods as we enter our final fourth quarter of the fiscal year. Operator, we will now open it up to questions.
QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS
Operator
(Operator Instructions). Edward Yruma, KeyBanc Capital.
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
Hi, thanks very much and congratulations on this acquisition. Can you tell us a little bit about Charming Shoppes and your view of SG&A? What type of  how much of Charming Shoppes' existing SG&A is kind of store-related versus how much is kind of headquarters and back-office-related?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
I am going to turn that over to Eric Specter, the Charming CFO.
6
Eric Specter
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CFO
Yes, good morning. (technical difficulty) in our recent 10-K, you will see that we do break out our corporate and shared service expenses, which are, of course, outside of operating the four walls of the store. And those dollars  approximately that total is about $85 million for the past fiscal year.
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
And David, you have built out a very formidable shared services infrastructure. What capacity do you have within your existing infrastructure to take on a business of this size? And I guess are incremental investments needed for you to kind of layer this business on top of your existing infrastructure?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
You know what? I think those are terrific questions and I just wish I could answer them right now. We are in the very early stages of putting our integration plans together and I think that's something we are focusing on, but I really just can't give you any guidance on that yet.
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
Great. And one final question. You guys have obviously added plus size biz within core dressbarn, as well as maurices. Can you talk about your overlap with your existing banners and if you expect to have to make tweaks or do they actually serve different customer bases? Thank you.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
That is a good question. Certainly, with maurices, that is going after a twenty something customer, so we think there is limited overlap, not particularly that it's a different customer, but also because of the real estate strategies, there is not a whole lot of overlap for that customer. So certainly, it is not zero, but it is minimal and we don't see any impact. We think it actually is a great opportunity for us to more clearly define the maurices versus the dressbarn women versus the Lane Bryant and Catherines and Fashion Bug brands.
So there is a little bit more on the dressbarn side, the dressbarn women's side and we are thinking that, over time, as we more clearly delineate those brands, we should be able to maintain two very separate merchandising organizations, which approaches.
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
Great, thank you.
Operator
Scott Krasik, BB&T Capital Markets.
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
Hi, everybody, can you hear me?
7
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Scott, yes.
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
Okay, thanks. Just in your review, David, at the beginning, you mentioned Fashion Bug and Figi's. You didn't mention Catherines. Is that because you aren't reviewing that in any way?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
No, we are not. We are excited to focus our energies on Lane Bryant and Catherines right out of the box. There is no question there. It is just that the other two, as I mentioned, they are a little bit  Figi's is a little bit off of our core strategy and Fashion Bug, we just didn't really spend the same effort on it because we thought like I think most people that the business would be divested. Since it is not, we are now going to roll up our sleeves and learn the business and understand what the opportunities are there.
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
Okay. And then maybe this question is more for Anthony or Eric, but maybe talk about where Lane Bryant stands now relative to when it was achieving peak EBITDA in 2006, 2007. And given the moves you have made in the store portfolio, are there any barriers to meeting that or exceeding that in the near future?
Eric Specter
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CFO
Scott, it's Eric. Certainly, we have still a gap to ultimately fill relative to your question about Lane Bryant's performance. They will use an EBITDA metric as a percent of sales. Certainly, it is hundreds of basis points below its peak back in 2006 and 07. And as we had in prior calls, Tony and I, as well as at any presentations, talked about some of the key initiatives. Particularly, you mentioned one of them  the real estate actions of migrating from malls to strip centers and our ability to add several hundred basis points of margin, EBITDA margin to the revenue base of Lane Bryant.
So certainly, those plans now will be shared with David and his team, but clearly that opportunity to regain and potentially get to our pre-'06,'07 levels is certainly well within our three-year strategy.
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
Okay, and then just last, the Cacique brand, it sort of made a little name for itself. David, any opportunities to maybe bring Cacique to maurices or dressbarn to drive top line?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
It is a good question. I think initially the Cacique brand is part and parcel with Lane Bryant, so we want to make sure it is fully developed at Lane Bryant and it is not clear that you are going to be able to build out enough space or find enough space in the Lane Bryant  I'm sorry  the maurices or dressbarn women's stores to fit in the product and you can do just a cursory review of the product. You have got to be able to put in it in a big way the way Lane Bryant does.
So I am not sure that the space constraints are going to work, but I am also not sure from a marketing perspective that is what our customer would like to see. So we will study it and maybe even test it, but right now, it is very much on the front burner to look at, but not do anything on.
8
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
Okay, thanks and congratulations.
Operator
Neely Tamminga, Piper Jaffray.
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
Good morning and congratulations to friends at both of these companies.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Thanks, Neely.
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
Yes, you bet. So here's  I have one question for Eric and Tony and then another question for you, David. I will start with you. Path of integration, the roadmap, this is now the third one that you guys will be effecting in terms of integration. Does it make sense  how should we be looking at the sales organization in the field and then maybe the real estate and back office and then sourcing and systems? Is there a logical path that we should be mindful of as you go through your roadmap?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Well, certainly, to your first point, if you look at the field organizations, we feel that you are best served by keeping them separate. So our three brands and same with Charming Shoppes, all their brands have separate field organizations and I think that is important to maintain that.
The same with the merchandising organizations. I mean those front-end associates, as we call them, really need to be focused purely on their customer and we have very distinct customer segments.
On the back end, I think there are opportunities to integrate and that is where we are going to be spending a lot of time thinking about and then figuring out how we can take the business to the next level and then enhance our joint shared service model. There is a lot of ideas that are floating around in the short time that we have been together and we are going to continue to pass those out. I'm sure there's going to be a lot of white board sessions and all that. Stay tuned. We will have more to tell you in the coming months.
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
Okay, that is helpful. So that's the first area really, it is the joint services, that you guys would be looking at in terms of timing. And then the second question I had for Eric and Tony, could you give us a sense, unless I missed it, but could you give us a sense as to how your current trends have been running, as well as are you comfortable with your inventory levels? And I am thinking specifically here just of Lane Bryant and Catherines businesses. Thanks.
9
Eric Specter
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CFO
Neely, it's Eric. Again, I have to point us to our latest conference call, which completed the year-end and we won't be able to comment on any current performance here in our first quarter, which, of course, we will comply and be filing all the required Forms, 10-Q at the end of the month, the end of May. So I really can't further comment on the sales trends in the current quarter.
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
Thank you.
Operator
Samantha Panella, Raymond James.
Samantha Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
Thanks. Let me add my congratulations on this deal. I just want to clarify one thing. Just in terms of when you are thinking about the full year of integration, you are speaking about Ascena's fiscal 13 year assuming that this deal closes in the calendar second quarter?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
That is correct.
Samantha Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
Okay. And then in terms of the financing for the deal, Armand, the $475 million in debt, what is the interest rate on that debt?
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP & CFO
Well, again, the financing is going to be broken down into two pieces. One piece will come from our existing ABL facility, which is a $250 million facility, which we are planning to draw down $175 million. The terms on that are L plus 200 to 250 basis points, LIBOR plus 200 to 250 basis points.
The term loan is going to be a six-year term loan. Obviously, we expect to pay that a lot faster than six years, hopefully a couple of years. But the terms on that loan, again, it is a $300 million term loan and we don't have the final numbers yet, but indication purposes from our bankers tell us that it could likely be in the range of LIBOR plus 325 to 350 basis points.
Samantha Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
Okay, thank you. And then for Charming Shoppes, reading the recent 10-K, it looks like, with the convertible notes outstanding, that if a change of control were to take place, that you may be required to repurchase the notes. Is that the case? What is the plan for Charming Shoppes' debt?
Eric Specter
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CFO
It is Eric. Again, you are correct, Neely. We have approximately $140 million of outstanding convertible notes and those notes  the indenture calls for, on a change of control, that those noteholders would be paid at par at the closing of the transaction.
10
Samantha Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
Thanks. And one last question regarding Fashion Bug, how many of those stores would you label as underperforming and how many of those stores are the leases up for renewal maybe in the next year or two?
Eric Specter
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CFO
Well, we are currently, Neely, operating approximately 600 stores. Sam, I apologize.
Samantha Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
No problem.
Eric Specter
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CFO
And again, that was  again, in our prior calls, we talked about getting to what we called our profitable base of stores. So we now are  there is a handful, as you would always expect, with the real estate portfolio of 600. But they are substantially and again, I am going to use an EBITDA metric, all substantially all performing at some level of EBITDA contribution.
Samantha Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
And then, I'm sorry, in terms of the renewal, leases up for renewal?
Eric Specter
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CFO
Well, we have  and again, we have  again, referring to some of our prior calls, we have structured a very flexible lease structure whereby many of these stores have  and when I say many, approximately half of these stores have the flexibility for us either having the right to terminate or there is natural expirations on those leases within the next year.
Samantha Panella
- Raymond James - Analyst
Great, thank you again so much.
Operator
Anna Andreeva, FBR Capital Markets.
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
Great, thanks and congrats, guys, as well. Just curious, David, could you sort of compare and contrast the Charming Shoppes acquisition with maurices and Tween Brands? Like you said, this is the largest acquisition you guys have ever tackled, so you have had three very well-managed businesses. Previously now, it is going to be seven if you keep Figi's and Fashion Bug. I guess just maybe talk about that.
11
And then just kind of switching gears to Ascena near term, you talked about the shift between 3Q and 4Q. Maybe give us a little bit of color on what is driving the shortfall in the third quarter. And Armand, I think you talked about taking markdowns to move some of the slower-moving goods. So how are inventories at the end of the quarter and why I guess should we see some upside for the fourth quarter?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
All right, well, Anna, you have got a whole lot of questions there. I will start it off and talk about the style of this acquisition, comparing and contrasting with the other ones and then I will let Armand talk about the quarter.
The thing to understand about all three acquisitions is that we have been able to identify what I feel are terrific retail niches and then partner with the existing management team to develop a family of brands, as we like to say, that can be supported by our now our shared service model.
So the good news in all the situations is that there is very strong management in place. So as we look around, we feel very confident in the team that is here and we look forward to working with them to help them execute their plans and leverage and collaborate with them to get them to their desired levels of improvement even faster.
I think with maurices and Justice, there is probably, just due to the nature and the size of the business, it is probably much less on the back end and those were more, in maurices' case, just to unleash their potential, help them grow. Justice had been through a bit of a rough patch and they had committed to a turnaround plan and our timing happened to be pretty good and we just supported them as they executed an amazing turnaround.
And now here, you have got a business that also is in improvement mode, but it also has a shared service infrastructure and so does Ascena obviously. So we think not only do you have the potential of the brand growing both top line and improving their margins, but you also have the potential on the back end of figuring out ways to integrate the shared service model of both brands such that we can deliver services to the brands on what we call a faster, better, smarter basis. And with that, I will turn it over to Armand to talk about the numbers.
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP & CFO
Sure. So, Anna, let me stay with the inventory. As we ended the current third quarter, looking at all the brands, I feel very comfortable with both the level and the seasonality going into the fourth quarter. We will give you a lot more color when we do report our Q3 sales and earnings numbers on May 31. But looking out at the fourth quarter, we are estimating opportunities in all three brands for gross profit improvements over last year.
Last year, as we headed into the new fiscal year, we did take some, let's say, markdowns on certainly getting inventory levels down, as well as taking markdowns on slow-moving goods. We wanted to be very clean. I feel very comfortable again going into the fourth quarter with the kind of level and obviously, taking the markdowns on slow-moving goods. So I am looking at opportunities in the gross profit line in the fourth quarter.
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
Terrific. Thanks so much.
Operator
Mark Montagna, Avondale Partners.
12
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
Hi, thank you. David, a question for you just dealing with Lane Bryant. They had, according to the 10-K, their intentions of rolling out a new prototype for the fall and then in coming years updating approximately about a third of the stores over the next few years. Do you think, with the new acquisition, are you going to reassess that, just kind of pass through a litmus test just to make sure it makes sense to roll this out going forward?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Well, I would say, Mark, I can't wait to see the new prototype. I am a store design guy deep down and the initial things I've heard about it sound great. And I think just like Tony and Eric, I would say that let's get a bunch of them open and let's see the results and then we will reassess whether it is a rollout or you do a modified version of it or what have you. I think that is just retailing 101 and I think we wait and see, but we need to get a bunch of them opened first to have some datapoints to be able to look at.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
Okay. Yes, that sounds like the typical discipline that you have had in the past. Then just the other question deals with Lane Bryant was planning I think it was about $30 million of CapEx for projects with the DC and some systems-type projects. Are you also going to be reassessing that because that is a very large commitment and with all the potential savings that you have as a huge company, would you kind of reassess that whole potential?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Of course, Mark. We have a tremendous infrastructure now and we have got DCs and all sorts of things that we need to figure out how we can operate them most efficiently. Just to give you an example, currently, all our brands outsource e-commerce fulfillment and at some point, you look at the volume that we do, we think it makes sense to bring that in.
So there is a lot of discussion going on figuring out how we can operate most effectively. And while I am not going to promise any quick answers these are big decisions, big dollars, we are not going to just go ahead blindly with the existing transformation plan that Tony and Eric have talked about before. But certainly their research and study will be taken into account as jointly we figure out what is the right solution, not for Lane Bryant or dressbarn or this or that, but what is the right solution overall for Ascena.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
Okay. And then last question actually is are you fully completed with all the projects that you had going on with Ascena with the data centers, the DC integrations, all of that stuff you could say is completed at this point?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
No. I wish we could say it is completely done. I think there's a few, like the big financial systems, projects, we think will be done at the end of our fiscal year this summer and there are some others that we're beginning and some others that we are cleaning up. But the good thing, Mark, is we have all these opportunities, so I don't ever want to be done. I just want to go from one to the next and the next and while there is some really good ones that we have been able to finish and get some great savings from it, I think there are more that we can do and really what this does, this transaction does is it gives the opportunity to kind of reset and think about all the opportunities together that we can do and then prioritize them and then go out and implement them as effectively as possible.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
All right. That sounds great. Thank you, David.
13
Operator
Carla Casella, JPMorgan.
Carla Casella
- JPMorgan - Analyst
Hi. I had a question on the 4400 store base. Is part of the synergy the opportunity to convert stores between the different brands and do you have restrictions in your leases as to whether you change a location to a different nameplate?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
(technical difficulty) possibly be a few stores that get converted, but that would be the rare exception rather than rule. Certainly, there have been no situations where we've talked about doing that. If it happens, it happens in one store in one division (technical difficulty) greatly underperforming and it might be repurposed as another one. And generally we have strong relations with our landlords. If you think about it, with 4400 stores, we are one of the bigger tenants out there and I think if we did want to switch, I would assume that most landlords would be happy to work with us.
Carla Casella
- JPMorgan - Analyst
Okay, great. And then how much of your sourcing right now are common suppliers?
Unidentified Company Representative
Sourcing our common suppliers.
Carla Casella
- JPMorgan - Analyst
Do you use any of the same suppliers?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
We don't think so. We don't have  we haven't had the opportunity to compare the list yet, but nothing is jumping out at us for our big suppliers and that might be an opportunity. Certainly, something that we are going to consider looking into.
Carla Casella
- JPMorgan - Analyst
Okay, great. Thanks a lot.
Operator
Steve Marotta, CL King.
14
Steve Marotta
- CL King - Analyst
Good morning, everybody. David, you mentioned that one of the goals for Lane Bryant would be to increase sales productivity. Actually, you mentioned it for all three divisions. But specific for Lane Bryant, how many stores do you think there could be domestically? Are there square footage growth opportunities?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
I think there are some store square footage growth opportunities for all our brands, not just Lane Bryant, but certainly Lane Bryant I think can continue to grow. There's about 800 stores or so and a bunch of those are in outlets run under the LBO flag.
So as we continue to see how that business with Cacique especially continues to improve, I think there's opportunity to put it into more markets, particularly as Lane Bryant looks to move from the malls into the strips I think there's more opportunities than we've got today.
Steve Marotta
- CL King - Analyst
Okay. And my follow-up question as it relates to Fashion Bug, and I know that there are different options for that particular division. Is running it in perpetuity as a turnaround project an option?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
I think at this point all options are on the table.
Steve Marotta
- CL King - Analyst
Okay, great. Thank you.
Operator
Janine Stichter, Telsey Advisory.
Janine Stichter
- Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst
Hi guys, how are you. So my question was on the cost cuts at Charming Shoppes. I know you guys had identified about $25 million to $30 million in cost cuts and a lot of that was predicated on selling Fashion Bug. So is that something that's still in progress or is that kind of on hold until you figure out what you're going to do with Fashion Bug? And also I was just wondering if that is included in the expectation for basically breakeven to slightly accretive in the first year.
Anthony Romano
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CEO
Janine, hi, it's Tony. So I think as David had mentioned earlier, the back-office work that we have been doing as it relates to the DC and our technology that we are going to need to take a step back to make sure that we are doing the right thing for the overall Company. So I am sure David's expectations are that we are going to achieve as good or not better savings than we would have achieved with our investments. But we certainly haven't worked through any of those details or been able to follow through on those discussions.
And the second part of the question, David, was  is this sort of thought process part of why you're going to be accretive in the first year, the savings, (inaudible)?
15
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
I think the savings are great and we haven't quantified them, but when you talk about savings, I think of those in terms of synergies. And just to be clear, it is a good question, Janine, we have not factored in any synergies into our analysis. So we believe that there are synergies. We have started looking at different ones.
I am sorry, the one exception to that is that there is an NOL that carries over and that has been factored into our numbers. Apart from that, none of the other synergies that we see have been factored into our statement that we believe that the acquisition will be neutral to slightly accretive in the first fiscal year.
Janine Stichter
- Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst
So what tax rate should we be modeling for FY 13?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
I'll let Armand answer that one.
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP & CFO
That is a good question and my tax experts are going through that exercise as we speak. And we will probably share a little more color maybe after, let's say, hopefully as this deal gets closed.
Janine Stichter
- Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst
Perfect. Sounds good. Thanks.
Operator
Steve Kernkraut, Berman Capital.
Steve Kernkraut
- Berman Capital - Analyst
Hi, guys. Congratulations on a great deal it seems for both of you. Most of the questions have been really asked and you're probably limited what you could say, but should we anticipate that you guys will have post the closing of the deal similar to what you did on Justice, that you will have some big meeting where you will explain to the investment community what the synergies are and what the timing is and things like that so we could anticipate a meeting like that in August, September?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
I think that is a great thing to do, Steven and it was very effective when we did it with Justice and my sense is that fall would be a good time. It gives us a chance to kind of get through the summer, [throw] integration plans together. See how back-to-school is for some of our businesses where it is important, finish up the fiscal year and have all that behind us and then be able to talk and go into a lot of detail, not just about our results, but also about our plans for integration and each brand's initiatives and plans for the coming year.
16
Steve Kernkraut
- Berman Capital - Analyst
So if something like that would happen, it wouldn't happen concurrent with the closing of the deal; it would be more of a fall event after back-to-school season's over?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Yes, at this point, I think that closing the deal, if all goes well, it is going to be probably mid-June. I think that is way too premature, but I think by the time we get through our fiscal year and do something in October, we will be a lot smarter than we are now.
Steve Kernkraut
- Berman Capital - Analyst
Okay, thanks a lot. Good luck, guys.
Operator
Travis Williams, Stephens.
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
Thanks, guys and congrats, David and Tony. I was wondering maybe if, Tony, you could provide us with some updated data on the size of the plus market in the US and maybe the growth rate over the past few years. And then I know, David, you commented towards minimal customer overlap. I was wondering if maybe you might share with us from the loyalty programs of each of the companies what that actually looks like from a numbers standpoint.
And then my last question is just regarding potential to grow e-com business at the Charming Shoppes brands. You guys at Ascena have done a really remarkable job of growing the e-com business quite rapidly; whereas Charming's has been sort of flat for the last few years and that is basically it. Thanks.
Anthony Romano
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CEO
Hi, Travis. It's Tony. Regarding the size of the plus size markets, it has been relatively flat in terms of dollars. As measured by NPD, it is $17.4 billion, but we like to also look at it based on women that wear sizes 14 and larger. One of the key things with NPD is that that is based on women self-identifying as plus and we all know that those answers aren't always exactly right on the mark.
So we also take a second look at NPD's data and look at all women wearing size 14 and larger and the market grows to $29 billion when you consider again all American women wearing size 14 and larger. And in fact, greater than 50% of American women wear size 14 or larger.
I think just briefly on the e-com business, we have actually had some nice success at Charming as well. Just last year, our e-com growth was 16% and represents 10% of overall sales of business. We do think there remains tremendous growth opportunity, but we have been excited about initiatives that we put on our e-com like our universal cart, like our free ship to store. We have international shipping and in fact, have recorded sales in 88 countries already in just six months without any aggressive advertising at all. I believe, David, you had another question.
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
Thanks for that color, Tony.
17
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
The other point I want to make about their e-commerce, it is already at 10%. And so with dressbarn and maurices, they are working off of a bit of a lower base. And while we are thrilled with the growth rate, they are not at 10%.
So while I agree with Tony, I think his customer will  does enjoy shopping at home and I think you're going to continue to see that number grow to greater penetration than the 10% they've got. The dressbarn and maurices brands are still not at that level.
To your earlier question, Travis, the overlap with our (inaudible) is a good question. We have not done that exercise yet, but it is on our to-do list and I think just anecdotally, I would tell you that there is going to be some overlap, but we think it is going to be fairly minimal. We will keep you posted on that.
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
Okay, and then just one follow-up that kind of came up. You mentioned sourcing maybe as a potential down the road, but can you just comment as to Charming Shoppes' sourcing, whether it is direct or agent for those of us that don't cover that company?
Anthony Romano
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CEO
Yes, Travis. It's Tony. We have a direct sourcing office in Hong Kong and source about, in a combined basis, about 50% of our apparel overall on the direct source basis and the balance from agents in the New York marketplace, but it has been one of our initiatives to drive apparel sourcing to 80%. And that is some of the things that we meant when we talk about powerful combination perhaps just to give us an opportunity to increase that penetration all that much quicker, as well as working with the full Ascena family to see if there is not other leveraging and fabrics for those sorts of things.
Travis Williams
- Stephens Inc. - Analyst
Sure. Great, thank you. Congrats.
Operator
[Bashin Shay], [Tullet Preemboppin].
Bashin Shay
- Tullet Preemboppin - Analyst
Hi, good morning. So I think I may have missed the beginning of the call. You guys are going to be launching the tender offer the next 10 business days and you are expecting the deal to close by the end of June, is that correct?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
That is correct.
Bashin Shay
- Tullet Preemboppin - Analyst
Okay, and you are not expecting  and then HSR is the only regulatory approval that you need for the closing of the transaction?
18
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Yes, that is correct. (multiple speakers)
Bashin Shay
- Tullet Preemboppin - Analyst
I'm sorry?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
So that is correct.
Bashin Shay
- Tullet Preemboppin - Analyst
Okay, and you are not expecting any issues, it seems like, with that?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
No, definitely not.
Bashin Shay
- Tullet Preemboppin - Analyst
Okay, thank you.
Operator
Mark Montagna, Avondale Partners.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
Hi, just some follow-ups from some previous comments. When you mentioned that e-commerce was 10% of revenue at Charming Shoppes, does that include Figi or is that just 10% of your apparel brands?
Eric Specter
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - CFO
That is just 10%, Mark, of the apparel brands. Figi's in our 10-K is broken out separately as our direct business. Our e-com business is embedded within each of the brands' P&Ls.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
Okay, that's great. And then just lastly, the NOL that you mentioned, can you tell us how much that is? What is the net cash value and are there any restrictions on you taking it all just in a one-year time period?
19
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
I will let Armand handle that.
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP & CFO
Okay, let me see. Certainly, we can't take it all in on certainly one year, Mark. We estimate that the NOL value on a tax basis is going to be somewhere a little north of $40 million. And again, we are not going to be able to take that; it will be over a period of time.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
Okay, thank you.
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP & CFO
And that will be baked into  I think I had done a call before what our effective rate will be going forward that certainly will be baked into that.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
Okay, that sounds great. Thanks.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President & CEO
Well, I want to thank everyone for their interest. At this point, we are going to cut off and I do want to remind everybody that we have very limited ability to talk about this detail with the pending tender. So we are going to probably just go radio silent for a while and I am sure we will be back in touch at the time  at the time we are able to talk in more detail. So again, thank you for your interest. We appreciate your support and signing off.
Operator
Thank you for your participation in today's conference. This concludes the presentation. You may now disconnect and have a great day.
20


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120531161308.txt.gz
TIME:20120531161308
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
May 31, 2012
Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
 
(845) 369-4500
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
  
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On May 31, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release disclosing material non-public information regarding its results of operations for its fiscal third quarter and nine months ended April 28, 2012. The Company also reaffirmed its earnings per diluted share guidance for its full fiscal year ending July 28, 2012. A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
 
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
Date: May 31, 2012
 
 

 
 
News Release
 
ascena retail group, Inc. reports
THIRD Quarter results
 
 consolidated comparable store sales increase 5% 
 company Reaffirms fiscal 2012 earnings guidance 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reported financial results for its fiscal third quarter and nine months ended April 28, 2012.
SUFFERN, NY 
May
31, 2012 
(NASDAQ  ASNA)
 
Fiscal Third Quarter Results
 
Net income for the third quarter of Fiscal 2012 was $49.4 million, representing a slight decrease to the year-ago quarters net income of $51.8 million. Earnings per share for the third quarter of Fiscal 2012 decreased slightly to $0.31 per diluted share, compared to $0.32 of earnings per diluted share for the third quarter of Fiscal 2011. The decrease in net income and earnings per share for the third quarter of Fiscal 2012 was entirely attributable to the incurrence of $6.8 million, or $0.03 per diluted share, of costs relating to the pending acquisition of Charming Shoppes, Inc.
 
Net sales for the third quarter of Fiscal 2012 increased 8% to $783.3 million, compared to $722.8 million for last years third quarter. This was primarily due to a 5% increase in comparable store sales, and strong growth in sales from new stores and e-commerceConsolidated comparable store sales include stores open for at least one year and do not include e-commerce sales results. The Company was pleased to note that e-commerce sales increased 55% to $36 million versus last years comparable period. The Companys comparable store sales and net sales by brand for the fiscal third quarter were as follows:
.
 
 
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the third quarter of Fiscal 2012 were $229.0 million, or 29.2% of sales, compared to $210.5 million, or 29.1% of sales last year. The marginal increase in SG&A expenses as a percent of sale was related to an increase in stock-based compensation costs.
 
Operating income for the third quarter of Fiscal 2012 decreased slightly to $85.3 million, or 10.9% of sales, compared to $86.4 million, or 12.0% of sales last year. The 110 basis point decrease in operating income as a percent of sales was due to a combination of a decrease in merchandise margin due to higher promotional markdowns, as well as the impact of higher SG&A expenses.
 
 
 
Fiscal Nine Month Results
 
Net income for the first nine-month period of Fiscal 2012 increased by 13% to $160.6 million, compared to net income of $142.3 million for the first nine months of Fiscal 2011. Earnings per share for the first nine-month period of Fiscal 2012 increased by 15% to $1.01 per diluted share, compared to $0.88 of earnings per diluted share for the first nine months of Fiscal 2011. This growth in net income and earnings per share for the first nine months of Fiscal 2012 was partially offset by the incurrence of the above-mentioned $6.8 million, or $0.03 per diluted share, of costs relating to the pending Charming Shoppes acquisition.
 
Net sales for the first nine-month period of Fiscal 2012 increased 10% to $2.4 billion, compared to $2.2 billion for last years first nine months. The overall increase was primarily due to a 6% comparable store sales increase, and strong growth in sales from new stores and e-commerceE-commerce sales increased 55% to $121 million versus last year. The Companys comparable store sales and net sales by brand for the first nine months were as follows:
.
 
 
SG&A expenses for the first nine-month period of Fiscal 2012 were $685.5 million, or 28.4% of sales, compared to $625.7 million, or 28.6% of sales last year. The 20 basis point improvement in SG&A expenses was primarily due to leverage on higher sales.
 
Operating income for the first nine-month period of Fiscal 2012 increased 11.1% to $261.8 million, or 10.8% of sales, compared to $235.7 million, or 10.8% of sales last year. The $26.1 million increase is attributable to increased margin on higher sales, partially offset by an increase in SG&A expenses.
 
Fiscal Third Quarter Balance Sheet Highlights
 
The Company ended the third quarter of Fiscal 2012 with $616.5 million in cash and investments, compared to $436.1 million in cash and investments at the end of Fiscal 2011. The Company expects to use a significant portion of its cash and investments balance to partially fund the Charming Shoppes acquisition, which is expected to close in mid-June 2012.
 
The Company repurchased approximately 2.7 million shares at an aggregate cost of $37.2 million during the first nine months of Fiscal 2012.
 
 
 
Commentary
 
David Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented, Our overall financial performance in the quarter was in-line with expectations and reflects the continued challenging marketplace for retailers and consumers. Our ability to perform well despite these pressures validates the strength of our product, the loyalty of our customers and our strategy to build a compelling, diversified business. We are gratified and excited to powerfully move this strategy forward with the anticipated addition of Charming Shoppes to the Ascena portfolio of brands.
 
Reaffirms Fiscal July 2012 Earnings Guidance
 
The Company today reaffirmed guidance for earnings per diluted share for the fiscal year ending July 2012 in the range of $1.37 to $1.40, excluding the impact on earnings of the pending Charming Shoppes acquisition, which is currently scheduled for a mid-June closing. Items excluded include the impact on earnings from acquisition-related costs during the fiscal third quarter and those anticipated in the fourth quarter, as well as any impact of the acquisition on the combined operating results of the Company. This estimate is based upon various assumptions for the remainder of the year, including a mid-single digit increase in consolidated comparable store sales. The Company plans to end the fiscal year with approximately 2,600 , and stores in operation.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
 
Conference Call Information
 
The Company will conduct a conference call today, May 31, 2012, at 4:30 PM Eastern Time to review its third quarter fiscal 2012 results followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (617) 614-2703 prior to the start time, the passcode is 36779645. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at . A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until June 30, 2012 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 68605679.
www.ascenaretail.com
 
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. is a leading national specialty retailer of apparel for women and tween girls, operating through its wholly-owned subsidiaries, the and brands. The Company operates through its subsidiaries approximately 2,600 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn,
maurices
Justice
 
offers casual, career and special occasion fashion apparel and accessories at value prices for women ages 35-55, operates 838 stores in 48 states. offers casual and career apparel and accessories at value prices to the fashion-conscious woman, ages 17-34 with a 20-something attitude, and operates 813 stores in 44 states and Canada. offers trend-right apparel and accessories at value prices for tween girls ages 7-14 and operates 920 stores in 46 states, Puerto Rico and Canada.
dressbarn
maurices
Justice
 
For more information, visit
www.ascenaretail.com
,
www.dressbarn.com
,
www.maurices.com
and
www.shopjustice.com
.
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available in the Companys most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended July 30, 2011 and in its last filed Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended January 28, 2012.
 
Investor Relations
(845) 369-4600
 
ICR, Inc.
James Palczynski
Senior Managing Director
(203) 682-8229
jp@icrinc.com
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Segment Information (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
 
Note 1. Basis of Presentation
 
Segment Information
 
In January 2011, the Company completed an internal corporate reorganization and established a new holding company named Ascena Retail Group, Inc., to own the interests of each of the and brands through wholly owned subsidiaries. In connection therewith, beginning in Fiscal 2012, the Company implemented a new methodology to allocate corporate overhead costs to each of its operating segments on a reasonable basis.
dressbarn, maurices
Justice
 
As previously disclosed in the Companys Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 16, 2011, in order to conform to this new cost allocation methodology, the Company has recasted historically reported segment operating results in order to enhance the comparability of its segmental operating performance. There have been no changes in total net sales or total operating income as a result of this change.
 
A reconciliation of the Companys operating income for each segment under the historical and recasted basis of reporting for the three months and nine months ended April 30, 2011 is as follows:
 
 
 
Common Stock Split
 
On April 3, 2012, the Company issued a two-for-one common stock split, effected in the form of a 100% stock dividend. All common share and earnings per share data presented in the attached unaudited consolidated financial statements has been adjusted to reflect the stock split.
 
Other Reclassifications
 
Certain other immaterial reclassifications have been made to the prior periods financial information in order to conform to the current periods presentation.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120601142907.txt.gz
TIME:20120601142907
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
May 31, 2012 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On May 31, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an investor conference call to discuss the Companys results of operations for its third quarter ended April 28, 2012 and certain other information, including the contents of the Companys press release dated May 31, 2012 which was furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 8-K on May 31, 2012. The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference. A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
Date: June 1, 2012
 
 
 

 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS
EDITED TRANSCRIPT
ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
EVENT DATE/TIME: MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT
 
OVERVIEW:
ASNA reported YTD 2012 net sales of $2.4b, net income of $161m or $1.01 per diluted share and 3Q12 net sales of $783m, net income of $49.4m or $0.31 per diluted share. Expects FY12 EPS to be $1.37-1.40.
 
 
 
scenaetailroupncarningsonferenceall
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 A
R
G
, I
. E
C
C
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
Allison Townsend
ICR - IR
David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
Armand Correia
Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
Anna Andreeva
FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
Janet Kloppenburg
JJK Research - Analyst
Scott Krasik
BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
Brian Tunick
JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
Mark Montagna
Avondale Partners - Analyst
Robin Murchison
SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
Steve Marotta
CL King & Associates - Analyst
Janine Stitcher
Telsey Advisors - Analyst
Alex Fuhrman
Piper Jaffray - Analyst
Janet Clay
Liberty Mutual - Analyst
 
PRESENTATION
 
 
Operator
 
Good afternoon. My name is Derek and I will be your conference operator today. At this time, I would like to welcome everyone to the Ascena Retail Group's third-quarter earnings conference call. I would like to introduce Allison Townsend of ICR. Ms. Townsend, please begin.
 
 
Allison Townsend
- ICR - IR
 
Thank you, Derek. Today's call is being recorded and will be available for replay later today. Information on accessing this replay is available on today's press release. As a matter of formality, I need to remind participants that remarks made by management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results and implementation of the Company's plans to vary materially. These risks are referenced in today's press release as well as in the Company's most recently filed Forms 10-K and 10-Q.
 
At this time, I would like to turn the conference over call over to your host, Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO. David?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Allison. Good afternoon and thank you for joining us to discuss the results of our fiscal third quarter. With me today is Armand Correia, our CFO. We are pleased to report a good third quarter. Net sales increased 8% to $783 million with consolidated comp sales increasing 5% in the third quarter. Our earnings per share were $0.31, compared to EPS of $0.32 per share in the prior-year quarter. The slight reduction versus last year is entirely the result of a $0.03 per diluted share impact of acquisition related costs for the pending Charming Shoppes acquisition. Comp sales by brand were Justice up 8%, dressbarn up 6%, and maurices was down 1%. Our operating and financial results this quarter were generally consistent with our plans.
 
 
 
scenaetailroupncarningsonferenceall
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 A
R
G
, I
. E
C
C
 
As you know, the major point of progress that we had this past quarter was strategic with our announcement of the agreement to acquire Charming Shoppes. While we do not have further developments to discuss just yet, we are working to move this process forward and preparing for the longer integration process that will follow the deal. Our teams are excited and will be ready. In the meanwhile, we have focused  we have been focused on executing well and in an environment that remains challenging but is not without opportunity.
 
Now I would like to walk you through each of our brands in a little more detail. At Justice, we continue to grow our market share by giving our customers trend-right merchandise assortments at compelling values. Our third quarter sales increase of 11% was driven primarily by a 3% growth in transactions and a 5% increase in dollars per transaction, as well as a 23% growth in e-commerce sales. The shift in product mix towards apparel continued which carries higher selling prices. Our assortments of casual and active tops and casual and active bottoms continue to perform well. From a regional perspective, all regions delivered positive comps with the upper Midwest and Midwest delivering double-digit growth. The Justice e-commerce business also continues to grow rapidly and our new Canadian stores are performing above plan as well.
 
Our marketing strategy at Justice reinforces our value proposition with the right balance of 40% discounts offered to our customers through direct mail, e-mail, customer loyalty programs, and also storewide point-of-sale events. For the third quarter, our promotional cadence was similar to last year, which drove both traffic and transactions. Justice executed three 40% off entire store point-of-sale events, the same as last year, with 15 additional point-of-sale days during the quarter. These events were supplemented by 5% increase in circulation of direct mail catazines, which included four catazine mailings similar to last year and the elimination of one postcard mailing. For the fourth quarter, we have added 22 POS days compared to last year's fourth quarter, which will include three POS events and three catazines, the same as last year, and two postcards, one less than last year.
 
I would also like to announce our new strategic initiative, adding Brothers merchandise in our Justice brick-and-mortar stores. We will be adding it into 10 current Justice stores in time for back-to-school, with 25 more planned prior to the holiday selling season. During the third quarter, we opened nine Justice stores including three in Canada and closed six stores. And ended the quarter with 920 stores versus 890 stores last year. In the fourth quarter, we plan to open approximately 31 stores, including five stores in Canada, and close three.
 
Turning now to maurices, net sales grew 8% in the third quarter. Maurices comp was down 1% for the quarter, which was up against a tough 11% comp from the prior year. A 3% increase in conversion was more than offset by a 2% decrease in traffic and a 2% decrease in average dollar sale. Comp store sales increased in the Northeast while all other regions declined. The net sales increase was driven by strong new store performance, including performance above expectations for our first two Canadian stores and an 88% growth in e-commerce sales. Many of our women's apparel departments posted increases, with casual wear at work knits and wovens and casual bottoms posting double-digit growth. Our plus size collection was flat and accessories were down.
 
Our maurices third-quarter marketing initiatives involved a variety of strategies. We had the two mailers consistent with last year, with mailing quantities up 24%. We continue to enroll customers in our electronic maurices Take Ten loyalty program which launched in September and has helped to more than double the size of our e-mail database to 1.9 million. The penetration of our private label credit card has increased to 35%. For the fourth quarter, we want to have an incremental mailer for a total of two direct mail pieces versus one last year with an 18% planned increase in quantities. At maurices, our store base is now 813 locations at the end of the quarter, versus 767 stores last year. During the third quarter, we opened 12 new stores including our first two Canadian stores and closed two stores. 25 new store openings, including an additional four stores in Canada, and two store closings are planned for the fourth quarter.
 
Our dressbarn brand performed well this quarter. Net sales were up 6% including a 6% increase in comps, which was driven by both a 4% increase in transactions and a 2% increase in average dollars per transaction. From a regional perspective all regions had positive comps, with the best performance in the Midwest and West. We continue to be pleased with our e-commerce growth which more than doubled, growing at 115% for the quarter. We attribute our success to our trend right assortments, helped by favorable weather trends in February and March. We have seen universal acceptance of color as the main trend for the season, and see this trend continuing through the summer and into fall.
 
Both career and casual bottoms performed well above expectations, with strong performances in our capri and short business which was helped by the warmer weather trends. Career and casual knit tops and sportswear also performed well. Our largest spring category, dresses, had modest gains trending above last year, while jewelry and special occasion dresses have underperformed. Our merchandising and planning reorganization is helping us deliver trend right assortments and will give us greater fashion consistency across our size ranges. We are confident that our new direction will positively impact our performance going forward.
 
We continue to use a variety of marketing tools for the third quarter, which helped to drive sales. dressbarn refined its customer targeting which allowed us to decrease total mailed quantities by 7% versus last year, while maintaining sales and traffic. We had three mailings and two gift with purchase promotions, the same as last year. We changed the format and offering of two of the three mailers which resulted in a14% increase in response rate. Our electronic dressbarn blushPERKS loyalty program continues to grow, and we have enrolled approximately 1.5 million customers since December. We increased the frequency of e-mails sent by 66%, and our e-mail database of 2.6 million is 150% more than last year. Our dressbarn credit card market share is at 30% of sales.
 
 
 
scenaetailroupncarningsonferenceall
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 A
R
G
, I
. E
C
C
 
For the fourth quarter, we are anniversarying three direct mail pieces with a slight decrease in planned quantities as we further refine our customer targeting and adding an incremental gift with purchase. At dressbarn our store base is 838 locations as of the end of the quarter versus 834 stores last year. During the third quarter, we opened 14 stores and closed 1. For the fourth quarter, we plan to close nine stores.
 
We will continue working to sustain the momentum in our business. Through May, comp sales have continued to be up, though in the low single digits. Looking ahead, we are estimating mid-single-digit comp sales increases for the remainder of the quarter. And we are reaffirming our fiscal year earnings per share guidance in the range of $1.37 to $1.40, excluding the impact of the pending Charming Shoppes acquisition. Items excluded include the impact on earnings from acquisition related costs during the fiscal third quarter and those anticipated in the fourth quarter, as well as any impact of the acquisition on the combined operating results of the Company. We expect to announce our fiscal 2013 earnings per share guidance with our fourth-quarter and fiscal year 2012 financial results toward the end of September.
 
Before I turn the call over to Armand to discuss our financial results in more detail, I would just like to say that it is very exciting to be on the cusp of what we think will be another great acquisition. We believe this positions us well to further diversify our business, create synergies among our brands, and drive incremental value to our shareholders. Thank you. Armand?
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Thank you, David, and good afternoon, everyone. Before reviewing our quarterly results, just two notes. First, it's appropriate to mention that this year's quarterly earnings include certain costs that we believe are not reflective of ongoing operations. We will comment on these costs during our prepared remarks. Second, as noted in today's press release, last year's operating income results for our brands have been recasted for both the quarter and year-to-date in order to conform to our current method of allocating corporate overhead costs to our brands on a reasonable basis.
 
Net sales increased 8% to $783 million. The increase was primarily driven by an overall comp sales increase of 5%, which came on top of a 6% increase last year. Our comp sales results continue to show consistency, increasing for a 13th consecutive quarter. We are pleased to also note that our e-commerce sales continue to grow and were better than expected, increasing 55% to $36 million, compared to last year's $24 million. Moving down the income statement, gross profit was $340 million, an increase of 7% over last year's $318 million. The gross profit rate came in at 43.4% of sales, compared to last year's 44%. The 60 basis points decline was primarily margin due to increased markdowns.
 
From a brand perspective, the gross profit rate at Justice increased to 44.5%, compared to last year's 44.3%. The increase was leverage on buying and occupancy costs. Maurices' gross profit rate was 45.2%, compared to last year's strong 47.7%. The 250 basis points decline was margin due to increased markdowns. dressbarn came in at 40.7%, compared to a similar rate last year.
 
Selling, general and administrative expenses came in at $229 million or 29.2% of sales, compared to last year's $211 million or 29.1% of sales. The lack of leverage was primarily due to an increase of $4 million in stock-based compensation from an increase in the stock price, which accounted for approximately 50 basis points of this year's rate. We also incurred additional costs from several ongoing strategic initiatives. Operating income was $85 million or 10.9% of sales, compared to last year's $86 million or 12% of sales. The year-over-year decrease of 110 basis points was from the 60 basis points decline in gross profit and an increase of 40 basis points in non-cash expense for depreciation.
 
Operating income by brand. Justice quarterly operating income was $23 million or 8.1% of sales, in line with expectations, but slightly below last year's $24 million or 9.1% of sales. Maurices' operating income was $38 million or 16.9% of sales, below last year's results of $40 million, or 19.4% of sales. While dressbarn's operating income came in at $24 million or 8.9% of sales, compared to last year's performance of $22 million or 8.8% of sales.
 
The tax rate for the quarter was 37.5% compared to last year's 40.2%. This year's rate was more reflective of the Company's ongoing tax rate of approximately 38.5%. Net income was $49.4 million or $0.31 per diluted share. But this includes $6.8 million of pretax acquisition costs related to the pending acquisition of Charming Shoppes. This compares to a year-ago quarter's net income of $51.8 million or $0.32 per diluted share. Excluding the after-tax impact of the acquisition cost, this year's quarterly net income would have been $53.7 million, or $0.34 per diluted share. It should also be noted that all earnings per share reflect the recent two-for-one stock split.
 
Now, turning to a quick review of our year-to-date results, net sales for the nine month period ended April 28, 2012 increased 10% to $2.4 billion, with comp store sales increasing 6%. Operating income for this period increased to $262 million or 10.8% of sales. This compares to last year's $236 million or 10.8% of sales. Net income for the nine month period increased 13% to $161 million, or $1.01 per diluted share, compared to last year's $142 million or $0.88 per diluted share. Again, excluding the after-tax impact of the previously mentioned acquisition costs, net income for this nine month period would have been $165 million or $1.04 per diluted share.
 
 
  
scenaetailroupncarningsonferenceall
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 A
R
G
, I
. E
C
C
 
Moving on to the balance sheet, we ended the quarter with $617 million in cash and investments. The Company expects to use a significant portion of this amount to partially fund the pending Charming Shoppes acquisition, which is expected to close mid-June of 2012. Net cash flows provided from operations for the quarter were strong at approximately $79 million. At quarter end, total inventories were $349 million, increasing 16% year-over-year in dollars and 3% in units. Average unit cost was up 12%. Of this amount, 7% was from mix and 5% from product cost. Although dollar levels were higher, the unit increase of low single digits was in line with plan. As we look at our business for the remainder of the quarter, we are comfortable with May's ending inventory levels, year-over-year up approximately 9% in dollars and down 2% in units.
 
From a brand perspective, inventory at Justice was $128 million increasing 27% year-over-year in dollars and 3% in units, and in line with plan. The variance between dollars and units is primarily due to the average unit cost increase of 24% of which 14% was mix and 10% was product cost. At maurices, inventory ended the quarter at $87 million and increased 19% in dollars and 12% in units versus the same period last year. This level was higher than planned due to a slowdown in sales during the quarter. Average unit cost increased 6% with mix being up 3% and cost up 3%. At dressbarn, inventory was in line with plan, increasing 5% year-over-year to $134 million and flat in units.
 
Capital expenditures for the quarter were $51 million, and included $15 million towards the purchase of a new headquarters facility for dressbarn and Ascena in Mahwah, New Jersey. The remaining CapEx was primarily for new store construction, store remodels, and IT projects. The full year is expected to be in the range of $145 million to $150 million. We're also pleased to announce today that our Suffern, New York headquarters and former distribution center facility was sold. We will remain at our Suffern facility until the new headquarters facility is ready to be occupied. Weighted average shares outstanding for the third quarter was 159.9 million shares, a decrease from last year's 161.7 million shares. The decrease was from 2.7 million shares repurchased during the first half of this fiscal year.
 
Thank you. This concludes our prepared remarks. Operator, we will now accept your questions.
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
 
Operator
 
(Operator Instructions)
 
Anna Andreeva, FBR Capital Markets.
 
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Follow-up on May to date, you said it was up low-single digits, are you guys seeing similar results by brand? And what gives you confidence that comps will improve to mid-singles as we go through the quarter? Is it just a virtue of comparisons getting easier in June and July? Maybe talk about that.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Sure. Yes, you're absolutely right, it is easier comps as we get into June and July. And the results for May were pretty much the same across all three brands.
 
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. So maurices did improve from negative 1%?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes.
 
 
 
scenaetailroupncarningsonferenceall
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 A
R
G
, I
. E
C
C
 
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Can you  since we're talking about maurices, can you maybe talk about what happened in this division? I think at the beginning of the quarter you guys talked about being pretty pleased with spring and some of the color and newness, working at that division. Just maybe what happened in April?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I don't think it was just April. I think the season had some challenges. We mentioned that accessories was down. That turned out to be a more difficult business, and even though it's a good margin business, if the customer does not want it, she really doesn't want it at any price. So, we had some inventory issues there that we worked our way out of for the most part. And certainly, we'll be clean as we get into back-to-school. And at the same time, some of the other challenges we had with merchandise, we've dealt with. We've got new product in. Color has been great. We're well-positioned for color as we turn the corner into back-to-school. So we feel much more confident about the next few months at maurices than we had for spring.
 
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay, got it. That's great. And just, Armand, I'm not sure if I missed this, could you break down the components of the gross margin decline, just occupancy, leverage versus markdowns? Just trying to understand why gross margins were down in 3Q after being up nicely in the second quarter despite easier comparisons, and how should we expect gross margins to look like in the fourth quarter?
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Okay. So, as far as the gross profit rate decline of 60 basis points, actually, we had gotten some leverage on buying occupancy of 30 BPS. So merchandise margins overall were down 90 BPS. As far as the quarter, in looking at the fourth quarter  if I look at the fourth quarter, the margin opportunities are primarily in the maurice and dressbarn divisions. If you look at last year's fourth quarter, you'll see that maurices had a decline of about 250 basis points in gross profit, with dressbarn declining 130 basis points. So I look at the quarter as the opportunity in those two brands to certainly improve upon those type of numbers.
 
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
 
All right. Well, thanks so much. Good luck, guys.
 
 
Operator
 
Your line maybe on mute.
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Hello, can you hear me?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes.
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
I'm sorry. I didn't hear anything  excuse me 
 
 
 
scenaetailroupncarningsonferenceall
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 A
R
G
, I
. E
C
C
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Janet, you're cutting in and out.
 
 
Operator
 
Scott Krasik, BB&T Capital Markets.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Just a couple questions. First, bigger picture, maybe talk about why you decided to bring the boys merchandise into the stores? I think you've always made a point of emphasis that girls at that age feel safe and want to shop without the distraction of boys. What was the thinking there? I think it's a really good point. At this age, we think that it's really mom buying the clothes.
 
You may not even see that many boys in the store. But what we've done is develop a test where we're looking at a prototype for the Brothers business  prototype store within the store. , in about a third of the situations, it will have a separate entrance. And in the other two thirds, it will kind of be in a corner of the store, Scott, and it will have its own little entryway. So, it really will be very isolated. And when you walk into that section, it will feel like a little boys' club. It won't feel anything like the girls' area. And it's going to have its own obviously separate fitting room and access. And so, you really won't feel like you are shopping with your little brother.
 
And I think as mom is buying most of the clothes, it's maybe a moot point, but even if little brother or big brother is in there, that environment is going to have a big video screen with all sorts of fun boy videos playing. It will be captivating for that boy. And accordingly you must have been pleased with the website production  productivity?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I think the website was a great learning opportunity. I won't say that it was huge results. I think the opportunity is to leverage the box that we currently have, and the fact that we've got mom coming into the store. And once we can establish it as a brick-and-mortar, I think that's actually going to help drive e-commerce and vice versa.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. And then, Armand, you might have touched on it, but maybe give us a little bit more confidence of why you expect to see such healthy gross margin improvement year-over-year in the fourth quarter? Maybe by division?
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Yes, I touched upon it with Anna's question. If you go back to the fourth quarter last year, you're going to see that dressbarn and maurices are really the brands that we believe have the opportunity for improved margin in Q4 given the declines that we saw last year.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
But including  so based on the sales trends  so just less markdowns?
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Yes.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 
 
scenaetailroupncarningsonferenceall
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 A
R
G
, I
. E
C
C
 
Okay. And then just in terms of SG&A, is there incremental SG&A associated with moving into the new headquarters and then running it on an ongoing basis that maybe we haven't been considering?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We don't think so.
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
We don't think so.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We'll need to drill down on that, but we don't have enough information yet to be specific. But it's going to be immaterial, Scott.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. Well, congratulations. Good luck.
 
 
Operator
 
Edward Yruma, KeyBanc.
 
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
This is Jane in for Ed. I was just curious if you could give a little bit more color on Justice in the back half. What  I saw in the past, last quarter you had said that there was opportunities with Justice, as well on the margin side.
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
We did, but I think the question was  I feel that there's a greater opportunity in the other two brands given the performance last year during Q4.
 
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
So, there is a little bit of opportunity at Justice as well?
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Yes.
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
And is it more of  I guess more of a unit-based opportunity than pricing?
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
I wouldn't think it's units. I think it's going to be in pricing.
 
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
Okay, great. Thank you.
 
 
Operator
 
Brian Tunick, JPMorgan.
 
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Good afternoon, guys, and congratulations. So, a couple of questions. David, I guess I'd be curious on your view  between the warm weather and the early Easter, just sort of curious, do you think that Justice and the dressbarn business may have pulled forward some sales and sort of how you're thinking about that?
 
Second question, your peers have about 10% of their business is being driven online. So just curious, what are your goals over the next couple years, and what are you learning from that multichannel shopper? And then the third question for Armand, maybe just talk about as we look past the next quarter, but what are the product costs that you locked in savings wise for the back half of the year? If you could just give us an idea of what the AUC looks like that you've locked in? Thanks very much.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Brian, first, I do think that we pulled forward business. I think the whole industry did. And looking back, I'd say the unseasonably warm weather that we all enjoyed probably brought some of May sales forward. So, we all saw May numbers today. There were some pretty good numbers out there, and then some other numbers that weren't so good.
 
So, I've got a sense that there was a pull forward and once we  now that we're through May, we're through Memorial Day, we're really in summer, and we're going to start turning the corner to back-to-school, I think that, that effect is behind us. And that's why while we were only up low single digits for May, we're still holding to our mid-single-digit comp for the balance of the quarter, June and July.
 
On online, we are roughly running, call it 5%. It's higher for Justice and lower for dressbarn just because of the relative maturity of those, as everyone knows, Justice has been out for I think about 10 years, and maurices for about 2 and a half, dressbarn for about 1 and a half. So, you heard the incredible growth numbers for maurices and dressbarn. So, they're ramping up very rapidly. I think the 10% number that you mentioned is a good penetration number. I think that all three of our brands will be able to hit that number in, say, three-ish years. I think it's an area where we're spending a lot of time and energy on, and we're ramping up our resources to support those areas.
 
And I think there's only good things that come from being multichannel and being able to address your customer, whether it's online, mobile commerce, obviously in-store, but also combining that so that people can come in-store, and if we're out of something, they can order it online and have it delivered. They can go shop online and have it delivered to the store. That whole, we call it on my omni-channel, I think is becoming more and more important. And that's just becoming the standard that the customer is looking for. So, we're moving in that direction, and we'll be spending money in that direction. And I think you'll see our capabilities grow in the coming years in that area. Armand?
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call 
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
As far as your question on product costs, locking them in, I think the only thing I gave you color on, Brian, now, obviously, we are seeing product costs decreasing going into the fall season. I think that bodes well for opportunities and gross profit. As far as strategy of changing ticket price, I don't think we're going down that path. So, I think at this point, while I can't quantify it, we're feeling pretty good about the way the product costs have decreased overall and the opportunities on gross profit for the fall season.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Just remember, Brian, to tag onto that, that there is more opportunity with Justice due to the nature of the product and cotton as a percent of their total cost versus a dressbarn, which is much lower and had much less significant costs and therefore price increases. So, you'll see a bigger impact, a bigger bang at Justice as we go into fall than you will at dressbarn. And maurices is in the middle, but probably more on the dressbarn side.
 
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
All right, super. That's very helpful. Thanks very much, guys.
 
 
Operator
 
Janet Kloppenburg, JJK Research.
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
I'm sorry about before. I just wanted to ask, Armand, where you thought the inventories would be coming out of the quarter? And, David, if you're increasing  it seems like you might be increasing your marketing spend for maurices and maybe for dressbarn. Is that something we should look to you to continue to do? And lastly, I just wanted to make sure I understood that your annual guidance does not include  I know it doesn't include any charges associated with the acquisition, but does it include any accretion that could possibly come from the acquisition, given that you might close the deal mid-June? Thank you.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, I guess I'll start and work backwards. The guidance doesn't include any impact for the Charming acquisition.
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Okay.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
What I would suggest is that in September when we give you our guidance for fiscal '13, we'll true it up and be able to tell you what that looks like if anything at that time. We'll be a lot smarter.
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Okay.
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Working backwards on the marketing dollars, if there  there is incremental spend, it's very minimal. We're trying to hold our dollars flat at dressbarn and maurices. It's been a bit of increase at Justice. But as we look out, we don't see any substantial change.
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Okay, thank you.
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Janet, relative to inventory coming out for the quarter, I guess on dollars I would say we're a little higher than I would have liked. But then when I looked at, obviously, average unit cost increase, and saw that units were pretty much in line with our plan, we're feeling a little better. And again, the color I gave you, more importantly, is where we're at the end of May. And as I said before, I'm very comfortable with the May ending inventory levels, given what the plans are for June and July.
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Did you give us the May ending inventory number?
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
I didn't give you a number. I just gave you the fact that ending May, overall inventories in dollars were up 9% and units were actually down 2% year-over-year.
 
 
Operator
 
Mark Montagna, Avondale Partners.
 
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Question for you on the Brothers announcement. Are these stores larger stores where you actually have some excess space that you're able to tuck it in? Or are you scaling back some sort of merchandise within Justice to make room for this?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
It's a mix, Mark. I'd say they're all at least prototype, some are a little bit bigger for sure. But, we're only talking about, say, 600- to 700-odd square feet. So, it's a pretty small piece of the store. And we are not anticipating scaling back any of the offerings or the inventory levels within the Justice merchandise.
 
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay. And then are both the boys and the girls targeting the same age range?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes.
 
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
And then what do you define as age range now for Justice, because it seems like it's come down significantly since when it used to be Tween Brands many years ago?
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Many years ago I can't speak to, but since I've been tracking it, and since we merged about three years ago, it's really been that 7- to 12- year old.
 
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
And we'd like to extend it to 14, but really the sweet spot is 7-to-12.
 
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay. And then with your e-commerce growth at maurices, are you seeing sales in certain higher density zip codes that might encourage you to look at testing maurices stores in that type of geography?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
That's a really good question. And with catalogs, it's much easier to track the zip codes. With the orders, you can track zip codes, obviously, because your shipping the goods out, but the inquiries is a little harder to track. And that's something that we're certainly looking at, but if you think about it, Mark, just as a percent of sales, et cetera it's still relatively small, and we want to get a little more confidence under our belts that we can use that information to help inform us on our Business and our potential. So, it's a good call out, good thing to be looking at. We're not there yet. But ask us again in another year or two.
 
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay. Then just lastly regarding the move into the B-malls for dressbarn, and then the B and C-malls for Justice. Can you just give us an update on what are you seeing, you happy with it for both divisions? And just remind us when you started that again?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, first with dressbarn, we've been doing a couple for a season for a couple years. We've ramped that up this year. The results have been more or less on plan, although there's a little bit of aberration depending on the situation. So, we don't think we've quite nailed it yet, but we are encouraged enough that we are continuing to look for opportunities in more of these B, B minus malls.
 
And we just came back from ICSC, and had a good experience out there, good reception from the mall developers. So, I think you'll see that continue albeit on a slow, gradual pace. Justice, on the other hand, continues to open up stores rather aggressively in B and C malls. They are able to do very attractive rent deals, and we think that model has worked out extremely well, and we'll continue to open up stores in these markets. But as I say, we've opened up more and more, we've gained more experience, we have a better sense of what markets, what type of malls, what co-tenants, et cetera are working for us.
 
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay, that sounds great. Thank you.
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call 
 
 
Operator
 
Robin Murchison, SunTrust.
 
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Just back on Justice for a moment. So if I heard you right, so your comps were up a  versus last year, up 3%. Your operating margin was down a point, but your gross margin was up 20 basis points. So, if that's correct, and that's attributable to the incremental marketing spend?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes, primarily.
 
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Okay. All right, thank you, David. And then secondly, with regard to the accessories space, is there any  what do you think about that? Is there any opportunity to redirect the space, or is this just a cycle that you feel like we have to come through? How can we get that square footage more productive?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I've got to believe that much of the mistakes or the problems were self-inflicted. Certainly, as we've all listened to or read other results, other people are doing very well on accessories. So I don't think it's an industrywide problem. I think we can point at certain things that, at our brands, our three brands that we missed or that we may have bet on that didn't pan out. So, maybe accessories our not quite as important to our customer as they were a year or two ago, but I also think we didn't execute quite as well as we could have.
 
So we are not giving up and accessories. We are re-strategizing our Accessories business, and we feel very confident this is a great business for us, a great little niche to be in at all three of our Businesses. And longer-term, I would see growth at all three brands. Although this is definitely a bump in the road, we're going to continue to focus on this area, both because we like the margins and we like it as an add-on to increase UBTs to be able to dress that customer from head to toe.
 
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Thanks, and one more if I can. Are you pretty satisfied with the move from  the move away from Ethel. I think at the beginning of fiscal next year, you're going to be largely moved away from merchandise that appeals to her and more into your younger format, if you will? Can you comment?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
What Robin is referring to is our dressbarn target customers. And I would go so far to say that even this season, Robin, we are essentially Ethel-less, and while we miss her, we think that we are doing very well by focusing on a younger, more updated customer. We think the results show that. And we're going to continue to refine our offerings, and are developing our team, as we've talked about before, our merchandising team, to have a more fashion-oriented viewpoint to provide a better assortment for that customer, that fortysomething attitude customer.
 
 
Robin Murchison
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Thanks. Good luck, guys.
 
 
Operator
 
Steve Marotta, CL King & Associates.
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call 
 
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
Quick question regarding dressbarn, can you talk a little bit about tactics to capitalize on the dislocation that's going on currently in the mid-tier channel? I got to imagine with the problems at JCPenney and Kohl's, how are you trying to capture that? Is it a little bit of increased marketing, increased micro-marketing? Can you talk a little bit about those strategies?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Clearly, there is something going on with our customer. And I think if you just look at our results at dressbarn in the last nine months, I think it shows that we are taking market share. And the way we're doing it is not by putting huge signs in the window saying, 50% off. Rather, it's showing great merchandise, and having a more focused assortment and point of view to that customer. So, I think we're going to continue going down that road, refining our customer lists so that we can speak to our existing customer. Trying to do more compelling windows, whether it's a promotion or fashion window that will attract more passersby.
 
We've ramped up our loyalty program. As I mentioned earlier, we've gone to an electronic version of that just about six months ago and had very good success with that. So, I think all these things add up. And when that customer is out there, unhappy with what she's seeing at a JCPenney or a Kohl's, they're our two biggest competitors. So, we think that some of those customers are going to wander in our stores, and I think we're going to continue to take share from them, given this strategy that we've embarked upon.
 
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
That's great. Thank you. And, Armand, could you refresh my memory of investments that were currently completed in the third quarter this year, and maybe the ones that are targeted for the next 12 months or so?
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
From a strategic initiative standpoint?
 
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
Correct. Thank you, yes.
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
So, the ones we've got going on right now is we've got the one that, obviously, I'm very closely involved with is our financial consolidation project. We were hoping to get that, obviously, completed by the end of the fiscal year and into the beginning of the next. It's been delayed maybe a couple of months. It looks like it's going to be a completion date of probably sometime end of September into October. So, we're kind of at the tail end of that, and that's going along pretty well. Just a couple of delays, but we want to make sure everything is set before we get this thing implemented across all three brands.
 
And obviously, with the Charming Shoppes pending acquisition, we would then look to roll that out to Charming. The other projects that are now ongoing are kind of a consolidation of our customer relationship management databases through one particular vendor. That's going on and that's probably going to be probably another several months to a year.
 
Then we've also got a TradeStone, which is a sourcing strategic initiative where we basically just bring everything together in an automated basis, much more efficient. That one looks like  and obviously all three brands ultimately, and we'll be able to utilize it. That looks like it's going to be another year to a year and a half away before it gets fully implemented across all three brands. David, have I missed any?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Those were the key ones.
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call 
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Those were the key ones, Steve.
 
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst
 
Terrific. Thank you very much, guys.
 
 
Operator
 
Janine Stitcher, Telsey Advisors.
 
 
Janine Stitcher
- Telsey Advisors - Analyst
 
I was hoping you could talk a little bit about the special occasion category. I think you mentioned it was weak at dressbarn. It seems like there could be a big opportunity there to improve the holiday period and the profitability there for dressbarn. So, any tweaks you're making to that category in addition to accessories that you've kind of already touched on a bit?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes, that was a disappointment. And we've had good success in that category. And not a lot of choices that woman has outside department stores for special occasion. So I can't tell you if it was just a slowdown in the consumer or we missed a few trends, but certainly it's an area that we continue to focus on because it is a little bit of a specialty niche for us at dressbarn. And we'll be testing a lot of different things and we've got some great merchants in that area. So, I'm not concerned that we'll be back in a big way for holiday.
 
 
Janine Stitcher
- Telsey Advisors - Analyst
 
Great. And then just on SG&A, can you just give us what the leverage point  how we should think about SG&A leveraging? It seems like it's moved a little bit higher than the historical level of around 3%?
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Yes, you're right, Jean, it has. And again, it gets a little clouded because of some of these ongoing strategic initiatives that are going on and kind of the tail end of some of these initiatives as they continue to add a little cost. I would say that it's probably more like 3.5% at this stage.
 
 
Janine Stitcher
- Telsey Advisors - Analyst
 
Okay, great.
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Obviously our goal is to get back down to 3% as we get into our shared service concept, consolidating and looking at where we have efficiencies, where we can consolidate redundant functions and that's certainly a goal that we have.
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
 
Operator
 
Alex Fuhrman, Piper Jaffray.
 
 
Alex Fuhrman
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
Just a couple of quick ones here. Curious with the Brothers rollout. Obviously, it's just a test but curious to what you're seeing in the competitive landscape. There's not really a whole lot else in the specialty channel targeting that demographic. Where do you think the Justice mom is currently shopping for her sons?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, first, let's talk about the direct competition. It was two people, PS by Aeropostale out and 77kids, and we all saw the announcement about 77kids. So, even though they only had 20 stores, that's one less potential competitor, clearly. PS from what we've seen seems to be going a little bit younger than  maybe overlapping with the 7- to- 12 category, but it seems to be focusing a little bit of a younger customer, as well. And then she is going to all the normal places that a mom shops for her boys. The big boxes, whether it's Wal-Mart and Target or the Old Navys of the world.
 
So, we think the specialty store experience with a more finely tuned assortment is going to be a successful with this, with this mom. And we've got value prices, so great prices that I think will resonate. So, that's why it's a test, but we feel pretty good about it and we'll have a lot more to say after the initial rollout for back-to-school on our September call.
 
 
Alex Fuhrman
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
Okay. And then switching gears to maurices, the 3% increase in conversion, I think you mentioned during the Q&A that the response was pretty strong as you start to get more colored bottoms deliveries during the quarter. Was that 3% increase in conversion fairly consistent throughout the quarter? Or was that really when it started to pick up, when those deliveries came in?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We're seeing if we got that information by month in front of us. Alex, you might have to call us back on that.
 
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Sure. I can do it offline, Alex, if you can give me a call.
 
 
Alex Fuhrman
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
That's not a problem. Thanks a lot, guys, and good luck.
 
 
Operator
 
Scott Krasik, BB&T Capital Markets.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Just a follow-, actually, on the acquisition. In the offering documents, David, it indicated that you had specifically asked the Charming Shoppes board not to sell Fashion Bug. Just wondering what the thinking was around that?
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I think whenever you sell a division, you don't  the way it was going, you don't know as an outsider whether or not they were making the right decision or they were getting the right price. And so the way we viewed it is, let's do a deeper dive and understand the business better, which we've been doing. Let's take some time and look a little bit more thoughtfully at our alternatives, which we've been doing. And, I think we'll be in good shape to have an announcement out, assuming we close as expected on June 14, the next morning we will have an announcement that will talk about what we think  what are plans will be.
 
 
Operator
 
Janet Clay, Liberty Mutual.
 
 
Janet Clay
- Liberty Mutual - Analyst
 
I just have two more questions on the Brothers concept. What kind of upfront costs are you looking at in terms of doing this target test?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I'm sorry, I missed the first part. What kind of what are we looking for?
 
 
Janet Clay
- Liberty Mutual - Analyst
 
What kind of costs will this test run for the Brothers concept, the 10 stores within a store?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, the cost you have are for inventory and for the build-out of the space. And so it's kind of a couple million dollars, but I won't say it's insignificant, but in the scheme of things, we think it's a pretty reasonable cost to try this test. Even if it doesn't work at all, it's a minimal write-off.
 
 
Janet Clay
- Liberty Mutual - Analyst
 
And then  I have to admit I do shop at Justice with my 8-year-old 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Oh, good.
 
 
Janet Clay
- Liberty Mutual - Analyst
 
 who absolutely loves your store.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thank you. I'm happy to hear that.
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call 
 
 
Janet Clay
- Liberty Mutual  Analyst
 
So, the thing I was wondering about when you're talking about the mom shopping for her boy, because I have also a son who is 12, do the moms usually  do you think more moms going to Justice by themselves while they're shopping, because I've only ever gone with my daughter. So I'm just curious, do you have a lot of moms that just come in by themselves?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I think  I can't give you the specifics, but certainly anecdotally, and we can get you more detail from our team, that it is a mom and daughter experience. But a lot of times mom will go back and pick up some things during the day when it's not as hectic and she doesn't have to deal with her daughter dragging her to buy this and buy that. And so, I think that is even more the case with the, because we all know that the boys are not shoppers and don't necessarily want to be in the store. But to the point earlier, if they are in the store, you can kind of park them in the Brothers area, and they can watch the TV, or hang out there while you're shopping with the girl.
 
 
Janet Clay
- Liberty Mutual - Analyst
 
Okay. All right, it will be interesting to check it out. Or any of those test stores going to be in the Boston area?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
You know what, call us back and we'll get the list. I can't think of a Boston area store, but there may be one I'm not aware of.
 
 
Janet Clay
- Liberty Mutual - Analyst
 
All right, thank you.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
So, I'll ask our team to get the list. Maybe even if you travel somewhere, we'll give you the list so you can go look at them.
 
 
Janet Clay
- Liberty Mutual - Analyst
 
Great. Thanks a lot.
 
 
Operator
 
At this time I'm showing no further questions in queue. I would like to turn the call back over to Mr. David Jaffe for any closing remarks.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thank you very much, everyone, for your interest. And we look forward to speaking to you again at the September fiscal year end 2012 call. Everybody have a good summer. Thank you.
 
 
Operator
 
Ladies and gentlemen, that concludes today's conference. We thank you for your participation. You may now disconnect. Have a great day.
 
 
 
MAY 31, 2012 / 08:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q3 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120615143852.txt.gz
TIME:20120615143852
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On June 14, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the "Company") (i) and certain of its domestic subsidiaries entered into an amendment and restatement agreement (the "Amendment and Restatement Agreement") to amend and restate the Company's existing revolving credit agreement dated as of November 25, 2009, as amended and restated as of January 3, 2011 (the "Existing Credit Agreement" and as amended and restated by the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, the "ABL Credit Agreement") with the lenders thereunder and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent; Bank of America, N.A, as syndication agent; U.S. Bank National Association, as documentation agent; and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, as joint lead arrangers and joint bookrunners; and (ii) entered into a term credit agreement (the "Term Credit Agreement" and together with the ABL Credit Agreement, the "Credit Agreements") among the lenders thereunder and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
The Amendment and Restatement Agreement amended and restated the Existing Credit Agreement, which was a $200 million five-year credit facility. The Existing Credit Agreement was scheduled to expire on January 3, 2016, but has now been amended to terminate in five years on June 14, 2017. The ABL Credit Agreement also provides a senior secured revolving credit facility up to $250 million with an optional increase of up to $50 million. The revolving credit facility may be used for the issuance of letters of credit, to fund working capital requirements and capital expenditures, and for general corporate purposes. The ABL Credit Agreement includes a $175 million letter of credit sublimit, of which $40 million can be used for standby letters of credit, and a $25 million swing loan sublimit. The interest rates, pricing and fees under the ABL Credit Agreement fluctuate based on excess availability, as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement. As of June 14, 2012, there is $25 million in borrowings outstanding under the ABL Credit Agreement. Letters of credit that were outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement will be treated as letters of credit under the ABL Credit Agreement for the same amount.
The Term Credit Agreement provides a senior secured term credit facility for $300 million with an incremental facility of up to $100 million and matures in six years. The interest rates under the Term Credit Agreement fluctuate based on the total leverage ratio, as defined in the Term Credit Agreement.
The Term Credit Agreement was used to finance in part the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation, and the payment of fees and expenses.
The Credit Agreements contain customary representations, warranties, and affirmative covenants. The Credit Agreements also contain customary negative covenants, subject to negotiated exceptions on (i) liens, (ii) investments, (iii) indebtedness, (iv) significant corporate changes, including mergers and acquisitions, (v) dispositions, (vi) restricted payments and certain other restrictive agreements. The Credit Agreements also contain customary events of default, such as payment defaults, cross-defaults to other material indebtedness, bankruptcy and insolvency, the occurrence of a defined change in control, or the failure to observe the negative covenants and other covenants related to the operation of the Company's business.
The Company's obligations under the Credit Agreements are guaranteed by certain of its domestic subsidiaries (the "Subsidiary Guarantors"). As collateral security under the Credit Agreements and the guarantees thereof, the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors have granted to each administrative agent, for the benefit of the lenders, a lien on substantially all of their tangible and intangible assets, including, without limitation, certain domestic inventory and certain material real estate.
The above description of the Credit Agreements is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the actual terms of the Credit Agreements, copies of which are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and Exhibit 99.2.
Item 2.03  Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The information required by this Item is included in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
EXECUTION VERSION
AMENDMENT AND RESTATEMENT AGREEMENT dated as of June 14, 2012 (this ""), to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of November 25, 2009, as heretofore amended and restated as of January 3, 2011 (the ""), among ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the other LOAN PARTIES hereto, the LENDERS party hereto, the ISSUING BANKS party hereto and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent and the Swingline Lender.
Agreement
Existing Credit Agreement
Company
The Company has requested certain amendments to the Existing Credit Agreement, and the Lenders party hereto (which constitute all the Lenders party to the Existing Credit Agreement), the Issuing Banks party hereto (which constitute all the Issuing Banks party to the Existing Credit Agreement), the Swingline Lender and the Administrative Agent are willing to agree to such amendments on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein.
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein contained and other good and valuable consideration, the sufficiency and receipt of which are hereby acknowledged, and intending to be legally bound, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1. . (a) As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms
"" means the representations and warranties made by the Acquired Company in the Acquisition Agreement, but only to the extent that the Company or Merger Sub have the right under the Acquisition Agreement not to consummate the Tender Offer or the Merger as a result of such representations and warranties in the Acquisition Agreement being inaccurate.
Acquired Company Acquisition Agreement Representations
"" means the Amended and Restated Commitment Letter dated May 11, 2012, among JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Bank of America, N.A, Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and the Company.
Commitment Letter
"" means the representations and warranties set forth in Section 3.01, 3.02(a), 3.03(b), 3.03(c), 3.08, 3.14, 3.15 and 3.16 of the Restated Credit Agreement.
Specified Representations
(b) Except as expressly specified otherwise, terms defined in the Restated Credit Agreement used but not otherwise defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Restated Credit Agreement.
SECTION 2. . Effective as of the Second Restatement Effective Date (as defined below), (a) the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated to be in the form attached as Exhibit A (the Existing Credit Agreement, as so amended and restated, being
Amendment and Restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement
referred to as the "") and (b) the Schedules and Exhibits to the Existing Credit Agreement are hereby replaced with the Schedules and Exhibits attached to the Restated Credit Agreement.
Restated Credit Agreement
SECTION 3. . The Loan Parties represent and warrant to each other party hereto that:
Representations and Warranties
(a) this Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each Loan Party and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Loan Party, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law;
(b) the representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in the Restated Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents are true and correct on and as of the Second Restatement Effective Date; and
(c) as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
SECTION 4. . The amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement and the Schedules and Exhibits thereto as set forth in Section 2 hereof shall become effective on the first date (the "") on which the following conditions shall have been satisfied:
Effectiveness
Second Restatement Effective Date
(a) The Administrative Agent shall have executed a counterpart hereto and shall have received from the Company and each Designated Subsidiary (including, subject to the final paragraph of this Section, the Acquired Company and such of its subsidiaries as constitute Designated Subsidiaries), each Lender, each Issuing Bank and the Swingline Lender either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include a facsimile transmission) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement.
(b) The Administrative Agent shall have executed a counterpart to the Restated Security Agreement and shall have received from the Company and each Designated Subsidiary (including, subject to the final paragraph of this Section, the Acquired Company and such of its subsidiaries as constitute Designated Subsidiaries), either (i) a counterpart of the Restated Security Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include a facsimile transmission) that such party has signed a counterpart of the Restated Security Agreement.
(c) The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks and dated the Second Restatement Effective Date) of (i) Proskauer Rose LLP, New York counsel for the Loan Parties, (ii) Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, counsel for the Acquired Company and California and Pennsylvania counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, (iii)
 
Day Pitney LLP, Connecticut counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, (iv) Baker Donelson, Bearman, Caldwell & Berkowitz, PC, Tennessee counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, (v) Harrison & Moberly, LLP, Indiana counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, (vi) Willcox & Savage PC, Virginia counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, (vii) Thompson Hine LLP, Ohio counsel to certain of the Loan Parties and (viii) Greenberg Traurig LLP, Nevada counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, in each case in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
(d) The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of each Loan Party, the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
(e) The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, dated the Second Restatement Effective Date and signed by the chief financial officer of the Company, certifying satisfaction of the conditions set forth in paragraph (i), the first sentence of paragraph (j), the first sentence of paragraph (l) and paragraph (n).
(f) The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, dated the Second Restatement Effective Date and signed by the chief financial officer of the Company, as to the solvency of the Loan Parties on a consolidated basis after giving effect to the Transactions, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
(g) The Administrative Agent shall have received, with respect to the Acquisition, a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company required to be delivered pursuant to Section 6.04(h) of the Restated Credit Agreement.
(h) The Administrative Agent shall have received a completed Borrowing Base Certificate, which shall be dated the Second Restatement Effective Date and signed by a Financial Officer of the Company and shall set forth information required therein as of April 28, 2012, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to the Acquisition, together with supporting information and any additional reports with respect to the Borrowing Base that the Administrative Agent may reasonably request.
(i) The representations and warranties set forth in Section 3 hereof shall be true and correct in all material respects as of the Second Restatement Effective Date.
(j) The Collateral and Guarantee Requirement shall have been satisfied (subject to the final paragraph of this Section). The Administrative Agent shall have received a completed Perfection Certificate, in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, dated the Second Restatement Effective Date and signed by an executive officer or a Financial Officer of each of the Company and the Acquired Company, together with all attachments contemplated thereby, including the results of a search of the Uniform Commercial Code (or equivalent) filings made with respect to the
 
Loan Parties in the jurisdictions contemplated by the Perfection Certificate and copies of the financing statements (or similar documents) disclosed by such search and evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent that the Liens indicated by such financing statements (or similar documents) are permitted under Section 6.02 of the Restated Credit Agreement or have been, or substantially contemporaneously with the occurrence of the Second Restatement Effective Date will be, released.
(k) The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence that the insurance required by Section 5.07 of the Restated Credit Agreement is in effect, together with endorsements naming the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lender Parties, as additional insured and loss payee thereunder to the extent required under Section 5.07 of the Restated Credit Agreement and Section 4.10 of the Restated Security Agreement.
(l) The Acquisition shall have been consummated, or substantially concurrently with the Second Restatement Effective Date shall be consummated, pursuant to and on the terms set forth in the Acquisition Agreement (and the Acquired Company shall have become, or substantially concurrently with the Second Restatement Effective Date shall become, a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Company), and all conditions precedent to the consummation of the Offer (as defined in the Acquisition Agreement as in effect on the original date thereof) and the Merger (as defined in the Acquisition Agreement as in effect on the original date thereof) shall have been satisfied, in each case without giving effect to any amendments, waivers or consents that are adverse in any material respect to the Loan Parties that have not been approved by the Arrangers. The Administrative Agent shall have received a copy of the Acquisition Agreement, certified by a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Company as being complete and correct and as enclosing all closing certificates, opinions and other closing documents delivered in satisfaction of the closing conditions set forth in the Acquisition Agreement.
(m) All principal, premium, if any, interest, fees and other amounts due or outstanding under the Existing Acquired Company Credit Agreement shall have been paid in full, or substantially concurrently with the Second Restatement Effective Date shall be paid in full, the commitments and letters of credit outstanding thereunder shall have been terminated, or substantially concurrently with the Second Restatement Effective Date shall be terminated or backstopped by Letters of Credit, and all Guarantees and Liens existing in connection therewith shall have been discharged and released, or substantially concurrently with the Second Restatement Effective Date shall be released, and the Administrative Agent shall have received reasonably satisfactory evidence thereof.
(n) After giving effect to the Acquisition and the other Transactions, Availability shall be not less than $50,000,000.
(o) The Lenders shall have received projections for the Company and the Subsidiaries through end of the sixth fiscal year of the Company after the Second Restatement Effective Date.
 
(p) The Lenders shall have received the financial statements, opinions and certificates referred to in Section 3.04.
(q) The Administrative Agent and the Arrangers shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable to the Administrative Agent and the Arrangers on or prior to the Second Restatement Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement of all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses (including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel) required to be reimbursed by the Company under the Commitment Letter, the Existing Credit Agreement, the Restated Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, as applicable.
(r) The Administrative Agent shall have received all documentation and other information required by bank regulatory authorities under applicable "know your customer" and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the Patriot Act, at least five Business Days prior to the Second Restatement Effective Date.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in clause (i) above, the only representations and warranties relating to the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries the making of which shall be a condition to the effectiveness of the amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement and the Schedules and Exhibits thereto as provided herein shall be the Acquired Company Acquisition Agreement Representations and the Specified Representations. Notwithstanding the foregoing conditions, solely with respect to the matters expressly identified in the Post-Closing Letter Agreement, the satisfaction of the foregoing conditions shall not be required on the Second Restatement Effective Date, and shall not be a condition to the effectiveness of the amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement and the Schedules and Exhibits thereto as provided herein, but shall be required to be accomplished in accordance with the Post-Closing Letter Agreement.
SECTION 5. . Each of the Loan Parties party to the Existing Credit Agreement hereby acknowledges that it expects to receive substantial direct and indirect benefits as a result of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby. Each such Loan Party hereby consents to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, and hereby (a) reaffirms and confirms its guarantees, pledges, grants of security interests and other obligations, as applicable, under the Loan Guarantee and each Collateral Document to which it is party, (b) affirms and confirms its obligations to indemnify and other commitments and obligations under the Loan Documents to which it is a party, as applicable, and (c) agrees that, notwithstanding the effectiveness of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby, (i) the Loan Guarantee and each Collateral Document to which it is a party shall continue to be in full force and effect and (ii) all guarantees, pledges, grants and other obligations thereunder shall continue to be in full force and effect and shall accrue to the benefit of the Lender Parties. Each such Loan Party hereby confirms and agrees that obligations under the Restated Credit Agreement and the Restated Security Agreement constitute "Obligations" and "Secured Obligations" (or words of similar import) under and as used in the Loan Guarantee or any Collateral Document to which it is a party.
Reaffirmation
 
SECTION 6. . (a) The Acquired Company and each of its subsidiaries that is a Designated Subsidiary (each of the Acquired Company and each such subsidiary, a "") shall, by its execution of this Agreement, be deemed to be a Loan Party under the Restated Credit Agreement and a Loan Guarantor for all purposes of the Restated Credit Agreement and shall have all of the obligations of a Loan Party and a Loan Guarantor thereunder, in each case as if had executed and delivered the Existing Credit Agreement or the Restated Credit Agreement. Each New Subsidiary hereby agrees to be bound by all of the terms, provisions and conditions contained in the Restated Credit Agreement, including all the guaranty obligations set forth in Article X of the Restated Credit Agreement.
New Loan Parties and Loan Guarantors
New Subsidiary
(b) Without limiting the generality of Section 6(a), each New Subsidiary hereby guarantees, jointly and severally with the other Loan Guarantors, to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the other Lender Parties, as provided in Article X of the Restated Credit Agreement (and subject to the limitations set forth in Section 10.10 of the Restated Credit Agreement), the prompt payment and performance of the Guaranteed Obligations in full when due (whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise) strictly in accordance with the terms thereof and agrees that if any of the Guaranteed Obligations are not paid or performed in full when due (whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise), each New Subsidiary will, jointly and severally together with the other Loan Guarantors, promptly pay and perform the same, without any demand or notice whatsoever, and that in the case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, the same will be promptly paid in full when due (whether at extended maturity, by acceleration or otherwise) in accordance with the terms of such extension or renewal. Each New Subsidiary hereby waives acceptance by the Administrative Agent and the Lender Parties of the guaranty by the New Subsidiary upon the execution of this Agreement by the New Subsidiary.
SECTION 7. . (a) Except as expressly set forth herein, this Agreement shall not by implication or otherwise limit, impair, constitute a waiver of, or otherwise affect the rights and remedies of the Lender Parties under the Existing Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, and shall not alter, modify, amend or in any way affect any of the terms, conditions, obligations, covenants or agreements contained in the Existing Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, all of which shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with the provisions thereof (it being understood and agreed that all interest and fees accruing under the Existing Credit Agreement in respect of periods prior to the Second Restatement Effective Date will accrue at the rates specified in the Existing Credit Agreement prior to it being amended and restated to be in the form of the Restated Credit Agreement and shall be payable at the next interest or fee payment date provided in the Restated Credit Agreement). Nothing herein shall be deemed to entitle any Loan Party to a consent to, or a waiver, amendment, modification or other change of, any of the terms, conditions, obligations, covenants or agreements contained in the Existing Credit Agreement, the Restated Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document in similar or different circumstances.
Effect of Amendment and Restatement; No Novation
 
(b) On and after the Second Restatement Effective Date, each reference in the Restated Credit Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereunder", "hereof", "herein", or words of like import, as used in the Restated Credit Agreement, shall refer to the Existing Credit Agreement as amended and restated in the form of the Restated Credit Agreement, and the term "Credit Agreement", as used in any Loan Document, shall mean the Restated Credit Agreement. On and after the Second Restatement Effective Date, each reference in the Restated Security Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereunder", "hereof", "herein", or words of like import, as used in the Restated Security Agreement, shall refer to the Restated Security Agreement (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) as amended and restated in the form of the Restated Security Agreement, and the term "Restated Security Agreement", as used in any Loan Document, shall mean the Restated Security Agreement.
(c) This Agreement shall constitute a "Loan Document" for all purposes of the Restated Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
(d) Neither this Agreement nor the effectiveness of the Restated Credit Agreement shall extinguish the obligations for the payment of money outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement or discharge or release any Guarantee thereof. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as a substitution or novation of the Obligations outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement or the Collateral Documents, which shall remain in full force and effect, except as modified hereby. Nothing expressed or implied in this Agreement, the Restated Credit Agreement or any other document contemplated hereby or thereby shall be construed as a release or other discharge of any Loan Party under any Loan Document (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) from any of its obligations and liabilities thereunder.
SECTION 8. . THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BUT GIVING EFFECT TO FEDERAL LAWS APPLICABLE TO NATIONAL BANKS.
Applicable Law
SECTION 9. . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which when so executed and delivered shall be deemed an original, but all of which taken together shall constitute a single contract. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile transmission or other electronic imaging (such as a pdf') shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart hereof.
Counterparts
SECTION 10. . Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability
 
SECTION 11. . Section headings used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and are not to affect the construction of, or to be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the date set forth above.
 
 
Eric Specter on behalf of each entity in the capacity shown:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(Colin D. Stern on behalf of each entity in the capacity shown)
 
EXHIBIT A
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012, among ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC., the BORROWING SUBSIDIARIES party hereto, the other LOAN PARTIES party hereto, the LENDERS party hereto and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
The Borrowers (such term and each other capitalized term used herein having the meaning assigned to it in Article I of this Agreement), the other Loan Parties, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent are parties to the Existing Credit Agreement, and have agreed to amend and restate such Agreement to provide for, among other things, (a) certain amendments hereto relating to the Acquisition, (b) an increase in total Revolving Commitments of $50,000,000, (c) the extension of the maturity of the credit facility established thereby, (d) certain amendments hereto relating to the incurrence of Permitted Term Indebtedness and (e) certain pricing and other amendments thereto, all as set forth herein.
Accordingly, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein contained and other good and valuable consideration, the sufficiency and receipt of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto have agreed pursuant to the Second Restatement Agreement that, as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, the Existing Credit Agreement shall be amended and restated to be in the form of this Agreement.
SECTION 1.01. As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms.
"" has the meaning set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement.
ABL Priority Collateral
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, bears interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
"" has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Account
"" means any Person obligated on an Account.
Account Debtor
"" means Charming Shoppes, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation.
Acquired Company
"" means the 1.125% Senior Convertible Notes due 2014 of the Acquired Company outstanding as of the Second Restatement Effective Date.
Acquired Company Convertible Notes
"" means the Acquisition Tender Offer and the Merger, collectively.
Acquisition
"" means the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of May 1, 2012, among the Company, Merger Sub and the Acquired Company, together with the exhibits thereto and the related disclosure letter.
Acquisition Agreement
"" means the offer to purchase for cash all the outstanding shares of common stock in the Acquired Company commenced by Merger Sub pursuant to the Acquisition Agreement.
Acquisition Tender Offer
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
"" means JPMCB, in its capacity as administrative agent hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Article VIII.
Administrative Agent
"" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly or indirectly Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
"" means this Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, as modified, amended or restated from time to time.
Agreement
"" means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus
Alternate Base Rate
 1
/
2
of 1% per annum and (c) the Adjusted LIBO Rate on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) for a deposit in dollars with a maturity of one month plus 1% per annum. For purposes of clause (c) above, the Adjusted LIBO Rate on any day shall be based on the rate per annum appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or on any successor or substitute screen provided by Reuters, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such screen, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, on such day (without any rounding) for deposits in dollars with a maturity of one month. Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate, respectively
 
"" means, with respect to any Lender, a percentage equal to a fraction the numerator of which is such Lender's Revolving Commitment and the denominator of which is the total Revolving Commitments of all the Lenders (if the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Revolving Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments at or prior to the time of determination); that for purposes of Section 2.20 when a Defaulting Lender shall exist, any such Defaulting Lender's Revolving Commitment shall be disregarded in the calculation.
Applicable Percentage
provided
"" means, for any day, with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Revolving Loan or the participation fee for any Standby Letter of Credit or Commercial Letter of Credit, as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth in the table below under the caption "ABR Spread", "Eurodollar Spread", "Standby Letter of Credit Fee" or "Commercial Letter of Credit Fee", as the case may be, based upon Average Availability for the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Company:
Applicable Rate
 
For purposes of the foregoing, the Applicable Rate shall be determined (a) from and after the Second Restatement Effective Date and until any change thereto pursuant to clause (b) below, by reference to Category 3 in the table above and (b) as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the Company ended on or after October 27, 2012, based upon the Borrowing Base Certificate that is delivered from time to time pursuant to Section 5.01(h) as of the last day of such fiscal quarter, with any changes to the Applicable Rate resulting from a change in Average Availability to be effective on the first day of the first month following delivery of such Borrowing Base Certificate. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this definition, if the Borrowers shall fail to deliver any Borrowing Base Certificate as of the last day of any fiscal quarter of the Company by the time required under Section 5.01(h), then the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to Category 3 in the table above from and including the day next following the date on which such Borrowing Base Certificate shall have been due to but excluding the sixth day after the date on which such Borrowing Base Certificate shall have been delivered.
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.10.
Applicable Share
 
"" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in commercial loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its activities and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
"" means J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, in their capacities as joint bookrunners and joint lead arrangers for the credit facility established hereby.
Arrangers
"" means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an Eligible Assignee, with the consent of any Person whose consent is required by Section 9.04, and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of Exhibit A or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
"" means, at any time, an amount equal to (a) the lesser of (i) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (ii) the Borrowing Base then in effect (b) the total Credit Exposure of all Lenders at such time.
Availability
minus
"" means the period from and including the Original Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments.
Availability Period
"" means, with respect to any fiscal quarter, (a) the sum of Availability for each day during such fiscal quarter divided by (b) the number of days in such fiscal quarter.
Average Availability
"" means each and any of the following bank services provided to any Loan Party by any Lender or any of its Affiliates: (a) credit cards for commercial customers (including, without limitation, "commercial credit cards" and purchasing cards), (b) stored value cards and (c) treasury management services (including, without limitation, controlled disbursement, automated clearinghouse transactions, return items, overdrafts and interstate depository network services).
Banking Services
"" means any and all obligations of the Loan Parties, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor), in connection with Banking Services.
Banking Services Obligations
"" mean all Reserves that the Administrative Agent from time to time establishes in its Permitted Discretion for Banking Services then provided or Banking Services Obligations then outstanding.
Banking Services Reserves
"" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board of Governors
"" means Bank of America, N.A., a national banking association, in its individual capacity, and its successors.
BofA
 
"" means the Company, in its capacity as contractual representative of the Borrowers pursuant to Article XI.
Borrower Representative
"" means the Company and the Borrowing Subsidiaries, collectively.
Borrowers
"" means (a) Revolving Loans of the same Type made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect, (b) a Swingline Loan, (c) a Protective Advance or (d) an Overadvance.
Borrowing
"" means, at any time (subject to modification as provided below), an amount equal to the sum of (a) 90% of the Loan Parties' Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable at such time, (b) 90% the Net Orderly Liquidation Value percentage identified in the most recent inventory appraisal ordered by the Administrative Agent the Loan Parties' Eligible Inventory, valued at the lower of cost, determined on a first-in-first-out basis, or market value, (c) Reserves. The Administrative Agent may, in its Permitted Discretion and with not fewer than four Business Days' prior written notice to the Borrower Representative, reduce the advance rates set forth above, adjust Reserves or reduce one or more of the other elements used in computing the Borrowing Base. Subject to the immediately preceding sentence and the other provisions hereof expressly permitting the Administrative Agent to adjust the Borrowing Base, the Borrowing Base at any time shall be determined by reference to the most recent Borrowing Base Certificate delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 4.02(c) or 5.01(h) (or, prior to the first such delivery, delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 4(h) of the Second Restatement Agreement); that if any Borrowing Base Certificate delivered under Section 4.02(c) or 5.01(h) (or under Section 4(h) of the Second Restatement Agreement) shall prove to have been materially inaccurate (regardless of whether any Revolving Commitments are in effect or any amounts are outstanding hereunder when such inaccuracy is discovered), and such inaccuracy shall have resulted in the payment of any interest or fees at rates lower than those that were in fact applicable for any period (based on the actual Borrowing Base), the applicable Borrowers shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for distribution to the Lenders (or former Lenders) as their interests may appear, the accrued interest or fees that should have been paid but were not paid as a result of such inaccuracy.
Borrowing Base
plus
multiplied by
multiplied by
minus
provided
"" means a certificate, signed and certified as accurate and complete by a Financial Officer of the Borrower Representative, in substantially the form of Exhibit B (with such changes thereto as may be required by the Administrative Agent from time to time to reflect the components of and reserves against the Borrowing Base as provided for hereunder) or another form that is acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion.
Borrowing Base Certificate
"" means the last day of each fiscal quarter of the Company; that (a) if on the last day of any fiscal month of the Company (i) any Revolving Loans shall be outstanding or (ii) the LC Exposure shall be
Borrowing Base Reporting Date
provided
 
$30,000,000 or more, then the last day of such fiscal month will also be a Borrowing Base Reporting Date and (b) during any Enhanced Reporting Period, the last day of each week will also be a Borrowing Base Reporting Date.
"" means a request by the Borrower Representative for a Revolving Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03, which shall be, in the case of any such written request, in the form of Exhibit C or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Borrowing Request
"" means, until such time as it ceases to be a Borrowing Subsidiary pursuant to Section 2.22, each of (a) The Dress Barn Inc., a Connecticut corporation, (b) Tween Brands, Inc., a Delaware corporation, (c) Maurices Incorporated, a Delaware corporation, (d) the Acquired Company, (e) Charming Shoppes of Delaware, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation, (f) CSI Industries, Inc., a Delaware corporation, (g) Catherines, Inc., a Delaware corporation, (h) Catherines Stores Corporation, a Tennessee corporation, (i) Lane Bryant, Inc., a Delaware corporation, (j) Lane Bryant Purchasing Corp., an Ohio corporation, (k) FB Apparel, Inc., an Indiana corporation, and (l) any other wholly owned Subsidiary designated as a Borrowing Subsidiary pursuant to Section 2.22.
Borrowing Subsidiary
"" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term "Business Day" shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
provided
"" means any Subsidiary that has been formed or is organized under the laws of Canada or any province or territory thereof.
Canadian Subsidiary
"" means, for any period, (a) the additions to property, plant and equipment and other capital expenditures of the Company and the Subsidiaries that are (or would be) set forth in a consolidated statement of cash flows of the Company for such period prepared in accordance with GAAP and (b) such portion of principal payments on Capital Lease Obligations or Synthetic Lease Obligations made by the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries during such period as is attributable to additions to property, plant and equipment that have not otherwise been reflected on the consolidated statement of cash flows as additions to property, plant and equipment for such period.
Capital Expenditures
"" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP; the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP, and the final maturity of such obligations shall be the date of the last payment of such amounts due under such lease (or other arrangement) prior to the first date on which such lease (or other arrangement) may be
Capital Lease Obligations
 
terminated by the lessee without payment of a premium or a penalty. For purposes of Section 6.02, a Capital Lease Obligation shall be deemed to be secured by a Lien on the property being leased and such property shall be deemed to be owned by the lessee.
"" means each Person that is a "controlled foreign corporation" within the meaning of Section 957(a) of the Code.
CFC
"" means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Exchange Act and the rules of the SEC thereunder as in effect on the Second Restatement Effective Date), other than the Permitted Investors, of Equity Interests representing more than 30% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in the Company and the percentage of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by Equity Interests in the Company owned by such Person or group then exceeds the percentage of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by Equity Interests in the Company owned by the Permitted Investors; (b) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of the Company by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the board of directors of the Company nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated; or (c) the occurrence of a "change of control" (or a similar event, however denominated) in any agreement or instrument governing Material Indebtedness.
Change in Control
"" means the occurrence, after the Second Restatement Effective Date, of any of the following: (a) the adoption or taking effect of any rule, regulation, treaty or other law, (b) any change in any rule, regulation, treaty or other law or in the administration, interpretation, implementation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority or (c) the making or issuance of any request, rule, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority; that, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a "Change in Law", regardless of the date enacted, adopted, promulgated or issued.
Change in Law
provided
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.16.
Charges
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Revolving Loans, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances.
Class
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
 
"" means any and all assets, whether real or personal, tangible or intangible, on which Liens are purported to be granted pursuant to the Collateral Documents as security for the Secured Obligations.
Collateral
"" has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Collateral Access Agreement
"" means, at any time, the requirement that:
Collateral and Guarantee Requirement
(a) the Administrative Agent shall have received from the Company and each Designated Subsidiary either (i) (A) a counterpart of this Agreement or a counterpart of the Second Restatement Agreement, in each case duly executed and delivered on behalf of such Person as a Loan Guarantor hereunder, and (B) a counterpart of the Restated Security Agreement, duly executed and delivered on behalf of such Person, or (ii) in the case of any Person that becomes a Designated Subsidiary after the Second Restatement Effective Date, (A) a Joinder Agreement, duly executed and delivered on behalf of such Person, and (B) instruments in the form or forms specified in the Restated Security Agreement under which such Person becomes a party to the Restated Security Agreement, duly executed and delivered on behalf of such Person, together with such documents and opinions with respect to such Designated Subsidiary as may reasonably be requested by the Administrative Agent;
(b) the Administrative Agent shall have received all such Collateral Access Agreements, Deposit Account Control Agreements and other Collateral Documents required to be provided to it under the Restated Security Agreement, duly executed by the parties thereto and evidence that all Credit Card Notifications required to be provided pursuant to Section 5.16 have been provided;
(c) all Equity Interests owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party shall have been pledged pursuant to, and to the extent required by, the Restated Security Agreement and, in the case of Equity Interests in any Foreign Subsidiary, where the Administrative Agent so requests in connection with the pledge of such Equity Interests, a Foreign Pledge Agreement ( that the Loan Parties shall not be required to pledge Equity Interests in Foreign Subsidiaries that are not Eligible Foreign Subsidiaries, and that the Loan Parties shall not be required to pledge more than 65% of the outstanding Equity Interests entitled to vote (within the meaning of Treas. Reg. Section 1.956-2(c)(2)) of any such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary), and the Administrative Agent shall, to the extent required by the Restated Security Agreement, have received certificates or other instruments representing all such certificated Equity Interests, together with undated stock powers or other instruments of transfer with respect thereto endorsed in blank;
provided
provided
further
 
(d) (i) all Indebtedness of the Company and any Subsidiary and (ii) all Indebtedness of any other Person in a principal amount of $5,000,000 or more that, in each case, is owing to any Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note and shall have been pledged pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement, and the Administrative Agent shall have received all such promissory notes, together with undated instruments of transfer with respect thereto endorsed in blank;
(e) all documents and instruments, including UCC financing statements, required by law or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to be filed, registered or recorded to perfect the Liens intended to be created by the Collateral Documents with the priority required by the Collateral Documents shall have been filed, registered or recorded or delivered to the Administrative Agent for filing, registration or recording;
(f) the Administrative Agent shall have received (i) counterparts of a Mortgage with respect to each Mortgaged Property duly executed and delivered by the record owner of such Mortgaged Property, (ii) a policy or policies of title insurance issued by a nationally recognized title insurance company insuring the Lien of each such Mortgage as a valid and enforceable Lien on the Mortgaged Property described therein, free of any other Liens except as permitted under Section 6.02, together with such endorsements, coinsurance and reinsurance as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request, (iii) if any Mortgaged Property is located in an area determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency to have special flood hazards, evidence of such flood insurance as may be required under applicable law, including Regulation H of the Board of Governors, and (iv) such surveys, abstracts, appraisals, legal opinions and other documents as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request with respect to any such Mortgage or Mortgaged Property; and
(g) each Loan Party shall have obtained all material consents and approvals required in connection with the execution and delivery of all Collateral Documents to which it is a party, the performance of its obligations thereunder and the granting by it of the Liens thereunder.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Designated Subsidiary formed or acquired after the Second Restatement Effective Date shall not be required to comply with the foregoing requirements prior to the time specified in Section 5.03. The foregoing definition shall not require the creation or perfection of pledges of or security interests in, or the obtaining of title insurance or, subject to the requirements of applicable law, flood insurance, legal opinions or other deliverables with respect to, particular assets of the Loan Parties, or the provision of Guarantees by any Subsidiary, if and for so long as the Administrative Agent, in consultation with the Company, determines that the cost of creating or perfecting such pledges or security interests in such assets, or obtaining such title insurance or flood insurance, legal opinions or other deliverables in respect of such assets, or providing such Guarantees, shall be excessive in view of the benefits to be obtained by the Lenders therefrom. The Administrative Agent may grant extensions of
 
time for the creation and perfection of security interests in (including delivery of promissory notes as required by clause (d) above) or the obtaining of title insurance or, subject to the requirements of applicable law, flood insurance, legal opinions or other deliverables with respect to particular assets or the provision of any Guarantee by any Subsidiary (including extensions beyond the Second Restatement Effective Date or in connection with assets acquired, or Subsidiaries formed or acquired, after the Second Restatement Effective Date) where it determines that such action cannot be accomplished without undue effort or expense by the time or times at which it would otherwise be required to be accomplished by this Agreement or the Collateral Documents.
"" means the Restated Security Agreement, each Collateral Access Agreement, each Credit Card Notification, each Deposit Account Control Agreement, each Mortgage, each Foreign Pledge Agreement, each IP Security Agreement and each other document granting a Lien upon any assets of any Loan Party as security for payment of the Secured Obligations.
Collateral Documents
"" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Commercial Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements relating to Commercial Letters of Credit that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrowers at such time. The Commercial LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Commercial LC Exposure at such time.
Commercial LC Exposure
"" means a Letter of Credit that is (a) designated as a Commercial Letter of Credit by the Borrower Representative at the time of, or prior to, the issuance thereof, (b) issued to provide for the payment of the purchase price for goods or services purchased by the Company or any Subsidiary and (c) intended to be drawn when such purchase price is due and payable and not merely upon the occurrence of a default or other contingency.
Commercial Letter of Credit
"" means, collectively, any written notice, demand, communication, information, document or other material provided by or on behalf of any Loan Party pursuant to any Loan Document or the transactions contemplated therein that is distributed to the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Bank by means of electronic communications pursuant to Section 9.01, including through the Platform.
Communications
"" means Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Company
"" means a Compliance Certificate in the form of Exhibit D or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Compliance Certificate
"" has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Concentration Account
"" means Other Connection Taxes that are imposed on or measured by net income (however denominated) or that are franchise Taxes or branch profits Taxes.
Connection Income Taxes
 
"" means, for any period, the excess of (a) the sum of (i) the cash interest expense (including (x) imputed interest expense in respect of Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations, (y) all commissions, discounts and other fees and charges owed with respect to letters of credit and bankers' acceptance financing and (z) net costs under Swap Agreements entered into to hedge interest rates to the extent such net costs are allocable to such period in accordance with GAAP) of the Company and the Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, (ii) any interest accrued during such period in respect of Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary that is required to be capitalized rather than included in consolidated interest expense for such period in accordance with GAAP, plus (iii) any cash payments made during such period in respect of obligations referred to in clause (b)(iii) below that were amortized or accrued in a previous period, (b) the sum of (i) interest income of the Company and the Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, (ii) to the extent included in such consolidated interest expense for such period, non-cash amounts attributable to amortization or write-off of capitalized interest or other financing costs paid in a previous period, plus (iii) to the extent included in such consolidated interest expense for such period, non-cash amounts attributable to accretion or amortization of debt discounts or accrued interest payable in kind for such period.
Consolidated Cash Interest Expense
minus
"" means, for any period, Consolidated Net Income for such period, (a) without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (i) consolidated interest expense for such period (including imputed interest expense in respect of Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations), (ii) consolidated income tax expense for such period, (iii) all amounts attributable to depreciation and amortization for such period, (iv) any non-cash extraordinary charges for such period, (v) any non-cash compensation charges, including charges arising from restricted stock and stock-option grants, for such period, (vi) any other non-cash charges (other than the write-down or write-off of current assets, any additions to bad debt reserve or bad debt expense or any accruals for estimated sales discounts, returns or allowances) for such period, (vii) any losses for such period attributable to early extinguishment of Indebtedness or obligations under any Swap Agreement, (viii) any fees and expenses for such period paid in connection with, and other non-recurring charges for such period relating to, the Acquisition, that such fees, expenses and non-recurring charges are incurred on or prior to January 26, 2014, (ix) charges for such period attributable to restructuring activities commenced by the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries prior to the Second Restatement Effective Date, that the aggregate amount added back pursuant to this clause (ix) may not exceed $25,000,000 in the aggregate for all periods (with not more than $10,000,000 thereof in the aggregate being for periods commencing after July 28, 2012), (x) severance charges for such period attributable to reorganization of certain operations of the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries, that the aggregate amount added back pursuant to this clause (x) may not exceed $5,000,000 in the aggregate for all periods, and (xi) charges for such period attributable to the sale, transfer or other disposition of, or cessation of the operation of, certain operations acquired as part of the Acquisition and consistent with the plan therefor previously communicated by the Company to the Administrative Agent, that the aggregate amount added back pursuant to this
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
provided
provided
provided
provided
 
clause (xi) may not exceed $50,000,000 in the aggregate for all periods, and (b) without duplication (i) to the extent not deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, all cash payments made during such period on account of non-cash charges that were or would have been added to Consolidated Net Income pursuant to clauses (a)(iv), (a)(v) or (a)(vi) above in such period or in a previous period and (ii) to the extent included in determining such Consolidated Net Income, (A) any extraordinary gains and all non-cash items of income (other than normal accruals in the ordinary course of business) for such period and (B) any gains for such period attributable to early extinguishment of Indebtedness or obligations under any Swap Agreement, all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that Consolidated EBITDA shall be calculated so as to exclude the effect of any gain or loss that represents after-tax gains or losses attributable to any sale, transfer or other disposition of assets by the Company or any Subsidiary, other than dispositions of inventory and other dispositions in the ordinary course of business.
minus
provided
"" means, for any period, Consolidated EBITDA for such period plus, without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated EBITDA, Consolidated Rental Expense for such period, all as determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated EBITDAR
"" means, for any period, the sum, without duplication, of (a) Consolidated Cash Interest Expense for such period, (b) Consolidated Rental Expense for such period, (c) mandatory principal prepayments and scheduled principal payments on, and cash payments upon the conversion of, Indebtedness made during such period (other than redemptions of the Acquired Company Convertible Notes required to be made by the Acquired Company as a result of the Acquisition), (d) expense for income taxes paid in cash during such period, (e) Restricted Payments paid in cash during such period, (f) the aggregate amount of principal payments on Capital Lease Obligations during such period and (g) mandatory cash contributions to any Plan or Multiemployer Plan during such period, all calculated for the Company and the Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
Consolidated Fixed Charges
"" means, for any period, the net income or loss of the Company and the Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that there shall be excluded (a) the income of any Person (other than the Company) that is not a Subsidiary except to the extent of the amount of cash dividends or similar cash distributions actually paid by such Person to the Company or, subject to clauses (b) and (c) below, any of the Subsidiaries during such period, (b) the income of, and any amounts referred to in clause (a) above paid to, any Subsidiary (other than a Loan Party) to the extent that, on the date of determination, the declaration or payment of cash dividends or similar cash distributions by such Subsidiary is restricted by operation of the terms of its organizational documents or any agreement, instrument, judgment, decree, statute, rule or regulation applicable to such Subsidiary and (c) the income or loss of, and any amounts referred to in clause (a) above paid to, any Subsidiary that is not wholly owned by the Company to the extent such income or loss or such amounts are attributable to the noncontrolling interest in such Subsidiary.
Consolidated Net Income
provided
 
"" means, for any period, the aggregate minimum rental expense of the Company and the Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, in respect of all rental obligations under operating leases.
Consolidated Rental Expense
"" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
"" means, for purposes of Section 9.19, the Secured Obligations.
Corresponding Debt
"" means any period (a) commencing on any date when Availability shall have been less than the greater of (i) the lesser of (A) 10% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (B) 10% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $25,000,000 for three consecutive Business Days and (b) ending on the first day thereafter when Availability shall have been greater than the greater of (i) the lesser of (A) 12.5% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (B) 12.5% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $30,000,000 for at least 60 consecutive days.
Covenant Period
"" means any receivables due to any Loan Party from a credit card issuer or a credit card processor in connection with purchases of Inventory of such Loan Party on (a) credit cards issued by Visa, MasterCard, American Express, Discover and any other credit card issuers that are reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, (b) private label credit cards of any Loan Party issued through the Company's credit card program with Alliance Data Systems under non-recourse arrangements substantially similar to those in effect on the Original Effective Date or (c) debit cards and mall cards issued by issuers or providers that are reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, in each case which have been earned by performance by such Loan Party but not yet paid to such Loan Party by such credit card issuer or credit card processor.
Credit Card Accounts Receivable
"" means any agreement between a Loan Party, on the one hand, and a credit card issuer or a credit card processor (including any credit card processor that processes purchases of Inventory from a Loan Party through debit cards or mall cards), on the other hand.
Credit Card Agreement
"" means each Credit Card Notification, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, executed by one or more Loan Parties and delivered by such Loan Parties to credit card issuers or credit card processors that are party to any Credit Card Agreement.
Credit Card Notifications
"" means, as to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Revolving Loans and the sum of such Lender's LC Exposure, Swingline Exposure, Protective Advance Exposure and Overadvance Exposure at such time.
Credit Exposure
 
"" means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
"" means any Lender, as determined by the Administrative Agent, that has (a) failed to fund any portion of its Loans or participations in Letters of Credit, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances within three Business Days of the date required to be funded by it hereunder, (b) notified any Borrower, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, the Swingline Lender or any Lender in writing that it does not intend to comply with any of its funding obligations under this Agreement or has made a public statement to the effect that it does not intend to comply with its funding obligations under this Agreement or under other agreements in which it commits to extend credit, (c) failed, within three Business Days after request by the Administrative Agent, to confirm that it will comply with the terms of this Agreement relating to its obligations to fund prospective Loans and participations in then outstanding Letters of Credit, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances, (d) otherwise failed to pay over to the Administrative Agent or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder within three Business Days of the date when due, unless the subject of a good faith dispute, or (e) (i) become or is insolvent or has a parent company that has become or is insolvent or (ii) become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee or custodian appointed for it, or has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment or has a parent company that has become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee or custodian appointed for it, or has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment.
Defaulting Lender
"" has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Deposit Account
"" has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Deposit Account Control Agreement
"" means each Subsidiary other than (a) any Subsidiary that is a Foreign Subsidiary, (b) any Subsidiary set forth on Schedule 1.01A, (c) any Inactive Subsidiary, (d) prior to the release of the Existing Acquired Company Mortgage on the parcels of real property owned by White Marsh Distribution, LLC, White Marsh Distribution, LLC and (e) prior to the release of the Existing Acquired Company Mortgage on the parcels of real property owned by FB Distro Distribution Center, LLC, FB Distro Distribution Center, LLC (it being agreed, in the case of clauses (d) and (e), that the Company will cause each such release to occur as promptly as reasonably practicable following the expiration or termination of such Existing Acquired Company Mortgage in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect on the Second Restatement Effective Date).
Designated Subsidiary
 
"" means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed on Schedule 3.06.
Disclosed Matters
"" means any capital stock which, by its terms (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable), or upon the happening of any event, (a) matures (excluding any maturity as the result of an optional redemption by the issuer thereof) or is mandatorily redeemable, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, or is redeemable at the option of the holder thereof, in whole or in part, or requires the payment of any cash dividend or any other scheduled payment constituting a return of capital, in each case at any time on or prior to the first anniversary of the Maturity Date, or (b) is convertible into or exchangeable (unless at the sole option of the issuer thereof) for (i) cash, (ii) debt securities or (iii) any capital stock referred to in (a) above, in each case at any time prior to the first anniversary of the Maturity Date.
Disqualified Stock
"" has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Document
"" or "" refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
"" means any Subsidiary other than a Foreign Subsidiary.
Domestic Subsidiary
"" means any period (a) during which any Default under clause (a) of Article VII or any Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or (b) during a Reduced Availability Period; that if all applicable circumstances described in clauses (a) and (b) shall cease to exist, the Borrower Representative may, not more than twice during each period of 12 consecutive months, request that the Administrative Agent discontinue the applicable Dominion Period, and the Administrative Agent will promptly comply with such request and will provide notification of such discontinuance to the Loan Parties' credit card issuers and credit card processors.
Dominion Period
provided
"" means (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender, (c) an Approved Fund and (d) any other Person, other than, in each case, a natural person or the Company, any Subsidiary or any other Affiliate of the Company.
Eligible Assignee
"" means, at any time, the Credit Card Accounts Receivable of a Loan Party that the Administrative Agent determines in its Permitted Discretion are eligible as the basis for (i) the extension of Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans and (ii) the issuance of Letters of Credit. Without limiting the Administrative Agent's discretion provided herein, Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable shall not include any Credit Card Account Receivable:
Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable
(a) which is not earned or does not represent the bona fide amount due to a Loan Party from a credit card processor or a credit card issuer that originated in the ordinary course of business of the applicable Loan Party;
 
(b) which is not owned by a Loan Party or to which a Loan Party does not have good or marketable title;
(c) in which the payee of such Credit Card Account Receivable is a Person other than a Loan Party;
(d) which does not constitute an "Account" (as defined in the UCC);
(e) which has been outstanding for more than five Business Days (or, in the case of American Express, 15 Business Days) from the date of sale;
(f) with respect to which the applicable credit card issuer, credit card processor or debit card or mall card issuer or provider has (i) applied for, suffered, or consented to the appointment of any receiver, interim receiver, custodian, trustee, monitor, administrator, sequestrator or liquidator of its assets, (ii) has had possession of all or a material part of its property taken by any receiver, interim receiver, custodian, trustee, monitor, administrator, sequestrator or liquidator, (iii) filed, or had filed against it (but only so long as any such involuntary filing has not been stayed or vacated), any request or petition for liquidation, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment of debts, adjudication as bankrupt, winding-up, or voluntary or involuntary case under any state, provincial, territorial or federal bankruptcy laws, (iv) has admitted in writing its inability, or is generally unable to, pay its debts as they become due, (v) become insolvent or (vi) ceased operation of its business;
(g) which is not a valid, legally enforceable obligation of the applicable credit card issuer or credit card processor with respect thereto;
(h) which is not subject to a properly perfected first priority security interest in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties);
(i) which is subject to any Lien, other than (i) a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties), (ii) any Permitted Encumbrances contemplated by the applicable processor agreements and for which appropriate Reserves (as determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion) have been established and (iii) Liens permitted by Section 6.02(i);
(j) with respect to which (i) any covenant has been breached or (ii) any representation or warranty is not true in all material respects, in each case to the extent contained in this Agreement, the Restated Security Agreement or in the credit card agreements relating to such Credit Card Account Receivable; that each such representation and warranty shall be true and correct in all respects to the extent already qualified by a materiality standard;
provided
 
(k) which is subject to risk of set-off, recoupment, non-collection or not being processed due to unpaid and/or accrued credit card processor fee balances, to the extent of the lesser of the balance of the applicable Credit Card Accounts Receivable or the unpaid credit card processor fees;
(l) which is evidenced by "chattel paper" or an "instrument" of any kind unless such "chattel paper" or "instrument" is in the possession of the Administrative Agent, and to the extent necessary or appropriate, endorsed to the Administrative Agent;
(m) which the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion determines may not be paid by reason of the applicable credit card processor's, credit card issuer's or debit card or mall card issuer's or provider's inability to pay;
(n) which represents a deposit or partial payment in connection with the purchase of Inventory of such Loan Party;
(o) which is not subject to a Credit Card Notification; or
(p) which does not meet such other usual and customary eligibility criteria for Credit Card Accounts Receivable in the Loan Parties' industry generally as the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion may determine from time to time;
, , that the Administrative Agent shall not add any additional eligibility criteria (or amend any then-existing eligibility criteria to make the same more restrictive) without giving at least four Business Days' prior notice to the Borrower Representative.
provided
however
In the event that (a) a Financial Officer of any Loan Party has actual knowledge that any credit card issuer, credit card processor or debit card or mall card issuer or provider with respect to Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable ceases to comply with the requirements of clause (f) above or (b) a Credit Card Account Receivable which was previously an Eligible Credit Card Account Receivable ceases to be an Eligible Credit Card Account Receivable hereunder (other than by reason of clause (m) or (p) above), the applicable Loan Party or the Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent thereof promptly, and in any event not later than the time of submission to the Administrative Agent of the next Borrowing Base Certificate.
In determining the amount of an Eligible Credit Card Account Receivable, the face amount of a Credit Card Account Receivable may, in the Administrative Agent's Permitted Discretion, be reduced by, without duplication, to the extent not reflected in such face amount, (i) the amount of all accrued and actual discounts, claims, credits or credits pending, promotional program allowances, price adjustments, finance charges or other allowances (including any amount that any Loan Party may be obligated to rebate
 
to an Account Debtor pursuant to the terms of any agreement or understanding (written or oral)) applicable to such Credit Card Account Receivable, (ii) the aggregate amount of all cash received in respect of such Credit Card Account Receivable but not yet applied by any Loan Party to reduce the amount of such Credit Card Account Receivable and (iii) the amount of all customary fees and expenses in connection with any credit card arrangement. Standards of eligibility may be made more restrictive from time to time solely by the Administrative Agent in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion, with any such changes to be effective four Business Days after delivery of notice thereof to the Borrower Representative and the Lenders.
"" means a Foreign Subsidiary that is (a) a first-tier CFC owned directly by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary that is a U.S. Person or (b) described in clause (b) of the definition of the term "Foreign Subsidiary".
Eligible Foreign Subsidiary
"" means, at any time, the Inventory of a Loan Party which the Administrative Agent determines in its Permitted Discretion is eligible as the basis for (i) the extension of Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans and (ii) the issuance of Letters of Credit. Without limiting the Administrative Agent's discretion provided herein, Eligible Inventory shall not include any Inventory:
Eligible Inventory
(a) which is not subject to a first priority perfected Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties);
(b) which is subject to any Lien other than (i) a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties), (ii) a Permitted Encumbrance which does not have priority over the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties) and (iii) Liens permitted by Section 6.02(i);
(c) which is unmerchantable, defective, damaged or unfit for sale (as such terms are customarily used in the Loan Parties' industry), or is not salable at prices approximating at least the cost of such Inventory in the ordinary course of business or is unacceptable due to age, type, category and/or quantity, in each case, consistent with the usage of such terms in the most recent inventory appraisal received by the Administrative Agent as contemplated hereby;
(d) with respect to which any covenant, representation, or warranty contained in this Agreement or the Restated Security Agreement has been breached or is not true or which does not conform in all material respects to all standards imposed by any applicable Governmental Authority;
(e) in which any Person other than such Loan Party shall (i) have any direct or indirect ownership, interest or title to such Inventory or (ii) be indicated on any purchase order or invoice with respect to such Inventory as having or purporting to have an interest therein;
(f) which is not finished goods or which constitutes packaging and shipping material, samples, prototypes, displays or display items, bill-and-hold
 
goods, goods that are returned or marked for return, repossessed goods, goods held on consignment, or goods which are not of a type held for sale in the ordinary course of business (for the avoidance of doubt, sales in the ordinary course of business includes clearance sales);
(g) which is not located in the United States or is in transit with a common carrier from vendors and suppliers; that up to $20,000,000 of such Inventory in transit shall not be excluded from being Eligible Inventory pursuant to this clause (g) subject to the right of the Administrative Agent, in its Permitted Discretion and upon not less than four Business Days' notice to the Borrower Representative, to exclude such Inventory if it determines that its ability to realize on such Inventory and the proceeds thereof upon the exercise of remedies would be uncertain; and that up to an additional $45,000,000 of such Inventory in transit shall not be excluded from being Eligible Inventory pursuant to this clause (g) so long as (i) the Administrative Agent shall have received (1) a true and correct copy of the bill of lading and other shipping documents for such Inventory (and, if such Inventory is in transit from outside the United States, such bill of lading is negotiable), (2) evidence of satisfactory casualty insurance naming the Administrative Agent as loss payee and otherwise covering such risks as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request, (3) confirmation that the applicable Loan Party has paid for the goods (unless such Loan Party's payment obligations are covered by a Commercial Letter of Credit or a private label letter of credit) or that the applicable Loan Party has title to such Inventory (together with such evidence thereof as the Administrative Agent may from time to time require) and (4) if the bill of lading is (A) non-negotiable, a duly executed Collateral Access Agreement or other bailee agreement reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent from the applicable customs broker for such Inventory, or (B) negotiable, confirmation that the bill is issued in the name of such Loan Party and consigned to the order of the Administrative Agent, and a reasonably acceptable agreement has been executed with such Loan Party's customs broker, in which the customs broker agrees that it holds the negotiable bill as agent for the Administrative Agent and will follow instructions of the Administrative Agent with respect to the disposition thereof and of the goods, (ii) the common carrier is not an Affiliate of the applicable vendor or supplier and (iii) the customs broker is not an Affiliate of any Loan Party;
provided
provided
further
(h) which is located in any location leased by the applicable Loan Party (other than any retail store of such Loan Party located in a jurisdiction that does not provide for a common law or statutory landlord's lien on the personal property of tenants that would be prior or superior to that of the Administrative Agent) unless (i) the lessor has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Collateral Access Agreement or (ii) a Rent Reserve has been established by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
(i) which is located in any third party warehouse or is in the possession of a bailee (other than a third party processor) and is not evidenced by a Document (other than bills of lading to the extent permitted pursuant to clause (g) above),
 
unless (i) such warehouseman or bailee has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Collateral Access Agreement and such other documentation as the Administrative Agent may require or (ii) an appropriate Reserve has been established by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion; that up to $10,000,000 at any one time of such Inventory described in this clause (i) and not meeting the requirements of the preceding subclauses (i) and (ii) may be included as Eligible Inventory to the extent such Inventory is being held for not more than 60 days in a warehouse pending delivery to a store upon the initial opening thereof (including the initial opening after the renovation or remodeling of a store);
provided
(j) which is being processed offsite at a third party location or outside processor, or is in-transit to or from said third party location or outside processor;
(k) which is the subject of a consignment by a Loan Party as consignor;
(l) which contains or bears any intellectual property rights licensed to a Loan Party unless the Administrative Agent is satisfied that it may sell or otherwise dispose of such Inventory without (i) infringing the rights of such licensor, (ii) violating any contract with such licensor or (iii) incurring any liability with respect to payment of royalties other than royalties incurred pursuant to sale of such Inventory under the current licensing agreement;
(m) which is not reflected in a current perpetual inventory report of the applicable Loan Party (unless such Inventory is reflected in a report to the Administrative Agent as "in transit" Inventory);
(n) for which reclamation rights have been asserted by the seller;
(o) any Inventory of the Figi Companies or any other highly perishable Inventory; or
(p) which does not meet such other eligibility criteria for Inventory as the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion may determine from time to time;
, , that the Administrative Agent shall not add any additional eligibility criteria (or amend any then-existing eligibility criteria to make the same more restrictive) without giving at least four Business Days' prior notice to the Borrower Representative; that in determining the value of the Eligible Inventory, such value shall be reduced by, without duplication, any amounts representing (i) Vendor Rebates; (ii) costs included in Inventory relating to advertising; (iii) to the extent determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion to be appropriate, the shrink reserve; (iv) the unreconciled discrepancy between the general inventory ledger and the perpetual inventory ledger, to the extent the general inventory ledger reflects less Inventory than the perpetual inventory ledger; and (v) a reserve for Inventory which is designated or demanded to be returned to or retained by the applicable vendor or which is recognized as damaged or off quality by the applicable Loan Party.
provided
however
provided
further
 
In the event that a Financial Officer of any Loan Party has actual knowledge that Inventory at any location having a fair market value of $5,000,000 or more which was previously Eligible Inventory ceases to be Eligible Inventory hereunder (other than by reason of clause (p) above), such Loan Party or the Borrower Representative shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof; that the Loan Parties shall not be required to deliver an updated Borrowing Base Certificate until such time as submission to the Administrative Agent of the next Borrowing Base Certificate is required hereunder; that the Administrative Agent may, in its reasonable discretion, upon receipt of such notice as set forth above, adjust Borrowing Base to reflect such change in Eligible Inventory.
provided
provided
further
"" means a bank or financial institution that is organized under the laws of the United States or any State or district thereof with an office in New York, New York which has a combined capital surplus of at least $200,000,000.
Eligible Successor Agent
"" means any period (a) commencing at any time when Availability shall be less than the greater of (i) the lesser of (A) 15% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (B) 15% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $35,000,000 and (b) ending when Availability shall have been greater than the greater of (i) the greater of (A) 17.5% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (B) 17.5% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $40,000,000 for a period of 30 consecutive days.
Enhanced Reporting Period
"" means all applicable federal, state, and local laws (including common law), regulations, rules, ordinances, codes, decrees, judgments, directives, orders (including consent orders), and binding agreements with any Governmental Authority in each case, relating to pollution or protection of the environment, natural resources, human health and safety (to the extent related to exposure to Hazardous Materials), or the presence, Release of, or exposure to, Hazardous Materials, or the generation, manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, transport, recycling or handling of, or the arrangement for such activities with respect to, Hazardous Materials.
Environmental Laws
"" means any liability, claim, action, suit, agreement, judgment or order arising under or relating to any Environmental Law for any damages, injunctive relief, losses, fines, penalties, fees, expenses (including reasonable fees and expenses of attorneys and consultants) or costs, whether contingent or otherwise, including those arising from or relating to: (a) compliance or non-compliance with any Environmental Law or permit, license or approval issued thereunder, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the Release of any Hazardous Materials or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
"" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other
Equity Interests
 
equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest (other than, prior to the date of such conversion, any Indebtedness that is convertible into any such Equity Interests).
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
ERISA
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with any Loan Party, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or 414(c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(m) or 414(o) of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
"" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived), (b) any failure by any Plan to satisfy the minimum funding standard (within the meaning of Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA) applicable to such Plan, in each case whether or not waived, (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(c) of the Code or Section 302(c) of ERISA, of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan, (d) a determination that any Plan is, or is reasonably expected to be, in "at-risk" status (as defined in Section 303(i)(4) of ERISA or Section 430(i)(4) of the Code), (e) the incurrence by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan, (f) the receipt by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan, (g) the incurrence by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan, (h) the receipt by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA, or in "endangered" or "critical" status, within the meaning of Section 305 of ERISA or Section 432 of the Code, (i) the occurrence of a non-exempt "prohibited transaction" (as defined in Section 4975 of the Code or Section 406 of ERISA) with respect to which any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate is a "disqualified person" (within the meaning of Section 4975 of the Code) or a "party in interest" (within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA) or could otherwise reasonably be expected to be liable or (j) any other event or condition with respect to a Plan or Multiemployer Plan that could reasonably be expected to result in material liability of any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate.
ERISA Event
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
"" has the meaning set forth in Article VII.
Events of Default
 
"" means the United States Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Exchange Act
"" means (a) any Deposit Account that is an operating account maintained by any Loan Party solely for the use of one of its retail stores (or a group of 80 or fewer retail stores) in which payments received from customers are deposited and which is not an account to which amounts held in other deposit accounts of the Loan Parties are swept, that (i) such Loan Party shall cause all amounts on deposit in such Deposit Account (other than amounts reasonably determined by such Loan Party to be required for the operating needs of the retail store or stores to which such Deposit Account relates), to be swept on each business day into one or more Deposit Accounts that are not Excluded Deposit Accounts and (ii) no such Deposit Account shall contain payment of or in respect of any Credit Card Account Receivable of any Loan Party, (b) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for the payment of salaries and wages and (c) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for payment of medical or insurance reimbursement, workers' compensation and similar expenses.
Excluded Deposit Account
provided
"" means any of the following Taxes imposed on or with respect to a Recipient or required to be withheld or deducted from a payment to a Recipient, (a) Taxes imposed on or measured by net income (however denominated), franchise Taxes, and branch profits Taxes, in each case, (i) imposed as a result of such Recipient being organized under the laws of, or having its principal office or, in the case of any Lender, its applicable lending office located in, the jurisdiction imposing such Tax (or any political subdivision thereof) or (ii) that are Other Connection Taxes, (b) in the case of a Lender, U.S. Federal withholding Taxes imposed on amounts payable to or for the account of such Lender with respect to an applicable interest in a Loan or Revolving Commitment pursuant to a law in effect on the date on which (i) such Lender acquires such interest in the Loan or Revolving Commitment (other than pursuant to an assignment request by the Company under Section 2.19(b)) or (ii) such Lender changes its lending office, except in each case to the extent that, pursuant to Section 2.17, amounts with respect to such Taxes were payable either to such Lender's assignor immediately before such Lender acquired the applicable interest in such Loan or Revolving Commitment or to such Lender immediately before it changed its lending office, (c) Taxes attributable to such Recipient's failure to comply with Section 2.17(f) and (d) any U.S. Federal withholding Taxes imposed under FATCA.
Excluded Taxes
"" means the Fourth Amended and Restated Loan and Security Agreement dated as of July 14, 2011, by and among the Acquired Company, certain of its subsidiaries party thereto, the lenders party thereto, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as agent for such lenders, and certain other parties thereto.
Existing Acquired Company Credit Agreement
"" means the mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents or other security document, as applicable, granting a Lien, as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, on the parcels of real property of the Acquired Company or its subsidiaries set forth on Schedule 1.01B.
Existing Acquired Company Mortgages
 
"" means the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, among the Company, the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent.
Existing Credit Agreement
"" means the letters of credit referred to on Schedule 2.06.
Existing Letters of Credit
"" means Sections 1471 through 1474 of the Code, as of the Second Restatement Effective Date (or any amended or successor version that is substantively comparable and not materially more onerous to comply with) and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof.
FATCA
"" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
"" means Figi's Inc., a Wisconsin corporation, and its subsidiaries.
Figi Companies
"" means, with respect to any Person, the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of such Person.
Financial Officer
"" means, for any period, the ratio of (a) (i) Consolidated EBITDAR for such period (ii) Capital Expenditures for such period, to (b) Consolidated Fixed Charges for such period. In the event that the Company or any Subsidiary shall have completed a Material Acquisition (including the Acquisition) or a Material Disposition during the relevant period, the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio shall be determined for such period on a Pro Forma Basis.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
minus
"" means a Lender that is not a U.S. Person.
Foreign Lender
"" means a pledge or charge agreement granting a Lien on Equity Interests in a Foreign Subsidiary to secure the Secured Obligations, governed by the law of the jurisdiction of organization of such Foreign Subsidiary and in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Foreign Pledge Agreement
"" means a Subsidiary that (a) is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States or any State thereof or the District of Columbia or (b) substantially all the assets of which consist of Equity Interests in Subsidiaries described in clause (a) above.
Foreign Subsidiary
 
"" means the deposit account(s) of the Borrowers to which the Administrative Agent or the Swingline Lender is authorized by the Borrowers (or by the Borrower Representative on their behalf) to transfer the proceeds of any Borrowings requested or authorized pursuant to this Agreement.
Funding Accounts
"" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America, applied in accordance with the consistency requirements thereof.
GAAP
"" means, at any time, the sum of (a) 50% of the aggregate remaining amount at such time of outstanding gift certificates and gift cards sold by the Loan Parties entitling the holder thereof to use all or a portion of the certificate or gift card to pay all or a portion of the purchase price of Inventory and (b) 100% of the aggregate amount at such time of outstanding customer deposits and merchandise credits entitling the holder thereof to use all or a portion of such deposit or credit to pay all or a portion of the purchase price of Inventory.
Gift Card Reserve
"" means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national body exercising such powers or functions, such as the European Union or the European Central Bank).
Governmental Authority
"" of or by any Person (the "") means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the "") in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or other obligation; that the term "Guarantee" shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business. The amount, as of any date of determination, of any Guarantee shall be the principal amount outstanding on such date of Indebtedness or other obligation guaranteed thereby (or, in the case of (i) any Guarantee the terms of which limit the monetary exposure of the guarantor or (ii) any Guarantee of an obligation that does not have a principal amount, the maximum monetary exposure as of such date of the guarantor under such Guarantee (as determined, in the case of clause (i), pursuant to such terms or, in the case of clause (ii), reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company)).
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
 
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.01.
Guaranteed Obligations
"" means any chemical, material, substance or waste that is prohibited, limited or regulated by or pursuant to any applicable Environmental Law, including, without limitation, any petroleum products or byproducts and all other hydrocarbons, coal ash, radon gas, asbestos-containing materials, urea formaldehyde foam insulation, polychlorinated biphenyls, chlorofluorocarbons and all other ozone-depleting substances or mold.
Hazardous Materials
"" means any Subsidiary that (a) does not conduct any business operations and (b) either (i) has assets with a total book value of $1,000,000 or less or (ii) (A) was formed to conduct operations of one or more retail stores each of which has since closed and ceased to be in operation, (B) does not own any assets material to the Company and the Subsidiaries and (C) is (or after the closing of such retail stores will be) in the process of voluntary liquidation, dissolution or merger in compliance with Section 6.03.
Inactive Subsidiary
"" of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person (excluding trade accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business), (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding (i) current accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business, (ii) deferred compensation payable to directors, officers or employees of the Company or any Subsidiary and (iii) any purchase price adjustment or earnout incurred in connection with an acquisition, except to the extent that the amount payable pursuant to such purchase price adjustment or earnout is, or becomes, reasonably determinable), (e) all Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations of such Person, (f) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty, (g) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers' acceptances, (h) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed by such Person (but only to the extent of the lesser of (x) the amount of such Indebtedness and (y) the fair market value of such property, if such Indebtedness has not been assumed by such Person), and (i) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other Person (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor by contract, as a matter of law or otherwise as a result of such Person's ownership interest in or other relationship with such other Person, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor. It is acknowledged and agreed that private
Indebtedness
 
label letters of credit issued by the Company or any Subsidiary for the making of payment for the purchase of Inventory in the ordinary course of business (and in respect of which no Issuing Bank or other financial institution is an issuer thereof or has any disbursement obligations thereunder) do not constitute Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary.
"" means (a) Taxes, other than Excluded Taxes, imposed on or with respect to any payment made by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party under any Loan Document and (b) to the extent not otherwise described in clause (a), Other Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.03(b).
Indemnitee
"" means the information package prepared for Lenders relating to the Borrowers and the Transactions and dated May 2012, and all other written materials relating to the Borrowers and the Transactions (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement or in this Agreement) provided to the Lenders in connection with the syndication of the Revolving Commitments under the Existing Credit Agreement or this Agreement or the solicitation of consents to the amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement effected hereby.
Information Materials
"" means the Intercreditor Agreement among the Loan Parties, the Administrative Agent and the administrative agent, collateral agent, collateral trustee or a similar representative for any Permitted Term Indebtedness, in substantially the form of Exhibit E, with such changes therefrom as are contemplated or permitted by Section 9.18.
Intercreditor Agreement
"" means a request by the Borrower Representative to convert or continue a Revolving Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.08, which shall be, in the case of any such written request, in the form of Exhibit F or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Interest Election Request
"" means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan, a Protective Advance or an Overadvance), the first Business Day of each calendar quarter and the Maturity Date, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months' duration, such day or days prior to the last day of such Interest Period as shall occur at intervals of three months' duration after the first day of such Interest Period, and the Maturity Date, and (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, Protective Advance or Overadvance, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid and the Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
"" means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months (or, with the consent of each Lender, nine or twelve months) thereafter, as the Borrower Representative may elect; that (a) if any Interest Period would end on a day
Interest Period
provided
 
other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (b) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and, in the case of a Revolving Borrowing, thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
"" has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Inventory
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, any Equity Interests, evidences of Indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, or any capital contribution or loans or advances (other than advances made in the ordinary course of business that would be recorded as accounts receivable on the balance sheet of the specified Person prepared in accordance with GAAP) to, Guarantees of any Indebtedness or other obligations of, or any other investment (including any investment in the form of transfer of property for consideration that is less than the fair value thereof (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company)) in, any other Person that are held or made by the specified Person. The amount, as of any date of determination, of (a) any Investment in the form of a loan or an advance shall be the principal amount thereof outstanding on such date, without any adjustment for write-downs or write-offs (including as a result of forgiveness of any portion thereof) with respect to such loan or advance after the date thereof, (b) any Investment in the form of a Guarantee shall be determined in accordance with the definition of the term "Guarantee", (c) any Investment in the form of a purchase or other acquisition for value of any Equity Interests, evidences of Indebtedness or other securities of any Person shall be the fair value (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company) of the consideration therefor (including any Indebtedness assumed in connection therewith), plus the fair value (as so determined) of all additions, as of such date of determination, thereto, and minus the amount, as of such date of determination, of any portion of such Investment repaid to the investor in cash as a repayment of principal or a return of capital, as the case may be, but without any other adjustment for increases or decreases in value of, or write-ups, write-downs or write-offs with respect to, such Investment after the time of such Investment, (d) any Investment (other than any Investment referred to in clause (a), (b) or (c) above) in the form of a transfer of Equity Interests or other property by the investor to the investee, including any such transfer in the form of a capital contribution, shall be the fair value (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company) of such Equity Interests or other property as of the time of such transfer (less, in the case of any investment in the form of transfer of property for consideration that is less than the fair value thereof, the fair value (as so determined) of such consideration as of the time of the transfer), minus the amount, as of such date of determination, of any portion of such Investment repaid to the investor in cash as a return of capital, but without any other adjustment for increases or decreases in
Investment
 
value of, or write-ups, write-downs or write-offs with respect to, such Investment after the time of such transfer, and (e) any Investment (other than any Investment referred to in clause (a), (b), (c) or (d) above) in any Person resulting from the issuance by such Person of its Equity Interests to the investor shall be the fair value (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company) of such Equity Interests at the time of the issuance thereof.
"" has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
IP Security Agreements
"" means the United States Internal Revenue Service.
IRS
"" means (a) each of JPMCB and BofA, each in its capacity as an issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Section 2.06(i), and (b) solely with respect to any Existing Letter of Credit, any Lender that shall have issued such Letter of Credit. An Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Bank, in which case the term "Issuing Bank" shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Bank
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., a national banking association, in its individual capacity, and its successors.
JPMCB
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.03.
Joinder Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(j).
LC Collateral Account
"" means a payment made by an Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
"" means, at any time, the sum of the Commercial LC Exposure and the Standby LC Exposure. The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
"" means (a) the Administrative Agent, (b) the Arrangers, (c) the Syndication Agent, (d) the Documentation Agent, (e) the Lenders, (f) the Issuing Banks, (g) Lenders and their Affiliates to whom any Banking Services Obligations are owing, (h) Lenders and their Affiliates to whom Swap Obligations constituting Secured Obligations hereunder are owing, (i) the beneficiaries of each indemnification obligation undertaken by any Loan Party under any Loan Document and (j) the permitted successors and assigns of the foregoing.
Lender Parties
"" means the Persons listed on Schedule 2.01 and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption or an amendment referred to in Section 2.09(e), other than any such Person that shall have ceased to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term "Lenders" includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
 
"" means each Existing Letter of Credit and any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement. It is acknowledged that private label letters of credit issued by the Company or any Subsidiary do not constitute Letters of Credit (it being further acknowledged that no Issuing Bank is an issuer of any such private label letter of credit or has any disbursement obligations thereunder).
Letter of Credit
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or on any successor or substitute screen provided by Reuters, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such screen, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the "LIBO Rate" with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
"" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, charge, security interest or other encumbrance in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
"" means this Agreement, the Collateral Documents, the Intercreditor Agreement, any agreement referred to in Section 2.06(i), any amendment referred to in Section 2.09(e) and, except for purposes of Section 9.02, any promissory notes issued pursuant to this Agreement, any Letter of Credit applications and all other agreements, instruments, documents and certificates identified in Section 4.01 executed and delivered to, or in favor of, the Administrative Agent or any other Lender Party and including all other pledges, powers of attorney, consents, assignments, contracts, notices, letter of credit agreements and all other written matter whether heretofore, now or hereafter executed by or on behalf of any Loan Party, or any employee of any Loan Party, and delivered to the Administrative Agent or any other Lender Party in connection with the Agreement or the transactions contemplated thereby. Any reference in this Agreement or any other Loan Document to a Loan Document shall include all appendices, exhibits or schedules thereto, and all amendments, restatements, supplements or other modifications thereto, and shall refer to this Agreement or such Loan Document as the same may be in effect at any and all times such reference becomes operative.
Loan Documents
"" means of this Agreement.
Loan Guarantee
Article X
 
"" means each Loan Party.
Loan Guarantor
"" means the Company and the Subsidiary Loan Parties.
Loan Parties
"" means the loans and advances made by the Lenders or the Administrative Agent pursuant to this Agreement, including Swingline Loans, Overadvances and Protective Advances.
Loans
"" means any acquisition, or a series of related acquisitions, of (a) Equity Interests in any Person if, after giving effect thereto, such Person will become a Subsidiary or (b) assets comprising all or substantially all the assets of (or all or substantially all the assets constituting a business unit, division, product line or line of business of) any Person; that the aggregate consideration therefor (including Indebtedness assumed in connection therewith, all obligations in respect of deferred purchase price (including obligations under any purchase price adjustment but excluding earnout or similar payments) and all other consideration payable in connection therewith) exceeds $50,000,000.
Material Acquisition
provided
"" means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, operations or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Company and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of any Borrower to perform any of its monetary obligations under the Loan Documents to which it is a party, (c) the Collateral, or the Administrative Agent's Liens (on behalf of itself and the Lender Parties) on the Collateral or the priority of such Liens (with materiality to be determined for purposes of this clause (c) in terms of the Collateral taken as a whole, and not in terms of any individual item of Collateral), or (d) the rights of or benefits available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Lenders under the Loan Documents (other than, in the case of this clause (d) only, a material adverse effect caused by an improper act or omission of any Issuing Bank or Lender or the Administrative Agent).
Material Adverse Effect
"" means any sale, transfer or other disposition, or a series of related sales, transfers or other dispositions, of (a) all or substantially all the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in any Person that are owned by the Company or any Subsidiary or (b) assets comprising all or substantially all the assets of (or all or substantially all the assets constituting a business unit, division, product line or line of business of) any Person; that the aggregate consideration therefor (including Indebtedness assumed by the transferee in connection therewith, all obligations in respect of deferred purchase price (including obligations under any purchase price adjustment but excluding earnout or similar payments) and all other consideration payable in connection therewith) exceeds $50,000,000.
Material Disposition
provided
"" means Indebtedness (other than the Loans, Letters of Credit and the Loan Guarantee), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of the Company and the Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $50,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the "principal amount" of the obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum
Material Indebtedness
 
aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Company or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
"" means each Borrowing Subsidiary and each other Subsidiary (a) the consolidated total assets of which equal 5.0% or more of the consolidated total assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries or (b) the consolidated revenues of which equal 5.0% or more of the consolidated revenues of the Company and the Subsidiaries, in each case as of the end of or for the most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b) (or, prior to the first delivery of any such financial statements, as of the end of or for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company ended April 28, 2012); that if at the end of or for any such most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters the combined consolidated total assets or combined consolidated revenues of all Subsidiaries that under clauses (a) and (b) above would not constitute Material Subsidiaries shall have exceeded 10.0% of the consolidated total assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries or 10.0% of the consolidated revenues of the Company and the Subsidiaries, then one or more of such excluded Subsidiaries shall for all purposes of this Agreement be deemed to be Material Subsidiaries in descending order based on the amounts of their consolidated total assets or consolidated revenues, as the case may be, until such excess shall have been eliminated. For purposes of this definition, the consolidated total assets and consolidated revenues of the Company as of any date prior to, or for any period that commenced prior to, the Second Restatement Effective Date shall be determined on a pro forma basis to give effect to the Acquisition and the other Transactions to occur on the Second Restatement Effective Date.
Material Subsidiary
provided
"" means June 14, 2017, or any earlier date on which the Revolving Commitments are reduced to zero or otherwise terminated pursuant to the terms hereof.
Maturity Date
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.09.
Maximum Liability
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.16.
Maximum Rate
"" means the merger of Merger Sub with and into the Acquired Company, with the Acquired Company surviving such merger as a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Company.
Merger
"" means Colombia Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation.
Merger Sub
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc., and any successor to its rating agency business.
Moody's
"" means a mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents or other security document granting a Lien on any Mortgaged Property to secure the Secured Obligations. Each Mortgage shall be in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Mortgage
 
"" means each parcel of real property located in the United States of America owned in fee by a Loan Party, and the improvements thereto, that (together with such improvements) has a book value of $5,000,000 or more; that for so long as such real property shall be subject to any Existing Acquired Company Mortgage, the real property set forth on Schedule 1.01B shall not constitute a "Mortgaged Property".
Mortgaged Property
provided
"" means a "multiemployer plan" as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
"" means, with respect to Inventory of any Person, the orderly liquidation value thereof, as determined on a basis consistent in all material respects with the inventory appraisals referred to in Section 4.01(h) of the Existing Credit Agreement (with such adjustments as shall be deemed appropriate to reflect events or changes in circumstances after the dates of such appraisals) by an appraiser acceptable to the Administrative Agent, net of all costs of liquidation thereof.
Net Orderly Liquidation Value
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.02(d).
Non-Consenting Lender
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.10.
Non-Paying Guarantor
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.02.
Obligated Party
"" means all unpaid principal of and accrued and unpaid interest on the Loans, all LC Exposure, all accrued and unpaid fees and all expenses, reimbursements, indemnities and other obligations of the Loan Parties to any Lender, the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, the Documentation Agent, the Syndication Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Indemnitee arising under the Loan Documents, whether direct or indirect (including those acquired by assumption), absolute or contingent, due or to become due, now existing or hereafter arising and including interest, fees, costs, expenses and indemnities that accrue after the commencement by or against any Loan Party or any Affiliate thereof of any proceeding under any bankruptcy or insolvency laws naming such Person as the debtor in such proceeding, regardless of whether such interest, fees costs, expenses and indemnities are allowed claims in such proceeding.
Obligations
"" means the United States Treasury Department Office of Foreign Assets Control.
OFAC
"" means November 25, 2009.
Original Effective Date
"" means, with respect to any Recipient, Taxes imposed as a result of a present or former connection between such Recipient and the jurisdiction imposing such Tax (other than connections arising from such Recipient having executed, delivered, become a party to, performed its obligations under, received payments under, received or perfected a security interest under, engaged in any other transaction pursuant to or enforced any Loan Document, or sold or assigned an interest in any Loan Document).
Other Connection Taxes
 
"" means all present or future stamp, court or documentary, intangible, recording, filing or similar Taxes that arise from any payment made under, from the execution, delivery, performance, enforcement or registration of, from the receipt or perfection of a security interest under, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document, except any such Taxes that are Other Connection Taxes imposed with respect to an assignment (other than an assignment made pursuant to Section 2.19).
Other Taxes
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(b).
Overadvance
"" means, at any time, the sum of the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Overadvances at such time. The Overadvance Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Overadvance Exposure at such time.
Overadvance Exposure
"" means any amount that a Loan Party owes to the Administrative Agent under Section 9.19.
Parallel Debt
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04(c)(ii).
Participant Register
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04(c)(i).
Participants
"" means the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001 (Title III of Pub.L. No. 107-56 (Signed into law October 26, 2001)).
Patriot Act
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.10.
Paying Guarantor
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA.
PBGC
"" means the purchase or other acquisition by the Company or any Subsidiary of Equity Interests in, or all or substantially all the assets of (or all or substantially all the assets constituting a business unit, division, product line or line of business of), any Person if (a) in the case of any purchase or other acquisition of Equity Interests in a Person, such Person will be, upon the consummation of such acquisition a wholly owned Subsidiary (or, in the case of any such purchase or other acquisition structured as a two-step tender offer, such Person will become a wholly owned Subsidiary reasonably promptly thereafter upon the consummation of the second-step merger), in each case including as a result of a merger or consolidation between any Subsidiary and such Person, or (b) in the case of any purchase or other acquisition of other assets, such assets will be owned by the Company or a wholly owned Subsidiary; that (i) all transactions related thereto are consummated in accordance with applicable law, (ii) the business of such Person, or such assets, as the case may be, constitute a business permitted under Section 6.03(b) and (iii) with respect to each such purchase or other acquisition, all actions required to be taken with respect to each newly created or acquired Subsidiary or assets in order to satisfy the requirements set forth in Section 5.03 and the Collateral Documents shall be taken in accordance therewith.
Permitted Acquisition
provided
 
"" means a determination made in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable (from the perspective of a secured asset-based lender) business judgment.
Permitted Discretion
"" means:
Permitted Encumbrances
(a) Liens imposed by law for Taxes that are not yet delinquent or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.06;
(b) carriers', warehousemen's, mechanics', materialmen's, repairmen's and other like Liens imposed by law (other than any Lien imposed pursuant to Section 430(k) of the Code or Section 303(k) of ERISA or a violation of Section 436 of the Code), arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than 30 days or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.06;
(c) pledges and deposits made (i) in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations and (ii) in respect of letters of credit, bank guarantees or similar instruments issued for the account of the Company or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business supporting obligations of the type set forth in clause (i) above;
(d) deposits made to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts (other than Indebtedness for borrowed money), leases (other than Capital Lease Obligations), statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(e) judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (k) of Article VII;
(f) easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances and exceptions to title on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business or in the ordinary operation of such real property that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not materially detract from the value of the affected property or interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Company or any Subsidiary or the ordinary operation of such real property;
(g) customary rights of setoff upon deposits of cash in favor of banks and other depository institutions and Liens of a collecting bank arising under the UCC in respect of payment items in the course of collection;
(h) Liens arising from precautionary UCC financing statement filings (or similar filings under applicable law) regarding operating leases or consignments;
 
(i) Liens representing any interest or title of a licensor, lessor or sublicensor or sublessor, or a licensee, lessee or sublicensee or sublessee, in the property subject to any lease (other than Capital Lease Obligations), license or sublicense or concession agreement permitted by this Agreement;
(j) Liens arising in the ordinary course of business in favor of custom and forwarding agents and similar Persons in respect of imported goods and merchandise in the custody of such Persons;
(k) Liens in favor of customs and revenue authorities arising as a matter of law to secure payment of customs duties in connection with the importation of goods;
(l) Liens or rights of setoff against credit balances of the Company or any Subsidiary with credit card issuers or credit card processors to secure obligations of the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, to any such credit card issuer or credit card processor incurred in the ordinary course of business as a result of fees and chargebacks; and
(m) other Liens that are contractual rights of set-off;
that the term "Permitted Encumbrances" shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness, other than Liens referred to in clause (c) above securing letters of credit, bank guarantees or similar instruments.
provided
"" means:
Permitted Investments
(a) direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof;
(b) investments in commercial paper maturing within 270 days from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, the highest credit rating obtainable from S&P or from Moody's;
(c) investments in certificates of deposit, banker's acceptances and time deposits maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof that has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000;
(d) fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above;
 
(e) money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in SEC Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) are rated AAA by S&P or Aaa by Moody's and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $5,000,000,000;
(f) marketable direct obligations issued by any state of the United States or any political subdivision of any such state or any public instrumentality thereof and rated, at the time of the acquisition thereof, at least A by S&P or Moody's; and
(g) in the case of any Foreign Subsidiary, other short-term investments that are analogous to the foregoing, are of comparable credit quality and are customarily used by companies in the jurisdiction of such Foreign Subsidiary for cash management purposes.
"" means David Jaffe (or any member of his family that is actively involved in the management of the Company) and Armand Correia.
Permitted Investors
"" means Indebtedness of the Company, and the Guarantees thereof by any Loan Party, that (a) the stated final maturity of such Indebtedness shall not be earlier than the Maturity Date, (b) no Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall guarantee obligations of the Company under such Indebtedness, (c) such Indebtedness shall not be secured by any Lien on any assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries other than assets that constitute Collateral and (d) if such Indebtedness or any Guarantees thereof is secured, the administrative agent, collateral agent, trustee and/or any similar representative (in each case, as determined by the Administrative Agent) acting on behalf of the holders of such Indebtedness shall become party to the Intercreditor Agreement and Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral securing such Indebtedness and Guarantees shall be junior and subordinate to the Liens thereon securing the Secured Obligations pursuant to the Intercreditor Agreement. As of the Second Restatement Effective Date, Indebtedness under the Term Credit Agreement constitutes Permitted Term Indebtedness.
Permitted Term Indebtedness
provided
"" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
"" means any "employee pension benefit plan", as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA (other than a Multiemployer Plan), that is subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.01(d).
Platform
"" means the certain Post-Closing Letter Agreement, dated as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, between the Company and the Administrative Agent.
Post-Closing Letter Agreement
 
"" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMCB as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City. Each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
"" means, with respect to any computation hereunder required to be made on a pro forma basis giving effect to any proposed Investment or other acquisition (including any Permitted Acquisition or any Material Acquisition), any Material Disposition, any Restricted Payment or any payment of or in respect of any Indebtedness (collectively, ""), computation thereof after giving pro forma effect to such Pro Forma Event in accordance with Regulation S-X under the Securities Act (including pro forma adjustments arising out of events which are directly attributable to such Pro Forma Event, are factually supportable and are expected to have a continuing impact), using, for purposes of making such computation, the consolidated financial statements of the Company and the Subsidiaries (and, to the extent applicable, the historical financial statements of any entities or assets so acquired or to be acquired, or so disposed or to be disposed), which shall be reformulated as if such Pro Forma Event (and, in the case of any pro forma computations made hereunder to determine whether such Pro Forma Event is permitted to be consummated hereunder, to any other Pro Forma Event consummated since the first day of the period covered by any component of such pro forma computation and on or prior to the date of such computation), and any Indebtedness or other liabilities incurred in connection with any such Pro Forma Event, had been consummated and incurred at the beginning of such period. If any Indebtedness bears a floating rate of interest and is being given pro forma effect, the interest on such Indebtedness shall be calculated as if the rate in effect on the date of determination had been the applicable rate for the entire period (taking into account any Swap Agreement applicable to such Indebtedness if such Swap Agreement has a remaining term in excess of 12 months).
Pro Forma Basis
Pro Forma Events
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.04(a).
Protective Advance
"" means, at any time, the sum of the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Protective Advances at such time. The Protective Advance Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Protective Advance Exposure at such time.
Protective Advance Exposure
"" means any period (a) commencing at any time when Availability shall be less than the greater of (i) the lesser of (A) 10.0% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (B) 10% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $25,000,000 for three consecutive Business Days and (b) ending when Availability shall have been greater than the greater of (i) the lesser of (A) 12.5% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (B) 12.5% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $30,000,000 for a period of 60 consecutive days.
Reduced Availability Period
"" means the Administrative Agent, any Lender, any Issuing Bank or any combination thereof (as the context requires).
Recipient
 
"" means, in respect of any Indebtedness (the ""), any Indebtedness that extends, renews or refinances such Original Indebtedness (or any Refinancing Indebtedness in respect thereof); that (a) the principal amount of such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not exceed the principal amount of such Original Indebtedness except by an amount no greater than accrued and unpaid interest with respect to such Original Indebtedness; (b) the stated final maturity of such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not be earlier than that of such Original Indebtedness; (c) such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not constitute an obligation (including pursuant to a Guarantee) of any Subsidiary that shall not have been (or, in the case of after-acquired Subsidiaries, shall not have been required to become pursuant to the terms of the Original Indebtedness) an obligor in respect of such Original Indebtedness and shall constitute an obligation of such Subsidiary only to the extent of their obligations in respect of such Original Indebtedness; and (d) such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not be secured by any Lien on any asset other than the assets that secured such Original Indebtedness (or would have been required to secure such Original Indebtedness pursuant to the terms thereof).
Refinancing Indebtedness
Original Indebtedness
provided
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04(b).
Register
"" means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the directors, officers, partners, members, trustees, employees, agents, administrators, managers, representatives and advisors of such Person and of such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
"" means any actual release, spill, emission, leaking, dumping, injection, pouring, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migration into or through the environment or within or upon any building, structure, facility or fixture.
Release
"" means, with respect to any leased store, warehouse distribution center, regional distribution center or depot where any Inventory subject to Liens arising by operation of law is located, a reserve equal to two months' rent at such store, warehouse distribution center, regional distribution center or depot.
Rent Reserve
"" means reports prepared by the Administrative Agent or another Person showing the results of appraisals, field examinations or audits pertaining to the Loan Parties' assets from information furnished by or on behalf of the Loan Parties, after the Administrative Agent has exercised its rights of inspection pursuant to this Agreement, which Reports may be distributed to the Lenders by the Administrative Agent.
Report
"" means, at any time, Lenders having Credit Exposure and unused Revolving Commitments representing more than 50% of the sum of the total Credit Exposure and unused Revolving Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
"" means any and all reserves which the Administrative Agent deems necessary, in its Permitted Discretion, to maintain (including, without limitation, reserves for accrued and unpaid interest on the Secured Obligations, Rent Reserves, Gift
Reserves
 
Card Reserves, Banking Services Reserves and reserves for loyalty programs, reserves for consignee's, warehousemen's and bailee's charges, reserves for dilution of Accounts, reserves for Inventory shrinkage, reserves for customs charges and shipping charges and other foreign landing costs related to any Inventory in transit, reserves for Swap Obligations, reserves for contingent liabilities of any Loan Party, reserves for uninsured losses of any Loan Party, reserves for uninsured, underinsured, un-indemnified or under-indemnified liabilities or potential liabilities with respect to any litigation and reserves for taxes, fees, assessments, and other governmental charges) with respect to the Collateral or any Loan Party.
"" means that certain Amended and Restated Pledge and Security Agreement, dated as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, between the Loan Parties and the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lender Parties.
Restated Security Agreement
"" means any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary, or any payment or distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, exchange, conversion, cancellation or termination of any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary.
Restricted Payment
"" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit, Protective Advances, Overadvances and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum possible aggregate amount of such Lender's Credit Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to (a) Section 2.09 and (b) assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Revolving Commitment is set forth on Schedule 2.01, or in the Assignment and Assumption or amendment referred to in Section 2.09(e) pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed or acquired its Revolving Commitment, as applicable. The aggregate amount of the Lenders' Revolving Commitments as of the Second Restatement Effective Date is $250,000,000.
Revolving Commitment
"" means a Loan made pursuant to Sections 2.01 and 2.02(a).
Revolving Loan
"" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw Hill Companies, Inc., and any successor to its rating agency business.
S&P
"" means an arrangement relating to property owned by the Company or any Subsidiary whereby the Company or such Subsidiary sells or transfers such property to any Person and the Company or any Subsidiary leases such property, or other property that it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property sold or transferred, from such Person or its Affiliates.
Sale/Leaseback Transaction
"" means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
SEC
 
"" means the Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of 14, 2012, among the Company, the other Loan Parties, the Lenders, the Swingline Lender, the Issuing Banks and the Administrative Agent.
Second Restatement Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in the Second Restatement Agreement.
Second Restatement Effective Date
"" means all Obligations, together with all (a) Banking Services Obligations and (b) Swap Obligations owing to one or more Lenders or their respective Affiliates; that at or prior to the time that any transaction relating to such Swap Obligation is executed, the Lender or an Affiliate thereof party thereto (if other than JPMCB or an Affiliate thereof) shall have delivered written notice to the Administrative Agent that such a transaction has been entered into and that it constitutes a Secured Obligation entitled to the benefits of the Collateral Documents.
Secured Obligations
provided
"" means the United States Securities Act of 1933.
Securities Act
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(d).
Settlement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(d).
Settlement Date
"" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Standby Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements relating to Standby Letters of Credit that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrowers at such time. The Standby LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Standby LC Exposure at such time.
Standby LC Exposure
"" means all Letters for Credit other than Commercial Letters of Credit.
Standby Letter of Credit
"" means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves), expressed as a decimal, established by the Board of Governors to which the Administrative Agent is subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency Liabilities" in Regulation D of the Board of Governors). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
"" of a Person means any Indebtedness of such Person the payment of which is subordinated to payment of the Secured Obligations.
Subordinated Indebtedness
 
"" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, (a) any Person the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date and (b) any other Person (i) of which Equity Interests representing more than 50% of the equity value or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (ii) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
"" means any direct or indirect subsidiary of the Company.
Subsidiary
"" means each Subsidiary that is a party to this Agreement as a Borrower or a Loan Guarantor (including any such Subsidiary that becomes a party hereto as a Loan Guarantor pursuant to the Second Restatement Agreement or a Joinder Agreement) and is a party to the Restated Security Agreement.
Subsidiary Loan Party
"" means a certificate in the form of Exhibit G or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Supplemental Perfection Certificate
"" means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Company or any Subsidiary shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
"" of a Person means any and all obligations of such Person, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor), under (a) any and all Swap Agreements, and (b) any and all cancellations, buy backs, reversals, terminations or assignments of any Swap Agreement transaction.
Swap Obligations
"" means, at any time, the sum of the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Swingline Loans at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
"" means JPMCB, in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder, and its successors and assigns in such capacity.
Swingline Lender
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(a).
Swingline Loan
"" means BofA.
Syndication Agent
 
"" means, as to any Person, any lease (including leases that may be terminated by the lessee at any time) of any property (whether real, personal or mixed) (a) that is accounted for as an operating lease under GAAP and (b) in respect of which the lessee retains or obtains ownership of the property so leased for US federal income tax purposes, other than any such lease under which such Person is the lessor.
Synthetic Lease
"" means, as to any Person, an amount equal to the sum, without duplication, of (a) the obligations of such person to pay rent or other amounts under any Synthetic Lease which are attributable to principal and (b) the amount of any purchase price payment under any Synthetic Lease assuming the lessee exercises the option to purchase the leased property at the end of the lease term. For purposes of Section 6.02, a Synthetic Lease Obligation shall be deemed to be secured by a Lien on the property being leased and such property shall be deemed to be owned by the lessee.
Synthetic Lease Obligations
"" means all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, withholdings (including backup withholding), assessments, fees or other charges imposed by any Governmental Authority, including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto.
Taxes
"" means the Term Credit Agreement dated as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, among the Company, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
Term Credit Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement.
Term Priority Collateral
"" means the "Loan Documents" under the Term Credit Agreement.
Term Loan Documents
"" means the (a) execution, delivery and performance by the Loan Parties of this Agreement, the borrowing of the Loans, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder, (b) the execution, delivery and performance by the Loan Parties of the Term Loan Documents, the borrowing of the Term Loans and the use of proceeds thereof, (c) the creation and perfection of the security interests provided for in the Collateral Documents, (d) the consummation of the Acquisition, (e) the repayment in full of all principal, premium, if any, interest, fees and other amounts due or outstanding under the Existing Acquired Company Credit Agreement, the termination of the commitments and letters of credit outstanding thereunder and the discharge and release of the guarantees and liens existing in connection therewith, and (f) the payment of all fees and expenses in connection with the foregoing.
Transactions
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
"" means the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect from time to time in the State of New York or any other state the laws of which are required to be applied in connection with the perfection of security interests created by the Collateral Documents.
UCC
 
"" means, at any time, any Secured Obligations (or portion thereof) that are contingent in nature or unliquidated at such time, including any Secured Obligation that is: (a) an obligation to reimburse a bank for drawings not yet made under a letter of credit issued by it; (b) any other obligation (including any guarantee) that is contingent in nature at such time; or (c) an obligation to provide collateral to secure any of the foregoing types of obligations.
Unliquidated Obligations
"" means a "United States person" within the meaning of Section 7701(a)(30) of the Code.
U.S. Person
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.17(f)(ii)(B)(3).
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
"" means credits earned from vendors for volume purchases that reduce net inventory costs for the Loan Parties.
Vendor Rebates
"", when used in reference to a subsidiary of any Person, means that all the Equity Interests in such subsidiary (other than directors' qualifying shares and other nominal amounts of Equity Interests that are required to be held by other Persons under applicable law) are owned, beneficially and of record, by such Person, another wholly-owned subsidiary of such Person or any combination thereof.
wholly-owned
"" means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
SECTION 1.02. For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Loan") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Loan") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Loan"). Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Borrowing") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Borrowing") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing").
Classification of Loans and Borrowings.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
SECTION 1.03. The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". The words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all real and personal, tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights. The word "law" shall be construed as referring to all statutes, rules, regulations, codes and other laws (including official rulings and interpretations thereunder having the force of law or with which affected Persons customarily comply), and all judgments, orders, writs and decrees, of all Governmental
Terms Generally.
 
Authorities. Except as otherwise provided herein and unless the context requires otherwise, (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document (including this Agreement and the other Loan Documents) shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any definition of or reference to any statute, rule or regulation shall be construed as referring thereto as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (including by succession of comparable successor laws), and all references to any statute shall be construed as referring to all rules, regulations, rulings and official interpretations promulgated or issued thereunder, (c) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and permitted assigns (subject to any restrictions on assignment set forth herein) and, in the case of any Governmental Authority, any other Governmental Authority that shall have succeeded to any or all functions thereof, (d) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof and (e) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement.
SECTION 1.04. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature used herein shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that (a) if the Borrower Representative notifies the Administrative Agent that the Borrowers request an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the Second Restatement Effective Date in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower Representative that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith; that the Borrower Representative, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent and Lenders, on the other hand, agree to negotiate in good faith with respect to any proposed amendment to eliminate or adjust for the effect of any such change in GAAP; and (b) notwithstanding any other provision contained herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature used herein shall be construed, and all computations of amounts and ratios referred to herein shall be made, without giving effect to (i) any election under Statement of Financial Accounting Standards 159, The Fair Value Option for Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities, or any successor thereto (including pursuant to the Accounting Standards Codification), to value any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary at "fair value", as defined therein, and (ii) any change in GAAP occurring after the Second Restatement Effective Date as a result of the adoption of any proposals set forth in the Proposed Accounting Standards Update, Leases (Topic 840), issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board on August 17, 2010, or any other proposals issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board in connection therewith, in each case if such change would require treating any lease (or similar arrangement conveying the right to use) as a capital lease where such lease (or similar arrangement) was not required to be so treated under GAAP as in effect on the Second Restatement Effective Date.
Accounting Terms; GAAP.
provided
provided
 
SECTION 1.05. All references herein to the Company and the Subsidiaries shall be deemed to be references to such Persons, and all the representations and warranties of the Company and the other Loan Parties contained in this Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall be deemed made, in each case, after giving effect to the Acquisition and the other Transactions to occur on the Second Restatement Effective Date, unless the context otherwise requires.
Effectuation of Transactions.
SECTION 2.01. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender, severally and not jointly, agrees to make Revolving Loans to the Borrowers from time to time during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in (a) such Lender's Credit Exposure exceeding such Lender's Revolving Commitment or (b) the total Credit Exposures exceeding the lesser of (i) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect or (ii) the Borrowing Base then in effect, subject to the Administrative Agent's authority, in its sole discretion, to make Protective Advances and Overadvances pursuant to the terms of Section 2.04 and 2.05. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrowers may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Commitments.
SECTION 2.02. (a) Each Revolving Loan shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans of the same Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments. Any Protective Advance, any Swingline Loan and any Overadvance shall be made in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.04 or 2.05, as applicable.
Loans and Borrowings.
(b) Subject to Section 2.14, each Revolving Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower Representative may request in accordance herewith. Each Protective Advance, Swingline Loan or Overadvance shall be an ABR Loan. Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Revolving Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrowers to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
(c) At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate principal amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000; that a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing that results from a continuation of an outstanding Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to such outstanding Borrowing. At the time each ABR Revolving Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate principal amount that is an integral multiple of
provided
 
$500,000 and not less than $1,000,000; that, without affecting the Borrowing Base limitation set forth in Section 2.01, an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate principal amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the Revolving Commitments then in effect or that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.06(e).
provided
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower Representative shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert to or continue, any Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
SECTION 2.03. To request a Revolving Borrowing, the Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request either in writing (delivered by hand or facsimile) or by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m. (or, solely in the case of a request for a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing proposed to be made on the Second Restatement Effective Date, 2:30 p.m.), New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Revolving Borrowing, not later than 12:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of an executed written Borrowing Request. Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Requests for Revolving Borrowings.
(i) the name of the applicable Borrower;
(ii) the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing and the manner in which the proceeds of such Borrowing are to be disbursed (which shall be consistent with Section 2.07);
(iii) the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
(iv) whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
(v) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period."
If no election as to the Type of Revolving Borrowing is specified, then the requested Revolving Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, then the applicable Borrower(s) shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Revolving Loan to be made as part of the requested Revolving Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.04. (a) Subject to the limitations set forth below, the Administrative Agent is authorized by the Borrowers and the Lenders, from time to time in the Administrative Agent's sole discretion (but shall have absolutely no obligation), to make Loans to the Borrowers, on behalf of all Lenders, which the Administrative Agent, in its Permitted Discretion, deems necessary or desirable (i) to preserve or protect the Collateral or any portion thereof, (ii) to enhance the likelihood of, or maximize the amount of, repayment of the Loans and other Obligations, or (iii) to pay any other amounts required to be paid by the Borrowers pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, including payments of reimbursable expenses (including costs, fees, and expenses as described in Section 9.03) and other sums payable under the Loan Documents which have not been paid by the Borrowers after written demand therefor (any of such Loans are herein referred to as ""); that the aggregate principal amount of Protective Advances outstanding at any time shall not exceed (i) $15,000,000 in the aggregate or (ii) together with the aggregate principal amount of Overadvances outstanding at such time pursuant to Section 2.05, $20,000,000 in the aggregate; that no Protective Advance may be made if, after giving effect thereto, any Lender's Credit Exposure shall exceed its Revolving Commitment. Protective Advances may be made even if the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have not been satisfied. The Protective Advances shall be secured by the Liens in favor of the Administrative Agent in and to the Collateral and shall constitute Obligations hereunder. All Protective Advances shall be ABR Borrowings. The Administrative Agent's authorization to make Protective Advances may be revoked at any time by the Required Lenders. Any such revocation must be in writing and shall become effective prospectively upon the Administrative Agent's receipt thereof. At any time that there is sufficient Availability and the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have been satisfied, the Administrative Agent may request the Lenders to make Revolving Loans to repay a Protective Advance. At any other time the Administrative Agent may require the Lenders to fund their risk participations as described in Section 2.04(b).
Protective Advances.
Protective Advances
provided
provided
further
(b) The Administrative Agent may by notice given not later than 12:00 p.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of any Protective Advance outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate principal amount of the Protective Advance in which the Lenders will be required to participate and each Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Protective Advance. Each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to the Administrative Agent such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Protective Advance. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Protective Advances pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including nonsatisfaction of any of the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02, the occurrence and continuance of a Default or any reduction or termination of the Revolving Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Revolving Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply,
 
, to the payment obligations of the Lenders pursuant to this paragraph). From and after the date, if any, on which any Lender has paid in full for its participation in any Protective Advance purchased hereunder, the Administrative Agent shall promptly distribute to such Lender its Applicable Percentage of all payments of principal and interest and all proceeds of Collateral received by the Administrative Agent in respect of such Protective Advance; that any such payment or proceeds so distributed shall be repaid to the Administrative Agent if and to the extent such payment or proceeds is required to be refunded to the Borrowers for any reason. The purchase of participations in any Protective Advance pursuant to this paragraph shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrowers of their obligation to repay such Protective Advance.
mutatis
mutandis
provided
SECTION 2.05. (a) The Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Lenders agree that in order to facilitate the administration of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, promptly after the Borrower Representative requests an ABR Revolving Borrowing pursuant to Section 2.03, the Swingline Lender may, in its discretion, elect to have the terms of this Section 2.05(a) apply to such Borrowing Request by advancing, on behalf of the Lenders and in the amount and on the date requested, same day funds to the Borrowers to the Funding Account(s) (each such Loan made solely by the Swingline Lender pursuant to this Section 2.05(a) is referred to in this Agreement as a ""), with settlement among the Swingline Lender and the other Lenders as to the Swingline Loans to take place on a periodic basis as set forth in Section 2.05(d). Each Swingline Loan shall be subject to all the terms and conditions applicable to other ABR Loans funded by the Lenders, except that all payments thereon shall be payable to the Swingline Lender solely for its own account. The aggregate principal amount of Swingline Loans outstanding at any time shall not exceed $25,000,000. The Swingline Lender shall not make any Swingline Loan if the requested Swingline Loan exceeds Availability (before giving effect to such Swingline Loan). All Swingline Loans shall be ABR Borrowings.
Swingline Loans and Overadvances.
Swingline Loan
(b) Any provision of this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, at the request of the Borrower Representative, the Administrative Agent may in its sole discretion (but shall have absolutely no obligation) make Loans to the Borrowers, on behalf of the Lenders, in amounts that exceed Availability (any such Loans are herein referred to collectively as ""); that the aggregate principal amount of Overadvances outstanding at any time shall not exceed (i) $15,000,000 in the aggregate or (ii) together with the aggregate principal amount of Protective Advances outstanding at such time pursuant to Section 2.04, $20,000,000 in the aggregate; that no Overadvance may be made if, after giving effect thereto, any Lender's Credit Exposure shall exceed its Revolving Commitment. The Overadvances shall be secured by the Liens in favor of the Administrative Agent in and to the Collateral and shall constitute Obligations hereunder. All Overadvances shall be ABR Borrowings. The Borrowers shall be required to repay each Overadvance no later than the 60th day after the date of the making thereof. The Administrative Agent's authorization to make Overadvances may be revoked at any time by the Required Lenders. Any such revocation must be in writing and shall become effective prospectively upon the Administrative Agent's receipt thereof.
Overadvances
provided
provided
further
 
(c) The Swingline Lender and the Administrative Agent may by notice given not later than 12:00 p.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of any Swingline Loan or Overadvance, respectively, outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate principal amount of the Swingline Loan or Overadvance, respectively, in which the Lenders will be required to participate and each Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Overadvance. Each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender or the account of the Administrative Agent, as applicable, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Overadvance. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans and Overadvances pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including nonsatisfaction of any of the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02, the occurrence and continuance of a Default or any reduction or termination of the Revolving Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Revolving Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders pursuant to this paragraph). From and after the date, if any, on which any Lender has paid in full for its participation in any Swingline Loan or Overadvance purchased hereunder, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, shall promptly distribute to such Lender its Applicable Percentage of all payments of principal and interest and all proceeds of Collateral received by the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, in respect of such Swingline Loan or Overadvance; that any such payment or proceeds so distributed shall be repaid to the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, if and to the extent such payment or proceeds is required to be refunded to the Borrowers for any reason. The purchase of participations in any Swingline Loan or Overadvance pursuant to this paragraph shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrowers of their obligation to repay such Swingline Loan or Overadvance.
mutatis
mutandis
provided
(d) The Administrative Agent, on behalf of the Swingline Lender, shall request settlement (a "") with the Lenders on at least a weekly basis or on any earlier date that the Administrative Agent elects, by notifying the Lenders of such requested Settlement by facsimile, telephone, or e-mail no later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of such requested Settlement (the ""). Each Lender (other than the Swingline Lender) shall transfer the amount of such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the outstanding principal amount of the applicable Swingline Loan with respect to which Settlement is requested to the Administrative Agent, to such account of the Administrative Agent as the Administrative Agent may designate, not later than 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on such Settlement Date. Settlements may occur during the existence of a Default and whether or not the applicable conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have then been satisfied. Such amounts transferred to the Administrative Agent shall be applied against the amounts of the Swingline Lender's Swingline Loans and, together with Swingline Lender's Applicable Percentage of such
Settlement
Settlement Date
 
Swingline Loan, shall constitute Revolving Loans of such Lenders, respectively. If any such amount is not transferred to the Administrative Agent by any Lender on such Settlement Date, the Swingline Lender shall be entitled to recover such amount on demand from such Lender together with interest thereon as specified in Section 2.07.
SECTION 2.06. (a)  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower Representative may request the issuance of Letters of Credit for its own account or for the account of another Borrower, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks, at any time and from time to time during the Availability Period. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrowers to, or entered into by the Borrowers with, an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
Letters of Credit.
General.
(b) To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit (other than an automatic renewal permitted pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section), the Borrower Representative shall hand deliver or facsimile (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the recipient) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If requested by the applicable Issuing Bank, the applicable Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on such Issuing Bank's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrowers shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the total LC Exposure shall not exceed $175,000,000, (ii) the total Standby LC Exposure shall not exceed $40,000,000 and (iii) the total Credit Exposures shall not exceed the lesser of (x) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (y) the Borrowing Base then in effect.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions.
(c) Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date; that a Letter of Credit may expire at a later date if the applicable Borrower shall have deposited cash collateral in an LC Collateral Account pursuant to Section 2.06(j) in an amount equal to 103% of the undrawn face amount of such Letter of Credit. Any Letter of Credit may provide by its terms that it may be automatically
Expiration Date.
provided
 
extended for additional successive one year periods on terms reasonably acceptable to the applicable Issuing Bank. Any Letter of Credit providing for automatic extension shall be extended upon the then current expiration date without any further action by any Person unless the applicable Issuing Bank shall have given notice to the applicable beneficiary (with a copy to the applicable Borrower) of the election by such Issuing Bank not to extend such Letter of Credit, such notice to be given not fewer than 30 days prior to the then current expiration date of such Letter of Credit; that no Letter of Credit may be extended automatically or otherwise beyond the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date (other than in accordance with this paragraph).
provided
(d) By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the applicable Issuing Bank or the Lenders, such Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from such Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of such Issuing Bank, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by such Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrowers on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrowers for any reason. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default, reduction or termination of the Revolving Commitments or any or other event that under any rule of law or uniform practices to which any Letter of Credit is subject (including Section 3.14 of ISP 98 or any successor publication of the International Chamber of Commerce) permits a drawing to be made under such Letter of Credit after the expiration thereof or of the Revolving Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations.
force
majeure
(e) If an Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrowers shall, following notice of such LC Disbursement to the Borrower Representative, reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 2:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower Representative shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower Representative prior to such time on such date, then not later than 2:00 p.m., New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the Borrower Representative receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the day of receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower Representative receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt; that the Borrowers may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 that such payment be
Reimbursement.
provided
 
financed with an ABR Revolving Borrowing in an equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrowers' obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Revolving Borrowing or, if the Swingline Lender shall have elected to apply the terms of Section 2.05(a) to such requested Borrowing, the resulting Swingline Loan. If the Borrowers fail to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrowers in respect thereof and such Lender's Applicable Percentage thereof. Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrowers, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to such Issuing Bank the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Borrowers pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the applicable Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse such Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and such Issuing Bank as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse an Issuing Bank for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of ABR Revolving Loans or a Swingline Loan as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrowers of their obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
mutatis
mutandis
(f) The Borrowers' joint and several obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section is absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by any Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not substantially comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, (iv) any or other event that under any rule of law or uniform practices to which any Letter of Credit is subject (including Section 3.14 of ISP 98 or any successor publication of the International Chamber of Commerce) permits a drawing to be made under such Letter of Credit after the stated expiration date thereof or of the Revolving Commitments or (v) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this paragraph, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrowers' obligations hereunder. None of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders or the Issuing Banks, or any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in
Obligations Absolute.
force
majeure
 
interpretation of technical terms or any other act, failure to act or other event or circumstance; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse any Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrowers to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by any Borrower that are caused by such Issuing Bank's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of bad faith, gross negligence or wilful misconduct on the part of an Issuing Bank (with such absence to be presumed unless otherwise determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final and nonappealable judgment), such Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, an Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
provided
(g) Each Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit. Each Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Borrower Representative by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of such demand for payment and whether such Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrowers of their obligation to reimburse such Issuing Bank and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures.
provided
(h) If any Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrowers shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrowers reimburse such LC Disbursement in full, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Borrowers fail to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then Section 2.13(d) shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be paid to the Administrative Agent for the account of the applicable Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse the Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment, and shall be payable on demand or, if no demand has been made, on the date on which the Borrowers reimburse the applicable LC Disbursement in full.
Interim Interest.
provided
(i) Any Issuing Bank may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Borrower Representative, the Administrative Agent, the replaced Issuing Bank and the successor Issuing Bank. The Administrative
Replacement of the Issuing Banks.
 
Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of an Issuing Bank. At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Borrowers shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Bank pursuant to Section 2.12(b). From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Bank shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term "Issuing Bank" shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Bank, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Banks, as the context shall require. After the replacement of an Issuing Bank hereunder, the replaced Issuing Bank shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
(j) If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Borrower Representative receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Borrowers shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders (the ""), an amount in cash equal to 103% of the LC Exposure as of such date plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to any Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII. The Borrowers shall also deposit cash collateral in accordance with this paragraph as and to the extent required by Section 2.11(b) or 2.20. Each such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the Secured Obligations. The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account and the Borrowers hereby grant the Administrative Agent a security interest in the LC Collateral Account. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Borrowers' risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall, notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein or in the Collateral Documents, be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrowers for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated, be applied to satisfy other Secured Obligations (but subject to, in the case of any such application at a time when any Lender is a Defaulting Lender (but only if, after giving effect thereto, the remaining cash collateral shall be less than the aggregate LC Exposure of all the Defaulting Lenders that has not been reallocated to non-Defaulting Lenders pursuant to Section 2.20), the consent of each Issuing Bank). If the Borrowers are required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrowers within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived. If any Borrower is required to provide an amount
Cash Collateralization.
LC Collateral Account
provided
 
of cash collateral hereunder pursuant to Section 2.11(b), such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to such Borrower as and to the extent that, after giving effect to such return, the Borrowers would remain in compliance with Section 2.11(b) and no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing. If any Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder pursuant to Section 2.20, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to such Borrower as promptly as practicable to the extent that, after giving effect to such return, no Issuing Bank shall have any exposure in respect of any outstanding Letter of Credit that is not fully covered by the Revolving Commitments of the non-Defaulting Lenders and/or the remaining cash collateral and no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
(k) Each Existing Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be a Letter of Credit issued hereunder for all purposes hereof and of the other Loan Documents, and no issuance or similar fees (as distinguished from ongoing participation or fronting fees) will be required in connection with the Existing Letters of Credit. Without limiting the foregoing (i) each such Existing Letter of Credit shall be included in the calculation of the LC Exposure, (ii) all liabilities of the Borrowers and the other Loan Parties with respect to such Existing Letters of Credit shall constitute Obligations and (iii) each Lender shall have reimbursement obligations with respect to such Existing Letters of Credit as provided in this Section 2.06. Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this Section 2.06, no Existing Letter of Credit that has not been issued by an Issuing Bank referred to in clause (a) of the definition of such term may be renewed or extended.
Existing Letters of Credit.
(l) Unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank shall, in addition to its notification obligations set forth elsewhere in this Section, report in writing to the Administrative Agent (i) periodic activity (for such period or recurrent periods as shall be requested by the Administrative Agent) in respect of Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank, including all issuances, extensions, amendments and renewals, all expirations and cancelations and all disbursements and reimbursements, (ii) reasonably prior to the time that such Issuing Bank issues, amends, renews or extends any Letter of Credit, the date of such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension, and the stated amount of the Letters of Credit issued, amended, renewed or extended by it and outstanding after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (and whether the amounts thereof shall have changed), (iii) on each Business Day on which such Issuing Bank makes any LC Disbursement, the date and amount of such LC Disbursement, (iv) on any Business Day on which the Borrowers fail to reimburse an LC Disbursement required to be reimbursed to such Issuing Bank on such day, the date of such failure and the amount of such LC Disbursement and (v) on any other Business Day, such other information as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request as to the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank.
Issuing Bank Reports to the Administrative Agent.
(m) For all purposes of this Agreement, the amount of a Letter of Credit that, by its terms or the terms of any document related thereto, provides for one or more automatic increases in the stated amount thereof shall
LC Exposure Determination.
 
be deemed to be the maximum stated amount of such Letter of Credit after giving effect to all such increases, whether or not such maximum stated amount is in effect at the time of determination.
SECTION 2.07. (a) Each Lender shall make each Revolving Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 2:00 p.m., New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower Representative by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to the Funding Account(s); that ABR Revolving Loans made to finance the reimbursement of (i) an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(e) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the applicable Issuing Bank and (ii) a Protective Advance or an Overadvance shall be retained by the Administrative Agent.
Funding of Borrowings.
provided
(b) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Revolving Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance on such assumption, make available to the applicable Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrowers severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the applicable Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of a payment to be made by such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of a payment to be made by the Borrowers, the interest rate applicable to ABR Revolving Loans. If the Borrowers and such Lender shall pay such interest to the Administrative Agent for the same or an overlapping period, the Administrative Agent shall promptly remit to the Borrowers the amount of such interest paid by the Borrowers for such period. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Revolving Loan included in such Borrowing. Any payment by the Borrowers shall be without prejudice to any claim the Borrowers may have against a Lender that shall have failed to make such payment to the Administrative Agent.
SECTION 2.08. (a) Each Revolving Borrowing initially shall be of the Type and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in the applicable Borrowing Request or as otherwise provided in Section 2.03. Thereafter, the Borrower Representative may elect to convert such Borrowing to a Borrowing of a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. The Borrower Representative may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans
Interest Elections.
 
comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing. This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings, Overadvances or Protective Advances, which may not be converted or continued.
(b) To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Borrowers were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of an executed written Interest Election Request. Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
(i) the Borrower and the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
(ii) the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
(iii) whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
(iv) if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period".
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrowers shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.
(c) Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
(d) If the Borrower Representative fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower Representative ( that no such notice shall be required in the case of an Event of Default under clause (h) or (i) of Article VII), then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Revolving Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
provided
 
SECTION 2.09. (a) Unless previously terminated, the Revolving Commitments shall automatically terminate on the Maturity Date.
Termination and Reduction of Revolving Commitments; Increase in Revolving Commitments.
(b) The Borrowers may at any time terminate the Revolving Commitments upon (i) the payment in full of all outstanding Loans, together with accrued and unpaid interest thereon and on any LC Disbursements, (ii) the cancellation and return of all outstanding Letters of Credit (or alternatively, with respect to each such Letter of Credit, the furnishing to the Administrative Agent of a cash deposit (or at the discretion of the Administrative Agent a back up standby letter of credit reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent) equal to 103% of the portion of the LC Exposure attributable to such Letter of Credit as of such time), (iii) the payment in full of all accrued and unpaid fees and (iv) the payment in full of all reimbursable expenses and all other Obligations outstanding at such time.
(c) The Borrowers may from time to time reduce the Revolving Commitments; that (i) each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 and (ii) the Borrowers shall not reduce the Revolving Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Loans in accordance with Section 2.11, the sum of the Credit Exposures would exceed the lesser of (x) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (y) the Borrowing Base then in effect.
provided
(d) The Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Revolving Commitments under paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any such notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Borrower Representative pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments delivered by the Borrower Representative may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower Representative (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied. Any termination or reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments.
provided
(e) (i) The Borrowers shall have the right to increase the total Revolving Commitments by obtaining additional Revolving Commitments, either from one or more of the Lenders or from one or more other lending institutions; that (i) no Lender hereunder shall have any obligation to provide any such requested increase, (ii) any such request for an increase shall be in a minimum amount of $10,000,000, (iii) the aggregate amount of all additional Revolving Commitments obtained under this paragraph shall not
provided
 
exceed $50,000,000, (iv) the Administrative Agent shall have approved the identity of any such new Lender, such approval not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, (v) any such new Lender shall assume all the rights and obligations of a "Lender" hereunder, and (vi) the procedure described in paragraph (e)(ii) of this Section shall have been satisfied.
(ii) Any amendment hereto for such an increase or addition shall be in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and shall only require the written signatures of the Administrative Agent, the Borrowers and the Lender(s) being added or increasing their Revolving Commitments. As a condition precedent to such an increase, the Borrower Representative shall deliver to the Administrative Agent (A) a certificate of each Loan Party signed by an authorized officer of such Loan Party (1) certifying and attaching the resolutions adopted by such Loan Party approving or consenting to such increase, and (2) in the case of the Borrowers, certifying that, before and after giving effect to such increase, (x) the representations and warranties contained in Article III and the other Loan Documents are true and correct in all material respects, except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they are true and correct as of such earlier date, and (y) no Default exists, (B) an opinion of counsel to the Loan Parties as to the power and authority of the Loan Parties to effect such increase and such other customary and related matters as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request and (C) a reaffirmation agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, executed and delivered by the Loan Parties.
(iii) On the Business Day following any such increase, all outstanding ABR Revolving Borrowings shall be reallocated, pursuant to procedures reasonably determined by the Administrative Agent, among the Lenders (including any newly added Lenders) in accordance with the Lenders' respective revised Applicable Percentages. Eurodollar Revolving Borrowings outstanding at the time of such increase shall be reallocated, pursuant to procedures reasonably determined by the Administrative Agent, among the Lenders in accordance with the Lenders' respective Applicable Percentages in effect at the time upon the expiration of the then applicable Interest Periods.
SECTION 2.10. (a) The Borrowers hereby unconditionally promise to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan on the Maturity Date and (ii) to the Administrative Agent the then unpaid amount of each Protective Advance and Overadvance on the earliest of (A) the Maturity Date, (B) demand by the Administrative Agent therefor and (C) in the case of any Overadvance, the 60th day after the date of the making thereof.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt.
(b) On each Business Day during any Dominion Period, the Administrative Agent shall apply all funds credited to a Concentration Account on such Business Day or the immediately preceding Business Day (at the discretion of the Administrative Agent, whether or not immediately available), , to prepay any
first
 
Protective Advances and Overadvance that may be outstanding and, , to prepay the Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans and to cash collateralize outstanding LC Exposure.
second
(c) Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrowers to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
(d) The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrowers to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
(e) The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (c) or (d) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrowers to pay any amounts due hereunder in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
(f) Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the Borrowers shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
SECTION 2.11. (a) The Borrowers shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to prior notice in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
Prepayment of Loans.
(b) Except to the extent such excess arises from Protective Advances permitted under Section 2.04 or Overadvances permitted under Section 2.05, in the event and on each occasion that the total Credit Exposure exceeds the lesser of (i) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (ii) the Borrowing Base then in effect, the Borrowers shall prepay the Revolving Loans and/or Swingline Loans (or, if no such Borrowings are outstanding, deposit cash collateral in the LC Collateral Account in accordance with Section 2.06(j)) in an aggregate amount equal to such excess.
(c) The Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone
 
(confirmed by hand delivery or facsimile) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment or (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid; that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.09, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.09. Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Revolving Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Revolving Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Revolving Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02. Each prepayment of a Revolving Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Revolving Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.13.
provided
SECTION 2.12. (a) The Borrowers agree to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue for each day on the amount of the unused Revolving Commitment of such Lender on such day at a rate equal to 0.375% per annum. Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the first Business Day of each January, April, July and October, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Second Restatement Effective Date, and on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate. All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed. For purposes of computing commitment fees, the Revolving Commitment of a Lender shall be deemed to be used to the extent of the outstanding Revolving Loans and LC Exposure of such Lender (and the Swingline Exposure and participations in Protective Advances and Overadvances of such Lender shall be disregarded for such purpose).
Fees.
(b) The Borrowers agree to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participation in each Standby Letter of Credit or Commercial Letter of Credit at the Applicable Rate for a Letter of Credit of such type, in each case on the average daily amount of the portion of such Lender's LC Exposure attributable to such Letter of Credit (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Second Restatement Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Revolving Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to each Issuing Bank a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate or rates per annum separately agreed upon between the Company and such Issuing Bank, on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Second Restatement Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any
 
LC Exposure, as well as such Issuing Bank's standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder. Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of each calendar month shall be payable on the first Business Day of the next succeeding month, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Second Restatement Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to the Issuing Banks pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within 10 days after demand. All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed.
provided
(c) The Borrowers agree to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees in the amounts and payable at the times separately agreed upon between the Company and the Administrative Agent.
(d) All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the applicable Issuing Bank, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances (absent manifest error in the amount paid).
SECTION 2.13.  (a) The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan, but excluding Protective Advances and Overadvances) shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
Interest.
(b) The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
(c) Each Protective Advance and Overadvance shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate for ABR Revolving Loans plus 2% per annum.
(d) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrowers hereunder is not paid when due (after giving effect to any applicable grace period), whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% per annum plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% per annum plus the rate applicable to ABR Revolving Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
(e) Accrued interest on each Loan (for ABR Loans, accrued through the last day of the prior calendar quarter) shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and upon termination of the Revolving Commitments; that
provided
 
(i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (d) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Revolving Loan prior to the end of the Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Revolving Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
(f) All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate or Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
SECTION 2.14. If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest.
(a) the Administrative Agent determines in good faith (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period; or
(b) the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice (which may be telephonic) thereof to the Borrower Representative and the Lenders as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower Representative and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist (which notification shall be made promptly after the Administrative Agent obtains knowledge of the cessation of such circumstances), (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Revolving Borrowing to, or continuation of any Revolving Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective, and such Revolving Borrowing shall be continued as an ABR Borrowing, and (ii) any Borrowing Request for a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing shall be treated as a request for an ABR Revolving Borrowing.
SECTION 2.15. (a) If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs.
(i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended or participated in by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or any Issuing Bank;
 
(ii) impose on any Lender or any Issuing Bank or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense (other than Taxes) affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein; or
(iii) subject any Recipient to any Taxes (other than (A) Indemnified Taxes, (B) Taxes described in clauses (b) through (d) of the definition of the term "Excluded Taxes" and (C) Connection Income Taxes) on its loans, loan principal, letters of credit, commitments or other obligations, or its deposits, reserves, other liabilities or capital attributable thereto;
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender or other Recipient of making, converting to, continuing or maintaining any Loan or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan, or to increase the cost to such Lender or other Recipient of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit (or of maintaining its obligation to participate in or to issue any Letter of Credit), or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or other Recipient hereunder (whether of principal, interest or any other amount) then, from time to time upon request of such Lender or other Recipient, the Borrowers will pay to such Lender or other Recipient, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or other Recipient, as the case may be, for such additional costs or expenses incurred or reduction suffered. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Company reasonably believes that any such Taxes were not correctly or legally asserted, the applicable Recipient will use commercially reasonable efforts to cooperate with the Company to obtain a refund of such Taxes so long as such efforts would not, in the sole determination of such Recipient result in any non-reimbursable additional costs, expenses or risks or be otherwise disadvantageous to it.
(b) If any Lender or any Issuing Bank determines that any Change in Law regarding capital or liquidity requirements has had or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement, the Revolving Commitments of such Lender or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit or Loans held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank, to a level below that which such Lender or such Issuing Bank or such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's policies and the policies of such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's holding company with respect to capital adequacy or liquidity), then, from time to time upon request of such Lender or such Issuing Bank, the Borrowers will pay to such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Bank or such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
(c) A certificate of a Lender or an Issuing Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or such Issuing Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section delivered
 
to the Borrower Representative shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrowers shall pay such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
(d) Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or any Issuing Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's right to demand such compensation; that the Borrowers shall not be required to compensate a Lender or an Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or expenses incurred or reductions suffered more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower Representative of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or expenses or reductions and of such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or expenses or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
SECTION 2.16. In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Eurodollar Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.11(c) and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower Representative pursuant to Section 2.19, then, in any such event, the Borrowers shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. Such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan (but not including the Applicable Rate applicable thereto), for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest that would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate such Lender would bid if it were to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the London interbank market. A certificate of any Lender delivered to the Borrower Representative and setting forth and explaining in reasonable detail any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrowers shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 30 days after receipt thereof.
Break Funding Payments.
SECTION 2.17. (a)  Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party under any Loan Document shall be made without deduction or withholding for any Taxes, except as required by applicable law. If any applicable law (as determined in the good faith
Taxes.
Payments Free of Taxes.
 
discretion of an applicable withholding agent) requires the deduction or withholding of any Tax from any such payment by a withholding agent, then the applicable withholding agent shall be entitled to make such deduction or withholding and shall timely pay the full amount deducted or withheld to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law and, if such Tax is an Indemnified Tax, then the sum payable by the applicable Loan Party shall be increased as necessary so that after such deduction or withholding has been made (including such deductions and withholdings applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the applicable Recipient receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deduction or withholding been made.
(b) The Loan Parties shall timely pay to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law, or at the option of the Administrative Agent timely reimburse it for the payment of, any Other Taxes.
Payment of Other Taxes by the Loan Parties.
(c) As soon as practicable after any payment of Taxes by any Loan Party to a Governmental Authority pursuant to this Section, such Loan Party shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Evidence of Payment.
(d) The Loan Parties shall jointly and severally indemnify each Recipient, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes (including Indemnified Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) payable or paid by such Recipient or required to be withheld or deducted from a payment to such Recipient and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to the Borrower Representative by a Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Indemnification by the Loan Parties.
(e) Each Lender shall severally indemnify the Administrative Agent, within 10 days after demand therefor, for (i) any Indemnified Taxes attributable to such Lender (but only to the extent that any Loan Party has not already indemnified the Administrative Agent for such Indemnified Taxes and without limiting the obligation of the Loan Parties to do so), (ii) any Taxes attributable to such Lender's failure to comply with the provisions of Section 9.04(c)(ii) relating to the maintenance of a Participant Register and (iii) any Excluded Taxes attributable to such Lender, in each case, that are payable or paid by the Administrative Agent in connection with any Loan Document, and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Lender by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive absent
Indemnification by the Lenders.
 
manifest error. Each Lender hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent to set off and apply any and all amounts at any time owing to such Lender under any Loan Document or otherwise payable by the Administrative Agent to the Lender from any other source against any amount due to the Administrative Agent under this paragraph (e).
(f) (i) Any Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding Tax with respect to payments made under any Loan Document shall deliver to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent, at the time or times reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent, such properly completed and executed documentation reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate of withholding. In addition, any Lender, if reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent, shall deliver such other documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent as will enable the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent to determine whether or not such Lender is subject to backup withholding or information reporting requirements. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the preceding two sentences, the completion, execution and submission of such documentation (other than such documentation set forth in Section 2.17(f)(ii)(A), (ii)(B) and (ii)(D) below) shall not be required if in the Lender's reasonable judgment such completion, execution or submission would subject such Lender to any material unreimbursed cost or expense or would materially prejudice the legal or commercial position of such Lender.
Status of Lenders.
(ii) Without limiting the generality of the foregoing:
(A) any Lender that is a U.S. Person shall deliver to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent on or prior to the date on which such Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent), executed originals of IRS Form W-9 certifying that such Lender is exempt from U.S. Federal backup withholding tax;
(B) any Foreign Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Foreign Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent), whichever of the following is applicable:
(1) in the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party (x) with respect to payments of interest under any Loan Document, executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN establishing an exemption from, or reduction of, U.S. Federal withholding Tax pursuant to the "interest" article of such tax treaty and (y) with respect to any other applicable payments under any
 
Loan Document, executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN establishing an exemption from, or reduction of, U.S. Federal withholding Tax pursuant to the "business profits" or "other income" article of such tax treaty;
(2) executed originals of IRS Form W-8ECI;
(3) in the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of the exemption for portfolio interest under Section 881(c) of the Code, (x) a certificate substantially in the form of Exhibit I-1 to the effect that such Foreign Lender is not a "bank" within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, a "10 percent shareholder" of the Company within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, or a "controlled foreign corporation" described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code (a "") and (y) executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN; or
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
(4) to the extent a Foreign Lender is not the beneficial owner, executed originals of IRS Form W-8IMY, accompanied by IRS Form W-8ECI, IRS Form W-8BEN, a U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate substantially in the form of Exhibit I-2 or Exhibit I-3, IRS Form W-9, and/or other certification documents from each beneficial owner, as applicable; that if the Foreign Lender is a partnership and one or more direct or indirect partners of such Foreign Lender are claiming the portfolio interest exemption, such Foreign Lender may provide a U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate substantially in the form of Exhibit I-4 on behalf of each such direct and indirect partner;
provided
(C) any Foreign Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Foreign Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent), executed originals of any other form prescribed by applicable law as a basis for claiming exemption from or a reduction in U.S. Federal withholding Tax, duly completed, together with such supplementary documentation as may be prescribed by applicable law to permit the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent to determine the withholding or deduction required to be made; and
(D) if a payment made to a Lender under any Loan Document would be subject to U.S. Federal withholding Tax imposed by FATCA if such Lender were to fail to comply with the applicable reporting requirements of FATCA (including those contained in Section 1471(b) or 1472(b) of the Code, as applicable), such Lender shall deliver to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent at the time or times prescribed by law and at such time or times reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent such documentation prescribed by applicable law (including as prescribed
 
by Section 1471(b)(3)(C)(i) of the Code) and such additional documentation reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent as may be necessary for the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent to comply with their obligations under FATCA and to determine that such Lender has complied with such Lender's obligations under FATCA or to determine the amount to deduct and withhold from such payment. Solely for purposes of this clause (D), "FATCA" shall include any amendments made to FATCA after the Second Restatement Effective Date.
Each Lender agrees that if any form or certification it previously delivered expires or becomes obsolete or inaccurate in any respect, it shall promptly update such form or certification or promptly notify the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent in writing of its legal inability to do so.
(g) If any party determines, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, that it has received a refund of any Taxes as to which it has been indemnified pursuant to this Section (including by the payment of additional amounts pursuant to this Section), it shall pay to the indemnifying party an amount equal to such refund (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made under this Section with respect to the Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses (including Taxes) of such indemnified party and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund). Such indemnifying party, upon the request of such indemnified party, shall repay to such indemnified party the amount paid over pursuant to this paragraph (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) in the event that such indemnified party is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in no event will the indemnified party be required to pay any amount to an indemnifying party pursuant to this paragraph the payment of which would place the indemnified party in a less favorable net after-Tax position than the indemnified party would have been in if the indemnification payments or additional amounts giving rise to such refund had never been paid. This paragraph shall not be construed to require any indemnified party to make available its Tax returns (or any other information relating to its Taxes that it deems confidential) to the indemnifying party or any other Person.
Treatment of Certain Refunds.
(h) For purposes of this Section, the term "Lender" shall include any Issuing Bank.
Issuing Banks.
SECTION 2.18. (a) The Borrowers shall make each payment required to be made by them hereunder or under any other Loan Document on or prior to the time expressly required hereunder or under such other Loan Document for such payment or, if no such time is expressly required, on or prior to 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without any defense, setoff, recoupment or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the
Payments Generally; Allocation of Proceeds; Sharing of Set-offs.
 
Administrative Agent at its offices at 10 South Dearborn Street, 22
nd
Floor, Chicago, Illinois, except that payments required to be made directly to an Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender shall be so made and except that payments pursuant to Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto and payments pursuant to other Loan Documents shall be made to the Persons specified therein. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payment received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments under each Loan Document shall be made in dollars.
(b) Any proceeds of Collateral received by the Administrative Agent (i) not constituting (A) a specific payment of principal, interest, fees or other sum payable under the Loan Documents (which shall be applied as specified by the Borrowers), (B) amounts to be applied from a Concentration Account during any Dominion Period (which shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.10(b)) or, (C) so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, amounts which are received into any Concentration Account (which shall be deposited to the Borrowers' Funding Account in accordance with the Restated Security Agreement) or (ii) after an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent so elects or the Required Lenders so direct, shall be applied ratably , to pay any fees, indemnities, or expense reimbursements then due to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks from the Borrowers (other than in connection with Banking Services or Swap Obligations), , to pay any fees or expense reimbursements then due to the Lenders from the Borrowers (other than in connection with Banking Services or Swap Obligations), , to pay interest due in respect of the Protective Advances and Overadvances, , to pay the principal of the Protective Advances and Overadvances, , to pay interest then due and payable on the Loans (other than the Protective Advances and Overadvances) ratably, , to prepay principal on the Loans (other than the Protective Advances and Overadvances) and unreimbursed LC Disbursements ratably, , to pay an amount to the Administrative Agent equal to 103% of the aggregate undrawn face amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit and the aggregate amount of any unpaid LC Disbursements, to be held as cash collateral for such Obligations, , to payment of any amounts owing with respect to Banking Services and Swap Obligations, , to the payment of any other Secured Obligations due to the Administrative Agent or any Lender, and , any excess to be returned to Borrower RepresentativeNotwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, unless so directed by the Borrower Representative, or unless a Default is in existence, neither the Administrative Agent nor any Lender shall apply any payment which it receives to any Eurodollar Loan, except (a) on the expiration date of the Interest Period applicable to such Eurodollar Loan or (b) in the event, and only to the extent, that there are no outstanding ABR Loans and, in any such event, the Borrowers shall pay the break funding payment required in accordance with Section 2.16.
first
second
third
fourth
fifth
sixth
seventh
eighth
ninth
tenth
.
(c) At the election of the Administrative Agent, all payments of principal, interest, LC Disbursements, fees, reimbursable expenses (including, without limitation,
 
all reimbursements of fees and expenses pursuant to Section 9.03) and other sums payable under the Loan Documents may be paid from the proceeds of Borrowings made hereunder, whether made following a request by the Borrower Representative pursuant to Section 2.03 or a deemed request as provided in this Section or may be deducted from any deposit account of any Borrower maintained with the Administrative Agent. Each Borrower hereby irrevocably authorizes (i) the Administrative Agent to make a Borrowing for the purpose of paying each payment of principal, interest, fees or any other amount due under the Loan Documents and agrees that all such amounts charged shall constitute Loans (including Swingline Loans and Overadvances, but such a Borrowing may only constitute a Protective Advance if it is to reimburse costs, fees and expenses pursuant to Section 9.03) and that all such Borrowings shall be deemed to have been requested pursuant to Section 2.03, 2.04 or 2.05, as applicable, and (ii) the Administrative Agent to charge any deposit account of any Borrower (other than, so long as no Dominion Period is in effect or no Event of Default shall have occurred or be continuing, any Excluded Deposit Account maintained with the Administrative Agent for each payment of principal, interest, fees or any other amount due under the Loan Documents.
(d) If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall notify the Administrative Agent of such fact and shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances and Overadvances of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the amount of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amounts of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances and Overadvances; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrowers pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement (for the avoidance of doubt, as in effect from time to time) or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances to any Person that is an Eligible Assignee (as such term is defined from time to time). Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against such Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
(e) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower Representative prior to the date on which any payment is due to the
 
Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the Issuing Banks hereunder that the Borrowers will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrowers have made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the Issuing Banks, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Borrowers have not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or Issuing Banks, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Bank with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
(f) If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it hereunder to or for the account of the Administrative Agent, then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), (i) apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lender's obligations in respect of such payment until all such unsatisfied obligations have been discharged and/or (ii) hold any such amounts in a segregated account as cash collateral for, and apply any such amounts to, any future payment obligations of such Lender hereunder to or for the account of the Administrative Agent.
SECTION 2.19. (a) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrowers are required to pay any Indemnified Taxes or additional amounts to any Lender or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign and delegate its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or Affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment and delegation (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Borrowers hereby agree to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment and delegation.
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders.
(b) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrowers are required to pay any Indemnified Taxes or additional amounts to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, or if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the Borrowers may, at their sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent by the Borrower Representative, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights (other than its existing rights to payments pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17) and obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents to an Eligible Assignee that shall assume such obligations (which Eligible Assignee may be another
 
Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment and delegation); that (i) the Borrowers shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Banks, which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances and Overadvances, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrowers (in the case of all other amounts), (iii) in the case of any such assignment and delegation resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.15 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.17, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments and (iv) such assignment and delegation does not conflict with applicable law. A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrowers to require such assignment and delegation have ceased to apply. Each party hereto agrees that an assignment and delegation required pursuant to this paragraph may be effected pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption executed by the Borrower Representative, the Administrative Agent and the assignee (subject to any required consents referred to above) and that the Lender required to make such assignment and delegation need not be a party thereto.
provided
SECTION 2.20. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
Defaulting Lenders.
(a) commitment fees shall cease to accrue on the unused portion of the Revolving Commitment of such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(a);
(b) the Revolving Commitment and Credit Exposure of such Defaulting Lender shall not be included in determining whether all Lenders or all affected Lenders or the Required Lenders have taken or may take any action hereunder (including any consent to any amendment, waiver or modification pursuant to Section 9.02); that any waiver, amendment or modification requiring the consent of all Lenders or each affected Lender which affects such Defaulting Lender differently than other affected Lenders shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender;
provided
(c) if any Swingline Exposure, LC Exposure, Protective Advance Exposure and Overadvance Exposure exists at the time such Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then:
(i) such Defaulting Lender's Swingline Exposure (other than any portion thereof with respect to which such Defaulting Lender shall have funded its participation as contemplated by Section 2.05(c)), LC Exposure (other than any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements with respect to which such Defaulting Lender shall have funded its participation as contemplated by Section 2.06(d)), Protective Advance Exposure (other than any portion thereof with respect to which such Defaulting Lender shall have funded its participation
 
as contemplated by Section 2.04(b)) and Overadvance Exposure (other than any portion thereof with respect to which such Defaulting Lender shall have funded its participation as contemplated by Section 2.05(c)) shall be reallocated among the non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages, but only to the extent the sum of all non-Defaulting Lenders' Revolving Credit Exposures plus such Defaulting Lender's Swingline Exposure, LC Exposure, Protective Advance Exposure and Overadvance Exposure does not exceed the total of all non-Defaulting Lenders' Revolving Commitments;
(ii) if the reallocation described in clause (i) above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Borrowers shall within one Business Day following notice by the Administrative Agent, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the Borrowers against such Defaulting Lender, (A) first, prepay the portion of such Defaulting Lender's Overadvance Exposure that has not been so reallocated, (B) second, prepay the portion of such Defaulting Lender's Protective Advance Exposure that has not been so reallocated, (C) third, prepay the portion of such Defaulting Lender's Swingline Exposure that has not been so reallocated and (D) fourth, cash collateralize such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure that has not been so reallocated in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.06(j) for so long as such LC Exposure is outstanding;
(iii) if the Borrowers cash collateralize any portion of such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure pursuant to clause (ii) above, the Borrowers shall not be required to pay any letter of credit participation fees to such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lender's cash collateralized LC Exposure during the period such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is cash collateralized;
(iv) if any portion of the LC Exposure of such Defaulting Lender is reallocated pursuant to clause (c)(i) above, then the fees payable to the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.12(b) shall be adjusted to give effect to such reallocation; or
(v) if any portion of such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is neither cash collateralized nor reallocated pursuant to clause (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above, then, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the applicable Issuing Bank or any Lender hereunder, all letter of credit participation fees payable under Section 2.12(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure shall be payable to the Issuing Banks (and allocated among them ratably based on the amount of such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit issued by each Issuing Bank) until such LC Exposure is cash collateralized and/or reallocated; and
(d) the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loan and no Issuing Bank shall be required to issue, amend, renew, extend or increase any Letter of Credit, in each case, unless it is satisfied that the related exposure will be 100% covered by the Revolving Commitments of the non-Defaulting Lenders and/or cash collateral provided by the Borrowers in accordance with clause (c) of this Section, and
 
participating interests in any such newly issued, amended, renewed, extended or increased Letter of Credit or newly made Swingline Loan shall be allocated among non-Defaulting Lenders in a manner consistent with clause (c)(i) of this Section (and Defaulting Lenders shall not participate therein).
In the event and on the date that each of the Administrative Agent, the Company, each Issuing Bank and the Swingline Lender agrees that a Defaulting Lender has adequately remedied all matters that caused such Lender to be a Defaulting Lender, then the Swingline Exposure, LC Exposure, Protective Advance Exposure and Overadvance Exposure of the other Lenders shall be readjusted to reflect the inclusion of such Lender's Revolving Commitment and on such date such Lender shall purchase at par such of the Revolving Loans of the other Lenders as the Administrative Agent shall determine may be necessary in order for such Lender to hold Revolving Loans in accordance with its Applicable Percentage.
SECTION 2.21. If after receipt of any payment which is applied to the payment of all or any part of the Obligations, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender is for any reason compelled to surrender such payment or proceeds to any Person because such payment or application of proceeds is invalidated, declared fraudulent, set aside or determined to be void or voidable as a preference, impermissible setoff, or a diversion of trust funds, or for any other reason, then the Obligations or part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued and this Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall continue in full force as if such payment or proceeds had not been received by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender. The provisions of this Section shall be and remain effective notwithstanding any contrary action which may have been taken by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender in reliance upon such payment or application of proceeds. The provisions of this Section shall survive the termination of this Agreement.
Returned Payments.
SECTION 2.22. The Company may designate any Subsidiary that is a wholly owned Domestic Subsidiary of the Company as a Borrowing Subsidiary upon 10 Business Days' notice to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders (such notice to include the name, primary business address and tax identification number of such proposed Borrowing Subsidiary). Upon proper notice and receipt by the Administrative Agent of such agreements, documents and legal opinions as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request and subject to the Administrative Agent's determining in consultation with the Lenders that designating such Subsidiary as a Borrowing Subsidiary would not cause any Lender to suffer any economic, legal or regulatory disadvantage, such Subsidiary shall be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. A Subsidiary shall cease to be a Borrowing Subsidiary hereunder at such time as the Company gives notice to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders of its intention to terminate such Subsidiary as a Borrowing Subsidiary; that any such termination shall not be effective (other than to terminate such Borrowing Subsidiary's right to make further Borrowings or to obtain Letters of Credit) and such Subsidiary shall remain a Borrowing Subsidiary until such time as all Loans to such Borrowing Subsidiary and accrued interest thereon and all other amounts then due from such Borrowing Subsidiary have been paid in full and no Letter of Credit issued for the account of such Borrowing Subsidiary shall be outstanding.
Borrowing Subsidiaries.
provided
 
Each Loan Party represents and warrants to the Lenders as follows:
SECTION 3.01. The Company and each Subsidiary is duly organized, validly existing and (to the extent the concept is applicable in such jurisdiction and, in the case of any Subsidiary other than a Borrowing Subsidiary, except where the failure to be so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect) in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Organization; Powers.
SECTION 3.02. (a) The Transactions, insofar as they are to be carried out by each Loan Party, are within such Loan Party's corporate or other organizational powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or other organizational and, if required, shareholder or other equityholder action. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each Loan Party and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which any Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Loan Party, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Authorization; Enforceability; Benefit to Loan Parties.
(b) Each Loan Party expects to derive benefit (and its board of directors or other governing body has determined that it may reasonably be expected to derive benefit), directly and indirectly, from (i) successful operations of each of the other Loan Parties and (ii) the credit extended by the Lenders to the Borrowers hereunder. Each Loan Party has determined that execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement and any other Loan Documents to be executed by such Loan Party is within its purpose, will be of direct and indirect benefit to such Loan Party, and is in its best interest.
SECTION 3.03. The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except such as have been (or, in the case of filings relating to the consummation of the Merger, substantially contemporaneously with the effectiveness of the Second Restatement Effective Date will be) obtained or made and are (or will so be) in full force and effect and except for filings
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts.
 
necessary to perfect Liens created under the Loan Documents, (b) will not violate any applicable law, including any order of any Governmental Authority, or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company or any Subsidiary, except, in the case of any applicable law, a violation which would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any indenture, material agreement or other material instrument binding upon the Company or any Subsidiary or any of their assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Company or any Subsidiary, and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Company or any Subsidiary, except Liens created pursuant to the Loan Documents or Liens created in connection with the Term Credit Agreement.
SECTION 3.04. (a) The Loan Parties have heretofore furnished to the Lenders (i)(A) the consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the fiscal years ended July 30, 2011 and July 31, 2010, each audited by and accompanied by the unqualified opinion of Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent registered public accounting firm, and (B) the unaudited consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for each of the fiscal quarters and the portions of the fiscal year ended October 29, 2011, January 28, 2012 and April 28, 2012 and (ii)(A) the consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations and comprehensive income, stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Acquired Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of and for the fiscal years ended January 28, 2012 and January 29, 2011, each audited by and accompanied by the unqualified opinion of Ernst & Young LLP, independent registered public accounting firm, and (B) the unaudited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations and cash flows of the Acquired Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of and for the fiscal quarter ended April 28, 2012. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries or the Acquired Company and its consolidated subsidiaries, as the case may be, as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clauses (i)(B) and (ii)(B) above.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Effect.
(b) The Loan Parties have heretofore furnished to the Lenders a pro forma consolidated balance sheet and related pro forma consolidated statement of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the period of 12 consecutive months ended January 28, 2012, prepared giving effect to the Transactions as if the Transactions had occurred on such date, in the case of such balance sheet, or at the beginning of such period, in the case of such statements of operations. Such pro forma consolidated balance sheet and pro forma statements of operations (i) have been prepared by the Company in good faith based on the same assumptions used to prepare the pro forma financial statements included in the Information Materials (which assumptions are believed on the Second Restatement Effective Date by the Borrowers to be reasonable), (ii) are based on the best information available to the Borrowers, (iii) accurately reflect
 
all adjustments necessary to give effect to the Transactions and (iv) present fairly, in all material respects, the pro forma financial position and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the period of 12 consecutive months ended on January 28, 2012, as if the Transactions had occurred on such date or at the beginning of such period, as the case may be.
(c) Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto or in the Information Materials and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has, as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities, material unusual long-term commitments or material unrealized losses.
(d) Since July 30, 2011, there has been no event, development or circumstance that has had, or could reasonably be expected to have, a material adverse effect on the business, assets, results of operations or financial conditions of the Company and the Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
SECTION 3.05. (a) The Company and each Subsidiary has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its property material to its business (including its Mortgaged Properties), except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes and Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02.
Properties.
(b) The Company and each Subsidiary owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, tradenames, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by the Company and the Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) Schedule 3.05 sets forth the address of each real property that is owned in fee by the Loan Parties as of the Second Restatement Effective Date and, with respect to any such real property that constitutes a Mortgaged Property, the proper jurisdiction for the filing of a Mortgage in respect thereof. As of the Second Restatement Effective Date, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary (i) has received notice, or has knowledge, of any pending or contemplated condemnation proceeding affecting any Mortgaged Property or any sale or disposition thereof in lieu of condemnation or (ii) is or could be obligated under any right of first refusal, option or other contractual right to sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of any Mortgaged Property or any interest therein.
SECTION 3.06. (a) There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, threatened against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
Litigation and Environmental Matters.
 
(b) Except for the Disclosed Matters or matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received written notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
(c) Since the Second Restatement Effective Date, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 3.07. (a) The Company and each Subsidiary is in compliance with all laws, including all orders of Governmental Authorities, applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect (it being agreed that this Section does not apply to any law which is specifically addressed in Section 3.06(b), 3.07(b), 3.08, 3.09, 3.10 or 3.14). No Default has occurred and is continuing.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements.
(b) To the extent applicable, the Company and the Subsidiaries are in compliance, in all material respects, with (i) the Trading with the Enemy Act and each of the foreign assets control regulations of the United States Treasury Department (31 CFR, Subtitle B, Chapter V) and any other enabling legislation or executive order relating thereto, and (ii) the USA Patriot Act. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, any director, officer, agent, employee or Affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary, is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by OFAC that could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. No part of the proceeds of the Loans will be used, directly or indirectly, or otherwise made available (A) for any payments to any officer or employee of a Governmental Authority, or any Person controlled by a Governmental Authority, or any political party, official of a political party, candidate for political office, or anyone else acting in an official capacity, in order to obtain, retain or direct business or obtain any improper advantage, in violation of the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977 or (B) to any Person for the purpose of financing the activities of any Person currently subject to any United States sanctions administered by OFAC.
(c) No Loan Party is in default in any material respect in the performance, observance or fulfillment of any of the obligations, covenants or conditions contained in (i) any material agreement to which it is a party or (ii) any agreement or instrument evidencing or governing Material Indebtedness.
SECTION 3.08. No Loan Party is an "investment company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Investment Company Status.
 
SECTION 3.09. The Company and each Subsidiary has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) any Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Company or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books reserves with respect thereto to the extent required by GAAP or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes.
SECTION 3.10. (a) No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan that is subject to Title IV of ERISA (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Accounting Standards Codification Topic 715) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $2,000,000 the fair value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans that are subject to Title IV of ERISA (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Accounting Standards Codification Topic 715) did not, as of the date or dates of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed the fair value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans by any material amount.
ERISA; Labor Matters.
(b) As of the Second Restatement Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts, slowdowns or any other material labor disputes against the Company or any Subsidiary pending or, to the knowledge of the Borrowers, threatened. The hours worked by and payments made to employees of the Company and the Subsidiaries have not been in violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act or any other applicable Federal, state, local or foreign law dealing with such matters, except for any such violation that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. All payments due from the Company or any Subsidiary, or for which any claim may be made against the Company or any Subsidiary, on account of wages and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a liability on the books of the Company or such Subsidiary to the extent required by GAAP. The consummation of the Transactions will not give rise to any right of termination or right of renegotiation on the part of any union under any collective bargaining agreement to which the Company or any Subsidiary is bound.
SECTION 3.11. The Loan Parties have disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which the Company or any Subsidiary is subject, and all other matters known to them, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Information Materials nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary to the Administrative Agent, any Arranger or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished)
Disclosure.
 
contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to forecasts and projected financial information, the Loan Parties represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed by them to be reasonable at the time made and at the time so furnished and, if furnished prior to the Second Restatement Effective Date, as of the Second Restatement Effective Date (it being understood that such forecasts and projections may vary from actual results and that such variances may be material).
provided
SECTION 3.12. Schedule 3.12 sets forth, as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, the name, type of organization and jurisdiction of organization of, and the percentage of each class of Equity Interests owned by the Company or any Subsidiary in, (a) each Subsidiary and (b) each joint venture in which the Company or any Subsidiary owns any Equity Interests, and identifies each Designated Subsidiary and each Inactive Subsidiary as such. None of the Subsidiaries set forth on Schedule 1.01A conducts any business operations or owns any assets material to the Company and the Subsidiaries. All the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in each Subsidiary owned by any Loan Party have been (to the extent such concepts are relevant with respect to such Equity Interests) duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non assessable. Except as set forth on Schedule 3.12, as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, there is no existing option, warrant, call, right, commitment or other agreement to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party requiring, and there are no Equity Interests in any Subsidiary outstanding that upon exercise, conversion or exchange would require, the issuance by any Subsidiary of any additional Equity Interests or other securities exercisable for, convertible into, exchangeable for or evidencing the right to subscribe for or purchase any Equity Interests in any Subsidiary.
Subsidiaries and Joint Ventures.
SECTION 3.13. Schedule 3.13 sets forth a description of all insurance maintained by or on behalf of the Company and the Subsidiaries as of the Second Restatement Effective Date. As of the Second Restatement Effective Date, all premiums due and payable in respect of such insurance have been paid. The Loan Parties believe that the insurance maintained by or on behalf of the Company and the Subsidiaries is adequate.
Insurance.
SECTION 3.14. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is principally, or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying margin stock (within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors), or extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying margin stock. No part of the proceeds of any Loan or any Letter of Credit will be used, whether directly or indirectly, and whether immediately, incidentally or ultimately, in any manner or for any purpose that would entail a violation of Regulations T, U or X of the Board of Governors.
Federal Reserve Regulations.
SECTION 3.15. Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Second Restatement Effective Date, (a) the fair value of the assets of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries, at a fair valuation, will exceed their debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair
Solvency.
 
saleable value of the property of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries (determined on the basis of such property being liquidated with reasonable promptness in an arm's-length transaction) will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of their debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (c) the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries will be able to pay their debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise (it being understood and agreed that for purposes of this Section, contingent liabilities mean the maximum amount of liability that could reasonably be likely to result from pending litigation, asserted claims and assessments, guaranties, indemnification obligations, adjustment of purchase price or other post-closing payment adjustments (including earn-outs and other similar arrangements) and uninsured risks of the Company and its Subsidiaries), as such debts and liabilities become absolute and matured; and (d) the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the businesses in which they are engaged as such businesses are now conducted and are proposed to be conducted following the Second Restatement Effective Date.
SECTION 3.16. (a) The Restated Security Agreement, upon execution and delivery thereof by the parties thereto, will create in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lender Parties, a valid and enforceable security interest in the Collateral and (i) when the Collateral constituting certificated securities (as defined in the UCC) is delivered to the Administrative Agent, together with instruments of transfer duly endorsed in blank, the security interest created under the Restated Security Agreement will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the pledgors thereunder in such Collateral, prior and superior in right to any other Person, and (ii) when financing statements in appropriate form are filed in the applicable filing offices, the security interest created under the Restated Security Agreement will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in the remaining Collateral (as defined therein) to the extent perfection can be obtained by filing UCC financing statements, prior and superior to the rights of any other Person, except for rights secured by Liens permitted under Section 6.02.
Collateral Matters.
(b) Each Mortgage, upon execution and delivery thereof by the parties thereto, will create in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lender Parties, a legal, valid and enforceable security interest in all the applicable mortgagor's right, title and interest in and to the Mortgaged Properties subject thereto and the proceeds thereof, and when the Mortgages have been filed in the jurisdictions specified therein, the Mortgages will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the mortgagors in the Mortgaged Properties and the proceeds thereof, prior and superior in right to any other Person, but subject to Liens permitted under Section 6.02.
(c) Upon the recordation of the IP Security Agreements with the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, and the filing of the financing statements referred to in paragraph (a) of this Section, the security interest created under the Restated Security Agreement will constitute a fully
 
perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in the Intellectual Property (as defined in the Restated Security Agreement) in which a security interest may be perfected by filing in the United States of America, in each case prior and superior in right to any other Person, but subject to Liens permitted under Section 6.02 (it being understood that subsequent recordings in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office may be necessary to perfect a security interest in such Intellectual Property acquired by the Loan Parties after the Second Restatement Effective Date).
SECTION 3.17. The Borrowers will use the proceeds of the Loans and will request the issuance of Letters of Credit only for purposes set forth in Section 5.11.
Use of Proceeds.
SECTION 3.18. Schedule 3.18 (as updated from time to time as permitted by Section 5.16) sets forth a list of all Credit Card Agreements to which any Loan Party is a party. A true and complete copy of each Credit Card Agreement listed on Schedule 3.18 has been delivered to the Administrative Agent, together with all material amendments, waivers and other modifications thereto. All such Credit Card Agreements are in full force and effect, currently binding upon each Loan Party that is a party thereto and, to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, binding upon other parties thereto in accordance with their terms. The Loan Parties are in compliance in all material respects with each such Credit Card Agreement.
Credit Card Agreements.
SECTION 4.01. The effectiveness of the amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement in the form of this Agreement is subject to the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in the Second Restatement Agreement.
Second Restatement Effective Date.
SECTION 4.02. The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of each Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to receipt of the request therefor in accordance herewith and to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event.
(a) The representations and warranties of the Loan Parties set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable.
(b) At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
(c) After giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, the aggregate Credit Exposures shall not exceed the lesser of (i) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect or (ii) other than in the case of a Protective Advance or an Overadvance, the Borrowing Base then in effect, and, other than in the case of a Protective Advance or an Overadvance, the Administrative Agent shall have received a Borrowing Base Certificate as of a date not earlier than the last day of the most recent fiscal month ended at least 20 days prior to the date of such Borrowing or such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension.
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrowers on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this Section.
Notwithstanding the failure to satisfy the conditions precedent set forth in paragraphs (a) or (b) of this Section, unless otherwise directed by the Required Lenders, the Administrative Agent may, but shall have no obligation to, continue to make Loans and an Issuing Bank may, but shall have no obligation to, issue or cause to be issued any Letter of Credit for the ratable account and risk of Lenders from time to time if the Administrative Agent believes that making such Loans or issuing or causing to be issued any such Letter of Credit is in the best interests of the Lenders.
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees, expenses and other amounts payable under any Loan Document (other than Banking Services Obligations and contingent or indemnity obligations for which no claim has been made) have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Loan Parties covenant and agree, jointly and severally, with the Lenders that:
SECTION 5.01. The Borrowers will furnish to the Administrative Agent, for distribution to each Lender:
Financial Statements; Borrowing Base and Other Information.
(a) within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, its audited consolidated balance sheet and related consolidated statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all audited by and accompanied by the opinion of Deloitte & Touche LLP or another independent registered public accounting firm of recognized national standing (without a "going concern" or like qualification, exception or emphasis and without any
 
qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP;
(b) within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Company, its consolidated balance sheet as of the end of such fiscal quarter, the related consolidated statements of operations for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year and the related consolidated statement of cash flows for the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by a Financial Officer of the Company as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and such portion of the fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
(c) during any Enhanced Reporting Period, within 20 days after the end of each of the first two fiscal months of each fiscal quarter of the Company, the consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations and cash flows of the Company as of the end of and for such fiscal month and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by a Financial Officer of the Company as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal month and such portion of the fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
(d) concurrently with each delivery of financial statements under clause (a), (b) or (c) above, a completed Compliance Certificate signed by a Financial Officer of the Company (i) certifying, in the case of the financial statements delivered under clause (b) or (c), that such financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes, (ii) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (iii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Section 6.12, (iv) if any
 
change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate (and, in the event of any such change referred to in Section 1.04(b)(ii), with respect to the amounts included in the calculation of the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for the period of four fiscal quarters of the Company then most recently ended, providing a reasonably detailed reconciliation of such amounts as they are reflected in the financial statements accompanying such certificate and as they would be reflected therein without giving effect to such change) and (v) certifying that all notices required to be provided under Sections 5.03 and 5.04 have been provided;
(e) concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, a certificate of the accounting firm that audited such financial statements stating whether it obtained knowledge during the course of its examination of such financial statements of any Default and, in the case it shall have obtained knowledge of any Default, specifying the details thereof (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines); that such certificate shall not be required to be delivered if the Company has used commercially reasonable efforts to cause such certificate to be delivered by such accounting firm and such accounting firm has informed the Company that it is not willing to provide such certificate;
provided
(f) within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, a completed Supplemental Perfection Certificate, signed by a Financial Officer of the Company, setting forth the information required pursuant to the Supplemental Perfection Certificate;
(g) as soon as available, but within 15 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, a copy of the plan and forecast (including a projected consolidated and consolidating balance sheet, statement of operations and statement of cash flow) of the Company for each month of the upcoming fiscal year;
(h) as soon as available but in any event within 20 days (or, during any Enhanced Reporting Period, 3 days) after each Borrowing Base Reporting Date, and at such other times as may be requested by the Administrative Agent, a Borrowing Base Certificate setting forth a computation of the Borrowing Base as of such Borrowing Base Reporting Date, together with supporting information and any additional reports with respect to the Borrowing Base that the Administrative Agent may reasonably request;
(i) as soon as available but in any event within 20 days (or, during any Enhanced Reporting Period, 3 days) after each Borrowing Base
 
Reporting Date, and at such other times as may be requested by the Administrative Agent, the following information as of such Borrowing Base Reporting Date, all delivered electronically in a text formatted file reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent:
 
 
 
 
 
(j) at any time that any Revolving Loan is outstanding or the LC Exposure is equal to or greater than $100,000,000, as soon as available but in any event within 20 days after the end of each calendar month and at such other times as may be reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent, a schedule and aging of the Loan Parties' accounts payable as of the month then ended, delivered electronically in a text formatted file reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent;
(k) promptly upon the Administrative Agent's request:
 
 
(l) at such other times as may be requested by the Administrative Agent, the Loan Parties' sales journal, cash receipts journal and debit memo/credit memo journal as of the period then ended;
(m) at such other times as may be reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent, copies of all tax returns filed by any Loan Party with the IRS;
(n) within 20 days after the first Business Day of March of each year, a certificate of good standing for each Borrower from the appropriate governmental officer in its jurisdiction of incorporation, formation, or organization;
(o) promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by the Company to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
(p) promptly after any request therefor by the Administrative Agent, copies of (i) any documents described in Section 101(k)(1) of ERISA that the Loan Parties or any ERISA Affiliate may request with respect to any Multiemployer Plan (following the receipt thereof from the administrator or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan) and (ii) any notices described in Section 101(l)(1) of ERISA that the Loan Parties or any ERISA Affiliate may request with respect to any Multiemployer Plan (following the receipt thereof from the administrator
 
or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan); that if an ERISA Event has occurred or, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, is reasonably likely to occur, and the Loan Parties or any ERISA Affiliate have not requested such documents or notices from the administrator or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan, upon request by the Administrative Agent, the applicable Loan Party or ERISA Affiliate shall promptly make a request for such documents and notices from such administrator or sponsor and shall provide copies of such documents and notices to the Administrative Agent promptly after receipt thereof; and
provided
(q) promptly after any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Company or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of any Loan Document, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request.
Information required to be delivered pursuant to clause (a), (b) or (o) of this Section shall be deemed to have been delivered if such information, or one or more annual or quarterly reports containing such information, shall have been posted by the Administrative Agent on an IntraLinks or similar site to which the Lenders have been granted access or shall be available on the website of the SEC at http://www.sec.gov. Information required to be delivered pursuant to this Section may also be delivered by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent.
SECTION 5.02. The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent (for distribution to the Lenders) written notice promptly upon any Financial Officer, or other officer or employee responsible for compliance with the Loan Documents, of the Company or any Subsidiary becoming aware of any of the following:
Notices of Material Events.
(a) the occurrence of any Default;
(b) the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary, or any adverse development in any such pending action, suit or proceeding not previously disclosed in writing by the Company to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, that in each case could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect or that in any manner questions the validity of any Loan Document;
(c) any Lien (other than a Permitted Encumbrance or any Lien securing Permitted Term Indebtedness) or claim made or asserted against any material portion of the Collateral;
(d) any and all default notices received under or with respect to any leased location or public warehouse where Collateral having an aggregate value in excess of $10,000,000 is located (which shall be delivered within two Business Days after receipt thereof); and
 
(e) any other development that has resulted, or could reasonably be expected to result, in a Material Adverse Effect.
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Company setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
SECTION 5.03. . If any additional Domestic Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Second Restatement Effective Date, the Company will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will, as promptly as practicable, and in any event within 30 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in writing) after such Domestic Subsidiary is formed or acquired (i) if such Domestic Subsidiary is a Designated Subsidiary, execute and deliver a Joinder Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit H (the ""), and (ii) cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied with respect to such Domestic Subsidiary and with respect to any Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of such Domestic Subsidiary owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party. If any additional Eligible Foreign Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Second Restatement Effective Date, the Company will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will, as promptly as practicable, and in any event within 60 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in writing) after such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary is formed or acquired, cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied with respect to any Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party.
Additional Subsidiaries
Joinder Agreement
SECTION 5.04. (a) Each Loan Party will furnish to the Administrative Agent prompt written notice of any change in (i) its legal name, as set forth in its organizational documents, (ii) its jurisdiction of organization or the form of its organization (including as a result of any merger or consolidation), (iii) the location of its chief executive office or (iv) its organizational identification number, if any, or, with respect to any Loan Party organized under the laws of a jurisdiction that requires such information to be set forth on the face of a UCC financing statement, its Federal Taxpayer Identification Number. Each Loan Party agrees not to effect or permit any change referred to in the preceding sentence unless all filings have been made under the UCC or otherwise that are required in order for the Administrative Agent to continue at all times following such change to have a valid, legal and perfected security interest in all the Collateral affected thereby. Each Loan Party also agrees promptly to notify the Administrative Agent if any material portion of the Collateral is damaged or destroyed.
Information Regarding Collateral.
(b) If (i) any Mortgaged Property is acquired by any Loan Party after the Second Restatement Effective Date or (ii) any material assets are acquired by any Loan Party after the Second Restatement Effective Date (other than assets constituting
 
Collateral under the Collateral Documents that become subject to the Lien of the Collateral Documents upon the acquisition thereof), the Loan Parties will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will cause such assets to be subjected to a Lien securing the Secured Obligations and will take such actions as shall be necessary or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to grant and perfect such Lien, all at the expense of the Loan Parties. It is understood and agreed that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this Agreement or in any Collateral Document, the Loan Parties shall not be required to (A) grant leasehold mortgages, (B) obtain landlord lien waivers or Collateral Access Agreements with respect to any of their retail operating store locations or (C) enter into Deposit Account Control Agreements in respect of any Excluded Deposit Account.
SECTION 5.05. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, do or cause to be done all things reasonably necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation, dissolution, disposition or other transaction permitted under Section 6.03 or 6.05.
Existence; Conduct of Business.
provided
SECTION 5.06. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, pay or discharge all its material obligations, including Tax liabilities, before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) (i) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (ii) such Loan Party or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books reserves with respect thereto to the extent required by GAAP and (iii) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and the enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation or (b) the failure to make payment could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Obligations.
SECTION 5.07. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
Maintenance of Properties.
SECTION 5.08. The Loan Parties will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies having a financial strength rating of at least A- by A.M. Best Company (a) insurance in such amounts (with no greater risk retention) and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies of established repute engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations and (b) all insurance required to be maintained pursuant to the Collateral Documents. The Borrower will furnish to the Lenders, upon request of the Administrative Agent, information in reasonable detail as to the insurance so maintained. With respect to each Mortgaged Property that is located in an area determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency to have special flood hazards, the applicable Loan Party has obtained and will maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies, such flood insurance as is required under applicable law, including Regulation H of the Board of Governors.
Insurance.
 
SECTION 5.09. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, (a) keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct (in all material respects) entries in accordance with GAAP and applicable law are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities and (b) permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender (including employees of the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any consultants, accountants, lawyers and appraisers retained by the Administrative Agent), upon reasonable prior notice (but in no event more than once each fiscal year of the Company unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing), to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and, accompanied by one or more such officers or their designees if requested by the Company, independent accountants, all at such reasonable times during normal business hours and as often as reasonably requested. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the right of the Administrative Agent or any Lender to conduct appraisals or field examinations shall be governed exclusively by Sections 5.12 and 5.13, respectively, and shall not be limited by this Section.
Books and Records; Inspection Rights.
SECTION 5.10. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, comply with all laws, including all orders of any Governmental Authority, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws.
SECTION 5.11. The Letters of Credit and the proceeds of the Loans will be used only for general corporate purposes of the Borrowers and their subsidiaries, including the financing of the Acquisition. No part of the proceeds of any Loan and no Letter of Credit will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board of Governors, including Regulations T, U and X.
Use of Proceeds.
SECTION 5.12. The Loan Parties will provide to the Administrative Agent from time to time upon the Administrative Agent's request, at the sole expense of the Loan Parties, appraisals (or updates thereof) of the Inventory of the Loan Parties from appraisers selected and engaged by the Administrative Agent, prepared on a basis consistent in all material respects with the inventory appraisals referred to in Section 4.01(h) of the Existing Credit Agreement (with such adjustments as shall be deemed appropriate to reflect events or changes in circumstances after the dates of such appraisals); that the Administrative Agent shall be entitled to request only one such appraisal in any calendar year, except that (a) at any time when Availability shall have been less than the greater of (i) the lesser of (x) 20% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect or (y) 20% of the Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $47,500,000 for three consecutive Business Days, the Administrative Agent may request a second appraisal in the then-current calendar year, (b) if an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, there shall be no limitation on the number of appraisals that the Administrative Agent may request and (c) if the Company or any Subsidiary shall have consummated any Permitted Acquisition, the Administrative Agent may request a separate appraisal of the inventory acquired thereby to the extent the Loan Parties desire to include such inventory in Eligible Inventory. For purposes of the
Appraisals.
provided
 
foregoing, it is understood that a single appraisal may consist of appraisals of the assets of each Loan Party and may be conducted at multiple sites. Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon reasonable advance notice to the Company, the Administrative Agent may request appraisals in addition to those authorized by the preceding sentences of this Section; that the Loan Parties will not be responsible for the expense of appraisals conducted pursuant to this sentence.
provided
SECTION 5.13. At any time that the Administrative Agent requests, the Company and the Subsidiaries will allow the Administrative Agent, at the sole expense of the Loan Parties, to conduct, or engage a third party to conduct, field examinations (or updates thereof) during normal business hours to ensure the adequacy of Collateral included in the Borrowing Base and related reporting and control systems; that the Administrative Agent shall be entitled to conduct only one such field examination in any calendar year, except that (a) at any time when Availability shall have been less than the greater of (i) the lesser of (x) 20% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (y) 20% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $47,500,000 for three consecutive Business Days, the Administrative Agent may conduct a second field examination in the then-current calendar year, (b) if an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, there shall be no limitation on the number of field examinations that the Administrative Agent may conduct and (c) if the Company or any Subsidiary shall have consummated any Permitted Acquisition, the Administrative Agent may conduct a separate field examination of the Collateral acquired thereby to the extent the Loan Parties desire to include such Collateral in the Borrowing Base. For purposes of the foregoing, it is understood that a single field examination may consist of examinations of the assets of each Loan Party and may be conducted at multiple sites. Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon reasonable advance notice to the Company, the Administrative Agent may conduct, or engage a third party to conduct, field examinations in addition to those authorized by the preceding sentences of this Section; that the Loan Parties will not be responsible for the expense of field examinations conducted pursuant to this sentence.
Field Examinations.
provided
provided
SECTION 5.14. The Loan Parties will, and will cause Subsidiaries to, maintain the Administrative Agent or one or more Lenders acceptable to the Administrative Agent as their principal depository bank, including for the maintenance of operating, administrative, cash management, collection activity, and other Deposit Accounts for the conduct of their business; that the Loan Parties shall not be required to satisfy the foregoing requirement with respect to (a) the Deposit Accounts of the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries maintained with any financial institution with which the Acquired Company or any such subsidiary maintained a Deposit Account prior to the Second Restatement Effective Date or (b) any Deposit Account that is an Excluded Deposit Account.
Depository Banks.
provided
SECTION 5.15. The Loan Parties will execute any and all further documents, financing statements, agreements and instruments, and take all such further actions (including the filing and recording of financing statements, fixture filings, mortgages, deeds of trust and other documents) that may be required under any applicable law, or that the Administrative Agent may reasonably request, to cause the
Further Assurances.
 
Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be and remain satisfied at all times, all at the expense of the Loan Parties. The Loan Parties also agree to provide to the Administrative Agent, from time to time upon request, evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent as to the perfection and priority of the Liens created or intended to be created by the Collateral Documents.
SECTION 5.16. Each Loan Party will (a) comply in all material respects with all its obligations under each Credit Card Agreement to which it is party and (b) maintain credit card arrangements solely with the credit card issuers and credit card processors identified on Schedule 3.18; , , that the Company may amend Schedule 3.18 to remove any credit card issuer or credit card processor identified on such Schedule or to add additional credit card issuers and credit card processors that are satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its reasonable discretion, and concurrently with the making of any such amendment the Loan Party shall provide to the Administrative Agent evidence that a Credit Card Notification shall have been delivered to any credit card issuer or credit card processor added to such Schedule.
Credit Card Agreements and Notifications.
provided
however
SECTION 5.17. The Loan Parties shall deliver, when and as required by the terms of the Post-Closing Letter Agreement, the items referenced therein.
Post Closing Requirements.
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees, expenses and other amounts payable under any Loan Document (other than Banking Services Obligations and contingent or indemnity obligations for which no claim has been made) have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Loan Parties covenant and agree, jointly and severally, with the Lenders that:
SECTION 6.01. (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
Indebtedness; Certain Equity Securities.
(i) Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
(ii) Indebtedness existing on the Second Restatement Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.01 and Refinancing Indebtedness in respect thereof;
(iii) Indebtedness of the Company to any Subsidiary and of any Subsidiary to the Company or any other Subsidiary; that (A) such Indebtedness shall not have been transferred to any Person other than the Company or any Subsidiary, (B) any such Indebtedness owing by any Loan
provided
 
Party shall be unsecured and subordinated in right of payment to the Obligations on terms customary for intercompany subordinated Indebtedness, as reasonably determined by the Administrative Agent, (C) any such Indebtedness owing to any Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note (which may be a global promissory note) that shall have been pledged pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement and (D) any such Indebtedness owing by any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to any Loan Party shall be incurred in compliance with Section 6.04;
(iv) Guarantees incurred in compliance with Section 6.04;
(v) Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary (A) incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations, that such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 180 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and the principal amount of such Indebtedness does not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets or (B) assumed in connection with the acquisition of any fixed or capital assets, and Refinancing Indebtedness in respect of any of the foregoing; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (v) shall not exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
provided
(vi) Indebtedness in respect of netting services, overdraft protections (in an aggregate amount not to exceed $1,000,000 at any time outstanding) and otherwise in connection with deposit and checking accounts;
(vii) Indebtedness in respect of letters of credit, bank guarantees and similar instruments issued for the account of the Company or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business supporting obligations under workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws;
(viii) Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary in the form of purchase price adjustments or earn-outs incurred in connection with any Permitted Acquisition or other Investment permitted by Section 6.04;
(ix) the Acquired Company Convertible Notes;
(x) Permitted Term Indebtedness in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $400,000,000 at any time outstanding;
(xi) Indebtedness of Loan Parties in respect of surety bonds (whether bid performance or otherwise) and other obligations of a like nature, in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business; and
 
(xii) other Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties permitted by this clause (xii) shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding; and that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (xii) that is secured by Liens on the assets of the Loan Parties may not exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding.
provided
provided
further
(b) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, issue any Disqualified Stock, other than, in the case of the Subsidiaries, to the Company or a Subsidiary; that any issuance of Equity Interests of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to any Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.04.
provided
SECTION 6.02. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any asset now owned or hereafter acquired, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Liens.
(a) Liens created under the Loan Documents;
(b) Permitted Encumbrances;
(c) any Lien on any asset of the Company or any Subsidiary existing on the Second Restatement Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.02; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other asset of the Company or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations that it secures on the Second Restatement Effective Date and any extensions, renewals and refinancings thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
(d) any Lien existing on any asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Company or any Subsidiary or existing on any asset of any Person that becomes (including pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition) a Subsidiary (or of any Person not previously a Subsidiary that is merged or consolidated with or into a Subsidiary in a transaction permitted hereunder) after the Second Restatement Effective Date prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary (or is so merged or consolidated); that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary (or such merger or consolidation), (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other assets of the Company or any Subsidiary (other than, in the case of any such merger or consolidation, the assets of any special purpose merger Subsidiary that is a party thereto) and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations that it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary (or is so merged or consolidated) and any extensions, renewals and refinancings thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
 
(e) Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Company or any Subsidiary; that (i) such Liens secure only Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(a)(v) and obligations relating thereto not constituting Indebtedness and (ii) such Liens shall not apply to any other asset of the Company or any Subsidiary (other than the proceeds and products thereof); that in the event purchase money obligations are owed to any Person with respect to financing of more than one purchase of any fixed or capital assets, such Liens may secure all such purchase money obligations and may apply to all such fixed or capital assets financed by such Person;
provided
provided
further
(f) in connection with the sale or transfer of any Equity Interests or other assets in a transaction permitted under Section 6.05, customary rights and restrictions contained in agreements relating to such sale or transfer pending the completion thereof;
(g) in the case of (i) any Subsidiary that is not a wholly-owned Subsidiary or (ii) the Equity Interests in any Person that is not a Subsidiary, any encumbrance or restriction, including any put and call arrangements, related to Equity Interests in such Subsidiary or such other Person set forth in the organizational documents of such Subsidiary or such other Person or any related joint venture, shareholders' or similar agreement;
(h) Liens solely on any cash earnest money deposits, escrow arrangements or similar arrangements made by the Company or any Subsidiary in connection with any letter of intent or purchase agreement for a Permitted Acquisition or other transaction permitted hereunder;
(i) Liens securing Permitted Term Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(a)(x) and obligations relating thereto not constituting Indebtedness; that such Liens (i) attach only to the Collateral and (ii) are subject to the Intercreditor Agreement;
provided
(j) any Lien on assets of any Foreign Subsidiary; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any Collateral (including any Equity Interests in any Foreign Subsidiary that constitute Collateral) or any other asset of the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary and (B) such Lien shall secure only Indebtedness of such Foreign Subsidiary permitted by Section 6.01(a)(xii) and obligations relating thereto not constituting Indebtedness; and
provided
(k) other Liens securing Indebtedness or other obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding (it being understood that in the event any such Liens extend to Credit Card Accounts Receivable or Inventory, such Credit Card Accounts Receivable or Inventory shall, to the extent otherwise included therein, cease to be Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable or Eligible Inventory, as applicable).
 
SECTION 6.03. (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing (i) any Subsidiary may merge into the Company in a transaction in which the Company is the surviving corporation, (ii) any Person (other than the Company) may merge into or consolidate with any Subsidiary in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary and, if any party to such merger or consolidation is a Loan Party, a Loan Party, (iii) any Subsidiary may merge into or consolidate with any Person (other than the Company) in a transaction permitted under Section 6.05 in which, after giving effect to such transaction, the surviving entity is not a Subsidiary and (iv) any Subsidiary (other than a Borrower) may liquidate or dissolve if the Company determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Company and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders; that any such merger or consolidation involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger or consolidation shall not be permitted unless it is also permitted by Section 6.04. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the Company or any Subsidiary from effecting the Acquisition.
Fundamental Changes; Business Activities.
provided
(b) The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Company and the Subsidiaries on the Second Restatement Effective Date and businesses reasonably related or complementary thereto, including development, operation and promotion of certain gift products, of other apparel or accessories in a specialty store, catalogue or e-commerce environment.
SECTION 6.04. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, purchase, hold, acquire (including pursuant to any merger or consolidation with any Person that was not a wholly-owned Subsidiary prior thereto), make or otherwise permit to exist any Investment in any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) all or substantially all the assets of any other Person or of a business unit, division, product line or line of business of any other Person, except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions.
(a) Permitted Investments;
(b) Investments existing on the Second Restatement Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.04 (but not any additions thereto (including any capital contributions) made after the Second Restatement Effective Date);
(c) Investments by the Company and the Subsidiaries in Equity Interests in their respective subsidiaries; that (i) such subsidiaries are Subsidiaries prior to such Investments, (ii) any such Equity Interests
provided
 
held by a Loan Party shall be pledged in accordance with the requirements of the definition of the term "Collateral and Guarantee Requirement" and (iii) the aggregate amount of such Investments by the Loan Parties in, and loans and advances by the Loan Parties to, and Guarantees by the Loan Parties of Indebtedness and other obligations of, Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties (excluding all such Investments, loans, advances and Guarantees existing on the Second Restatement Effective Date and permitted by clause (b) above) shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
(d) loans or advances made by the Company to any Subsidiary or made by any Subsidiary to the Company or any other Subsidiary; that (i) the Indebtedness resulting therefrom is permitted by Section 6.01(a)(iii), (ii) any such loans and advances made by a Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note (which may be in the form of a grid note) pledged pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement and (iii) the amount of such loans and advances made by the Loan Parties to Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties shall be subject to the limitation set forth in clause (c) above;
provided
(e) Guarantees by the Company or any Subsidiary of Indebtedness or other obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary (including any such Guarantees (i) arising as a result of any such Person being a joint and several co-applicant with respect to any letter of credit or letter of guaranty or (ii) of any leases of retail store locations and related obligations arising thereunder); that the aggregate amount of Indebtedness and other obligations of Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties that is Guaranteed by any Loan Party shall be subject to the limitation set forth in clause (c) above;
provided
(f) Guarantees of the obligations of the Canadian Subsidiaries under real property leases; that the aggregate amount of Guarantees under this clause (f) may not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
(g) Investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(h) any Permitted Acquisition; that (i) both before and after giving effect to such acquisition no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (ii) after giving effect to such acquisition (other than the Acquisition) (A) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio, computed on a Pro Forma Basis for the most recent period of four fiscal quarters of the Company for which financial statements shall have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 (or, prior to the first such delivery, ending on April 28, 2012), shall be not less than 1.10 to 1.00 and (B)
provided
 
Availability, determined on a Pro Forma Basis, shall have been and shall be not less than 17.5% of the total Revolving Commitments in effect at all times during the period commencing on the 60th day before such acquisition and (iii) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clause (ii) above and confirming that the other requirements of the definition of the term "Permitted Acquisition" and this clause (h) have been satisfied;
(i) deposits, prepayments and other credits to suppliers, lessors and landlords made in the ordinary course of business;
(j) advances by the Company or any Subsidiary to employees in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices for travel and entertainment expenses, relocation costs and similar purposes;
(k) Investments made as a result of receipt of non-cash consideration from a sale, transfer or other disposition of assets permitted under Section 6.05; that any such Investment in the form of a promissory note in an amount in excess of $5,000,000 shall be pledged pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement;
provided
(l) Investments in the form of Swap Agreements permitted under Section 6.07;
(m) investments constituting deposits described in clauses (c) and (d) of the definition of "Permitted Encumbrances" and endorsements of instruments for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business;
(n) acquisitions of individual retail store locations and leases;
(o) Investments in unconsolidated entities that do not constitute Subsidiaries of the Company; that the aggregate amount of Investments under this clause (o) may not exceed $35,000,000 at any time outstanding; and
provided
(p) other Investments; that (i) both before and after giving effect to such Investment no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (ii) Availability, determined on a Pro Forma Basis, shall have been and shall be not less than 17.5% of the aggregate Revolving Commitments in effect at all times during the period commencing on the 60th day before such Investment and (iii) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clause (ii)
provided
 
above and confirming that the other requirements of this clause (p) have been satisfied; that a purchase or acquisition (in one transaction or a series of transactions) of all or substantially all the assets of any Person or of a business unit, division, product line or line of business of any Person, may be only made in reliance on clause (h) of this Section and not on this clause (p).
provided
further
For the purposes of this Section, any unreimbursed payment by the Company or any Subsidiary for goods or services delivered to any Subsidiary shall be deemed to be an Investment in such Subsidiary.
SECTION 6.05. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any asset, including any Equity Interest owned by it, nor will the Company permit any Subsidiary to issue any additional Equity Interests in such Subsidiary (other than to the Company or any other Subsidiary in compliance with Section 6.04, and other than directors' qualifying shares and other nominal amounts of Equity Interests that are required to be held by other Persons under applicable law), except:
Asset Sales.
(a) (i) sales of inventory, (ii) sales, transfers and other dispositions of used, surplus, obsolete or outmoded machinery or equipment, (iii) contributions of merchandise to charitable organizations and (iv) dispositions of cash and Permitted Investments, in each case (other than in the case of clause (iv)) in the ordinary course of business;
(b) sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions to the Company or any Subsidiary; that any such sales, transfers, leases or other dispositions involving a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be made in compliance with Sections 6.04 and 6.09;
provided
(c) the sale or discount of accounts receivable arising in the ordinary course of business, but only in connection with the compromise or collection thereof and not in connection with any financing transaction;
(d) dispositions of assets subject to any casualty or condemnation proceeding (including in lieu thereof);
(e) leases or subleases of real property granted by the Company or any Subsidiary to third Persons not interfering in any material respect with the business of the Company or any Subsidiary, including retail store lease assignments and surrenders;
(f) the sale, transfer or other disposition of patents, trademarks, copyrights and other intellectual property (i) in the ordinary course of business, including pursuant to non-exclusive licenses of intellectual property; that no such sale, transfer or other disposition shall adversely affect in any material respect the fair value of any Eligible Inventory or the ability of the Administrative Agent to dispose of or
provided
 
otherwise realize upon any Eligible Inventory, or (ii) which, in the reasonable judgment of the Company or any Subsidiary, are determined to be uneconomical, negligible or obsolete in the conduct of business;
(g) Sale/Leaseback Transactions permitted by Section 6.06;
(h) the sale, transfer or other disposition of certain operations acquired as part of the Acquisition and consistent with the plan therefor previously communicated by the Company to the Administrative Agent;
(i) sales, transfers and other dispositions of assets that are not permitted by any other clause of this Section; that the aggregate fair value of all assets sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance on this clause (i) shall not exceed $35,000,000 during any fiscal year of the Company; and
provided
(j) sales, transfers and other dispositions of any real property;
that all sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions permitted hereby (other than those permitted by clause (a)(ii), (a)(iii), (b) or (d) above) shall be made for fair value and, in the case of sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions permitted by clauses (c), (f)(ii), (g), (h), (i) and (j) above, for at least 75% cash consideration.
provided
Notwithstanding the foregoing, other than dispositions to the Company or any Subsidiary in compliance with Section 6.04, and other than directors' qualifying shares and other nominal amounts of Equity Interests that are required to be held by other Persons under applicable requirements of law, (a) no such sale, transfer or other disposition of any Equity Interests in any Subsidiary shall be permitted unless (i) such Equity Interests constitute all the Equity Interests in such Subsidiary held by the Company and the Subsidiaries and (ii) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, the Company and the Subsidiaries shall otherwise be in compliance with Section 6.04 and (b) no such sale, transfer or other disposition of any Equity Interests in any Borrowing Subsidiary shall be permitted.
SECTION 6.06. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Sale/Leaseback Transaction, except for any such sale of any fixed or capital assets that is made for cash consideration in an amount not less than the cost of such fixed or capital asset and is consummated within 180 days after the Company or a Subsidiary acquires or completes the construction of such fixed or capital assets.
Sale/Leaseback Transactions.
SECTION 6.07. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Swap Agreement, other than Swap Agreements entered into in the ordinary course of business to hedge or mitigate risks to which the Company or a Subsidiary is exposed in the conduct of its business or the management of its liabilities and not for speculative purposes.
Swap Agreements.
 
SECTION 6.08. (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, or incur any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to do so, except that (i) the Company may declare and pay dividends with respect to its Equity Interests payable solely in additional Equity Interests (other than Disqualified Stock), (ii) any Subsidiary may declare and pay dividends or make other distributions with respect to its capital stock, partnership or membership interests or other similar Equity Interests, or make other Restricted Payments in respect of its Equity Interests, in each case ratably to the holders of such Equity Interests (or, if not ratably, on a basis more favorable to the Company and the Subsidiaries), (iii) the Company may make Restricted Payments, not exceeding $1,000,000 during any fiscal year of the Company, pursuant to and in accordance with stock option plans or other benefit plans for management or employees of the Company and the Subsidiaries, (iv) the Company may repurchase Equity Interests upon the exercise of stock options if such Equity Interests represent a portion of the exercise price of such options, (v) the Company may make cash payments in lieu of the issuance of fractional shares representing insignificant interests in the Company in connection with the exercise of warrants, options or other securities convertible into or exchangeable for shares of common stock in the Company and (vi) the Company may repurchase shares of its common stock and make other Restricted Payments, that at the time of and immediately after giving effect to any such repurchase or other Restricted Payment referred to in this clause (vi), (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio, computed on a Pro Forma Basis for the most recent period of four fiscal quarters of the Company for which financial statements shall have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 (or, prior to the first such delivery, ending on April 28, 2012), shall be not less than 1.15 to 1.00, (C) Availability, determined on a Pro Forma Basis, shall have been and shall be not less than 17.5% of the total Revolving Commitments in effect at all times during the period commencing on the 60th day before such Restricted Payment and (D) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clauses (B) and (C) above and confirming that the other requirements of this clause (vi) have been satisfied.
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments of Indebtedness.
provided
(b) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, make or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) of or in respect of principal of or interest on any Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(xii), or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(xii), except:
(i) payments of regularly scheduled interest and principal payments as and when due in respect of any Indebtedness, other than payments in respect of any Subordinated Indebtedness prohibited by the subordination provisions thereof;
 
(ii) refinancings of Indebtedness with the proceeds of other Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01;
(iii) payment of secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of (A) any voluntary sale or transfer of any assets securing such Indebtedness or (B) any casualty or condemnation proceeding (including a disposition in lieu thereof) of any assets securing such Indebtedness;
(iv) payments of or in respect of Indebtedness solely by issuance of the common stock of the Company;
(v) payments of or in respect of Indebtedness incurred by any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party; and
(vi) other payments of or in respect of Indebtedness; that at the time of and immediately after giving effect thereto, (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio, computed on a Pro Forma Basis for the most recent period of four fiscal quarters for which financial statements shall have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 (or, prior to the first such delivery, ending on April 28, 2012), shall be not less than 1.15 to 1.00, (C) Availability, determined on a Pro Forma Basis, shall have been and shall be not less than 17.5% of the total Revolving Commitments in effect at all times during the period commencing on the 60th day before such payment and (D) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clauses(B) and (C) above and confirming that the other requirements of this clause (vi) have been satisfied.
provided
SECTION 6.09. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease, license or otherwise transfer any assets to, or purchase, lease, license or otherwise acquire any assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) transactions in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than those that would prevail in an arm's-length transactions with unrelated third parties, (b) transactions between or among the Loan Parties not involving any other Affiliate, (c) any Restricted Payment permitted by Section 6.08, (d) the payment of reasonable fees and compensation to, and the providing of reasonable indemnities on behalf of, directors and officers of the Company or any Subsidiary, as determined by the board of directors of the Company in good faith and (e) the transactions described on Schedule 6.09.
Transactions with Affiliates.
SECTION 6.10. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of the Company or any Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon
Restrictive Agreements.
 
any of its assets to secure any Secured Obligations or (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to its Equity Interests or to make or repay loans or advances to the Company or any Subsidiary or to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to (A) restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by any Loan Document, (B) restrictions and conditions existing on the Second Restatement Effective Date identified on Schedule 6.10 (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (C) customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary pending such sale, that such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (D) in the case of any Subsidiary that is not a wholly-owned Subsidiary, restrictions and conditions imposed by its organizational documents or any related joint venture or similar agreement, that such restrictions and conditions apply only to such Subsidiary and to any Equity Interests in such Subsidiary, (E) restrictions and conditions set forth in the definitive documentation governing any Permitted Term Indebtedness, that, in the case of clause (a) above, such restrictions and conditions are no more onerous than those set forth in the Term Credit Agreement as in effect on the Second Restatement Effective Date, and (F) restrictions and conditions imposed by agreements relating to Indebtedness of Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties permitted under Section 6.01(a), that such restrictions and conditions apply only to such Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties, (ii) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to (A) restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(a)(v) if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the assets securing such Indebtedness and (B) customary provisions in leases and other agreements restricting the assignment thereof and (iii) clause (b) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by agreements relating to Indebtedness of any Subsidiary in existence at the time such Subsidiary became a Subsidiary and otherwise permitted under Section 6.01(a) (but shall apply to any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), that such restrictions and conditions apply only to such Subsidiary. Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to modify the requirements set forth in the definition of the term "Guarantee and Collateral Requirement" or the obligations of the Loan Parties under Sections 5.03, 5.04 or 5.15 or under the Collateral Documents.
provided
provided
provided
provided
provided
provided
SECTION 6.11. The Company will not, or will permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive any of its rights under its certificate of incorporation, by-laws or other organizational documents, in either case, to the extent such amendment, modification or waiver would be adverse in any material respect to the rights or interests of the Lenders hereunder or under any other Loan Document.
Amendment of Organizational Documents.
SECTION 6.12. The Company will not permit the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for any period of four fiscal quarters ending during a Covenant Period to be less than 1.00 to 1.00.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
 
SECTION 6.13. The Company will not change its fiscal year or its method of determining fiscal quarters (it being understood that the foregoing shall not restrict changes to the fiscal years of each of the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries in order to conform to the fiscal year of the Company).
Changes in Fiscal Periods.
If any of the following events ("") shall occur:
Events of Default
(a) the Borrowers shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
(b) the Borrowers shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days;
(c) any representation, warranty or certification made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been materially incorrect when made or deemed made;
(d) any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 5.02(a), 5.05 (with respect to a Loan Party's existence) or 5.11 or in Article VI;
(e) the Loan Parties shall fail to comply with Section 5.01(h), 5.01(i) or 5.08 and any such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days or more, or any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any other covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement or any other Loan Document (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after the earlier of (i) any Loan Party's knowledge of such breach or (ii) notice thereof from the Administrative Agent;
(f) any Loan Party or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal, interest, termination payment or other payment obligation and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness when and as the same shall become due and payable (after giving effect to any applicable grace period);
 
(g) any event or condition shall occur that results in any Material Indebtedness (other than with respect to the Acquired Company Convertible Notes) becoming due, or being terminated or required to be prepaid, repurchased, redeemed or defeased, prior to its scheduled maturity, or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness (other than with respect to the Acquired Company Convertible Notes) or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf, or, in the case of any Swap Agreement, the applicable counterparty, to cause any Material Indebtedness (other than with respect to the Acquired Company Convertible Notes) to become due, or to terminate or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to (i) any secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the assets securing such Indebtedness or (ii) any Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of a voluntary refinancing thereof permitted under Section 6.01;
provided
(h) an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of the Company or any Material Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Material Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
(i) the Company or any Material Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation (other than any liquidation permitted by Section 6.03(a)(iv)), reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Material Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding or (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, or the board of directors (or similar governing body) of the Company or any Material Subsidiary (or any committee thereof) shall adopt any resolution or otherwise authorize any action to approve any of the actions referred to above in this clause (i) or clause (h) of this Article;
(j) the Company or any Material Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
(k) one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $50,000,000 (to the extent not covered by independent third-party insurance as to which the insurer has been notified of such judgment and has not denied coverage) shall be rendered against the Company or any Subsidiary, or any combination
 
thereof, and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor to attach or levy upon any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
(l) one or more ERISA Events shall have occurred that could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
(m) a Change in Control shall occur;
(n) the Loan Guarantee shall fail to remain in full force or effect or any action shall be taken to discontinue or to assert the invalidity or unenforceability of the Loan Guarantee, or any Loan Guarantor shall fail to comply in any material respect with any of the terms or provisions of the Loan Guarantee to which it is a party, or any Loan Guarantor shall deny that it has any further liability under the Loan Guarantee to which it is a party, or shall give notice to such effect (except as a result of the release thereof as provided herein);
(o) any Lien purported to be created under any Collateral Document shall cease to be, or shall be asserted by any Loan Party not to be, a valid and perfected Lien on any material Collateral, with the priority required by the applicable Collateral Document, except (i) as a result of the sale or other disposition of the applicable Collateral in a transaction permitted under the Loan Documents, (ii) the release thereof as provided in the applicable Collateral Document or Section 9.02(c) or (iii) as a result of the failure of the Administrative Agent (or, in the case of the Term First Priority Collateral, the failure of the collateral agent under the Term Credit Agreement) to (A) maintain possession of any stock certificates, promissory notes or other instruments delivered to it under the Restated Security Agreement or (B) continue in accordance with applicable law the effectiveness of any UCC financing statement; or
(p) the Intercreditor Agreement is not or ceases to be binding on or enforceable against any party thereto (or against any Person on whose behalf any such party makes any covenant or agreements therein), or shall otherwise not be effective to create the rights and obligations purported to be created thereunder, in each case in any respect material to the Administrative Agent or the other Lender Parties;
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to any Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower Representative, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Revolving Commitments, and thereupon the Revolving Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, in each case without
 
presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers; and in the case of any event with respect to any Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Revolving Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall immediately and automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers to the extent permitted by applicable law.
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks hereby irrevocably appoints the entity named as Administrative Agent in the heading of this Agreement and its successors to serve as administrative agent and collateral agent under the Loan Documents, and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf, including execution of the other Loan Documents, and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms of the Loan Documents, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. In addition, to the extent required under the laws of any jurisdiction other than the United States of America, each of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks hereby grants to the Administrative Agent any required powers of attorney to execute any Collateral Document governed by the laws of such jurisdiction on such Lender's or Issuing Bank's behalf.
The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender or Issuing Bank and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, own securities of, act as the financial advisor or in any other advisory capacity for and generally engage in any kind of business with the Company or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder and without any duty to account therefor to the Lenders or the Issuing Banks.
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth in the Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing (and it is understood and agreed that the use of the term "agent" herein or in any other Loan Documents (or any other similar term) with reference to the Administrative Agent is not intended to connote any fiduciary or other implied (or express) obligations arising under agency doctrine of any applicable law, and that such term is used as a matter of market custom and is intended to create or reflect only an administrative relationship between contracting parties), (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or to exercise any discretionary power, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative
 
Agent is required to exercise as directed in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary, or as the Administrative Agent shall believe in good faith to be necessary, under the circumstances as provided in the Loan Documents), that the Administrative Agent shall not be required to take any action that, in its opinion, could expose the Administrative Agent to liability or be contrary to any Loan Document or applicable law, and (c) except as expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Company or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary, or as the Administrative Agent shall believe in good faith to be necessary, under the circumstances as provided in the Loan Documents) or in the absence of its own bad faith, gross negligence or wilful misconduct (such absence to be presumed unless otherwise determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and nonappealable judgment). The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof (stating that it is a "notice of default") is given to the Administrative Agent by the Borrower Representative or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or in connection with any Loan Document, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth in any Loan Document or the occurrence of any Default, (iv) the sufficiency, validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of any Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, (v) the creation, perfection or priority of Liens on the Collateral or the existence of the Collateral, or (vi) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
provided
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely, and shall not incur any liability for relying, upon any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing (including any electronic message, Internet or intranet website posting or other distribution) believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed, sent or otherwise authenticated by the proper Person (whether or not such Person in fact meets the requirements set forth in the Loan Documents for being the signatory, sender or authenticator thereof). The Administrative Agent also shall be entitled to rely, and shall not incur any liability for relying, upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person (whether or not such Person in fact meets the requirements set forth in the Loan Documents for being the signatory, sender or authenticator thereof), and may act upon any such statement prior to receipt of written confirmation thereof. In determining compliance with any condition hereunder to the making of a Loan, or the issuance, extension, renewal or increase of a Letter of Credit, that by its terms must be fulfilled to the satisfaction of a Lender or an Issuing Bank, the Administrative Agent may presume that such condition is satisfactory to such Lender or Issuing Bank unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice to the contrary
 
from such Lender or Issuing Bank prior to the making of such Loan or the issuance of such Letter of Credit. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrowers), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers hereunder or under any other Loan Document by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all their duties and exercise their rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of this Article shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for the bad faith, negligence or misconduct of any sub-agents except to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction determines in a final and nonappealable judgment that the Administrative Agent acted with bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct in the selection of such sub-agents.
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Borrower Representative. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Borrowers, to appoint a successor that is an Eligible Successor Agent. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, in consultation with the Borrower Representative, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which is an Eligible Successor Agent, until such time, if any, as the Required Lenders appoint a successor Administrative Agent. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. The fees payable by the Borrowers to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrowers and such successor. After the Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article, Section 2.17(d) and Section 9.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
Each Lender and Issuing Bank acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, any Lender or any Issuing Bank, or any of the Related Parties of any of the foregoing, and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis
 
and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender and Issuing Bank also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, any Lender or any Issuing Bank, or any of the Related Parties of any of the foregoing, and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
The Loan Parties acknowledge and agree that the Administrative Agent may prepare and distribute to the Lenders Reports containing information obtained by the Administrative Agent through the conduct of appraisals and field examinations pursuant to Sections 5.12 and 5.13 and the exercise of its inspection rights under Section 5.09. Each Lender hereby agrees that (a) it has requested a copy of each Report prepared by or on behalf of the Administrative Agent; (b) the Administrative Agent (i) makes no representation or warranty, express or implied, as to the completeness or accuracy of any Report or any of the information contained therein or any inaccuracy or omission contained in or relating to a Report and (ii) shall not be liable for any information contained in any Report; (c) the Reports are not comprehensive audits or examinations, and that any Person performing any field examination will inspect only specific information regarding the Loan Parties and will rely significantly upon the Loan Parties' books and records, as well as on representations of the Loan Parties' personnel and that the Administrative Agent undertakes no obligation to update, correct or supplement the Reports; (d) it will keep all Reports confidential and strictly for its internal use, not share the Report with any Loan Party or any other Person except as otherwise permitted pursuant to this Agreement; and (e) without limiting the generality of any other indemnification provision contained in this Agreement, it will pay and protect, and indemnify, defend, and hold the Administrative Agent and any such other Person preparing a Report harmless from and against, the claims, actions, proceedings, damages, costs, expenses, and other amounts (including reasonable attorney fees) incurred by as the direct or indirect result of any third parties who might obtain all or part of any Report through the indemnifying Lender.
The provisions of this Article are solely for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, and, except solely to the extent of the Borrowers' rights to consent pursuant to and subject to the conditions set forth in this Article, none of the Borrowers or any other Loan Party shall have any rights as a third party beneficiary of any such provisions. Each Lender Party, whether or not a party hereto, will be deemed, by its acceptance of the benefits of the Collateral and of the Loan Guarantee provided under the Loan Documents, to have agreed to the provisions of this Article.
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, neither the Arrangers nor any Person named on the cover page of this Agreement as a Syndication Agent or a Documentation Agent shall have any duties or obligations under this Agreement or any other Loan Document (except in its capacity, as applicable, as a Lender or an Issuing Bank), but all such Persons shall have the benefit of the indemnities provided for hereunder.
 
SECTION 9.01. (a) Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) of this Section), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by facsimile, as follows:
Notices.
(i) if to any Loan Party, to the Borrower Representative at:
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
Attention: Mr. Armand Correia, Chief Financial Officer
Facsimile No: (845) 369-4625
(ii) if to the Administrative Agent, JPMCB in its capacity as an Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. at:
270 Park Avenue, 44th Floor
Mail Code: NY1-K855
New York, New York 10017
Attention: Donna DiForio
Facsimile No: (646) 534-2274
With a copy to:
10 South Dearborn, Floor 22
Chicago, IL 60603-2300
Attention: Justin Anderson
Facsimile No: (312) 732-7583
(iii) if to any other Issuing Bank, to it at its address or facsimile number most recently specified by it in a notice delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower Representative; and
(iv) if to any other Lender, to it at its address or facsimile number set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
All such notices and other communications (i) sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received, (ii) sent by facsimile shall be deemed to have been given when sent (or, if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient) and (iii) delivered through electronic communications to the extent provided in paragraph (b) of this Section shall be effective as provided in such paragraph.
 
(b) Notices and other communications to the Lenders and Issuing Banks hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications (including e-mail and internet or intranet websites) pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices under Article II to any Lender or Issuing Bank if such Lender or Issuing Bank, as applicable, has notified the Administrative Agent that it is incapable of receiving notices under such Article by electronic communication. The Administrative Agent or the Borrower Representative (on behalf of the Loan Parties) may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications. All such notices and other communications (i) sent to an e-mail address shall be deemed received upon the sender's receipt of an acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by return e-mail or other written acknowledgement), that if not given during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient, and (ii) posted to an Internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its e-mail address as described in the foregoing clause (b)(i) of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor.
provided
provided
provided
(c) Any party hereto may change its address or facsimile number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.
(d) The Loan Parties agree that the Administrative Agent may, but shall not be obligated to, make any Communication by posting such Communication on Debt Domain, Intralinks, Syndtrak or a similar electronic transmission system (the ""). The Platform is provided "as is" and "as available". Neither the Administrative Agent nor any its Related Parties warrants, or shall be deemed to warrant, the adequacy of the Platform and expressly disclaim liability for errors or omissions in the Communications. No warranty of any kind, express, implied or statutory, including any warranty of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, non-infringement of third-party rights or freedom from viruses or other code defects, is made, or shall be deemed to be made, by the Administrative Agent or any of its Related Parties in connection with the Communications or the Platform.
Platform
SECTION 9.02. (a) No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders hereunder and under any other Loan Document are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by any Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for
Waivers; Amendments.
 
which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Bank may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
(b) Except as provided in Sections 2.09(e), 5.16, 9.02(e) and 9.18, and except for the execution and delivery of the Joinder Agreements, none of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any provision hereof or thereof may be waived, amended or modified except (i) in the case of this Agreement, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Borrowers and the Required Lenders or (ii) in the case of any other Loan Document, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, with the consent of the Required Lenders; that (A) any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document may be amended by an agreement in writing entered into by the Company and the Administrative Agent to cure any ambiguity, omission, defect or inconsistency so long as, in each case, (1) such amendment does not adversely affect the rights of any Lender or (2) the Lenders shall have received at least five Business Days' prior written notice thereof and the Administrative Agent shall not have received, within five Business Days of the date of such notice to the Lenders, a written notice from the Required Lenders stating that the Required Lenders object to such amendment and (B) no such agreement shall (1) increase the Revolving Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender ( that the Administrative Agent may make Protective Advances and Overadvances as set forth in Section 2.04 or 2.05, as applicable), (2) reduce or forgive the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce or forgive any interest or fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby, (3) postpone any scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any date for the payment of any interest, fees or other Obligations payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Revolving Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby, (4) change Section 2.18(b) or 2.18(d) in a manner that would alter the manner in which payments are shared, without the written consent of each Lender, (5) increase the advance rates set forth in the definition of Borrowing Base or add new categories of eligible assets, without the written consent of each Lender, (6) change any of the provisions of this Section or the percentage set forth in the definition of the term "Required Lenders" or any other provision of any Loan Document specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights thereunder or make any determination or grant any consent thereunder, without the written consent of each Lender, (7) change Section 2.20 without the consent of each Lender (other than any Defaulting Lender), (8) release any Loan Guarantor from its obligation under its Loan Guarantee (except as otherwise permitted herein or in the other Loan Documents), without the written consent of each Lender, or (9) except as provided in paragraph (c) of this Section or in any Collateral Document, release Collateral having an aggregate value in excess of $20,000,000 without the written consent of each Lender; further that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender hereunder or under any
provided
provided
provided
 
other Loan Document without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be (it being understood that any change to Section 2.20 shall require the consent of the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Banks). Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, this Agreement may be amended without any additional consents to provide for increased Revolving Commitments in the manner contemplated by Section 2.09. The Administrative Agent may also amend Schedule 2.01 to reflect increases in the Revolving Commitments in the manner contemplated by Section 2.09 or assignments entered into pursuant to Section 9.04.
(c) The Lenders and the Issuing Banks hereby irrevocably authorize the Administrative Agent, at its option and in its sole discretion, (i) to release any Liens granted to the Administrative Agent by the Loan Parties on any Collateral (A) upon the termination of all the Revolving Commitments, payment and satisfaction in full in cash of all Secured Obligations (other than Unliquidated Obligations) and the cash collateralization of all Unliquidated Obligations in a manner satisfactory to each affected Lender, (B) constituting property being sold or disposed of if the Loan Party disposing of such property certifies to the Administrative Agent that the sale or disposition is made in compliance with the terms of this Agreement (and the Administrative Agent may rely conclusively on any such certificate, without further inquiry), and to the extent that the property being sold or disposed of constitutes 100% of the Equity Interest of a Subsidiary, the Administrative Agent is authorized to release any Loan Guarantee provided by such Subsidiary, (C) constituting property leased to a Loan Party under a lease which has expired or been terminated in a transaction not prohibited under this Agreement and (D) as required to effect any sale or other disposition of such Collateral in connection with any exercise of remedies of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to Article VII and (ii) to release any Loan Guarantee provided by any Subsidiary that may be dissolved pursuant to Section 6.03(a)(iv) in connection with a voluntary liquidation or dissolution thereof permitted by such Section and, in connection therewith, to release any Liens granted to the Administrative Agent by such Subsidiary on any Collateral, if the Company certifies to the Administrative Agent that such liquidation or dissolution is made in compliance with the terms of this Agreement (and the Administrative Agent may rely conclusively on any such certificate, without further inquiry). The Lenders and the Issuing Banks hereby further irrevocably authorize the release of Liens on the Term Priority Collateral as provided in the Intercreditor Agreement. Except as provided above and in paragraphs (b) and (e) of this Section, the Administrative Agent will not release any Liens on Collateral without the prior written authorization of the Required Lenders; that, the Administrative Agent may in its discretion, release its Liens on Collateral valued in the aggregate not in excess of $10,000,000 during any calendar year without the prior written authorization of the Required Lenders. Any such release shall not in any manner discharge, affect, or impair the Obligations or any Liens (other than those expressly being released) upon (or obligations of the Loan Parties in respect of) all interests retained by the Loan Parties, including the proceeds of any sale, all of which shall continue to constitute part of the Collateral.
provided
 
(d) If, in connection with any proposed amendment, waiver or consent requiring the consent of "each Lender" or "each Lender affected thereby," the consents of Lenders having Credit Exposure and unused Revolving Commitments representing more than 66% of the sum of the total Credit Exposure and unused Revolving Commitments at such time are obtained, but the consents of other necessary Lenders are not obtained (any such Lender whose consent is necessary but not obtained being referred to herein as a ""), then the Borrower Representative may elect to replace any Non-Consenting Lender as a Lender party to this Agreement; that, concurrently with such replacement, (i) an Eligible Assignee which is reasonably satisfactory to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent shall agree, as of such date, to purchase for cash the Loans and other Obligations due to the Non-Consenting Lender pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption and to become a Lender for all purposes under this Agreement and to assume all obligations of the Non-Consenting Lender to be terminated as of such date and to comply with the requirements of paragraph (b) of Section 9.04, and (ii) the Borrowers shall pay to such Non-Consenting Lender in same day funds on the day of such replacement (A) all interest, fees and other amounts then accrued but unpaid to such Non-Consenting Lender by the Borrowers hereunder to and including the date of termination, including without limitation payments due to such Non-Consenting Lender under Sections 2.15 and 2.17, and (B) an amount, if any, equal to the payment which would have been due to such Lender on the day of such replacement under Section 2.16 had the Loans of such Non-Consenting Lender been prepaid on such date rather than sold to the replacement Lender.
Non-Consenting Lender
provided
(e) Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Administrative Agent may, without the consent of any Lender Party, consent to a departure by any Loan Party from any covenant of such Loan Party set forth in this Agreement or in any Collateral Document to the extent such departure is consistent with the authority of the Administrative Agent set forth in the definition of the term "Collateral and Guarantee Requirement".
SECTION 9.03. (a) The Borrowers shall pay (i) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers and their respective Affiliates, including the reasonable and documented fees, charges and disbursements of one primary counsel for the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers and their Affiliates, and if deemed necessary by the Administrative Agent, one local counsel in each applicable jurisdiction, in connection with the syndication and distribution (including, without limitation, via the internet or through a service such as Intralinks) of the credit facility provided for herein, the preparation and administration of the Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions of the Loan Documents (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by each Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, in connection with
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.
 
the enforcement, collection or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit. Subject to the provisions of Sections 5.09, 5.12 and 5.13, expenses subject to reimbursement by the Borrowers under this Section include, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with:
(i) appraisals and insurance reviews;
(ii) field examinations and the preparation of Reports based on the fees charged by a third party retained by the Administrative Agent or the internally allocated fees for each Person employed by the Administrative Agent with respect to each field examination;
(iii) taxes, fees and other charges for (A) lien searches and (B) filing financing statements and continuations, and other actions to perfect, protect, and continue the Administrative Agent's Liens;
(iv) sums paid or incurred to take any action required of any Loan Party under the Loan Documents that such Loan Party fails to pay or take; and
(v) forwarding loan proceeds, collecting checks and other items of payment, and establishing and maintaining the accounts and lock boxes, and costs and expenses of preserving and protecting the Collateral.
All of the foregoing costs and expenses may be charged to the Borrowers as Revolving Loans or to another deposit account, all as described in Section 2.18(c).
(b) The Borrowers agree, jointly and severally, to indemnify the Administrative Agent (or any sub-agent thereof), the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, each Issuing Bank and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an ""), against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, penalties, incremental taxes, liabilities and related expenses, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of the Loan Documents or any agreement or instrument contemplated thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by an Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or Release of Hazardous Materials on at, to or from any property owned or operated by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or any other Environmental Liability related in any way to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or
Indemnitee
 
proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether such proceeding is initiated against or by any party to this Agreement, or any Affiliate thereof, by an Indemnitee or any third party or whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, penalties, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and non-appealable judgment to have resulted from the bad faith, gross negligence or wilful misconduct of such Indemnitee. This Section shall not apply to any Taxes (other than Other Taxes or any Taxes that represent losses, claims, damages or related expenses arising from any non-Tax claim).
provided
(c) To the extent the Borrowers fail to pay any amount required to be paid by them to the Administrative Agent (or any sub-agent thereof), any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, or any Related Party of any of the foregoing, under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank, Swingline Lender or such Related Party, as the case may be, such Lender's Applicable Percentage (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, penalty, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent (or such sub-agent), such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such, or against any Related Party of any of the foregoing acting for the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent), any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in connection with such capacity.
provided
(d) To the extent permitted by applicable law, no Loan Party shall assert, and each hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee (i) for any damages arising from the use by others of information or other materials obtained through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems (including the Internet) or (ii) on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any other Loan Document, or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
(e) All amounts due under this Section shall be payable not later than 10 days after written demand therefor.
SECTION 9.04. (a) The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of any Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) the Borrowers may not assign or otherwise transfer any of their rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by a Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any
Successors and Assigns.
 
Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of any Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section), the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the sub-agents of the Administrative Agent and the Related Parties of any of the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
(b) (i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Revolving Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
(A) the Borrower Representative; that no consent of the Borrower Representative shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee;
provided
(B) the Administrative Agent;
(C) the Swingline Lender; that if the Swingline Lender has not provided written notice of its objection to any proposed assignment within three Business Days of its receipt thereof from the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender shall be deemed to have consented to such proposed assignment; and
provided
(D) each Issuing Bank; that if any Issuing Bank has not provided written notice of its objection to any proposed assignment within three Business Days of its receipt thereof from the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have consented to such proposed assignment.
provided
(ii) Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
(A) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Revolving Commitment or Loans, the amount of the Revolving Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent; that no such consent of the Borrower Representative shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
provided
 
(B) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement;
(C) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500; and
(D) the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire in which the assignee designates one or more credit contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain material non-public information about the Company, the Subsidiaries and other Affiliates thereof or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the assignee's compliance procedures and applicable law, including Federal, State and foreign securities laws.
(iii) Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
(iv) The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as non-fiduciary agent of the Borrowers, shall maintain at one of its offices a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and records of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount (and stated interest) of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrowers, any Issuing Bank and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
 
(v) Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignee's completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register; that if either the assigning Lender or the assignee shall have failed to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.05, 2.06(d) or (e), 2.07(b), 2.17(d) or 9.03(c), the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information therein in the Register unless and until such payment shall have been made in full, together with all accrued interest thereon. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
provided
(c) (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Swingline Lender, sell participations to one or more Eligible Assignees ("") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Revolving Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under the Loan Documents. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce the Loan Documents and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of the Loan Documents; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.02(b) that affects such Participant or requires the approval of all the Lenders. Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrowers agree that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16 and 2.17 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender; that such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.18(d) as though it were a Lender.
Participants
provided
provided
provided
(ii) A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.15 or 2.17 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower Representative's prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 2.17 unless the Borrower Representative is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrowers, to comply with Section 2.17(f) as though it were a Lender. Each Lender
 
that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as a non-fiduciary agent of the Borrowers, maintain records of the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each participant's interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement (the ""); that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of the Participant Register (including the identity of any Participant or any information relating to a Participant's interest in any Revolving Commitments or Revolving Loans or its other obligations under this Agreement or any other Loan Document) to any Person except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that such Revolving Commitment or Revolving Loan or other obligation is in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations. The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary. For the avoidance of doubt, the Administrative Agent (in its capacity as Administrative Agent) shall have no responsibility for maintaining a Participant Register.
Participant Register
provided
(d) Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
SECTION 9.05. All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any Loan Document is executed and delivered or any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any LC Exposure is outstanding and so long as the Revolving Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Revolving Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Survival.
SECTION 9.06. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness.
 
counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. This Agreement shall become effective as provided in the Second Restatement Agreement and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective permitted successors and assigns. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
SECTION 9.07. Any provision of any Loan Document held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions thereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability.
SECTION 9.08. If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Borrower or any Loan Guarantor against any of and all the Secured Obligations held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under the Loan Documents and although such obligations may be unmatured. The applicable Lender shall notify the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent of such set-off or application; that any failure to give or any delay in giving such notice shall not affect the validity of any such set-off or application under this Section. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff.
provided
SECTION 9.09. (a) THE LOAN DOCUMENTS (OTHER THAN THOSE CONTAINING A CONTRARY EXPRESS CHOICE OF LAW PROVISION) SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BUT GIVING EFFECT TO FEDERAL LAWS APPLICABLE TO NATIONAL BANKS.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
(b) Each party hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each Loan Party hereby irrevocably
 
and unconditionally agrees that all claims arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document brought by it or any of its Affiliates shall be brought, and shall be heard and determined, exclusively in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each party hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against any Loan Party or any of its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
(c) Each Loan Party hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
(d) Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
SECTION 9.10. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
SECTION 9.11. Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings.
SECTION 9.12. Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below) with the same degree of care that it uses to protect its own confidential
Confidentiality.
 
information, but in no event less than a commercially reasonable degree of care, except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its Related Parties, including accountants, legal counsel and other agents and advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent required or requested by any regulatory authority purporting to have jurisdiction over such Person or its Related Parties (including any self-regulatory authority, such as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners), (c) to the extent required by applicable law or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies under this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing confidentiality undertakings substantially similar to those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its Related Parties) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Company or any Subsidiary or its obligations, (g) on a confidential basis to any rating agency in connection with rating the Company or the Subsidiaries or the credit facilities provided for herein, (h) with the consent of the Company, or (i) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing, on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrowers; that, in the case of clause (c) above, the party disclosing such information shall provide to the Company prior written notice of such disclosure to the extent permitted by applicable law (and to the extent commercially feasible under the circumstances) and shall cooperate with the Company, at the Company's sole expense, in obtaining a protective order for, or other confidential treatment of, such disclosure, in each case at the Company's sole expense. For the purposes of this Section, "" means all information received from the Borrowers relating to the Company or any Subsidiary or their businesses or the Collateral, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing, on a non-confidential basis prior to disclosure by the Borrowers; that, in the case of information received from the Borrowers after the Second Restatement Effective Date, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential.
provided
Information
provided
EACH LENDER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 9.12 FURNISHED TO IT PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE COMPANY, THE SUBSIDIARIES AND ITS OTHER AFFILIATES AND THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES, AND CONFIRMS THAT IT HAS DEVELOPED COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES REGARDING THE USE OF MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION AND THAT IT WILL HANDLE SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
ALL INFORMATION, INCLUDING REQUESTS FOR WAIVERS AND AMENDMENTS, FURNISHED BY THE BORROWERS OR THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT PURSUANT TO, OR IN THE COURSE OF ADMINISTERING, THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE SYNDICATE-LEVEL INFORMATION, WHICH MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE COMPANY, THE SUBSIDIARIES AND ITS OTHER AFFILIATES AND THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES. ACCORDINGLY, EACH LENDER REPRESENTS TO THE BORROWERS AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT THAT IT HAS IDENTIFIED IN ITS ADMINISTRATIVE QUESTIONNAIRE A CREDIT CONTACT WHO MAY RECEIVE INFORMATION THAT MAY CONTAIN SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
SECTION 9.13. The respective obligations of the Lenders hereunder are several and not joint and the failure of any Lender to make any Loan or perform any of its obligations hereunder shall not relieve any other Lender from any of its obligations hereunder. Anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, neither any Issuing Bank nor any Lender shall be obligated to extend credit to the Borrowers in violation of applicable law.
Several Obligations; Nonreliance; Violation of Law.
SECTION 9.14. Each Lender that is subject to the requirements of the Patriot Act hereby notifies the Borrowers and the Loan Guarantors that pursuant to the requirements of the Patriot Act, it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrowers and the Loan Guarantors, which information includes the names and addresses of the Borrowers and the Loan Guarantors and other information that will allow such Lender to identify the Borrowers and the Loan Guarantors in accordance with the Patriot Act.
USA PATRIOT Act.
SECTION 9.15. Each Lender hereby appoints each other Lender as its agent for the purpose of perfecting Liens, for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, in assets which, in accordance with Article 9 of the UCC or any other applicable law can be perfected only by possession. Should any Lender (other than the Administrative Agent) obtain possession of any such Collateral, such Lender shall notify the Administrative Agent thereof, and, promptly upon the Administrative Agent's request therefor shall deliver such Collateral to the Administrative Agent or otherwise deal with such Collateral in accordance with the Administrative Agent's instructions.
Appointment for Perfection.
SECTION 9.16. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan, together with all fees, charges and other amounts that are treated as interest on such Loan under applicable law (collectively the ""), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the "") which may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding such Loan in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan hereunder, together with all Charges payable in respect
Interest Rate Limitation.
Charges
Maximum Rate
 
thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and Charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated and the interest and Charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
SECTION 9.17. Each Loan Party, on behalf of itself and its subsidiaries, agrees that in connection with all aspects of the transactions contemplated hereby and any communications in connection therewith, the Company, the Subsidiaries and its other Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and their Affiliates, on the other hand, will have a business relationship that does not create, by implication or otherwise, any fiduciary duty on the part of the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks or their Affiliates, and no such duty will be deemed to have arisen in connection with any such transactions or communications. The Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and their Affiliates may be engaged, for their own accounts or the accounts of customers, in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company, the Subsidiaries and its other Affiliates, and none of the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks or their Affiliates has any obligation to disclose any of such interests to the Company, the Subsidiaries or its other Affiliates. To the fullest extent permitted by law, each Loan Party hereby waives and releases any claims that it or any of its Affiliates may have against the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and their Affiliates with respect to any breach or alleged breach of agency or fiduciary duty in connection with any aspect of any transaction contemplated hereby.
No Fiduciary Relationship.
SECTION 9.18. The Lenders and the Issuing Banks acknowledge that the obligations of the Company under the Term Credit Agreement are (and obligations in respect of any other Permitted Term Indebtedness may in the future be) secured by Liens on assets of the Company and the other Loan Parties that constitute Collateral and that the relative Lien priority and other creditor rights of the Lender Parties hereunder and the secured parties under the Term Credit Agreement (or in respect of such other Permitted Term Indebtedness) will be set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement. Each Lender and Issuing Bank hereby acknowledges that it has received a copy of the Intercreditor Agreement. Each Lender and Issuing Bank hereby irrevocably (a) consents to the subordination of the Liens on the Term First Priority Collateral securing the Secured Obligations on the terms set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement, (b) authorizes and directs the Administrative Agent to execute and deliver the Intercreditor Agreement and any documents relating thereto, in each case on behalf of such Lender or Issuing Bank and without any further consent, authorization or other action by such Lender or Issuing Bank, (c) agrees that, upon the execution and delivery thereof, such Lender or Issuing Bank will be bound by the provisions of the Intercreditor
Intercreditor Agreement.
 
Agreement as if it were a signatory thereto and will take no actions contrary to the provisions of the Intercreditor Agreement and (d) agrees that no Lender or Issuing Bank shall have any right of action whatsoever against the Administrative Agent as a result of any action taken by the Administrative Agent pursuant to this Section or in accordance with the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement. Each Lender and Issuing Bank hereby further irrevocably authorizes and directs the Administrative Agent (i) to take such actions as shall be required to release Liens on the Collateral in accordance with the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement and (ii) to enter into such amendments, supplements or other modifications to the Intercreditor Agreement in connection with any extension, renewal, refinancing or replacement of any Secured Obligations and any Permitted Term Indebtedness as are reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent to give effect thereto, in each case on behalf of such Lender or Issuing Bank and without any further consent, authorization or other action by such Lender or Issuing Bank. The Administrative Agent shall have the benefit of the provisions of Article VIII with respect to all actions taken by it pursuant to this Section or in accordance with the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement to the full extent thereof. The foregoing provisions are intended as an inducement to the secured parties under the Term Credit Agreement (or in respect of other Permitted Term Indebtedness) to extend credit to the Company and such secured parties are intended third party beneficiaries of such provisions.
SECTION 9.19. (a) Each Loan Party irrevocably and unconditionally undertakes to pay to the Administrative Agent amounts equal to, and in the currency or currencies of, its Corresponding Debt.
Dutch Parallel Debt.
(b) The Parallel Debt of each Loan Party:
(i) shall become due and payable at the same time as its Corresponding Debt; and
(ii) is independent and separate from, and without prejudice to, its Corresponding Debt.
(c) For purposes of this Section, the Administrative Agent:
(i) is the independent and separate creditor of each Parallel Debt;
(ii) acts in its own name and not as agent, representative or trustee of the Lender Parties and its claims in respect of each Parallel Debt shall not be held in trust; and
(iii) shall have the independent and separate right to demand payment of each Parallel Debt in its own name (including, without limitation, through any suit, execution, enforcement of security, recovery of guarantees and applications for and voting in any kind of insolvency proceeding in accordance with the Loan Documents).
(d) The Parallel Debt of a Loan Party shall be (i) decreased to the extent that its Corresponding Debt has been irrevocably and unconditionally paid or discharged
 
and (ii) increased to the extent to that its Corresponding Debt has increased, and the Corresponding Debt of a Loan Party shall be (x) decreased to the extent that its Parallel Debt has been irrevocably and unconditionally paid or discharged and (y) increased to the extent that its Parallel Debt has increased, in each case that the Parallel Debt of a Loan Party shall never exceed its Corresponding Debt.
provided
(e) All amounts received or recovered by the Administrative Agent in connection with this Section, to the extent permitted by applicable law, shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.18.
(f) This Section applies solely for the purpose of determining the secured obligations in the Collateral Documents governed by Dutch law.
SECTION 10.01. Each Loan Guarantor hereby agrees that it is jointly and severally liable for, and absolutely, irrevocably and unconditionally guarantees to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the other Lender Parties the prompt payment and performance when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, and at all times thereafter, of the Secured Obligations and all reasonable costs and expenses including, without limitation, all court costs and attorneys' and paralegals' fees and expenses paid or incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders in endeavoring to collect all or any part of the Secured Obligations from, or in prosecuting any action against, any Borrower, any Loan Guarantor or any other guarantor of all or any part of the Secured Obligations (such costs and expenses, together with the Secured Obligations, being collectively called the ""). Each Loan Guarantor further agrees that the Guaranteed Obligations may be extended or renewed in whole or in part without notice to or further assent from it, and that it remains bound upon its guarantee notwithstanding any such extension or renewal. All terms of this Loan Guarantee apply to and may be enforced by or on behalf of any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of any Lender that extended any portion of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Guarantee.
Guaranteed Obligations
SECTION 10.02. This Loan Guarantee is a Guarantee of payment and not of collection. Each Loan Guarantor waives any right to require the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any other Lender Party to sue any Borrower, any other Loan Guarantor, any other guarantor, or any other Person obligated for all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations (each, an ""), or to enforce its rights against any collateral securing all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Guarantee of Payment.
Obligated Party
SECTION 10.03. (a) Except as otherwise provided for herein, the obligations of each Loan Guarantor hereunder are unconditional and absolute and not subject to any reduction, limitation,
No Discharge or Diminishment of Loan Guarantee.
 
impairment or termination for any reason (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations), including: (i) any claim of waiver, release, extension, renewal, settlement, surrender, alteration, or compromise of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, by operation of law or otherwise; (ii) any change in the corporate existence, structure or ownership of any Borrower or any other guarantor of or other Person liable for any of the Guaranteed Obligations; (iii) any insolvency, bankruptcy, reorganization or other similar proceeding affecting any Obligated Party or its assets or any resulting release or discharge of any obligation of any Obligated Party; or (iv) the existence of any claim, setoff or other right which any Loan Guarantor may have at any time against any Obligated Party, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender, or any other Person, whether in connection herewith or in any unrelated transaction.
(b) The obligations of each Loan Guarantor hereunder are not subject to any defense or setoff, counterclaim, recoupment, or termination whatsoever by reason of the invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any of the Guaranteed Obligations or otherwise, or any provision of applicable law or regulation purporting to prohibit payment by any Obligated Party, of the Guaranteed Obligations or any part thereof.
(c) Further, the obligations of any Loan Guarantor hereunder are not discharged or impaired or otherwise affected by: (i) the failure of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any other Lender Party to assert any claim or demand or to enforce any remedy with respect to all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations; (ii) any waiver or modification of or supplement to any provision of any agreement relating to the Guaranteed Obligations; (iii) any release, non-perfection or invalidity of any indirect or direct security for the obligations of any Borrower for all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations or any obligations of any other guarantor of or other Person liable for any of the Guaranteed Obligations; (iv) any action or failure to act by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any other Lender Party with respect to any collateral securing any part of the Guaranteed Obligations; or (v) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the payment or performance of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, or any other circumstance, act, omission or delay that might in any manner or to any extent vary the risk of such Loan Guarantor or that would otherwise operate as a discharge of any Loan Guarantor as a matter of law or equity (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations).
SECTION 10.04. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Loan Guarantor hereby waives any defense based on or arising out of any defense of any Borrower or any Loan Guarantor or the unenforceability of all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations from any cause, or the cessation from any cause of the liability of any Borrower or any Loan Guarantor, other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Loan Guarantor irrevocably waives acceptance hereof, presentment, demand, protest and, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any notice not provided for herein, as well as any requirement that at any time any action be taken by any Person against any Obligated Party or any other Person. Each Loan Guarantor confirms that it is not a surety under any state law and shall not raise any such law as a defense to its
Defenses Waived.
 
obligations hereunder. The Administrative Agent may, at its election, foreclose on any Collateral held by it by one or more judicial or nonjudicial sales, accept an assignment of any such Collateral in lieu of foreclosure or otherwise act or fail to act with respect to any collateral securing all or a part of the Guaranteed Obligations, compromise or adjust any part of the Guaranteed Obligations, make any other accommodation with any Obligated Party or exercise any other right or remedy available to it against any Obligated Party, without affecting or impairing in any way the liability of such Loan Guarantor under this Loan Guarantee except to the extent the Guaranteed Obligations have been fully and indefeasibly paid in cash. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Loan Guarantor waives any defense arising out of any such election even though that election may operate, pursuant to applicable law, to impair or extinguish any right of reimbursement or subrogation or other right or remedy of any Loan Guarantor against any Obligated Party or any security.
SECTION 10.05. No Loan Guarantor will assert any right, claim or cause of action, including, without limitation, a claim of subrogation, contribution or indemnification that it has against any Obligated Party, or any Collateral, until the Loan Parties and the Loan Guarantors have fully performed all their obligations to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders and the other Lender Parties.
Rights of Subrogation.
SECTION 10.06. If at any time any payment of any portion of the Guaranteed Obligations is rescinded or must otherwise be restored or returned upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of any Borrower or otherwise, each Loan Guarantor's obligations under this Loan Guarantee with respect to that payment shall be reinstated at such time as though the payment had not been made and whether or not the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders or the other Lender Parties are in possession of this Loan Guarantee. If acceleration of the time for payment of any of the Guaranteed Obligations is stayed upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of any Borrower, all such amounts otherwise subject to acceleration under the terms of any agreement relating to the Guaranteed Obligations shall nonetheless be payable by the Loan Guarantors forthwith on demand by the Administrative Agent.
Reinstatement; Stay of Acceleration.
SECTION 10.07. Each Loan Guarantor assumes all responsibility for being and keeping itself informed of the Borrowers' financial condition and assets, and of all other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of the Guaranteed Obligations and the nature, scope and extent of the risks that each Loan Guarantor assumes and incurs under this Loan Guarantee, and agrees that none of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender shall have any duty to advise any Loan Guarantor of information known to it regarding those circumstances or risks.
Information.
SECTION 10.08. The provisions of Section 2.17 shall apply to all payments by the Loan Guarantors of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Taxes.
mutatis
mutandis
SECTION 10.09. The provisions of this Loan Guarantee are severable, and in any action or proceeding involving any state corporate law, or any state, federal or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other law
Maximum Liability.
 
affecting the rights of creditors generally, if the obligations of any Loan Guarantor under this Loan Guarantee would otherwise be held or determined to be avoidable, invalid or unenforceable on account of the amount of such Loan Guarantor's liability under this Loan Guarantee, then, notwithstanding any other provision of this Loan Guarantee to the contrary, the amount of such liability shall, without any further action by the Loan Guarantors or the Lenders, be automatically limited and reduced to the highest amount that is valid and enforceable as determined in such action or proceeding (such highest amount determined hereunder being the relevant Loan Guarantor's ""). This Section with respect to the Maximum Liability of each Loan Guarantor is intended solely to preserve the rights of the Lenders to the maximum extent not subject to avoidance under applicable law, and no Loan Guarantor nor any other Person or entity shall have any right or claim under this Section with respect to such Maximum Liability, except to the extent necessary so that the obligations of any Loan Guarantor hereunder shall not be rendered voidable under applicable law. Each Loan Guarantor agrees that the Guaranteed Obligations may at any time and from time to time exceed the Maximum Liability of each Loan Guarantor without impairing this Loan Guarantee or affecting the rights and remedies of the Lenders hereunder; that nothing in this sentence shall be construed to increase any Loan Guarantor's obligations hereunder beyond its Maximum Liability.
Maximum Liability
provided
SECTION 10.10. In the event any Loan Guarantor (a "") shall make any payment or payments under this Loan Guarantee or shall suffer any loss as a result of any realization upon any collateral granted by it to secure its obligations under this Loan Guarantee, each other Loan Guarantor (each a "") shall contribute to such Paying Guarantor an amount equal to such Non-Paying Guarantor's Applicable Share of such payment or payments made, or losses suffered, by such Paying Guarantor. For purposes of this Section, each Non-Paying Guarantor's "" with respect to any such payment or loss by a Paying Guarantor shall be determined as of the date on which such payment or loss was made by reference to the ratio of (a) such Non-Paying Guarantor's Maximum Liability as of such date (without giving effect to any right to receive, or obligation to make, any contribution hereunder) or, if such Non-Paying Guarantor's Maximum Liability has not been determined, the aggregate amount of all monies received by such Non-Paying Guarantor from the Borrowers after the Original Effective Date (whether by loan, capital infusion or by other means) to (b) the aggregate Maximum Liability of all Loan Guarantors hereunder (including such Paying Guarantor) as of such date (without giving effect to any right to receive, or obligation to make, any contribution hereunder), or to the extent that a Maximum Liability has not been determined for any Loan Guarantor, the aggregate amount of all monies received by such Loan Guarantors from the Borrowers after the Original Effective Date (whether by loan, capital infusion or by other means). Nothing in this provision shall affect any Loan Guarantor's several liability for the entire amount of the Guaranteed Obligations (up to such Loan Guarantor's Maximum Liability). Each of the Loan Guarantors covenants and agrees that its right to receive any contribution under this Loan Guarantee from a Non-Paying Guarantor shall be subordinate and junior in right of payment to the payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations. This provision is for the benefit of both the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders and the Loan Guarantors and may be enforced by any one, or more, or all of them in accordance with the terms hereof.
Contribution.
Paying Guarantor
Non-Paying Guarantor
Applicable Share
 
SECTION 10.11. . The liability of each Loan Party as a Loan Guarantor under this Article X is in addition to and shall be cumulative with all other liabilities of each Loan Party to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents to which such Loan Party is a party or in respect of any obligations or liabilities of the other Loan Parties, without any limitation as to amount, unless the instrument or agreement evidencing or creating such other liability specifically provides to the contrary.
Liability Cumulative
SECTION 11.01. The Company is hereby appointed by each of the Borrowers as its contractual representative (herein referred to as the "") hereunder and under each other Loan Document, and each of the Borrowers irrevocably authorizes the Borrower Representative to act as the contractual representative of such Borrower with the rights and duties expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents. The Borrower Representative agrees to act as such contractual representative upon the express conditions contained in this Article XI. Additionally, the Borrowers hereby appoint the Borrower Representative as their agent to receive all of the proceeds of the Loans in the Funding Account(s), at which time the Borrower Representative shall promptly disburse such Loans to the appropriate Borrower. The Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders, and their respective Related Parties, shall not be liable to the Borrower Representative or any Borrower for any action taken or omitted to be taken by the Borrower Representative or the Borrowers pursuant to this Section.
Appointment; Nature of Relationship.
Borrower Representative
SECTION 11.02. The Borrower Representative shall have and may exercise such powers under the Loan Documents as are specifically delegated to the Borrower Representative by the terms of each thereof, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. The Borrower Representative shall have no implied duties to the Borrowers, or any obligation to the Lenders to take any action thereunder except any action specifically provided by the Loan Documents to be taken by the Borrower Representative.
Powers.
SECTION 11.03. The Borrower Representative may execute any of its duties as the Borrower Representative hereunder and under any other Loan Document by or through authorized officers.
Employment of Agents.
SECTION 11.04. Each Borrower shall immediately notify the Borrower Representative of the occurrence of any Default hereunder referring to this Agreement describing such Default and stating that such notice is a "notice of default." In the event that the Borrower Representative receives such a notice, the Borrower
Notices.
 
Representative shall give prompt notice thereof to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders. Any notice provided to the Borrower Representative hereunder shall constitute notice to each Borrower on the date received by the Borrower Representative.
SECTION 11.05. Upon the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Borrower Representative may resign at any time, such resignation to be effective upon the appointment of a successor Borrower Representative. The Administrative Agent shall give prompt written notice of such resignation to the Lenders.
Successor Borrower Representative.
SECTION 11.06. The Borrowers hereby empower and authorize the Borrower Representative, on behalf of the Borrowers, to execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders the Loan Documents and all related agreements, certificates, documents, or instruments as shall be necessary or appropriate to effect the purposes of the Loan Documents, including without limitation, the Borrowing Base Certificates and the Compliance Certificates. Each Borrower agrees that any action taken by the Borrower Representative or the Borrowers in accordance with the terms of this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, and the exercise by the Borrower Representative of its powers set forth therein or herein, together with such other powers that are reasonably incidental thereto, shall be binding upon all of the Borrowers.
Execution of Loan Documents; Borrowing Base Certificate.
SECTION 11.07. Each Borrower hereby agrees that such Borrower shall furnish promptly after each fiscal month to the Borrower Representative any certificate or report requested by the Borrower Representative, on which the Borrower Representative shall rely to prepare the Borrowing Base Certificates and Compliance Certificates required pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement.
Reporting.
 
:
Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
 
 
:
Company
 
:
Acquired Company
None.
 
:
Company
Mortgaged Property
 
All Other Real Property
None.
:
Acquired Company
Mortgaged Property
 
All Other Real Property
 
:
Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
None.
:
Company
 
 
:
Acquired Company
 
 
:
Company
 
:
Acquired Company
 
:
Company
 
Attention: Jay Buchheim
8500 Governor's Hill Drive
Cincinnati, OH 45249
 
P.O. Box 981540
El Paso, TX 79998
 
P.O. Box 3011
New Albany, OH 43054-3011
 
CAD 4/ Support Accounting
3100 Easton Square Place Road
Columbus, OH 43219
 
MD 1MOB2A
5050 Kingsley Drive
Cincinnati, OH 45263
 
3975 NW 120
th
Avenue
Coral Springs, FL 33065
 
2500 Lake Cook Road (RW2)
Riverwoods, IL 60015
 
3100 Easton Square Place Road
Columbus, OH 43219
 
1120 Avenue of the Americas
New York, NY 10036
:
Acquired Company
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
:
Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
 
 
 
:
Company
 
 
 
 
:
Acquired Company
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
:
Company
 
 
 
 
 
:
Acquired Company
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
:
Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
 
 
 
:
Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
 
 
EXHIBIT A
This Assignment and Assumption (this "") is dated as of the Effective Date set forth below and is entered into by and between the Assignor (as defined below) and the Assignee (as defined below). Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Credit Agreement identified below (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, the ""), receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged by the Assignee. The Standard Terms and Conditions set forth in Annex 1 attached hereto are hereby agreed to and incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Assignment and Assumption as if set forth herein in full.
Assignment and Assumption
Credit Agreement
For an agreed consideration, the Assignor hereby irrevocably sells and assigns to the Assignee, and the Assignee hereby irrevocably purchases and assumes from the Assignor, subject to and in accordance with the Standard Terms and Conditions referred to below and the Credit Agreement, as of the Effective Date inserted by the Administrative Agent as contemplated below, (a) all of the Assignor's rights and obligations in its capacity as a Lender under the Credit Agreement and any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto to the extent related to the amount and percentage interest identified below of all of such outstanding rights and obligations of the Assignor under the facility identified below (including any Letters of Credit, Guarantees, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances and Overadvances included in such facility) and (b) to the extent permitted to be assigned under applicable law, all claims, suits, causes of action and any other right of the Assignor (in its capacity as a Lender) against any Person, whether known or unknown, arising under or in connection with the Credit Agreement, any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto or the loan transactions governed thereby or in any way based on or related to any of the foregoing, including contract claims, tort claims, malpractice claims, statutory claims and all other claims at law or in equity related to the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clause (a) above (the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clauses (a) and (b) above being referred to herein collectively as the ""). Such sale and assignment is without recourse to the Assignor and, except as expressly provided in this Assignment and Assumption, without representation or warranty by the Assignor.
Assigned Interest
 
 
 
 
Effective Date: , 20 [TO BE INSERTED BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND WHICH SHALL BE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF RECORDATION OF TRANSFER IN THE REGISTER THEREFOR.]
                    
    
    
The Assignee, if not already Lender, agrees to deliver to the Administrative Agent a completed Administrative Questionnaire in which the Assignee designates one or more credit contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain material non-public information about the Company, the other Loan Parties and their Related Parties or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the Assignee's compliance procedures and applicable laws, including Federal and state securities laws.
 
 
ANNEX 1 TO ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION
1. .
Representations and Warranties
1.1 . The Assignor (a) represents and warrants that (i) it is the legal and beneficial owner of the Assigned Interest, (ii) the Assigned Interest is free and clear of any lien, encumbrance or other adverse claim and (iii) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby; and (b) assumes no responsibility with respect to (i) any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, other than statements made by it herein, (ii) the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of the Loan Documents or any collateral thereunder, (iii) the financial condition of the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or other Affiliates or any other Person obligated in respect of any Loan Document or (iv) the performance or observance by the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or other Affiliates or any other Person of any of their respective obligations under any Loan Document.
Assignor
1.2. . The Assignee (a) represents and warrants that (i) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and to become a Lender under the Credit Agreement, (ii) it satisfies the requirements, if any, specified in the Credit Agreement that are required to be satisfied by it in order to acquire the Assigned Interest and become a Lender, (iii) from and after the Effective Date, it shall be bound by the provisions of the Credit Agreement as a Lender thereunder and, to the extent of the Assigned Interest, shall have the obligations of a Lender thereunder, (iv) it has received a copy of the Credit Agreement, together with copies of the most recent financial statements delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 thereof (or, prior to the first such delivery, the financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 thereof), and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Assignment and Assumption and to purchase the Assigned Interest on the basis of which it has made such analysis and decision independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent or any other Lender(v) if it is a Lender that is a U.S. Person, attached hereto is an executed original of IRS Form W-9 certifying that such Lender is exempt from U.S. Federal backup withholding tax and (vi) if it is a Foreign Lender, attached hereto is any documentation required to be delivered by it pursuant to the terms the Credit Agreement (including Section 2.17(f) thereof), duly completed and executed by the Assignee; and (b) agrees that (i) it will, independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent, the Assignor or any other Lender, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Loan Documents, and (ii) it will perform in accordance with their terms all of the obligations which by the terms of the Loan Documents are required to be performed by it as a Lender.
Assignee
2. . From and after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments in respect of the Assigned Interest (including payments of principal, interest, fees and other amounts) to the Assignee whether such amounts have accrued prior to or on or after the Effective Date. The Assignor and the Assignee shall make all appropriate adjustments in payments by the Administrative Agent for periods prior to the Effective Date or with respect to the making of this assignment directly between themselves.
Payments
3. . This Assignment and Assumption shall be binding upon, and inure to the benefit of, the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. This Assignment and Assumption may be executed in any number of counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Assignment and Assumption by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Assignment and Assumption. THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BUT GIVING EFFECT TO FEDERAL LAWS APPLICABLE TO NATIONAL BANKS.
General Provisions
 
Pursuant to, and in accordance with, the terms and conditions of that certain Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012, among Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the "Borrower Representative"), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as the Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), the Borrower Representative is executing and delivering to the Administrative Agent this Borrowing Base Certificate, including the schedules hereto and the supporting date accompanying this Borrowing Base Certificate (collectively, this "Report"). The Borrower Representative hereby represents and warrants that this Report is true and complete and is based on information contained in the financial accounting records of the Borrower Representative and the other Loan Parties. The Borrower Representative hereby certifies that no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing as of the date of this Report.
 
ASCENA Credit Card Accounts Receivable - Eligibility Calculation
 
CHARMING Credit Card Accounts Receivable -Eligibility Calculation
 
ASCENA Inventory Eligibility Calculation
 
 
Charming Inventory Eligibility Calculation
 
RESERVES
 
 
Ascena
 
Charming
 
EXHIBIT C
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
    as Administrative Agent
270 Park Avenue, 44th Floor
Mail Code: NY1-K855
New York, New York 10017
Attention: Donna DiForio
Fax: (646) 534-2274
[Date]
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware Corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent. Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings specified in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Borrower Representative
This notice constitutes a Borrowing Request and the Borrower Representative hereby gives you notice, pursuant to Section 2.03 of the Credit Agreement, that it requests a Revolving Borrowing under the Credit Agreement, and in connection therewith specifies the following information with respect to such Borrowing:
 
 
The Borrower Representative hereby represents and warrants that the conditions specified in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of Section 4.02 of the Credit Agreement have been satisfied.
 
EXHIBIT D
[The form of this Compliance Certificate has been prepared for convenience only, and is not to affect, or to be taken into consideration in interpreting, the terms of the Credit Agreement referred to below. The obligations of the Loan Parties under the Credit Agreement are as set forth in the Credit Agreement, and nothing in this Compliance Certificate, or the form hereof, shall modify such obligations or constitute a waiver of compliance therewith in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement. In the event of any conflict between the terms of this Compliance Certificate and the terms of the Credit Agreement, the terms of the Credit Agreement shall govern and control, and the terms of this Compliance Certificate are to be modified accordingly.]
 
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June [    ], 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent. Unless otherwise defined herein, capitalized terms used in this Compliance Certificate have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Company
THE UNDERSIGNED HEREBY CERTIFIES IN HIS CAPACITY AS AN OFFICER OF THE COMPANY AND NOT IN HIS INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY, ON ITS BEHALF AND ON BEHALF OF THE BORROWERS, THAT TO HIS KNOWLEDGE AFTER DUE INQUIRY:
1. I am the duly elected [            
]
1
of the Company.
2. [Attached as hereto are the consolidated financial statements required by Section 5.01(a) of the Credit Agreement as of the end of and for the fiscal year ended [        ], setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the prior fiscal year, all audited by and accompanied by the opinion of [Deloitte & Touche LLP]
Schedule I
2
required by Section 5.01(a) of the Credit Agreement.] [or] [The consolidated financial statements required by Section 5.01(a) of the Credit Agreement as the end of and for the fiscal year ended [        ], setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the prior fiscal year, all audited by and accompanied by the opinion of [Deloitte & Touche LLP]
3
required by Section 5.01(a) of the Credit Agreement have been filed with the SEC and are available on the website of the SEC at .]
http://www.sec.gov
 
[Attached as hereto are the consolidated financial statements required by Section 5.01(b) of the Credit Agreement as of the end of and for the fiscal quarter ended [        ] and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year.] [or] [The consolidated financial statements required by Section 5.01(b) of the Credit Agreement as of the end of and for the fiscal quarter ended [        ] and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year have been filed with the SEC and are available on the website of the SEC at ]. Such financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and such portion of the fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes.]
Schedule I
http://www.sec.gov
[Attached as hereto are the consolidated financial statements required by Section 5.01(c) of the Credit Agreement as of the end of and for the fiscal month ended [        ] and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year. Such financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal month and such portion of the fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes.]
Schedule I
3. I have reviewed the terms of the Credit Agreement, and I have made, or have caused to be made under my supervision, a detailed review of the transactions and conditions of the Company and its Subsidiaries during the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements.
4. The examinations described in paragraph 3 did not disclose, and I have no knowledge of[, in each case except as set forth below,] (i) the existence of any condition or event which constitutes a Default during or at the end of the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements or as of the date of this Certificate or (ii) any change in GAAP or in the application thereof that has occurred since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 of the Credit Agreement.
5. hereto sets forth financial data and computations evidencing compliance with the covenant set forth in Section 6.12 of the Credit Agreement, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule II
5. hereto sets forth the Applicable Rate calculation for the fiscal quarter most recently ended, based upon the Borrowing Base Certificate delivered in respect thereof.
Schedule III
6. [Enclosed with this Compliance Certificate is a completed Supplemental Perfection Certificate required by Section 5.01(f) of the Credit Agreement.]
4
7. All notices required under Sections 5.03 and 5.04 of the Credit Agreement have been provided.
Described below are the exceptions, if any, to paragraph 4 by listing (i) the nature of each Default, the period during which it has existed and the action which the Borrowers have taken, are taking, or propose to take with respect to each such Default or (ii) any change in GAAP or the application thereof and the effect of such change on the attached financial statements [(including the reconciliation required by Section 5.01(d) of the Credit Agreement with respect to the amounts included in the calculation of the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for the period of four fiscal quarters most recently ended prior to the date hereof)]:
5
 
 
The foregoing certifications, together with the computations set forth in hereto, are made solely in the capacity of the undersigned as an officer of the Company, and not individually, and delivered this day of , 20[    ].
Schedule II
    
            
 
SCHEDULE II
 
 
 
 
 
 
SCHEDULE III
 
 
EXHIBIT E
 
 
 
 
[CS&M Ref. No. 6701-814]
 
 
 
 
 
 
INTERCREDITOR AGREEMENT dated as of June 14, 2012 (this ""), between JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative and collateral agent for, and acting on behalf of, the ABL Secured Parties (together with its successors and assigns in such capacity, the ""), and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative and collateral agent for, and acting on behalf of, the Term Secured Parties (together with its successors and assigns in such capacity, the ""). Capitalized terms used in this Agreement have the meanings assigned to them in Article I below.
Agreement
ABL Agent
Term Agent
On the date hereof, (a) Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Term Agent, are entering into the Term Credit Agreement and (b) the Company, the other Grantors, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as ABL Agent, are entering into the ABL Credit Agreement.
Company
The ABL Credit Agreement provides that Term Liens shall be permitted under the covenants contained therein, and the Term Credit Agreement provides that ABL Liens shall be permitted under the covenants contained therein, only if such Liens are subject to the terms of an intercreditor agreement in the form of this Agreement. Accordingly, the ABL Secured Parties and the Term Secured Parties have authorized and directed the ABL Agent and the Term Agent, respectively, to enter into this Agreement to set forth their relative rights and remedies with respect to the Collateral.
In consideration of the foregoing and the mutual covenants and obligations herein set forth and for other good and valuable consideration, the sufficiency and receipt of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto, intending to be legally bound, hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1.01. All capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement and that are defined in the UCC as in effect in the State of New York shall have the meanings specified therein.
New York UCC.
SECTION 1.02. As used in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
Other Defined Terms.
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
ABL Agent
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "ABL Obligations".
ABL Cap Amount
"" means all "Collateral", as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement, and any other assets of any Grantor now or at any time hereafter subject or purported under the terms of any ABL Collateral Document to be made subject to any Lien securing any ABL Obligations.
ABL Collateral
"" means the ABL Security Agreement, the ABL Mortgages and the other "Collateral Documents", as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement, and any other agreement, document or instrument now existing or entered into after the date hereof that grants a Lien on any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary to secure any ABL Obligations, as each may be Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
ABL Collateral Documents
"" means the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of the date hereof, among the Company, the Subsidiaries party thereto, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as ABL Agent, as Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
ABL Credit Agreement
"" means the ABL Credit Agreement, the ABL Collateral Documents and all other "Loan Documents", as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement.
ABL Documents
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "ABL Obligations".
ABL Excess Amounts
"" means "Lenders", as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement.
ABL Lenders
"" means all Liens on the Collateral securing the ABL Obligations, whether created under the ABL Collateral Documents or acquired by possession, statute (including any judgment lien), operation of law, subrogation or otherwise and whether or not created following the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, now or hereafter held by or on behalf of the ABL Agent or any other ABL Secured Party, or any agent or trustee therefor.
ABL Liens
"" means each mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents or other security document that grants a Lien on any real property owned or leased by any Grantor to secure any ABL Obligations.
ABL Mortgage
"" means all "Secured Obligations", as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement (including any such Secured Obligations arising or accruing during the pendency of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding), notwithstanding that any such Secured Obligations or claims therefor shall be disallowed, voided or subordinated in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding or under any Bankruptcy Law or other applicable law. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the sum of the ABL Obligations consisting of, without duplication, (a) principal amount of loans or advances under the ABL Credit Agreement and the other ABL Documents and (b) the aggregate face amount of all outstanding letters of credit issued or deemed issued under, or otherwise secured under, the ABL Credit Agreement and the other ABL Documents (the
ABL Obligations
 
foregoing ABL Obligations being collectively referred to as the ""), exceeds $300,000,000 (the ""), then the portion of the Capped ABL Obligations exceeding the ABL Cap Amount (such portion being referred to as the ""), and all interest, premiums, reimbursement obligations and other amounts in respect of the ABL Excess Amounts, shall be secured by the ABL Collateral Documents but shall not constitute "ABL Obligations" for all purposes of this Agreement (other than Sections 2.02 and 2.04, the definition of the term "Grantors" and the definition of the term "ABL Liens" as such term is used in Sections 2.01 and 2.02).
Capped ABL Obligations
ABL Cap Amount
ABL Excess Amounts
"" means any and all of the following that constitute Collateral: (a) all Accounts (other than Accounts arising under contracts for the sale of Term Priority Collateral); (b) all Chattel Paper (including Electronic Chattel Paper); (c) all tax refunds of any kind; (d) all Deposit Accounts and Securities Accounts (other than any Proceeds Collateral Account), and all cash, cash equivalents, checks and other negotiable Instruments, funds and other evidences of payment and all Financial Assets held on deposit therein or credited thereto, and all Security Entitlements arising therefrom (in each case, subject to Section 3.03, other than any identifiable Proceeds of the Term Priority Collateral); (e) all Inventory; (f) all rights to business interruption insurance; (g) solely to the extent evidencing, governing, securing or otherwise relating to the items referred to in any of the preceding clauses, all Documents, General Intangibles (other than Intellectual Property and Equity Interests), Instruments, Investment Property (other than Equity Interests) and Letter of Credit Rights; (h) except to the extent constituting Term Priority Collateral pursuant to clause (f) of the definition of such term, all Proceeds, including insurance Proceeds, of any of the foregoing and all collateral security and guarantees or other credit support given by any Person with respect to any of the foregoing; and (i) all books and records relating to any of the foregoing. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the term "ABL Priority Collateral" shall not include any assets referred to in clauses (a), (b), (c), (d) and (e) of the definition of the term "Term Priority Collateral".
ABL Priority Collateral
"" means the ABL Agent and the other "Lender Parties" as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement.
ABL Secured Parties
"" means the Amended and Restated Security Agreement dated as of the date hereof, among the Company, the other Grantors and the ABL Agent, as Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
ABL Security Agreement
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly or indirectly Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
"" means the ABL Agent and the Term Agent.
Agents
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Agreement
 
"" means, in respect of any Indebtedness, obligation or agreement, to amend, restate, modify, waive, supplement, restructure, extend, increase or renew such Indebtedness, obligation or agreement, in whole or in part. The terms "" and "" shall have correlative meanings.
Amend
Amended
Amendment
"" has the meaning set forth in the ABL Credit Agreement.
Banking Services
"" has the meaning set forth in the ABL Credit Agreement.
Banking Services Obligations
"" means Title 11 of the United States Code entitled "Bankruptcy," as now and hereafter in effect, or any successor statute.
Bankruptcy Code
"" means the Bankruptcy Code and any other Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law.
Bankruptcy Law
"" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed.
Business Day
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "ABL Obligations".
Capped ABL Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "".
Capped Term Obligations
Term Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.01.
Cash Collateral Usage
"" means any insured event of damage or casualty relating to all or any part of the Collateral.
Casualty
" refers to either (a) the ABL Agent, the ABL Collateral Documents, the ABL Credit Agreement, the ABL Documents, the ABL Obligations or the ABL Secured Parties, on the one hand, as opposed to (b) the Term Agent, the Term Collateral Documents, the Term Credit Agreement, the Term Documents, the Term Obligations or the Term Secured Parties, on the other hand.
Class"
"" means any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary that constitute the ABL Collateral or the Term Collateral.
Collateral
"" means the ABL Collateral Documents and the Term Collateral Documents.
Collateral Documents
"" has the meaning set forth in the recitals to this Agreement.
Company
"" means any taking, exercise of rights of eminent domain, public improvement, inverse condemnation, condemnation or similar action of or proceeding by any Governmental Authority or any other Person relating to any part of the Collateral.
Condemnation
 
"" means all compensation, awards and other payments or relief (including instruments and payments with respect to a deed in lieu of condemnation) to which the Company or any Subsidiary shall be entitled by law or otherwise in respect of any Condemnation.
Condemnation Proceeds
"" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
"" means any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any Person any right under any Copyright now or hereafter owned by any other Person or that such other Person otherwise has the right to license, and all rights of any such Person under any such agreement.
Copyright License
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by such Person: (a) all copyright rights in any work subject to the copyright laws of the United States or any other country, whether as author, assignee, transferee or otherwise, and (b) all registrations and recordings thereof, and all registration and recording applications filed in connection therewith, including registrations, recordings and applications in the United States Copyright Office or any similar office in any other country.
Copyrights
"" means the ABL Credit Agreement and the Term Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreements
"" means the ABL Documents and the Term Documents.
Credit Documents
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.01.
DIP Financing
"" means, with respect to the Obligations of any Class, subject to Sections 5.05 and 6.05:
Discharge
(a) payment in full in cash of the principal of and interest (including any Post-Petition Amounts in the nature of interest) on all Obligations of such Class;
(b) payment in full in cash of all other Obligations of such Class that are due and payable or otherwise accrued and owing at or prior to the time such principal and interest are paid (including any Post-Petition Amounts in the nature of fees, costs, expenses and other amounts);
 
(c) except for purposes of Section 5.02, termination or expiration of all commitments, if any, to extend credit that would give rise to Obligations of such Class; and
(d) termination or cash collateralization of all letters of credit the reimbursement or payment obligations in respect of which constitute Obligations of such Class (any such cash collateralization to be in an amount and manner reasonably satisfactory to the Agent of such Class, but in no event shall such amount be greater than 105% of the aggregate undrawn face amount of such letters of credit).
"" means, with respect to any Collateral, the Discharge of Obligations constituting Senior Obligations with respect to such Collateral. The parties hereto acknowledge that (a) with respect to the ABL Liens on the Term Priority Collateral and the ABL Obligations insofar as they are secured by such Liens, a Discharge of Senior Obligations shall mean a Discharge of the Term Obligations and (b) with respect to the Term Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral and the Term Obligations insofar as they are secured by such Liens, the Discharge of Senior Obligations shall mean a Discharge of the ABL Obligations.
Discharge of Senior Obligations
"" means any sale, lease, exchange, transfer or other disposition.
Disposition
"" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest (other than, prior to the date of such conversion, any Indebtedness that is convertible into any such Equity Interests).
Equity Interests
"" means the government of the United States, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national body exercising such powers or functions, such as the European Union or the European Central Bank).
Governmental Authority
"" means the Company and each Subsidiary that shall have created or purported to create any Lien on all or any part of its assets to secure any ABL Obligation or any Term Obligation.
Grantors
"" means and includes all obligations that constitute "Indebtedness" within the meaning of the ABL Credit Agreement or the Term Credit Agreement, as in effect on the date hereof.
Indebtedness
"" means (a) any voluntary or involuntary case or proceeding under the Bankruptcy Code with respect to any Grantor, (b) any other voluntary or involuntary insolvency, reorganization or bankruptcy case or
Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding
 
proceeding, or any receivership, liquidation, reorganization or other similar case or proceeding with respect to any Grantor or with respect to a material portion of the assets of any Grantor, (c) any liquidation, dissolution, reorganization or winding up of any Grantor, whether voluntary or involuntary and whether or not involving insolvency or bankruptcy, or (d) any assignment for the benefit of creditors or any other marshaling of assets and liabilities of any Grantor.
"" means all intellectual and similar property of every kind and nature now owned or hereafter acquired by any Grantor, including inventions, designs, Patents, Copyrights, Licenses, Trademarks, trade secrets, domain names, confidential or proprietary technical and business information, know-how, show-how or other data or information, software and databases and all embodiments or fixations thereof and related documentation, registrations and franchises, and all additions, improvements and accessions to, and books and records describing or used in connection with, any of the foregoing.
Intellectual Property
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.08(a).
Intellectual Property License
"" means, as to any Collateral, the Agent whose Liens on such Collateral are junior and subordinate to the Liens of the other Agent on such Collateral pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge that, subject to the proviso set forth in Section 2.01(a), the ABL Agent is the Junior Agent with respect to the Term Priority Collateral and the Term Agent is the Junior Agent with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral, and that, accordingly, any reference herein to the "Junior Agent" shall be construed as a reference to the ABL Agent insofar as the Term Priority Collateral is concerned and to the Term Agent insofar as the ABL Priority Collateral is concerned.
Junior Agent
"" means (a) with respect to Junior Obligations that are ABL Obligations or Junior Secured Parties that are ABL Secured Parties, the ABL Documents and (b) with respect to Junior Obligations that are Term Obligations or the Junior Secured Parties that are Term Secured Parties, the Term Documents.
Junior Documents
"" means, subject to the proviso set forth in Section 2.01(a), (a) with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral or the ABL Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral, the Term Liens on such Collateral, and (b) with respect to the Term Priority Collateral or the Term Liens on the Term Priority Collateral, the ABL Liens on such Collateral.
Junior Liens
"" means (a) with respect to any Collateral or any Senior Liens thereon, any Obligations that are secured by Junior Liens on such Collateral and (b) with respect to any Senior Obligations or Senior Secured Parties secured by any Collateral, any Obligations that are secured by Junior Liens on such Collateral.
Junior Obligations
 
"" means (a) with respect to the ABL Agent and any other ABL Secured Party, Term Priority Collateral and (b) with respect to the Term Agent and any other Term Secured Party, ABL Priority Collateral.
Junior Priority Collateral
"" means, as to any Collateral, the Secured Parties whose Liens on such Collateral are junior and subordinate to the Liens of the other Secured Parties on such Collateral pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge that the ABL Secured Parties are the Junior Secured Parties with respect to the Term Priority Collateral and the Term Secured Parties are the Junior Secured Parties with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral, and that, accordingly, any reference herein to the "Junior Secured Parties" shall be construed as a reference to the ABL Secured Parties insofar as the Term Priority Collateral is concerned and to the Term Secured Parties insofar as the ABL Priority Collateral is concerned.
Junior Secured Parties
"" means any Patent License, Trademark License, Copyright License or other license or sublicense agreement with respect to intellectual property to which any Grantor is a party.
License
"" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, charge, security interest or other encumbrance in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.05.
New Agent
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.05.
Notice of New Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.02.
Notification of Proceeds
"" means all ABL Obligations and all Term Obligations.
Obligations
"" means any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any Person any right to make, use or sell any invention on which a Patent now or hereafter owned by any other Person, or that any other Person now or hereafter otherwise has the right to license, is in existence, and all rights of any such Person under any such agreement.
Patent License
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by such Person: (a) all letters patent of the United States or the equivalent thereof in any other country, all registrations and recordings thereof and all applications for letters patent of the United States or the equivalent thereof in any other country, including registrations, recordings and pending applications in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or any similar offices in any other country, and (b) all reissues, continuations, divisions, continuations-in-part, renewals or extensions thereof, and the inventions disclosed or claimed therein, including the right to make, use and/or sell the inventions disclosed or claimed therein.
Patents
 
"" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.04(a).
Pledged or Controlled Collateral
"" means, with respect to any Obligations, all interest (including interest accruing at the default rate specified in the applicable Credit Documents), fees, costs, expenses and other amounts that would accrue and become due after commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding but for commencement of such Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, whether or not such amounts are allowed or allowable, in whole or in part, in any such Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Post-Petition Amounts
"" has the meaning set forth in the Term Credit Agreement.
Proceeds Collateral Account
"" means, with respect to the Obligations of any Class, the occurrence of any of the following: (a) an acceleration of the Obligations of such Class in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement of such Class; (b) a payment default in respect of Obligations under the Credit Agreement of such Class that has not been cured or waived in accordance with the terms thereof within 30 days of the occurrence thereof; or (c) the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Purchase Event
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.05.
Recovery
"" means, in respect of any Indebtedness, to refinance or replace, or to issue other Indebtedness in exchange for or replacement of, such Indebtedness in whole or in part. The terms "" and "" shall have correlative meanings.
Refinance
Refinanced
Refinancing
"" means (a) in the case of the ABL Agent, the ABL Secured Parties and (b) in the case of the Term Agent, the Term Secured Parties.
Related Secured Parties
"" means the ABL Secured Parties and the Term Secured Parties.
Secured Parties
"" means, as to any Collateral, the Agent whose Liens on such Collateral are senior to the Liens of the other Agent on such Collateral pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge that, subject to the proviso set forth in Section 2.01(a), the ABL Agent is the Senior Agent with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral and the Term Agent is the Senior Agent with respect to the Term Priority Collateral, and that, accordingly, any reference herein to the "Senior Agent" shall be construed as a reference to the ABL Agent insofar as the ABL Priority Collateral is concerned and to the Term Agent insofar as the Term Priority Collateral is concerned.
Senior Agent
 
"" means (a) with respect to Senior Obligations that are ABL Obligations, the ABL Documents and (b) with respect to Senior Obligations that are Term Obligations, the Term Documents.
Senior Documents
"" means, subject to the proviso set forth in Section 2.01(a), (a) with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral or the Term Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral, the ABL Liens on such Collateral, and (b) with respect to the Term Priority Collateral or the ABL Liens on the Term Priority Collateral, the Term Liens on such Collateral, and, in each case, any Liens incurred in connection with any Refinancing of Senior Obligations that are deemed to be Senior Liens under Section 5.05.
Senior Liens
"" means (a) with respect to any Collateral or any Junior Liens thereon, any Obligations that are secured by Senior Liens on such Collateral and (b) with respect to any Junior Obligations or Junior Secured Parties secured by any Collateral, any Obligations that are secured by Senior Liens on such Collateral.
Senior Obligations
"" means (a) with respect to the ABL Agent and any other ABL Secured Party, ABL Priority Collateral and (b) with respect to the Term Agent and any other Term Secured Party, Term Priority Collateral.
Senior Priority Collateral
"" means, as to any Collateral, the Secured Parties whose Liens on such Collateral are senior to the Liens of the other Secured Parties on such Collateral pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge that the ABL Secured Parties are the Senior Secured Parties with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral and the Term Secured Parties are the Senior Secured Parties with respect to the Term Priority Collateral, and that, accordingly, any reference herein to the "Senior Secured Parties" shall be construed as a reference to the ABL Secured Parties insofar as the ABL Priority Collateral is concerned and to the Term Secured Parties insofar as the Term Priority Collateral is concerned.
Senior Secured Parties
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.06.
Subject Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.06.
Subject Secured Parties
"" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, (a) any Person the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date and (b) any other Person (i) of which Equity Interests representing more than 50% of the equity value or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (ii) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
"" means any direct or indirect subsidiary of the Company.
Subsidiary
 
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.08(b).
Successor Intellectual Property License
"" means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Company or any Subsidiary shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
"" shall mean, with respect to any Person, the obligations of such Person under any Swap Agreement.
Swap Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
Term Agent
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "Term Obligations".
Term Cap Amount
"" means all "Collateral", as defined in the Term Credit Agreement, and any other assets of any Grantor now or at any time hereafter subject or purported under the terms of any Term Collateral Document to be made subject to any Lien securing any Term Obligations.
Term Collateral
"" means the Term Guarantee and Collateral Agreement, the Term Mortgages and the other "Collateral Documents", as defined in the Term Credit Agreement, and any other agreement, document or instrument now existing or entered into after the date hereof that grants a Lien on any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary to secure any Term Obligations, as each may be Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Term Collateral Documents
"" means the Term Loan Agreement dated as of the date hereof, among the Company, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Term Agent, as Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Term Credit Agreement
"" means the Term Credit Agreement, the Term Collateral Documents and all other "Loan Documents", as defined in the Term Credit Agreement.
Term Documents
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "Term Obligations".
Term Excess Amounts
"" means the Guarantee and Collateral Agreement dated as of the date hereof, among the Company, the Subsidiaries party thereto and the Term Agent, as Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Term Guarantee and Collateral Agreement
 
"" means all Liens on the Collateral securing the Term Obligations, whether created under the Term Collateral Documents or acquired by possession, statute (including any judgment lien), operation of law, subrogation or otherwise and whether or not created following the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, now or hereafter held by or on behalf of the Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party, or any agent or trustee therefor.
Term Liens
"" means each mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents or other security document that grants a Lien on any real property owned or leased by any Grantor to secure any Term Obligations.
Term Mortgage
"" means all "Secured Obligations", as defined in the Term Guarantee and Collateral Agreement (including any such Secured Obligations arising or accruing during the pendency of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding), notwithstanding that any such Secured Obligations or claims therefor shall be disallowed, voided or subordinated in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding or under any Bankruptcy Law or other applicable law. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the sum of the Term Obligations consisting of, without duplication, (a) principal amount of loans or advances under the Term Credit Agreement and the other Term Documents and (b) the aggregate face amount of all outstanding letters of credit issued or deemed issued under, or otherwise secured under, the Term Credit Agreement and the other Term Documents (the foregoing Term Obligations being collectively referred to as the ""), exceeds $400,000,000 (the ""), then the portion of the Capped Term Obligations exceeding the Term Cap Amount (such portion being referred to as the ""), and all interest, premiums, reimbursement obligations and other amounts in respect of the Term Excess Amounts, shall be secured by the Term Collateral Documents but shall not constitute "Term Obligations" for all purposes of this Agreement (other than Sections 2.02 and 2.04, the definition of the term "Grantors" and the definition of the term "Term Liens" as such term is used in Sections 2.01, 2.02).
Term Obligations
Capped Term Obligations
Term Cap Amount
Term Excess Amounts
"" means any and all of the following that constitute Collateral: (a) all Equipment, all real property and interests therein (including both fee and leasehold interests) and all fixtures; (b) all Intellectual Property; (c) each Proceeds Collateral Account, and all cash, cash equivalents, checks and other negotiable Instruments, funds and other evidences of payment and all Financial Assets held on deposit therein or credited thereto, and all Security Entitlements arising therefrom; (d) all Equity Interests; (e) all Commercial Tort Claims; (f) to the extent not expressly constituting ABL Priority Collateral (disregarding, for purposes of this clause (f), clause (i) of the definition of the term "ABL Priority Collateral"), all Investment Property, all Documents, all General Intangibles, all Instruments and all Letter of Credit Rights; (g) all other Collateral not constituting ABL Priority Collateral; (h) all Proceeds, including insurance Proceeds (other than business interruption insurance proceeds), of any of the foregoing and all collateral security and guarantees or other credit support given by any Person with respect to any of the foregoing; and (i) all books and records relating to any of the foregoing.
Term Priority Collateral
 
"" means the Term Agent and the other "Secured Parties" as defined in the Term Guarantee and Collateral Agreement.
Term Secured Parties
"" means any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any Person any right to use any Trademark now or hereafter owned by any other Person, or that any other Person otherwise has the right to license, and all rights of any such Person under any such agreement.
Trademark License
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by such Person: (a) all trademarks, service marks, trade names, corporate names, company names, business names, fictitious business names, trade styles, trade dress, logos, other source or business identifiers, designs and general intangibles of like nature, now existing or hereafter adopted or acquired, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all registration and recording applications filed in connection therewith, including registrations, recordings and applications in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or any similar offices in any other country or any political subdivision thereof, and all extensions or renewals thereof, (b) all goodwill associated therewith or symbolized thereby and (c) all other assets, rights and interests that uniquely reflect or embody such goodwill.
Trademarks
"" means the Uniform Commercial Code (or any similar or equivalent legislation) as in effect in any applicable jurisdiction.
UCC
SECTION 1.03. The definitions of terms in this Agreement shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". The words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all real and personal, tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights. The word "law" shall be construed as referring to all statutes, rules, regulations, codes and other laws (including official rulings and interpretations thereunder having the force of law or with which affected persons customarily comply) of all Governmental Authorities. Unless the context requires otherwise, (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time Amended (subject to any restrictions on such Amendments set forth herein); (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's permitted successors and assigns, and any reference herein to the Company or any other Grantor shall be construed to include the Company or such other Grantor as debtor and debtor-in-possession and any receiver or trustee for the Company or such other Grantor, as the case may be, in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding; (c) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar
Terms Generally.
 
import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof; and (d) all references herein to Articles and Sections shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of this Agreement.
SECTION 2.01. (a) Notwithstanding (i) the date, time, method, manner or order of grant, attachment or perfection of any ABL Lien or any Term Lien on any Collateral, (ii) any provision of the UCC or any other applicable law or of any ABL Document or any Term Document, (iii) any defect or deficiencies in, or failure to perfect, any ABL Lien or any Term Lien or (iv) any other circumstance whatsoever, each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby agrees that:
Relative Priorities.
(A) any ABL Lien on any ABL Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law, subrogation or otherwise, shall be senior in all respects and prior to any Term Lien on any ABL Priority Collateral;
(B) any Term Lien on any ABL Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law, subrogation or otherwise, shall be junior and subordinate in all respects to any ABL Lien on any ABL Priority Collateral;
(C) any Term Lien on any Term Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law, subrogation or otherwise, shall be senior in all respects and prior to any ABL Lien on any Term Priority Collateral; and
(D) any ABL Lien on any Term Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law, subrogation or otherwise, shall be junior and subordinate in all respects to any Term Lien on any Term Priority Collateral;
that notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement:
provided
(1) any ABL Lien on any ABL Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law, subrogation or otherwise, insofar as such ABL Lien secures ABL Excess Amounts, shall be junior and subordinate in all respects to all Term Liens on any ABL Priority Collateral (other than any Term Lien insofar as such Term Lien secures Term Excess Amounts); and
(2) any Term Lien on any Term Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law,
 
subrogation or otherwise, insofar as such Term Lien secures Term Excess Amounts, shall be junior and subordinate in all respects to all ABL Liens on any Term Priority Collateral (other than any ABL Lien insofar as such ABL Lien secures ABL Excess Amounts).
(b) The relative Lien priorities in respect of any Collateral set forth in this Section are only with respect to the priority of the Liens held by or on behalf of the Agents and their Related Secured Parties and shall not constitute a subordination of any Obligations to any other Obligations.
SECTION 2.02. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them will (and hereby waives any right to) contest or question the validity or enforceability of, or join or otherwise support any other Person in contesting or questioning the validity or enforceability of, in any proceeding, including any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, (a) the existence, perfection, priority, validity or enforceability of any ABL Lien (whether securing ABL Obligations or any ABL Excess Amounts) or any Term Lien (whether securing Term Obligations or any Term Excess Amounts), (b) the validity or enforceability of any ABL Obligations (or any ABL Excess Amounts) or any Term Obligations (or any Term Excess Amounts) or (c) the enforceability of this Agreement; that nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to prevent or impair the right of any Secured Party to enforce this Agreement.
Prohibition on Contests.
provided
SECTION 2.03. (a) Whether or not any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding has been commenced, each Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, that no Secured Party shall accept any additional Lien under any Collateral Document on any asset of any Grantor to secure Obligations of any Class unless such Grantor has granted or concurrently grants a Lien on such asset to secure Obligations of the other Class (all such Liens to have the relative priorities set forth herein based on whether the assets subject to such Liens constitute ABL Priority Collateral or Term Priority Collateral and whether such Liens secure ABL Excess Amounts or Term Excess Amounts); that the foregoing shall not apply to (i) Liens on any asset of any Grantor granted to secure Obligations of any Class if such asset is expressly excluded from the grant of a security interest by such Grantor pursuant to the Collateral Documents of the other Class and (ii) additional Liens on any asset of any Grantor granted to secure Obligations of any Class if, prior to such grant, such Grantor has offered in writing to grant a Lien on such asset to secure Obligations of the other Class and the Agent of such other Class has affirmatively declined in writing to accept such Lien or has failed to respond to such offer within 30 days thereof, in which case such Agent shall be deemed to have declined to accept such Lien. To the extent that the foregoing provisions are not complied with for any reason, without limiting any other rights and remedies available to the other Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties, each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that any amounts received by or distributed to such Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties pursuant to or as a result of Liens granted in contravention of this Section shall be subject to Section 4.02.
No New Liens.
provided
 
(b) Each Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, to cooperate in good faith in order to determine, upon any reasonable request by the other Agent, the specific assets included in the ABL Collateral and the Term Collateral, the steps taken to perfect the ABL Liens and the Term Liens thereon and the identity of the respective parties obligated under the ABL Documents and the Term Documents.
SECTION 2.04. The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, expressly acknowledges and agrees that (a) the ABL Credit Agreement includes a revolving commitment and that in the ordinary course of business the ABL Agent and the ABL Lenders will apply payments and make advances thereunder, (b) the amount of the ABL Obligations that may be outstanding at any time or from time to time may be increased or reduced and subsequently reborrowed, (c) all cash collateral received by the ABL Agent may be applied, reversed, reapplied, credited, or reborrowed, in whole or in part, to the ABL Obligations at any time and from time to time and (d) the advance rates under the ABL Credit Agreement may be reduced, and Reserves (as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement) may be imposed, under the terms of the ABL Credit Agreement, in each case without altering or otherwise affecting the Lien priorities set forth in this Agreement.
Revolving Nature of ABL Obligations.
SECTION 3.01. (a) Until the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to such Collateral has occurred, whether or not any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding has been commenced, each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them will:
Exercise of Remedies.
(i) enforce or exercise, or seek to enforce or exercise, any rights or remedies with respect to any Senior Priority Collateral of any Secured Party of the other Class (including the exercise of any right of set-off or enforcement of any right under any lockbox agreement, control agreement, landlord waiver or bailee's letter or similar agreement or arrangement) or institute any action or proceeding with respect to such rights or remedies (including any action of foreclosure); that the parties hereto acknowledge and agree that this Section shall not in any way prohibit any Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties from (A) commencing, or joining in filing of a petition for commencement of, any involuntary Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding of the type described in clause (a) or (b) of the definition of such term or (B) exercising any of its rights during an Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding to the extent expressly permitted by Article VI;
provided
(ii) subject to the proviso set forth in paragraph (a)(i) of this Section, commence or join with any Person (other than the Senior Secured Parties upon the request thereof) in commencing, or file with any court documents that seek to commence, or petition for or vote in favor of, any action or proceeding with
 
respect to any rights or remedies with respect to any Senior Priority Collateral of any Secured Party of the other Class (including any foreclosure action or seeking or requesting relief from or modification of the automatic stay or any other stay in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding to enable the commencement and pursuit thereof);
(iii) contest, protest or object to any foreclosure proceeding or action brought by any Secured Party of the other Class with respect to, or any other enforcement or exercise by any Secured Party of such other Class of any rights and remedies relating to, any Senior Priority Collateral of such Secured Party, whether under the Credit Documents of such other Class or otherwise and including any Disposition of any such Senior Priority Collateral, whether by foreclosure or otherwise; and
(iv) contest, protest or object to the forbearance by any Secured Party of the other Class from bringing or pursuing any foreclosure proceeding or action with respect to, or any other enforcement or exercise by any Secured Party of such other Class of any rights or remedies relating to, any Senior Priority Collateral of such Secured Party;
that, in each case under this Section, the Junior Liens on such Collateral shall attach to all Proceeds of such Collateral resulting from actions taken by any Senior Secured Party in accordance with this Agreement, subject to the relative Lien priorities set forth in Section 2.01.
provided
(b) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement (including paragraph (a)(i) of this Section), until the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to such Collateral has occurred, whether or not any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding has been commenced, the Senior Secured Parties in respect of such Collateral shall have the exclusive right to enforce and exercise rights and remedies (including the exercise of any right of set-off, any right under any lockbox agreement, control agreement, landlord waiver or bailee's letter or similar agreement or arrangement and the right to credit bid their debt) with respect to any of their Senior Priority Collateral and, in the course of such exercise, make related determinations regarding the release, Disposition or restrictions with respect to any such Collateral, without any consultation with or the consent of any Junior Secured Party; that the Junior Liens on such Collateral shall remain on the Proceeds of such Collateral so released or Disposed of, subject to the relative Lien priorities set forth in Section 2.01. In exercising rights and remedies with respect to any of its Senior Priority Collateral, each Senior Secured Party may enforce the provisions of the applicable Senior Documents and exercise remedies thereunder, all in such order and in such manner as it may determine in its sole discretion. Such exercise and enforcement shall include the right of any agent appointed by any Senior Secured Party to sell or otherwise Dispose of such Collateral upon foreclosure, to incur expenses in connection with such sale or other Disposition and to exercise all the rights and remedies of a secured creditor under the UCC and of a secured creditor under Bankruptcy Laws of any applicable jurisdiction.
provided
 
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Section, the Secured Parties of any Class may:
(i) file a claim or statement of interest with respect to Obligations of such Class in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding;
(ii) take any action in order to create, perfect, preserve, protect or prove (but not enforce) their Junior Liens on any Collateral, that no such action is, or could reasonably be expected to be, (A) adverse to the priority status of any Senior Liens on such Collateral or the rights of any Senior Secured Party to exercise remedies in respect thereof or (B) otherwise inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement, including the automatic release of Junior Liens provided in Section 5.01;
provided
(iii) file any responsive or defensive pleadings in opposition to any motion, claim, adversary proceeding or other pleading made by any Person objecting to or otherwise seeking the disallowance of the claims of any Secured Party of such Class, including any claims secured by Junior Priority Collateral thereof, or the avoidance of any Liens on the Collateral securing Obligations of such Class, in each case, to the extent not inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement;
(iv) exercise their rights and remedies as unsecured creditors to the extent (and only to the extent) provided in paragraph (e) of this Section;
(v) vote on any plan of reorganization (including to accept or reject any plan of partial or complete liquidation, reorganization, arrangement, composition or extension), file any proof of claim with respect to Obligations or Liens of such Class, and make other filings and make any arguments and motions, in each case, to the extent not inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement; and
(vi) join (but not exercise any control with respect to) any judicial foreclosure proceeding or other judicial lien enforcement proceeding with respect to any Collateral initiated by any Senior Secured Party with respect thereto, to the extent that any such action could not reasonably be expected to restrain, hinder, limit, delay for any significant period or otherwise interfere with the exercise of rights or remedies with respect to such Collateral by the Senior Secured Parties (it being understood that no Junior Secured Party shall be entitled to receive any Proceeds thereof unless otherwise expressly permitted hereby).
Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that it will not take or receive any Senior Priority Collateral of any Secured Party of the other Class or any Proceeds of any such Collateral in connection with the enforcement or exercise of any right or remedy (including any right of set-off) with respect to such Collateral in its capacity as a creditor, or in connection with any insurance policy relating to any such Collateral or any Condemnation Proceeds relating to any such Collateral, in each case to the extent such action is inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement. Without limiting
 
the generality of the foregoing, until the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to such Collateral has occurred, except as expressly provided in this paragraphs (a) and (c) of this Section (but subject to Section 4.02) and Sections 5.07, 5.08, 5.09, 6.03(b) and 6.03(c), the sole right of the Secured Parties of any Class with respect to any of the Senior Priority Collateral of the Secured Parties of the other Class is to hold a Junior Lien on such Collateral and to receive a share of the Proceeds thereof, if any, after such Discharge of Senior Obligations has occurred.
(d) Subject to paragraphs (a) and (c) of this Section and Sections 5.07, 5.08, 5.09, 6.03(b) and 6.03(c), each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties:
(i) agrees that neither such Agent nor any of its Related Secured Parties will take any action that (A) could reasonably be expected to restrain, hinder, limit, delay or otherwise interfere with (1) any enforcement or exercise of remedies with respect to any Senior Priority Collateral of any Secured Party of the other Class, including any Disposition of such Senior Priority Collateral, whether by foreclosure or otherwise, or (2) the realization by any Secured Party of the other Class of the full value of any of its Senior Priority Collateral or (B) otherwise would be prohibited hereunder, including any Disposition of any such Collateral, whether by foreclosure or otherwise;
(ii) waives any and all rights such Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties may have as junior lien creditors or otherwise to object to the manner in which any Secured Party of the other Class seeks to enforce or collect any Obligations of such other Class or to enforce or realize on its Senior Liens on any Collateral undertaken in accordance with this Agreement, regardless of whether any action or failure to act by or on behalf of any Secured Party of such other Class is adverse to the interests of such Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties; and
(iii) acknowledges and agrees that no covenant, agreement or restriction contained in any Collateral Document or other Credit Document of any Class shall be deemed to restrict in any way the rights and remedies of any Secured Party of the other Class with respect to any Collateral subject to its Senior Liens as set forth in this Agreement and the Credit Documents of such other Class.
(e) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, the Secured Parties of any Class may, in accordance with the terms of the Documents of such Class and applicable law, enforce rights and exercise remedies against the Company and any other Grantor as unsecured creditors; that no such action is inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement (including the limitations set forth in paragraphs (a) and (d) of this Section and in Article VI); that in the event any Secured Party becomes a judgment Lien creditor in respect of any Collateral as a result of its enforcement of its rights as an unsecured creditor with respect to any of its Obligations, such judgment Lien shall be subject to the terms of this Agreement, including the relative Lien priorities set forth in Section 2.01.
provided
provided
further
 
(f) Nothing in this Agreement shall prohibit the receipt by any Secured Party of any Class of the required or permitted payments of interest, principal and other amounts owed in respect of Obligations of such Class so long as such receipt is not the direct or indirect result of the enforcement or exercise by any Secured Party of such Class of rights or remedies as a secured creditor (including the right of set-off) against, or otherwise holding a Junior Lien on, the Senior Priority Collateral of any Secured Party of the other Class or enforcement in contravention of this Agreement of any Junior Lien on any such Collateral (it being agreed that any such enforcement or exercise permitted by this Agreement shall be subject to Section 4.02). Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to impair or otherwise adversely affect any rights or remedies any Secured Party of any Class may have with respect to any Collateral subject to its Senior Liens.
SECTION 3.02. The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges that, under the terms of the ABL Documents, Grantors are or may be required to ensure that all payments on Accounts constituting ABL Priority Collateral, or on other ABL Priority Collateral, are made to Deposit Accounts or lockboxes related thereto that constitute ABL Priority Collateral, and agrees that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth herein, no ABL Secured Party shall have any duty, responsibility or obligation to any Term Secured Party with respect to such Deposit Accounts or lockboxes, including no obligation to pay over to any Term Secured Party any payments received into any such Deposit Account or lockbox at any time. The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, agrees that to the extent that Proceeds of any Term Priority Collateral are deposited into any Deposit Accounts or lockboxes and are subsequently applied to repay or prepay the ABL Obligations, in the absence of the ABL Agent's willful misconduct or gross negligence (such absence to be presumed unless otherwise determined by a final, non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction), the sole remedy of the Term Secured Parties with regard to such Proceeds shall be to proceed directly against the Grantors unless, prior to the time such proceeds are applied to repay or prepay the ABL Obligations, the ABL Agent has actually received a Notification of Proceeds. For purposes of the foregoing, a "" means a notice in writing from the Term Collateral Agent or any Grantor to the ABL Agent containing the following information: (a) the Term Priority Collateral being sold or otherwise Disposed; (b) the proposed date of the sale or other Disposition; (c) the approximate amount of Proceeds therefrom; and (d) the name and contact information of the buyer or transferee of such Term Priority Collateral or, in the case of an auction, of the auctioneer.
Lockbox System.
Notification of Proceeds
SECTION 4.01. (a) Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby agrees that the ABL Priority Collateral or
Application of Proceeds.
 
Proceeds thereof received in connection with the sale or other Disposition of, or collection on, such ABL Priority Collateral upon the enforcement or exercise or any right or remedy (including any right of set-off) shall be applied:
(i) , to the payment of the ABL Obligations in accordance with the ABL Documents,
first
(ii) , to the payment of the Term Obligations in accordance with the Term Documents,
second
(iii) , to the payment of ABL Excess Amounts in accordance with the ABL Documents,
third
(iv) , to the payment of Term Excess Amounts in accordance with the Term Documents, and
fourth
(v) , the balance, if any, to the Grantors or to whomsoever may be lawfully entitled to receive the same or as a court of competent jurisdiction may direct.
fifth
(b) Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby agrees that the Term Priority Collateral or Proceeds thereof received in connection with the sale or other Disposition of, or collection on, such Term Priority Collateral upon the enforcement or exercise or any right or remedy (including any right of set-off) shall be applied:
(i) , to the payment of the Term Obligations in accordance with the Term Documents,
first
(ii) , to the payment of the ABL Obligations in accordance with the ABL Documents,
second
(iii) , to the payment of Term Excess Amounts in accordance with the Term Documents,
third
(iv) , to the payment of ABL Excess Amounts in accordance with the ABL Documents, and
fourth
(v) , the balance, if any, to the Grantors or to whomsoever may be lawfully entitled to receive the same or as a court of competent jurisdiction may direct.
fifth
SECTION 4.02. So long as the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to any Collateral has not occurred, whether or not any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding has been commenced, if (a) any Junior Secured Party receives any Collateral subject to any Senior Lien or any Proceeds of any such Collateral, or any other payment in connection with or on account of such Collateral, (i) in connection with the enforcement or exercise of any right or remedy (including any
Payments Over.
 
right of set-off) relating to such Collateral, the transfer of such Collateral or Proceeds to any Junior Secured Party by any Person holding a Lien on such Collateral that is subordinate to the Junior Lien on such Collateral, or any insurance policy claim or any Condemnation Proceeds in respect of such Collateral or (ii) as a distribution or recovery in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, (b) any Junior Secured Party receives, in contravention of Section 2.03, any Collateral of the type that would constitute Junior Priority Collateral of such Junior Secured Party, or any Proceeds of any such Collateral, or any other payment in connection with or on account of such Collateral, or (c) any Junior Secured Party receives any additional Collateral referred to in Section 6.03(b)(ii) that pursuant to such Section is subject to the provisions of this Section 4.02, or any Proceeds of such additional Collateral, or any other payment in connection with or on account of such additional Collateral, then, in each case, such Collateral or Proceeds thereof, or such other payment, shall be segregated and held in trust and forthwith transferred or paid over to the Senior Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Senior Secured Parties in the same form as received, with any necessary endorsements, or as a court of competent jurisdiction may otherwise direct. Until the Discharge of Senior Obligations occurs, each Junior Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby appoints the Senior Agent, and any officer or agent of the Senior Agent, with full power of substitution, as its true and lawful attorney-in-fact with full power and authority in the name, place and stead of each such Junior Secured Party or in such Senior Agent's own name, from time to time in such Senior Agent's discretion, for the purpose of carrying out the terms of this Section, to take any and all action or to execute and any all documents and instruments that may be necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this Section, including any endorsements or other instruments of transfer (which appointment is irrevocable and coupled with an interest).
SECTION 4.03. Upon the Discharge of Obligations of any Class, the Agent of such Class shall, except as may otherwise be required by applicable law or any order of any court or other Governmental Authority, deliver, at the expense of the Grantors, to the Agent of the other Class, without representation or recourse, any Collateral (including any Pledged or Controlled Collateral) held by the Agent of such Class at such time in the same form as received, with any necessary endorsements (so as, in respect of any such Pledged or Controlled Collateral, to allow the Agent of such other Class to obtain possession or control thereof), to be applied by the Agent of such other Class to the Obligations of such other Class in the order specified in the Credit Documents of such other Class.
Delivery of Collateral and Proceeds.
SECTION 5.01. (a) The Junior Liens on any Collateral shall be automatically, unconditionally and simultaneously released if:
Releases.
(i) in connection with the enforcement or exercise of its rights or remedies in respect of such Collateral, the Senior Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, releases its Senior Liens on any part of such Collateral; or
 
(ii) in connection with any Disposition permitted under the terms of both the ABL Documents and the Term Documents, the Senior Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, releases any of its Senior Liens on any part of such Collateral, other than following the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to such Collateral; or
that, in each case, the Junior Liens on such Collateral shall attach to all Proceeds of such Collateral in accordance with this Agreement, subject to the relative Lien priorities set forth in Section 2.01.
provided
(b) The Junior Agent with respect to any Collateral, for itself or on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, promptly shall (at the Grantors' expense) execute and deliver to the Senior Agent such documents and instruments as the Senior Agent may reasonably request to accomplish the purposes of this Section, including any endorsements or other instruments of transfer or release.
(c) Until the Discharge of Obligations of the other Class has occurred, each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby irrevocably constitutes and appoints the other Agent and any officer or agent of the other Agent, with full power of substitution, as its true and lawful attorney-in-fact with full power and authority in the name, place and stead of such Agent or its Related Secured Parties or in such other Agent's own name, from time to time in such other Agent's discretion, for the purpose of carrying out the terms of this Section, to take any and all action and to execute any and all documents and instruments that may be necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this Section, including any endorsements or other instruments of transfer or release (which appointment is irrevocable and coupled with an interest).
(d) Until the Discharge of Senior Obligations in respect of such Collateral has occurred, to the extent that the Senior Agent or the Senior Secured Parties released any Senior Lien on any Collateral and any such Lien is later reinstated, then the Junior Agent, for itself and for its Related Secured Parties, shall have a Lien on such Collateral, subject to the relative Lien priorities set forth in Section 2.01.
SECTION 5.02. (a) Until the Discharge of Term Obligations has occurred, and subject to the rights of the Grantors under the Term Documents, the Term Secured Parties shall have the exclusive right to adjust settlement under any insurance policy in respect of any Casualty to, or to approve any Condemnation Proceeds in respect of, any Term Priority Collateral, and all Proceeds on account thereof shall be paid to the Term Agent.
Insurance.
(b) Until the Discharge of ABL Obligations has occurred, and subject to the rights of the Grantors under the ABL Documents, the ABL Secured Parties shall have the exclusive right to adjust settlement under any insurance policy in respect of any Casualty to, or to approve any Condemnation Proceeds in respect of, any ABL Priority Collateral, and all Proceeds on account of ABL Priority Collateral shall be paid to the ABL Agent.
 
(c) Until the Discharge of ABL Obligations has occurred, subject to the rights of the Grantors under the ABL Documents, the ABL Secured Parties shall have the exclusive right to adjust settlement in respect of all business interruption insurance, and all Proceeds on account thereof shall be paid to the ABL Agent.
(d) Any insurance Proceeds and Condemnation Proceeds received by the Agent of any Class in accordance herewith shall, subject to the rights of the Grantors under the Credit Documents of such Class, be held or applied by it in accordance with such Credit Documents; that following the acceleration of the Obligations of such Class under such Credit Documents, all such amounts shall be promptly applied to such Obligations to the extent permitted under applicable law.
provided
(e) Until the Discharge of Obligations of the other Class has occurred, if any Secured Party of any Class shall, at any time, receive any insurance Proceeds (including Proceeds of the business interruption insurance) or Condemnation Proceeds in contravention of this Agreement, it shall segregate and hold in trust and forthwith pay over such insurance Proceeds or Condemnation Proceeds over to the Agent of the other Class in accordance with the terms of Section 4.02.
(f) Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees to cooperate with the Agent and Secured Parties of the other Class in connection with any Condemnation or Casualty for the purpose of carrying out the terms of this Section. In furtherance of the foregoing, each Agent agrees promptly to execute and deliver to the Agent of the other Class such acknowledgements, releases, consents, endorsements and other documents as the Agent of such other Class may reasonably request to accomplish the purposes of this Section (including any such request made at the request of any insurer). In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this Section and any other provision hereof, the provisions of this Section shall control.
SECTION 5.03. (a) The ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that the Term Documents may be Amended, and Indebtedness thereunder may be Refinanced, without the consent of any ABL Secured Party, and the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that the ABL Documents may be Amended, and Indebtedness thereunder may be Refinanced, without the consent of any Term Secured Party. No Amendment of any Credit Document shall affect the lien subordination or other provisions of this Agreement. Nothing in this paragraph shall affect any covenant of any Grantor under the Credit Documents of any Class that restricts the ability of such Grantor to Amend any Credit Document of the other Class or to effect a Refinancing of any Indebtedness thereunder.
Certain Provisions Regarding Credit Documents.
(b) In the event any Indebtedness under the Credit Documents of any Class is Refinanced, the holders of such Refinancing Indebtedness shall bind themselves in a writing addressed to the Agent of the other Class, for the benefit of the Secured Parties of such other Class, to the terms of this Agreement.
 
(c) The Agent of each Class agrees that each Collateral Document of such Class executed by it shall include the following language (or language to similar effect approved by the Agent of the other Class):
"Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the lien and security interest granted pursuant to this Agreement and the exercise of any right or remedy hereunder are subject to the provisions of the Intercreditor Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative and collateral agent for, and acting on behalf of, the ABL Secured Parties identified therein, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative and collateral agent for, and acting on behalf of, the Term Secured Parties identified therein. In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement and this Agreement, the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement shall govern and control."
Intercreditor Agreement
SECTION 5.04. (a) Each Agent agrees to hold that part of the Collateral that is in its possession or control, or in the possession or control of its agents or bailees (such Collateral being called the ""), as collateral agent for its Related Secured Parties and as gratuitous bailee for the Agent of the other Class (such bailment being intended, among other things, to satisfy the requirements of Sections 8-106(d)(3), 8-301(a)(2) and 9-313(c) of the UCC) solely for the purpose of perfecting the security interest granted under the Credit Documents of such other Class, subject to the terms and conditions of this Section.
Bailee for Perfection.
Pledged or Controlled Collateral
(b) No Agent shall have any obligation whatsoever to its Related Secured Parties or to any Secured Party of the other Class to ensure that the Pledged or Controlled Collateral is genuine or owned by any of the Grantors or to preserve rights or benefits of any Person. The duties or responsibilities of any Agent to any Secured Party of the other Class under this Section shall be limited solely to holding the Pledged or Controlled Collateral in its possession or under its control as gratuitous bailee in accordance with this Section and delivering such Pledged or Controlled Collateral upon the Discharge of Obligations of the applicable Class as provided in Section 4.03.
(c) No Agent acting pursuant to this Section shall have by reason of any Credit Document, this Agreement or any other document or agreement a fiduciary relationship in respect any Secured Party or any liability to any Secured Party, absent gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of such Agent (such absence to be presumed unless otherwise determined by a final, non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction).
 
(d) Subject to the terms of this Agreement, so long as the Discharge of Obligations of the applicable Class has not occurred, each Agent shall be entitled to deal with the Pledged or Controlled Collateral in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and the Credit Documents of the applicable Class. Upon the Discharge of such Obligations, such Agent shall, at the expense of the Grantors, take such other actions as are reasonably requested by the other Agent in connection with such other Agent obtaining a first-priority interest in, or possession or control of, such Pledged or Controlled Collateral.
SECTION 5.05. If any Grantor shall enter into any Refinancing of Obligations of any Class that is permitted by the Credit Documents of the other Class, where obligations under such Refinancing are secured by Liens on Collateral subject to Senior Liens securing such Refinanced Obligations, then a Discharge of Obligations of such Class shall be deemed not to have occurred for all purposes of this Agreement and, from and after the date on which the Notice of New Obligations is delivered to the Agent of the other Class in accordance with the next sentence, (a) the obligations under such Refinancing of Obligations of any Class shall automatically be treated as Obligations of such Class (to the same extent as the Refinanced Obligations), (b) the Liens securing such Refinancing of Obligations of any Class shall be treated as Senior Liens (to the same extent as the corresponding Liens securing the Refinanced Obligations) for all purposes of this Agreement, including for purposes of the Lien priorities and rights in respect of Collateral set forth herein, and (c) the collateral agent for such Refinancing of Obligations of any Class (the "") shall be the Agent of such Class (and, where applicable, the Senior Agent) for all purposes of this Agreement (to the same extent as the Agent for the Refinanced Obligations). Upon receipt of a notice (the "") stating that any Grantor has Refinanced any Obligations of any Class as provided above (which notice shall include the identity of the New Agent), the original Agents shall promptly enter into such documents and agreements (including Amendments to this Agreement) as the Company or such New Agent shall reasonably request in order to provide to such New Agent the rights contemplated hereby, in each case consistent in all material respects with the terms of this Agreement. The New Agent shall agree in a writing addressed to the remaining original Agent, for the benefit of its Related Secured Parties, to be bound by the terms of this Agreement. The provisions of this Section are intended to ensure that (i) the Liens on any Collateral securing any Refinancing of any Obligations of any Class will have the same priorities relative to the Liens on such Collateral securing Obligations of the other Class as the Liens that secured such Refinanced Obligations prior to such Refinancing and (ii) the parties benefited by the Liens on any Collateral securing any Refinancing of any Obligations of any Class will have the same rights and obligations relative to the parties holding Liens on such Collateral securing Obligations of the other Class as the parties that were benefited by the Liens that secured such Refinanced Obligations, and such provisions shall be construed accordingly.
When Discharge of Obligations Deemed Not to Have Occurred.
New Agent
Notice of New Obligations
SECTION 5.06. Without prejudice to the enforcement of any remedies of any Secured Party, whether under the Credit Documents or otherwise, the Agent of each Class, on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees
Obligations Purchase Right.
 
that, in the event a Purchase Event shall have occurred with respect to Obligations of such Class (the ""), the Secured Parties of the other Class (or any of them) may, at their sole expense and effort, upon notice to the Company and the Agent of such first Class, require the Secured Parties holding the Subject Obligations (the "") to assign and delegate to the Secured Parties of such other Class, without warranty or representation or recourse, all (but not less than all) of the Subject Obligations (including all, but not less than all, unfunded commitments under the applicable Credit Documents, if any, that are in effect); that (i) such assignment and delegation shall not conflict with any applicable law, and (ii) the Secured Parties of such other Class shall have paid to the Agent of such first Class, for the account of the Subject Secured Parties, in immediately available funds, an amount equal to 100% of the principal of all Indebtedness included in such Subject Obligations plus all accrued and unpaid interest thereon plus all accrued and unpaid fees and all the other Subject Obligations then outstanding (which shall include, with respect to (A) the aggregate face amount of the letters of credit, cash collateral in an amount equal to 105% thereof, (B) any Swap Obligations, 100% of the aggregate amount of such Swap Obligations (giving effect to any netting arrangements) that the Company or a Subsidiary would be required to pay if the relevant Swap Agreements giving rise to such Swap Obligations were terminated at such time, and (C) the Banking Services Obligations, 100% of the aggregate amount of the Banking Services Obligations (giving effect to any netting arrangements) that the Company or Subsidiary would be required to pay if the Banking Services giving rise to the Banking Services Obligations were terminated at such time). In order to effectuate the foregoing, the Agent of such first Class shall calculate, upon the written request of the Agent of such other Class from time to time, the amount in cash (and, with respect to clause (A) above, cash collateral) that would be necessary so to purchase the Subject Obligations. Following exercise of any such purchase right by the Secured Parties of any Class in accordance with the terms of this Section, the Secured Parties shall cooperate in consummating promptly thereafter such assignment and delegation using the applicable assignment forms set forth in the Credit Documents of the applicable Class.
Subject Obligations
Subject Secured Parties
provided
SECTION 5.07. (a) Subject to confidentiality limitations imposed by law, contract or otherwise, each Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, that if any of them obtains actual possession of any books and records of any Grantor (whether such books and records are in the form of a writing or stored in electronic form), then, upon request of the Agent of the other Class and reasonable prior notice, such Agent or such Related Secured Party in possession thereof will permit the requesting Agent, or its designated representatives and agents, to examine such books and records if and to the extent the requesting Agent delivers to such Agent or such Related Secured Party a certificate of its duly authorized officer to the effect that (i) such books and records contain, or are reasonably expected to contain, information that, in the good faith opinion of the requesting Agent, is necessary or useful to the exercise of rights and remedies with respect to the Senior Liens of the requesting Agent and (ii) the requesting Agent is entitled to receive and use such information as against the applicable Grantor or its suppliers, customers and contracts and under applicable law, and, in doing so, will comply, and will cause its Affiliates to comply, with all obligations imposed by law, contract or otherwise in respect of the disclosure or use of such information.
Sharing of Information; Rights of Access and Use.
 
(b) The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, agrees that if the ABL Agent takes any enforcement action with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral, the Term Agent and the other Term Secured Parties (i) shall cooperate with the ABL Agent (at the sole cost and expense of the ABL Agent and the ABL Secured Parties and subject to the condition that the Term Secured Parties shall have no obligation or duty to take any action or refrain from taking any action that, in the judgment of the Term Agent, could reasonably be expected to result in the incurrence of any liability, loss or damage to the Term Agent or the other Term Secured Parties) in its efforts to enforce its security interest in the ABL Priority Collateral and to assemble and sell the ABL Priority Collateral, (ii) shall not take any action designed or intended to hinder or restrict in any respect the ABL Agent from enforcing its security interest in the ABL Priority Collateral or selling or assembling the ABL Priority Collateral and (iii) in the event that the Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party shall acquire control or possession of any of the Term Priority Collateral, shall permit the ABL Agent, or its designated representatives or agents, upon reasonable advance notice, to use the Term Priority Collateral (including (x) equipment, processors, computers and other machinery related to the storage or processing of records, documents or files and (y) Intellectual Property), for a period not to exceed 120 days, for purposes of (A) assembling the ABL Priority Collateral, (B) selling (by public auction, private sale or a "store closing," "going out of business" or similar sale, whether in bulk, in lots or to customers in the ordinary course of business or otherwise and which sale may include augmented Inventory of the same type sold in the Grantors' business) any or all of the ABL Priority Collateral (including any ABL Priority Collateral located on any real property constituting Term Priority Collateral) in the ordinary course of business or otherwise, (C) removing any or all of the ABL Priority Collateral located in or on any real property constituting Term Priority Collateral or (D) taking reasonable actions to protect, secure and otherwise enforce the rights of the ABL Agent and the other ABL Secured Parties in and to the ABL Priority Collateral; that nothing contained in this paragraph shall restrict the rights of the Term Agent or the other Term Secured Parties from selling or otherwise Disposing of any Term Priority Collateral prior to the expiration of such 120-day period if the purchaser, assignee or transferee thereof agrees to be bound by the provisions of this paragraph. If any stay or other order prohibiting the enforcement or exercise of rights or remedies with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral has been entered by a court of competent jurisdiction, such 120-day period shall be tolled during the pendency of any such stay or other order. The rights of the ABL Agent, and its designated representatives and agents, set forth in clause (iii) above as to the Term Priority Collateral shall be irrevocable and royalty and rent free and shall continue at the ABL Agent's option for a period of up to 120 days as to any such Term Priority Collateral, beginning upon the earlier of (1) the date that is five days after the date on which the Term Agent has notified the ABL Agent that the Term Agent has acquired possession or control of such Term Priority Collateral and (2) the date the ABL Agent provides the Term Agent with written notice that it intends to exercise its rights under such clause with respect to such Term Priority Collateral.
provided
 
(c) During the period of actual use or control by the ABL Agent, or its designated representatives or agents, of any Term Priority Collateral, the ABL Secured Parties shall be (i) responsible for the ordinary course third party expenses related thereto, including costs with respect to heat, light, electricity and water with respect to that portion of any premises so used or controlled, or that arise as a result of such use or control, that the ABL Secured Parties shall not be obligated to pay any fee to the Term Secured Parties (or any Person claiming by, through or under the Term Secured Parties, including any purchaser of any Term Priority Collateral) or to any Grantor, for or in respect of the use by the ABL Agent, or its designated representatives or agents, of any Term Priority Collateral, and (ii) be obligated to repair at their expense any physical damage to such Term Priority Collateral resulting from such use or control, and to leave such Term Priority Collateral in substantially the same condition as it was at the commencement of such use or control, ordinary wear and tear excepted. In addition, the ABL Agent shall indemnify and hold harmless the Term Agent, and its officers, directors, employees and agents, from any liability, cost, expense, loss or damages, including reasonable and documented out-of-pocket legal fees and expenses, arising from any claim by a third party against the Term Agent to the extent such liability, cost, expense, loss or damages are found in a final, non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the ABL Agent, or its designated agents or representatives, pursuant to the exercise of its rights of access and use under paragraph (b) of this Section, to the extent not covered by insurance. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event shall the ABL Agent or the other ABL Secured Parties have any liability to the Term Agent or the other Term Secured Parties pursuant to this paragraph as a result of the condition of any Term Priority Collateral existing prior to the date of the exercise by the ABL Agent of its rights under paragraph (b) of this Section, and the ABL Agent and the other ABL Secured Parties shall have no duty or liability to maintain the Term Priority Collateral in a condition or manner better than that in which it was maintained prior to the use or control thereof by the ABL Agent, or its designated representatives or agents, or for any diminution in the value of the Term Priority Collateral that results solely from ordinary wear and tear resulting from the use or control of the Term Priority Collateral by the ABL Agent, or its designated representatives or agents, in the manner and for the time periods specified under this Section. Without limiting the rights granted under this Section, the ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, agrees to cooperate with the Term Agent (at the sole cost and expense of the Term Agent and the other Term Secured Parties and subject to the condition that the ABL Secured Parties shall have no obligation or duty to take any action or refrain from taking any action that, in the judgment of the Term Agent, could reasonably be expected to result in the incurrence of any liability, loss or damage to the ABL Agent or the ABL Secured Parties) in connection with any efforts made by the Term Agent to sell the Term Priority Collateral.
provided
(d) Neither the Agent nor any other Secured Party of any Class shall have any responsibility or liability for the acts or omissions of the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class made or arising in connection with the use or occupancy by the Agent or any other Secured Party of such other Class of any of the Term Priority Collateral.
 
(e) The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges and consents to the ABL Agent recording a memorandum of this Agreement (including the access rights set forth in this Agreement), in form reasonably acceptable to the ABL Agent, in the real property records of each county in which any real property constituting Term Priority Collateral is located. Upon the termination of the applicable access period referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section with respect to any such real property, the ABL Agent shall promptly take any actions reasonably requested by the Term Agent to remove such memoranda from the real property records relating to such real property.
SECTION 5.08. (a) The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, (i) acknowledges and consents to the grant to the ABL Agent by the Grantors of a limited, nonexclusive royalty-free license pursuant to the ABL Security Agreement (an "") and (ii) agrees that the Term Liens on the Intellectual Property constituting Collateral shall be subject to the Intellectual Property License.
Consent to License of Intellectual Property.
Intellectual Property License
(b) The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, agrees that if any Term Secured Party becomes the owner of any Intellectual Property as a result of the exercise of rights or remedies by such Term Secured Party with respect to its Senior Lien thereon, then, upon request of the ABL Agent, such Term Secured Party shall promptly provide written confirmation of the grant to the ABL Agent of, and does hereby irrevocably grant to the ABL Agent, a limited, nonexclusive royalty-free license in the form substantially similar to the Intellectual Property License (a "") to use any such Intellectual Property. Any license so granted by any Term Secured Party shall be binding on its successors and assigns (including any purchaser at a foreclosure sale). No Term Secured Party shall make any sale or transfer of any such Intellectual Property unless the purchaser or transferee thereof agrees in writing to provide a Successor Intellectual Property License to the ABL Agent upon request.
Successor Intellectual Property License
SECTION 5.09. The Term Agent agrees that if the ABL Agent shall require rights available under any permit or license controlled by the Term Agent in order to realize on any ABL Priority Collateral, the Term Agent shall take all such actions as shall be available to it (at the sole cost and expense of the Grantors), consistent with applicable law, and as shall be reasonably requested by the ABL Agent to make such rights available to the ABL Agent, subject to the Term Liens. The ABL Agent agrees that if the Term Agent shall require rights available under any permit or license controlled by the ABL Agent in order to realize on any Term Priority Collateral, the ABL Agent shall take all such actions as shall be available to it (at the sole cost and expense of the Grantors), consistent with applicable law, and as shall be reasonably requested by the Term Agent to make such rights available to the Term Agent, subject to the ABL Liens.
Permits and Licenses.
 
SECTION 6.01. Until the Discharge of ABL Obligations has occurred, if any Grantor shall be subject to any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding and the ABL Agent shall desire to permit the use of "Cash Collateral" (as such term is defined in Section 363(a) of the Bankruptcy Code) that constitutes ABL Priority Collateral (any such use being referred to as "") or to permit any Grantor to obtain financing from the ABL Secured Parties, or any of them, under Section 364 of the Bankruptcy Code or any similar Bankruptcy Law (any such financing being referred to as a ""), then the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, agrees that none of them will raise any objection to such Cash Collateral Usage or such DIP Financing, insofar as its rights with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral are affected. To the extent the ABL Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral are subordinate to or pari passu with any such DIP Financing meeting the foregoing requirements, the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, shall subordinate, and hereby subordinates, to the same extent the Term Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral to the Liens securing such DIP Financing (and all obligations relating thereto) and agrees, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, that neither the Term Agent nor any other Term Secured Party will request adequate protection or any other relief in connection with its rights as a holder of Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral (except as expressly agreed by the ABL Agent or to the extent permitted by Section 6.03(b)).
Cash Collateral and DIP Financing.
Cash Collateral Usage
DIP Financing
SECTION 6.02. Until the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to any Collateral has occurred, no Junior Secured Party with respect to such Collateral shall seek, or join or otherwise support any other Person in seeking, relief from or modification of the automatic stay or any other stay in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding in respect of such Collateral without the prior written consent of the Senior Agent with respect to such Collateral. No Junior Secured Party shall oppose, or join or otherwise support any other Person opposing, any motion of any Senior Secured Party seeking relief from the automatic stay or any other stay in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding in respect of such Senior Secured Party's Senior Priority Collateral.
Relief from the Automatic Stay.
SECTION 6.03. (a) Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them shall contest, or join or otherwise support any other Person contesting, (i) any request by the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class for adequate protection with respect to its Senior Liens on any Collateral or (ii) any objection by the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class to any motion, relief, action or proceeding based on the Agent or such other Secured Party of the other Class claiming a lack of adequate protection with respect to its Senior Liens on any Collateral.
Adequate Protection.
 
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this Section, in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding:
(i) if the Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class is granted adequate protection in the form of an additional Lien on Collateral of a type that would constitute Senior Priority Collateral of the Agent and other Secured Parties of such Class, then (A) the Agent of the other Class, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, may seek or request adequate protection in the form of a Lien on such Collateral, which Lien will be junior and subordinate to the Liens securing the Senior Obligations (and, in the case of any such Lien on additional collateral that would constitute ABL Priority Collateral, to any Cash Collateral Usage and/or DIP Financing (and all obligations related thereto) permitted by the ABL Credit Agreement) on the same basis as the other Liens on Collateral securing the Junior Obligations are so junior and subordinate to the Liens on such Collateral securing the Senior Obligations under this Agreement and (B) subject to clause (ii) below, the Agent of such first Class, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them shall contest, or join or otherwise support any other Person contesting, (1) any request by the Agent of such other Class, for itself or on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, for adequate protection pursuant to the preceding clause (A) or (2) any motion, relief, action or proceeding in support of a request for adequate protection pursuant to the preceding clause (A); and
(ii) if any Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class is granted adequate protection in the form of additional collateral of a type that would constitute Junior Priority Collateral of the Agent and other Secured Parties of such Class, then the Agent of such Class, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that the Agent of the other Class shall be entitled to be granted adequate protection in the form of a Lien on such additional collateral as security for the Obligations of such other Class (and, in the case of any additional collateral that would constitute ABL Priority Collateral, for any DIP Financing (and all obligations related thereto) provided by the ABL Secured Parties) and that any Lien on such additional collateral securing the Junior Obligations shall be junior and subordinate to the Lien on such collateral securing the Senior Obligations (and any such DIP Financing and related obligations) and to any other Liens granted to the Senior Secured Parties as adequate protection on the same basis as the other Liens on Collateral securing the Junior Obligations are so junior and subordinate to the Liens on such Collateral securing the Senior Obligations under this Agreement; that, to the extent the Agent of such other Class is not granted such adequate protection in the applicable form, any such additional collateral and any amounts recovered by or distributed to the Agent or any other Secured Party of such first Class pursuant to or as a result of any Lien on such additional collateral granted to or for the benefit of the Agent or any Secured Party of such first Class shall be subject to Section 4.02.
provided
(c) Except as expressly set forth in Sections 6.01 and 6.07 and in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section, nothing herein shall limit (i) the rights of the Agent of any Class, or any of its Related Secured Parties, to seek adequate protection with respect to its or their rights in the Collateral in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding (including adequate protection in the form of a cash payment, periodic cash payments or otherwise) or (ii) the right of the Agent of the other Class, or any of its Related Secured Parties, to object to such request for adequate protection.
 
SECTION 6.04. Subject to Sections 3.01(c) and 3.01(e), nothing contained herein shall prohibit or in any way limit the Senior Agent or any other Senior Secured Party from objecting in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding or otherwise to any action taken by the Junior Agent or any other Junior Secured Party, including the seeking by any such Junior Agent or any other Junior Secured Party of adequate protection or the asserting by any such Junior Agent or any other Junior Secured Party of any of its rights and remedies under the applicable Junior Credit Documents or otherwise, in each case to the extent affecting the Senior Agent's or such Senior Secured Parties' rights in its Senior Priority Collateral.
No Waiver.
SECTION 6.05. If any Secured Party is required in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding or otherwise to turn over or otherwise pay to the estate of any Grantor any amount paid in respect of its Senior Obligations (a "", then such Secured Party shall be entitled to a reinstatement of the applicable Senior Obligations with respect to all such recovered amounts. If this Agreement shall have been terminated prior to such Recovery, this Agreement shall be reinstated in full force and effect, and such prior termination shall not diminish, release, discharge, impair or otherwise affect the obligations of the parties hereto from such date of reinstatement.
Avoidance Issues.
Recovery
)
SECTION 6.06. (a) The Term Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, that none of them shall oppose or seek to challenge any claim by the ABL Agent or any other ABL Secured Party for allowance in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding of ABL Obligations consisting or alleged to consist of Post-Petition Amounts to the extent of the value of the Senior Priority Collateral of the ABL Agent and the other ABL Secured Parties, without regard to the existence of the Term Liens of the Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party on such Collateral.
Post-Petition Amounts.
(b) The ABL Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, that none of them shall oppose or seek to challenge any claim by the Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party for allowance in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding of Term Obligations consisting or alleged to consist of Post-Petition Amounts to the extent of the value of the Senior Priority Collateral of the Term Agent and the other Term Secured Parties, without regard to the existence of the ABL Liens of the ABL Agent or any other ABL Secured Party on such Collateral.
SECTION 6.07. Each Junior Agent, on behalf of itself and its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them will, in an Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, oppose or object to, or join or otherwise support any other Person in opposing or objecting to, any Disposition of any Senior Priority Collateral of any Grantor that is supported by the Senior Agent (and will not so oppose or object to any related bidding procedures and other related matters supported by the Senior Agent), and each Junior Agent and its Related Secured Parties will be deemed to have consented
Asset Dispositions.
 
under Section 363 of the Bankruptcy Code (or any comparable provisions of any other Bankruptcy Law) to any such Disposition of Senior Priority Collateral (and any such related bidding procedures and other related matters) supported by the Senior Agent.
SECTION 6.08. (a) Until the Discharge of the ABL Obligations has occurred, the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them (i) will assert or enforce any claim under Section 506(c) of the Bankruptcy Code (or any successor provision) senior to or on a parity with the ABL Liens on any ABL Priority Collateral for costs or expenses of preserving or disposing of any ABL Collateral and (ii) waives any claim it may now or hereafter have arising out of the election by any ABL Secured Party of the application of Section 1111(b)(2) of the Bankruptcy Code (or any successor provision) with respect to any ABL Priority Collateral.
Waiver.
(b) Until the Discharge of the Term Obligations has occurred, the ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them (i) will assert or enforce any claim under Section 506(c) of the Bankruptcy Code (or any successor provision) senior to or on a parity with the Term Liens on any Term Priority Collateral for costs or expenses of preserving or disposing of any Term Collateral and (ii) waives any claim it may now or hereafter have arising out of the election by any Term Secured Party of the application of Section 1111(b)(2) of the Bankruptcy Code (or any successor provision) with respect to any Term Priority Collateral.
SECTION 6.09. Each of the ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, and the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that (a) the grants of Liens pursuant to the ABL Collateral Documents and the Term Collateral Documents constitute separate and distinct grants of Liens and (b) because of, among other things, their differing rights in the ABL Priority Collateral and the Term Priority Collateral, the ABL Obligations and the Term Obligations are fundamentally different from one another and must be separately classified in any plan of reorganization proposed or adopted in an Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding (other than any such plan of reorganization that provides for the payment in full and in cash of the aggregate amount of (and accrued interest, fees and expenses under) the ABL Obligations and the Term Obligations). To further effectuate the intent of the parties as provided in the immediately preceding sentence, if it is held that the claims of the ABL Secured Parties and the Term Secured Parties in respect of the Collateral constitute only one secured claim (rather than separate classes of senior and junior secured claims as contemplated hereunder), then each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that, subject to the provisions hereof (including Sections 2.01 and 4.01), all distributions shall be made as if there were separate classes of senior and junior secured claims against the Grantors in respect of the Collateral, with the effect being that, to the extent that the aggregate value of the Senior Priority Collateral of any Class is sufficient to satisfy the Senior Obligations of such Class, the Senior Secured Parties of such Class shall be entitled to receive, in addition to amounts distributed to them in respect of principal, pre-petition interest and other claims constituting the Senior
Separate Grants of Security and Separate Classification.
 
Obligations of such Class, all Post-Petition Amounts included in the Senior Obligations of such Class before any distribution is made in respect of the Junior Obligations in respect of such Collateral, with the Junior Secured Parties in respect of such Collateral being required to (and hereby agreeing to) turn over to the Senior Agent in respect of such Collateral amounts otherwise received or receivable by them to the extent necessary to effectuate the intent of this sentence, even if such turnover has the effect of reducing the aggregate recoveries.
SECTION 6.10. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that no Agent or other Secured Party shall be required to vote to approve any plan of reorganization with respect to any Grantor for any reason or to agree that any provision of any Credit Document shall survive the effectiveness of a plan of reorganization with respect to any Grantor in an Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Voting.
SECTION 6.11. If, in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, debt obligations of any reorganized Grantor secured by Liens upon any assets of such reorganized Grantor are distributed pursuant to a plan of reorganization, on account of both the ABL Obligations and the Term Obligations, then, to the extent the debt obligations distributed on account of the ABL Obligations and the Term Obligations are secured by Liens upon the same assets, the provisions of this Agreement will survive the distribution of such debt obligations pursuant to such plan and will apply with like effect to the Liens securing such debt obligations.
Reorganization Securities.
SECTION 7.01. (a) Other than any reliance on the terms of this Agreement, the ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, acknowledges that it and the other ABL Secured Parties have, independently and without reliance on the Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party, and based on documents and information deemed by them appropriate, made their own credit analysis and decision to enter into the ABL Documents and be bound by the terms of this Agreement and agrees, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, that it and the other ABL Secured Parties will continue to make their own credit decision in taking or not taking any action under the ABL Documents or this Agreement.
Reliance; Information.
(b) Other than any reliance on the terms of this Agreement, the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges that it and the other Term Secured Parties have, independently and without reliance on the ABL Agent or any other ABL Secured Party, and based on documents and information deemed by them appropriate, made their own credit analysis and decision to enter into the Term Documents and be bound by the terms of this Agreement and agrees, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, that it and the other Term Secured Parties will continue to make their own credit decision in taking or not taking any action under the Term Documents or this Agreement.
 
SECTION 7.02. (a) The ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that, except as set forth in Section 8.16, the Term Agent and the other Term Secured Parties have made no express or implied representation or warranty, including with respect to the execution, validity, legality, completeness, collectibility or enforceability of any Term Document, the ownership of any Collateral or the perfection or priority of any Liens thereon. Except as otherwise provided herein, the Term Secured Parties will be entitled to manage and supervise their respective loans and extensions of credit under the Term Documents in accordance with law and as they may otherwise, in their sole discretion, deem appropriate.
No Warranties or Liability.
(b) The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that, except as set forth in Section 8.16, the ABL Agent and the other ABL Secured Parties have made no express or implied representation or warranty, including with respect to the execution, validity, legality, completeness, collectibility or enforceability of any ABL Document, the ownership of any Collateral or the perfection or priority of any Liens thereon. Except as otherwise provided herein, the ABL Secured Parties will be entitled to manage and supervise their respective loans and extensions of credit under the applicable ABL Documents in accordance with law and as they may otherwise, in their sole discretion, deem appropriate.
(c) None of the Term Agent or the other Term Secured Parties shall have any express or implied duty to the ABL Agent or any other ABL Secured Party, and none of the ABL Agent or the other ABL Secured Parties shall have any express or implied duty to any Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party, to act or refrain from acting in a manner that allows, or results in, the occurrence or continuance of an event of default or default under any agreements with any Grantor (including any ABL Documents or any Term Documents), regardless of any knowledge thereof that they may have or be charged with.
SECTION 7.03. No right of the Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class to enforce any provision of this Agreement or any Credit Document of such Class shall at any time in any way be prejudiced or impaired by any act or failure to act on the part of any Grantor or by any act or failure to act by any Agent or any other Secured Party, or by any noncompliance by any Person with the terms, provisions and covenants of this Agreement or any Credit Document, regardless of any knowledge thereof that any Agent or any other Secured Party may have or be otherwise charged with.
No Waiver of Lien Priorities.
SECTION 7.04. Until the Discharge of Obligations of such other Class, each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees not to assert and hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any right to demand, request, plead or otherwise assert or otherwise claim the benefit of any marshaling, appraisal, valuation or other similar right that may otherwise be available under applicable law with respect to any Collateral subject to any Senior Lien of the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class or any other similar rights a junior secured creditor may have under applicable law.
No Marshalling.
 
SECTION 7.05. All rights, interests, agreements and obligations of each Agent and its Related Secured Parties hereunder shall remain in full force and effect irrespective of:
Obligations Unconditional.
(a) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Credit Document;
(b) except as otherwise expressly set forth in this Agreement, any change in the time, manner or place of payment of, or in any other terms of, all or any Obligations of any Class, or any Amendment, including any increase in the amount of the obligations thereunder, whether in writing or by course of conduct or otherwise, of the terms of any Credit Document;
(c) except as otherwise expressly set forth in this Agreement, any exchange of any security interest in any Collateral or any other collateral, or any Amendment, whether in writing or by course of conduct or otherwise, of all or any Obligations of any Class or any guarantee thereof;
(d) the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding; or
(e) any other circumstances that otherwise might constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Grantor in respect of any Obligations or this Agreement or any Agent or any Secured Party in respect of this Agreement.
SECTION 8.01. Notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by fax, as follows:
Notices.
(a) if to the ABL Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 270 Park Avenue, 44th Floor, Mail Code: NY1-K855, New York, NY 10017, Attention: Donna DiForio (Fax No. (646) 534-2274); and
(b) if to the Term Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 South Dearborn, Chicago, Illinois 60603, Attention of Margaret Seweryn (Fax No. (888) 292-9533).
All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received; notices sent by fax shall be deemed to have been given when sent (except that, if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, shall be deemed to have
 
been given at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient). As agreed to between the Agents from time to time, notices and other communications may also be delivered by e-mail to the e-mail address of a representative of the applicable Person provided from time to time by such Person. Any Agent may change its address or facsimile number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other Agent.
SECTION 8.02. In the event of any express conflict between the provisions of this Agreement and the provisions of any Credit Document, the provisions of this Agreement shall govern and control.
Conflicts.
SECTION 8.03. This Agreement shall become effective when executed and delivered by the parties hereto. This is a continuing agreement of Lien subordination, and the Secured Parties of any Class may continue, at any time and without notice to the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class, to extend credit and other financial accommodations and lend monies to or for the benefit of any Grantor constituting their Obligations in reliance hereon. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby waives any right it may have under applicable law to revoke this Agreement or any of the provisions of this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that this Agreement is a "subordination agreement" within the meaning of, and is enforceable under, Section 510(a) of the Bankruptcy Code, and the terms hereof shall survive, and shall continue in full force and effect, in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding. All references to any Grantor shall include such Grantor as debtor and debtor-in-possession and any receiver or trustee for such Grantor, as the case may be, in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Effectiveness; Continuing Nature of this Agreement.
SECTION 8.04. In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Agreement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).
Severability.
SECTION 8.05. (a) No failure or delay on the part of any party hereto in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the parties hereto are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of this Agreement or consent to any departure by any party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.
Amendments; Waivers.
 
(b) Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the ABL Agent and the Term Agent.
SECTION 8.06. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, acknowledges that no Agent or any other Secured Party shall be responsible for keeping the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class informed of (a) the financial condition of any Grantor or (b) any other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of the Obligations of any Class. No Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class shall have any duty to advise the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class of information known to it regarding such condition or any such circumstances or otherwise. In the event the Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class, in its sole discretion, undertakes at any time or from time to time to provide any such information to the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class, it shall be under no obligation (i) to make, and neither the Agent nor any other Secured Party of such Class shall make, any express or implied representation or warranty, including with respect to the accuracy, completeness, truthfulness or validity of any such information so provided, (ii) to provide any additional information or to provide any such information on any subsequent occasion, (iii) to undertake any investigation or (iv) to disclose any information, which pursuant to accepted or reasonable commercial finance practices, such party wishes to maintain confidential or is otherwise required to maintain confidential.
Information Concerning Financial Condition of Grantors.
SECTION 8.07. With respect to the value of any payments or distributions in cash, property or other assets that any Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class pays over to the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class under the terms of this Agreement, the Agent or Secured Party making such payment shall be subrogated to the rights of the Agent and Secured Party receiving such payment; that the Agent making such payment, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby agrees that none of them shall assert or enforce any such rights of subrogation they may acquire as a result of any such payment until the Discharge of Obligations of the other Class has occurred.
Subrogation.
provided
SECTION 8.08. All payments received by any Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class may be applied, reversed and reapplied, in whole or in part, to such part of the Obligations of such Class as shall be provided in the applicable Credit Documents of such Class.
Application of Payments.
SECTION 8.09. THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AND GOVERNED BY THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
Applicable Law.
SECTION 8.10. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT. EACH PARTY
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
 
HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
SECTION 8.11. (a) Each Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, that each of them hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims arising out of or relating to this Agreement brought by any of them shall be brought, and shall be heard and determined, exclusively in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.
Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
(b) Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any objection that any of them may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any New York State or federal court. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
(c) Each Agent irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 8.01. Nothing in this Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
SECTION 8.12. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that each of them will take such further action and will execute and deliver such additional documents and instruments (in recordable form, if requested) as the other Agent may reasonably request to effectuate the terms of and the relative Lien priorities contemplated by this Agreement.
Further Assurances.
SECTION 8.13. Each Agent may demand specific performance of this Agreement. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby irrevocably waives any defense based on the adequacy of a remedy at law and any other defense that might be asserted to bar the remedy of specific performance in any action that may be brought by any other Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties.
Specific Performance.
 
SECTION 8.14. Article and Section headings in this Agreement are included herein for convenience of reference only and shall not constitute a part of this Agreement for any other purpose or be given any substantive effect.
Headings.
SECTION 8.15. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto in different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement or any document or instrument delivered in connection herewith by facsimile or other electronic transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement or such other document or instrument, as applicable.
Counterparts.
SECTION 8.16. By its signature, each Agent represents and warrants to the other Agent that it is duly authorized to execute and deliver this Agreement.
Authorization.
SECTION 8.17. This Agreement shall be binding upon, and shall inure to the benefit of, each Agent and its successors and assigns, as well as each other Secured Party, all of whom are intended to be bound by, and to be third party beneficiaries of, this Agreement. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) any Person to whom any Lender assigns or otherwise transfers all or any portion of any Obligation in accordance with the applicable Credit Documents shall become vested with all the rights and obligations in respect thereof granted to such Lender, without any further consent or action of the other Secured Parties, and (b) any counterparty to a Swap Agreement or an agreement relating to Banking Services Obligations that accepts the benefit of any Collateral in accordance with the ABL Collateral Documents or the Term Collateral Documents, as applicable, shall be deemed to have agreed to be bound by the terms of this Agreement. No other Person, including any Grantor, any debtor-in-possession or any receiver or trustee in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, shall have or be entitled to assert any rights or benefits hereunder.
Parties in Interest.
SECTION 8.18. The provisions of this Agreement are and are intended solely for the purpose of defining the relative rights of (a) the ABL Agent and the other ABL Secured Parties and (b) the Term Agent and the other Term Secured Parties. Nothing in this Agreement is intended to or shall impair the obligations of any Grantor, which are absolute and unconditional, to pay the ABL Obligations and the Term Obligations as and when the same shall become due and payable in accordance with their terms.
Provisions Solely to Define Relative Rights.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Agreement as of the date first above written.
 
EXHIBIT F
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
as Administrative Agent
270 Park Avenue, 44th Floor
Mail Code: NY1-K855
New York, New York 10017
Attention: Donna DiForio
Fax: (646) 534-2274
[Date]
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware Corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent. Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings specified in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Borrower Representative
This notice constitutes an Interest Election Request and the Borrower Representative hereby gives you notice, pursuant to Section 2.08 of the Credit Agreement, that it requests the conversion or continuation of a Revolving Borrowing under the Credit Agreement, and in connection therewith the Borrower Representative specifies the following information with respect to such Borrowing and each resulting Borrowing:
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT G
Reference is made to the (a) Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent and (b) Term Credit Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as it may be amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, the "" and, together with the ABL Credit Agreement, the ""), among the Company, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (in such capacity under each Credit Agreement, the ""). Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings specified in the Credit Agreements, Restated Security Agreement and Collateral Agreement referred to therein, as applicable.
ABL Credit Agreement
Company
Term Credit Agreement
Credit Agreements
Administrative Agent
This Certificate is dated as of [ ], 20[ ] and is delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(f) of the ABL Credit Agreement and Section 5.01(e) of the Term Credit Agreement (this Certificate and each other Certificate heretofore delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(f) of the ABL Credit Agreement and Section 5.01(e) of the Term Credit Agreement being referred to as a ""), and supplements the information set forth in the Perfection Certificate delivered on the Second Restatement Effective Date (as supplemented from time to time by the Supplemental Perfection Certificates delivered after the Second Restatement Effective Date and prior to the date hereof, the ""); that Sections 2 and 15 (and the Schedules related thereto) shall be deemed a part of the Supplemental Perfection Certificate solely with respect to the ABL Credit Agreement.
Supplemental Perfection Certificate
Prior Perfection Certificate
provided
The undersigned, an executive officer or a Financial Officer of the Company, solely in his capacity as an officer, and not individually, hereby certifies to the Administrative Agent and each other Lender Party and Secured Party with respect to the Company and the Subsidiaries, as follows:
SECTION 1. Reserved.
SECTION 2. Except as set forth on Schedule 2 hereto,
1
Schedule 2 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth, with respect to each Loan Party, the name and address of any Person in the United States other than a Loan Party that has possession of any Collateral, other than (a) any Inventory in transit with a common carrier, (b) any Inventory maintained at a third party warehouse location where such Collateral is held for not more than 60 days pending delivery to a retail store upon the initial opening thereof
 
(including the initial opening after the renovation or remodeling of a store) and (c) any Inventory in possession of any such Person if the aggregate fair value of all such Inventory in possession of such Person does not exceed $1,000,000.
SECTION 3. Reserved.
SECTION 4. Reserved.
SECTION 5. Reserved.
SECTION 6. . Except as set forth on Schedule 6 hereto,
Equity Interests
2
Schedule 6 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list, for each Loan Party, of all the stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membership interests or other Equity Interests owned by such Loan Party, specifying the issuer and certificate number of, and the number and percentage of ownership represented by, such Equity Interests.
SECTION 7. . Except as set forth on Schedule 7 hereto,
Debt Instruments
3
Schedule 7 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list, for each Loan Party, of all promissory notes and other evidence of Indebtedness evidencing (a) Indebtedness of the Company, the Acquired Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries owing to such Loan Party and (b) Indebtedness of any other Person in the principal amount of $5,000,000 or more held by such Loan Party, specifying the creditor and debtor thereunder and the type and outstanding principal amount thereof.
SECTION 8. . Except as set forth on Schedule 8 hereto,
Mortgaged Property
4
Schedule 8 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list, with respect to each Mortgaged Property, of (a) the exact name of the Person that owns such property, as such name appears in its certificate of organization, (b) if different from the name identified pursuant to clause (a) above, the name of the current record owner of such property, as such name appears in the records of the county recorder's office for such property identified pursuant to clause (c) below, and (c) the county recorder's office in which a Mortgage with respect to such property must be filed or recorded in order for the Administrative Agent to provide constructive notice to third parties of its mortgage lien.
 
 
SECTION 9. . Except as set forth on Schedule 9 hereto,
Intellectual Property
5
Schedule 9 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth, in proper form for filing with the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, a true and complete list of each Loan Party's (a) Copyrights, Copyright Applications and exclusive Copyright Licenses (where a Loan party is a licensee), (b) Patents and Patent Applications and (c) Trademarks and Trademark Applications, in each case specifying the name of the registered owner, title, type or mark, registration or application number, expiration date (if already registered) or filing date, a brief description thereof and, if applicable, the licensee and licensor.
SECTION 10. . Except as set forth on Schedule 10 hereto,
Commercial Tort Claims
6
Schedule 10 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list of commercial tort claims in excess of $1,000,000 held by any Loan Party, including a brief description thereof.
SECTION 11. . Except as set forth on Schedule 11 hereto,
Deposit Accounts
7
Schedule 11 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list of all Deposit Accounts maintained by each Loan Party, other than (a) any Deposit Account that is an operating account maintained by any Loan Party solely for the use of one of its retail stores (or a group of 80 or fewer retail stores) in which payments received from customers are deposited and which is not an account to which amounts held in other deposit accounts of the Loan Parties are swept, (b) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for the payment of salaries and wages and (c) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for payment of medical or insurance reimbursement, workers' compensation and similar expenses, in each case specifying the name and address of the depositary institution, the type of account (including whether such Deposit Account is a Concentration Account) and the account number.
SECTION 12. . Except as set forth on Schedule 12 hereto,
Securities Accounts
8
Schedule 12 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list of all securities accounts maintained by each Loan Party, specifying the name and address of the financial institution holding the securities account (including a securities intermediary or commodities intermediary), the type of account and the account number.
 
 
SECTION 13. . Except as set forth on Schedule 13 hereto,
Letter of Credit Rights
9
Schedule 13 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list of all letters of credit issued in favor of any Loan Party as the beneficiary thereunder, other than any such letters of credit that constitute "Supporting Obligations" within the meaning of the UCC.
SECTION 14. . Except as set forth on Schedule 14 hereto,
Chattel Paper
10
Schedule 14 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list, for each Loan Party, of all chattel paper (whether tangible or electronic), specifying the Loan Party and obligor thereunder, the type, the due date and outstanding principal amount thereof.
SECTION 15. . Except as set forth on Schedule 15 hereto,
Credit Card Agreements
11
Schedule 15 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list of each Credit Card Agreement to which any Loan Party is a party.
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have duly executed this certificate on this [    ] day of [        ], 20[    ].
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT H
THIS JOINDER AGREEMENT, dated as of [    ], 20 (this ""), is entered into between [ENTITY NAME OF THE NEW SUBSIDIARY], a [type of entity and jurisdiction of organization]
    
Agreement
1
(the ""), and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent (the "") under that certain Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and the Administrative Agent. All capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
New Subsidiary
Administrative Agent
Credit Agreement
Company
The New Subsidiary and the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lenders, hereby agree as follows:
1. The New Subsidiary hereby acknowledges, agrees and confirms that, by its execution of this Agreement, the New Subsidiary will be deemed to be a Loan Party under the Credit Agreement and a Loan Guarantor for all purposes of the Credit Agreement and shall have all of the obligations of a Loan Party and a Loan Guarantor thereunder, in each case as if it had executed the Credit Agreement. The New Subsidiary hereby ratifies, as of the date hereof, and agrees to be bound by, all of the terms, provisions and conditions contained in the Credit Agreement, including (a) all of the representations and warranties of the Loan Parties set forth in Article III of the Credit Agreement, (b) all of the covenants set forth in Articles V and VI of the Credit Agreement and (c) all of the guaranty obligations set forth in Article X of the Credit Agreement. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the New Subsidiary hereby guarantees, jointly and severally with the other Loan Guarantors, to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the other Lender Parties, as provided in Article X of the Credit Agreement (and subject to the limitations set forth in Section 10.10 of the Credit Agreement), the prompt payment and performance of the Guaranteed Obligations in full when due (whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise) strictly in accordance with the terms thereof, and agrees that if any of the Guaranteed Obligations are not paid or performed in full when due (whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise) the New Subsidiary will, jointly and severally together with the other Loan Guarantors, promptly pay and perform the same, without any demand or notice whatsoever, and that in the case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, the same will be promptly paid in full when due (whether at extended maturity, by acceleration or otherwise) in accordance with the terms of such extension or renewal.
 
2. The New Subsidiary hereby waives acceptance by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders of the guaranty by the New Subsidiary upon the execution of this Agreement by the New Subsidiary.
3. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement shall become effective when a counterpart hereof executed on behalf of the New Subsidiary shall have been delivered to the Administrative Agent and a counterpart hereof shall have been executed on behalf of the Administrative Agent, and thereafter shall be binding upon the New Subsidiary and the Administrative Agent and their respective successors and permitted assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of the New Subsidiary, the Administrative Agent and the other Lender Parties and their respective successors and assigns, except that the New Subsidiary may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the New Subsidiary shall be null and void), except as expressly contemplated by the Credit Agreement. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
4. THIS AGREEMENT AND THE RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS OF THE PARTIES HEREUNDER SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BUT GIVING EFFECT TO FEDERAL LAWS APPLICABLE TO NATIONAL BANKS.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
EXHIBIT I-1
Reference is hereby made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
Amended and Restated Credit Agreement
Company
Pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.17 of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, the undersigned hereby certifies that (i) it is the sole record and beneficial owner of the Revolving Loan(s) (as well as any note(s) evidencing such Revolving Loan(s)) in respect of which it is providing this certificate, (ii) it is not a bank within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (iii) it is not a ten percent shareholder of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code and (iv) it is not a controlled foreign corporation related to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code.
The undersigned has furnished the Administrative Agent and the Borrower Representative with a certificate of its non-U.S. Person status on IRS Form W-8BEN. By executing this certificate, the undersigned agrees that (1) if the information provided on this certificate changes, the undersigned shall promptly so inform the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent, and (2) the undersigned shall have at all times furnished the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent with a properly completed and currently effective certificate in either the calendar year in which each payment is to be made to the undersigned, or in either of the two calendar years preceding such payments.
Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and used herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement.
 
EXHIBIT I-2
Reference is hereby made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
Amended and Restated Credit Agreement
Company
Pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.17 of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, the undersigned hereby certifies that (i) it is the sole record and beneficial owner of the participation in respect of which it is providing this certificate, (ii) it is not a bank within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (iii) it is not a ten percent shareholder of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, and (iv) it is not a controlled foreign corporation related to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code.
The undersigned has furnished its participating Lender with a certificate of its non-U.S. Person status on IRS Form W-8BEN. By executing this certificate, the undersigned agrees that (1) if the information provided on this certificate changes, the undersigned shall promptly so inform such Lender in writing, and (2) the undersigned shall have at all times furnished such Lender with a properly completed and currently effective certificate in either the calendar year in which each payment is to be made to the undersigned, or in either of the two calendar years preceding such payments.
Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and used herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement.
 
EXHIBIT I-3
Reference is made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
Amended and Restated Credit Agreement
Company
Pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.17 of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, the undersigned hereby certifies that (i) it is the sole record owner of the participation in respect of which it is providing this certificate, (ii) its direct or indirect partners/members are the sole beneficial owners of such participation, (iii) with respect such participation, neither the undersigned nor any of its direct or indirect partners/members is a bank extending credit pursuant to a loan agreement entered into in the ordinary course of its trade or business within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (iv) none of its direct or indirect partners/members is a ten percent shareholder of the Company or any of its Subsidaries within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code and (v) none of its direct or indirect partners/members is a controlled foreign corporation related to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code.
The undersigned has furnished its participating Lender with IRS Form W-8IMY accompanied by one of the following forms from each of its partners/members that is claiming the portfolio interest exemption: (i) an IRS Form W-8BEN or (ii) an IRS Form W-8IMY accompanied by an IRS Form W-8BEN from each of such partner's/member's beneficial owners that is claiming the portfolio interest exemption. By executing this certificate, the undersigned agrees that (1) if the information provided on this certificate changes, the undersigned shall promptly so inform such Lender and (2) the undersigned shall have at all times furnished such Lender with a properly completed and currently effective certificate in either the calendar year in which each payment is to be made to the undersigned, or in either of the two calendar years preceding such payments.
Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and used herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement.
 
EXHIBIT I-4
Reference is made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
Amended and Restated Credit Agreement
Company
Pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.17 of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, the undersigned hereby certifies that (i) it is the sole record owner of the Loan(s) (as well as any note(s) evidencing such Loan(s)) in respect of which it is providing this certificate, (ii) its direct or indirect partners/members are the sole beneficial owners of such Loan(s) (as well as any note(s) evidencing such Loan(s)), (iii) with respect to the extension of credit pursuant to this Amended and Restated Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, neither the undersigned nor any of its direct or indirect partners/members is a bank extending credit pursuant to a loan agreement entered into in the ordinary course of its trade or business within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (iv) none of its direct or indirect partners/members is a ten percent shareholder of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code and (v) none of its direct or indirect partners/members is a controlled foreign corporation related to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code.
The undersigned has furnished the Administrative Agent and the Borrower Representative with IRS Form W-8IMY accompanied by one of the following forms from each of its partners/members that is claiming the portfolio interest exemption: (i) an IRS Form W-8BEN or (ii) an IRS Form W-8IMY accompanied by an IRS Form W-8BEN from each of such partner's/member's beneficial owners that is claiming the portfolio interest exemption. By executing this certificate, the undersigned agrees that (1) if the information provided on this certificate changes, the undersigned shall promptly so inform the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent, and (2) the undersigned shall have at all times furnished the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent with a properly completed and currently effective certificate in either the calendar year in which each payment is to be made to the undersigned, or in either of the two calendar years preceding such payments.
Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and used herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement.
 

Exhibit 10.2
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
TERM CREDIT AGREEMENT dated as of June 14, 2012, among ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC., the LENDERS party hereto and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
The Company (such term and each other capitalized term used herein having the meaning assigned to it in Article I of this Agreement), the Lenders and the Administrative Agent have agreed to enter into this Agreement to provide for, among other things, an extension of credit in the form of Tranche B Term Loans from the Lenders to the Company in an aggregate principal amount of up to $300,000,000.
The parties hereto agree as follows:
SECTION 1.01. As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms.
"" means the Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012, among the Company, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the lenders party thereto, the issuing banks party thereto and JPMCB, as administrative agent and swingline lender.
ABL Second Restatement Agreement
"" means the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of the date hereof, among the Company, certain Subsidiaries party thereto, the lenders party thereto and JPMCB, as administrative agent.
ABL Credit Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement.
ABL Priority Collateral
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, bears interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
"" means Charming Shoppes, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation.
Acquired Company
"" means the 1.125% Senior Convertible Notes due 2014 of the Acquired Company outstanding as of the Effective Date.
Acquired Company Convertible Notes
"" means the representations and warranties made by the Acquired Company in the Acquisition Agreement, but only to the extent that the Company or Merger Sub has the right under the Acquisition Agreement not to consummate the Acquisition Tender Offer or the Merger as a result of such representations and warranties in the Acquisition Agreement being inaccurate.
Acquired Company Acquisition Agreement Representations
"" means the Acquisition Tender Offer and the Merger, collectively.
Acquisition
"" means the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of May 1, 2012, among the Company, Merger Sub and the Acquired Company, together with the exhibits thereto and the related disclosure letter.
Acquisition Agreement
"" means the offer to purchase for cash all the outstanding shares of common stock in the Acquired Company commenced by Merger Sub pursuant to the Acquisition Agreement.
Acquisition Tender Offer
"" means the Amended and Restated Administrative Agent Fee Letter dated May 11, 2012, between the Company and the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Agent Fee Letter
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, in the case of the Tranche B Term Loans, the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall at no time be less than 1.00% per annum.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
provided
"" means JPMCB, in its capacity as administrative agent hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Article VIII.
Administrative Agent
"" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly or indirectly Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
"" means this Term Credit Agreement, as modified, amended or restated from time to time.
Agreement
"" means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus
Alternate Base Rate
 1
/
2
of 1% per annum and (c) the Adjusted LIBO Rate on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) for a deposit in dollars with a maturity of one month plus 1% per annum. For purposes of clause (c) above, the Adjusted LIBO Rate on any day shall be based on the rate per annum appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or on any successor or substitute screen provided by Reuters, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing
 
rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such screen, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, on such day (without any rounding) for deposits in dollars with a maturity of one month. Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate, respectively; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, in the case of the Tranche B Term Loans, the Alternate Base Rate shall at no time be less than 2.00% per annum.
provided
"" means, for any day, (a) with respect to any Tranche B Term Loan, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption "ABR Spread" or "Eurodollar Spread", as the case may be, based upon the Total Leverage Ratio as of the end of the fiscal quarter of the Company for which consolidated financial statements have theretofore been most recently delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b), that until the date of the delivery of the consolidated financial statements pursuant to Section 5.01(b) as of and for the fiscal quarter ended January 28, 2013, the Applicable Rate for purposes of this clause (a) shall be based on the rates per annum set forth in Level III, and (b) with respect to any Incremental Term Loan of any Series, the rate per annum specified in the Incremental Facility Agreement establishing the Incremental Term Commitments of such Series:
Applicable Rate
provided
 
For purposes of the foregoing, each change in the Applicable Rate resulting from a change in the Total Leverage Ratio shall be effective during the period commencing on and including the Business Day following the date of delivery to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b) of the consolidated financial statements indicating such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Applicable Rate shall be based on the rates per annum set forth in Level III if the Company fails to deliver the consolidated financial statements required to be delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b) or any Compliance Certificate required to be delivered pursuant hereto, in each case within the time periods specified herein for such delivery, during the period commencing on and including the day of the occurrence of a Default resulting from such failure and until the delivery thereof.
 
"" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in commercial loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its activities and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
"" means J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, in their capacities as joint bookrunners and joint lead arrangers for the credit facility established hereby.
Arrangers
"" means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an Eligible Assignee, with the consent of any Person whose consent is required by Section 9.04, and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of Exhibit A or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
"" means the Amended and Restated Arranger Fee Letter dated May 1, 2012, among the Arrangers, the Initial Lenders, and the Company.
Arranger Fee Letter
"" means, as of any date of determination: (a) $5,000,000, (b) $50,000,000 for each fiscal year of the Company commencing on and after July 29, 2012 and prior to such date of determination, (c) the sum of the aggregate amounts of (i) all Restricted Payments made pursuant to Section 6.08(a)(vi) and (ii) all payments of or in respect of Indebtedness made pursuant to Section 6.08(b)(vi), in each case as of such date of determination.
Available Amount
plus
minus
"" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board of Governors
"" means Bank of America, N.A., a national banking association, in its individual capacity, and its successors.
BofA
"" means Loans of the same Class and Type made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect.
Borrowing
"" means a request by the Company for a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03, which shall be, in the case of any such written request, in the form of Exhibit B or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Borrowing Request
"" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term "Business Day" shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
provided
"" means any Subsidiary that has been formed or is organized under the laws of Canada or any province or territory thereof.
Canadian Subsidiary
 
"" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP; the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP, and the final maturity of such obligations shall be the date of the last payment of such amounts due under such lease (or other arrangement) prior to the first date on which such lease (or other arrangement) may be terminated by the lessee without payment of a premium or a penalty. For purposes of Section 6.02, a Capital Lease Obligation shall be deemed to be secured by a Lien on the property being leased and such property shall be deemed to be owned by the lessee.
Capital Lease Obligations
"" means each Person that is a "controlled foreign corporation" within the meaning of Section 957(a) of the Code.
CFC
"" means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Exchange Act and the rules of the SEC thereunder as in effect on the Effective Date), other than the Permitted Investors, of Equity Interests representing more than 30% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in the Company and the percentage of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by Equity Interests in the Company owned by such Person or group then exceeds the percentage of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by Equity Interests in the Company owned by the Permitted Investors; (b) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of the Company by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the board of directors of the Company nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated; or (c) the occurrence of a "change of control" (or a similar event, however denominated) in any agreement or instrument governing Material Indebtedness or any Permitted Revolving Indebtedness.
Change in Control
"" means the occurrence, after the date of this Agreement, of any of the following: (a) the adoption or taking effect of any rule, regulation, treaty or other law, (b) any change in any rule, regulation, treaty or other law or in the administration, interpretation, implementation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority or (c) the making or issuance of any request, rule, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority; that, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a "Change in Law", regardless of the date enacted, adopted, promulgated or issued.
Change in Law
provided
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.15.
Charges
 
"," when used in reference to (a) any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Tranche B Term Loans or Incremental Term Loans of any Series, (b) any Commitment, refers to whether such Commitment is a Tranche B Term Commitment or an Incremental Term Commitment of any Series and (c) any Lender, refers to whether such Lender has a Loan or Commitment of a particular Class. Additional Classes of Loans, Borrowings, Commitments and Lenders may be established pursuant to Sections 2.19 and 2.20.
Class
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
"" means any and all assets, whether real or personal, tangible or intangible, on which Liens are purported to be granted pursuant to the Collateral Documents as security for the Secured Obligations.
Collateral
"" means the Guarantee and Collateral Agreement among the Company, the other Loan Parties and the Administrative Agent, substantially in the form of Exhibit C, together with all supplements thereto.
Collateral Agreement
"" means, at any time, the requirement that:
Collateral and Guarantee Requirement
(a) the Administrative Agent shall have received from the Company and each Designated Subsidiary either (i) a counterpart of the Collateral Agreement, duly executed and delivered on behalf of such Person, or (ii) in the case of any Person that becomes a Designated Subsidiary after the Effective Date, a supplement to the Collateral Agreement, in the form specified therein, duly executed and delivered on behalf of such Person, together with such documents and opinions with respect to such Designated Subsidiary as may reasonably be requested by the Administrative Agent;
(b) all Equity Interests owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party shall have been pledged pursuant to, and to the extent required by, the Collateral Agreement and, in the case of Equity Interests in any Foreign Subsidiary, where the Administrative Agent so requests in connection with the pledge of such Equity Interests, a Foreign Pledge Agreement ( that the Loan Parties shall not be required to pledge Equity Interests in Foreign Subsidiaries that are not Eligible Foreign Subsidiaries, and that the Loan Parties shall not be required to pledge more than 65% of the outstanding Equity Interests entitled to vote (within the meaning of Treas. Reg. Section 1.956-2(c)(2)) of any such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary), and the Administrative Agent shall, to the extent required by the Collateral Agreement, have received certificates or other instruments representing all such certificated Equity Interests, together with undated stock powers or other instruments of transfer with respect thereto endorsed in blank;
provided
provided
further
(c) (i) all Indebtedness of the Company and any Subsidiary and (ii) all Indebtedness of any other Person in a principal amount of $5,000,000 or more
 
that, in each case, is owing to any Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note and shall have been pledged pursuant to the Collateral Agreement, and the Administrative Agent shall have received all such promissory notes, together with undated instruments of transfer with respect thereto endorsed in blank;
(d) all documents and instruments, including UCC financing statements, required by law or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to be filed, registered or recorded to perfect the Liens intended to be created by the Collateral Documents with the priority required by the Collateral Documents shall have been filed, registered or recorded or delivered to the Administrative Agent for filing, registration or recording;
(e) the Administrative Agent shall have received (i) counterparts of a Mortgage with respect to each Mortgaged Property duly executed and delivered by the record owner of such Mortgaged Property, (ii) a policy or policies of title insurance issued by a nationally recognized title insurance company insuring the Lien of each such Mortgage as a valid and enforceable Lien on the Mortgaged Property described therein, free of any other Liens except as permitted under Section 6.02, together with such endorsements, coinsurance and reinsurance as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request, (iii) if any Mortgaged Property is located in an area determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency to have special flood hazards, evidence of such flood insurance as may be required under applicable law, including Regulation H of the Board of Governors, and (iv) such surveys, abstracts, appraisals, legal opinions and other documents as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request with respect to any such Mortgage or Mortgaged Property;
(f) the Administrative Agent shall have received a counterpart, duly executed and delivered by the applicable Loan Party and the applicable depositary bank or securities intermediary, as the case may be, of a Control Agreement with respect to (i) each Deposit Account maintained by any Loan Party (other than any Excluded Deposit Account) and (ii) each securities account maintained by any Loan Party with any securities intermediary; and
(g) each Loan Party shall have obtained all material consents and approvals required in connection with the execution and delivery of all Collateral Documents to which it is a party, the performance of its obligations thereunder and the granting by it of the Liens thereunder.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Designated Subsidiary formed or acquired after the Effective Date shall not be required to comply with the foregoing requirements prior to the time specified in Section 5.03. The foregoing definition shall not require the creation or perfection of pledges of or security interests in, or the obtaining of title insurance or, subject to the requirements of applicable law, flood insurance, legal opinions or other deliverables with respect to, particular assets of the Loan Parties, or the provision of Guarantees by any Subsidiary, if and for so long as the Administrative Agent, in consultation with the Company, determines that the cost of
 
creating or perfecting such pledges or security interests in such assets, or obtaining such title insurance or flood insurance, legal opinions or other deliverables in respect of such assets, or providing such Guarantees, shall be excessive in view of the benefits to be obtained by the Lenders therefrom. The Administrative Agent may grant extensions of time for the creation and perfection of security interests in (including delivery of promissory notes as required by clause (c) above) or the obtaining of title insurance or, subject to the requirements of applicable law, flood insurance, legal opinions or other deliverables with respect to particular assets or the provision of any Guarantee by any Subsidiary (including extensions beyond the Effective Date or in connection with assets acquired, or Subsidiaries formed or acquired, after the Effective Date) where it determines that such action cannot be accomplished without undue effort or expense by the time or times at which it would otherwise be required to be accomplished by this Agreement or the Collateral Documents.
"" means the Collateral Agreement, each Control Agreement, each Mortgage, each Foreign Pledge Agreement, each IP Security Agreement and each other document granting a Lien upon any assets of any Loan Party as security for payment of the Secured Obligations.
Collateral Documents
"" means a Tranche B Term Commitment, an Incremental Term Commitment of any Series or a combination thereof (as the context requires).
Commitment
"" means the Amended and Restated Commitment Letter dated May 11, 2012, among JPMCB, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, BofA, Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and the Company.
Commitment Letter
"" means, collectively, any written notice, demand, communication, information, document or other material provided by or on behalf of any Loan Party pursuant to any Loan Document or the transactions contemplated therein that is distributed to the Administrative Agent or any Lender by means of electronic communications pursuant to Section 9.01, including through the Platform.
Communications
"" means Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Company
"" means a Compliance Certificate in the form of Exhibit D or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Compliance Certificate
"" means the Confidential Information Memorandum dated May 2012, relating to the credit facility provided for herein.
Confidential Information Memorandum
"" means Other Connection Taxes that are imposed on or measured by net income (however denominated) or that are franchise Taxes or branch profits Taxes.
Connection Income Taxes
"" means, for any period, Consolidated Net Income for such period, (a) without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
 
such Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (i) consolidated interest expense for such period (including imputed interest expense in respect of Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations), (ii) consolidated income tax expense for such period, (iii) all amounts attributable to depreciation and amortization for such period, (iv) any non-cash extraordinary charges for such period, (v) any non-cash compensation charges, including charges arising from restricted stock and stock-option grants, for such period, (vi) any other non-cash charges (other than the write-down or write-off of current assets, any additions to bad debt reserve or bad debt expense or any accruals for estimated sales discounts, returns or allowances) for such period, (vii) any losses for such period attributable to early extinguishment of Indebtedness or obligations under any Swap Agreement, (viii) any fees and expenses for such period paid in connection with, and other non-recurring charges for such period relating to, the Acquisition, that such fees, expenses and non-recurring charges are incurred on or prior to January 26, 2014, (ix) charges for such period attributable to restructuring activities commenced by the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries prior to the Effective Date, that the aggregate amount added back pursuant to this clause (ix) may not exceed $25,000,000 in the aggregate for all periods (with not more than $10,000,000 thereof in the aggregate being for periods commencing after July 28, 2012), (x) severance charges for such period attributable to reorganization of certain operations of the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries, that the aggregate amount added back pursuant to this clause (x) may not exceed $5,000,000 in the aggregate for all periods, and (xi) charges for such period attributable to the sale, transfer or other disposition of, or cessation of the operation of, certain operations acquired as part of the Acquisition and consistent with the plan therefor previously communicated by the Company to the Administrative Agent, that the aggregate amount added back pursuant to this clause (xi) may not exceed $50,000,000 in the aggregate for all periods, and (b) without duplication (i) to the extent not deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, all cash payments made during such period on account of non-cash charges that were or would have been added to Consolidated Net Income pursuant to clauses (a)(iv), (a)(v) or (a)(vi) above in such period or in a previous period and (ii) to the extent included in determining such Consolidated Net Income, (A) any extraordinary gains and all non-cash items of income (other than normal accruals in the ordinary course of business) for such period and (B) any gains for such period attributable to early extinguishment of Indebtedness or obligations under any Swap Agreement, all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that Consolidated EBITDA shall be calculated so as to exclude the effect of any gain or loss that represents after-tax gains or losses attributable to any sale, transfer or other disposition of assets by the Company or any Subsidiary, other than dispositions of inventory and other dispositions in the ordinary course of business. For purposes of calculating Consolidated EBITDA for any period, if during such period the Company or any Subsidiary shall have consummated a Material Acquisition or a Material Disposition, Consolidated EBITDA for such period shall be calculated on a Pro Forma Basis after giving effect thereto.
provided
provided
provided
provided
minus
provided
"" means, for any period, the net income or loss of the Company and the Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that there shall be excluded (a) the income of any
Consolidated Net Income
provided
 
Person (other than the Company) that is not a Subsidiary except to the extent of the amount of cash dividends or similar cash distributions actually paid by such Person to the Company or, subject to clauses (b) and (c) below, any of the Subsidiaries during such period, (b) the income of, and any amounts referred to in clause (a) above paid to, any Subsidiary (other than a Loan Party) to the extent that, on the date of determination, the declaration or payment of cash dividends or similar cash distributions by such Subsidiary is restricted by operation of the terms of its organizational documents or any agreement, instrument, judgment, decree, statute, rule or regulation applicable to such Subsidiary, and (c) the income or loss of, and any amounts referred to in clause (a) above paid to, any Subsidiary that is not wholly owned by the Company to the extent such income or loss or such amounts are attributable to the noncontrolling interest in such Subsidiary.
"" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
"" means, with respect to any deposit account or securities account maintained by any Loan Party, a control agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, duly executed and delivered by such Loan Party and the depositary bank or the securities intermediary, as the case may be, with which such account is maintained.
Control Agreement
"" means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
"" has the meaning set forth in the Collateral Agreement.
Deposit Account
"" means each Subsidiary other than (a) any Subsidiary that is a Foreign Subsidiary, (b) any Subsidiary set forth on Schedule 1.01A, (c) any Inactive Subsidiary, (d) prior to the release of the Existing Acquired Company Mortgage on the parcels of real property owned by White Marsh Distribution, LLC, White Marsh Distribution, LLC and (e) prior to the release of the Existing Acquired Company Mortgage on the parcels of real property owned by FB Distro Distribution Center, LLC, FB Distro Distribution Center, LLC (it being agreed, in the case of clauses (d) and (e), that the Company will cause each such release to occur as promptly as reasonably practicable following the expiration or termination of such Existing Acquired Company Mortgage in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect on the Effective Date).
Designated Subsidiary
"" means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed on Schedule 3.06.
Disclosed Matters
"" means any capital stock which, by its terms (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable), or upon the happening of any event, (a) matures (excluding any maturity as the result of an
Disqualified Stock
 
optional redemption by the issuer thereof) or is mandatorily redeemable, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, or is redeemable at the option of the holder thereof, in whole or in part, or requires the payment of any cash dividend or any other scheduled payment constituting a return of capital, in each case at any time on or prior to the first anniversary of the latest Maturity Date (determined as of the date of issuance thereof or, in the case of any such capital stock outstanding on the date hereof, the date hereof), or (b) is convertible into or exchangeable (unless at the sole option of the issuer thereof) for (i) cash, (ii) debt securities or (iii) any capital stock referred to in (a) above, in each case at any time prior to the first anniversary of the latest Maturity Date (determined as of the date of issuance thereof or, in the case of any such capital stock outstanding on the date hereof, the date hereof).
"" or "" refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
"" means any Subsidiary other than a Foreign Subsidiary.
Domestic Subsidiary
"" means the date on which the conditions specified in Article IV are satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02).
Effective Date
"" means (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender, (c) an Approved Fund and (d) any other Person, other than, in each case, a natural person or the Company, any Subsidiary or any other Affiliate of the Company.
Eligible Assignee
"" means a Foreign Subsidiary that is (a) a first-tier CFC owned directly by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary that is a U.S. Person or (b) described in clause (b) of the definition of the term "Foreign Subsidiary".
Eligible Foreign Subsidiary
"" means all applicable federal, state, and local laws (including common law), regulations, rules, ordinances, codes, decrees, judgments, directives, orders (including consent orders), and binding agreements with any Governmental Authority in each case, relating to pollution or protection of the environment, natural resources, human health and safety (to the extent related to exposure to Hazardous Materials), or the presence, Release of, or exposure to, Hazardous Materials, or the generation, manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, transport, recycling or handling of, or the arrangement for such activities with respect to, Hazardous Materials.
Environmental Laws
"" means any liability, claim, action, suit, agreement, judgment or order arising under or relating to any Environmental Law for any damages, injunctive relief, losses, fines, penalties, fees, expenses (including reasonable fees and expenses of attorneys and consultants) or costs, whether contingent or otherwise, including those arising from or relating to: (a) compliance or non-compliance with any Environmental Law or permit, license or approval issued thereunder, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the Release of any Hazardous Materials or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
 
"" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest (other than, prior to the date of such conversion, any Indebtedness that is convertible into any such Equity Interests).
Equity Interests
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
ERISA
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with any Loan Party, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or 414(c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(m) or 414(o) of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
"" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived), (b) any failure by any Plan to satisfy the minimum funding standard (within the meaning of Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA) applicable to such Plan, in each case whether or not waived, (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(c) of the Code or Section 302(c) of ERISA, of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan, (d) a determination that any Plan is, or is reasonably expected to be, in "at-risk" status (as defined in Section 303(i)(4) of ERISA or Section 430(i)(4) of the Code), (e) the incurrence by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan, (f) the receipt by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan, (g) the incurrence by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan, (h) the receipt by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA, or in "endangered" or "critical" status, within the meaning of Section 305 of ERISA or Section 432 of the Code, (i) the occurrence of a non-exempt "prohibited transaction" (as defined in Section 4975 of the Code or Section 406 of ERISA) with respect to which any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate is a "disqualified person" (within the meaning of Section 4975 of the Code) or a "party in interest" (within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA) or could otherwise reasonably be expected to be liable or (j) any other event or condition with respect to a Plan or Multiemployer Plan that could reasonably be expected to result in material liability of any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate.
ERISA Event
 
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
"" has the meaning set forth in Article VII.
Events of Default
"" means the United States Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Exchange Act
"" means (a) any Deposit Account that is an operating account maintained by any Loan Party solely for the use of one of its retail stores (or a group of 80 or fewer retail stores) in which payments received from customers are deposited and which is not an account to which amounts held in other deposit accounts of the Loan Parties are swept, that (i) such Loan Party shall cause all amounts on deposit in such Deposit Account (other than amounts reasonably determined by such Loan Party to be required for the operating needs of the retail store or stores to which such Deposit Account relates), to be swept on each business day into one or more Deposit Accounts that are not Excluded Deposit Accounts and (ii) no such Deposit Account shall contain payment of or in respect of any Credit Card Account Receivable of any Loan Party, (b) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for the payment of salaries and wages and (c) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for payment of medical or insurance reimbursement, workers' compensation and similar expenses.
Excluded Deposit Account
provided
"" means any of the following Taxes imposed on or with respect to a Recipient or required to be withheld or deducted from a payment to a Recipient, (a) Taxes imposed on or measured by net income (however denominated), franchise Taxes, and branch profits Taxes, in each case, (i) imposed as a result of such Recipient being organized under the laws of, or having its principal office or, in the case of any Lender, its applicable lending office located in, the jurisdiction imposing such Tax (or any political subdivision thereof) or (ii) that are Other Connection Taxes, (b) in the case of a Lender, U.S. Federal withholding Taxes imposed on amounts payable to or for the account of such Lender with respect to an applicable interest in a Loan or Commitment pursuant to a law in effect on the date on which (i) such Lender acquires such interest in the Loan or Commitment (other than pursuant to an assignment request by the Company under Section 2.17(b)) or (ii) such Lender changes its lending office, except in each case to the extent that, pursuant to Section 2.15, amounts with respect to such Taxes were payable either to such Lender's assignor immediately before such Lender acquired the applicable interest in such Loan or Commitment or to such Lender immediately before it changed its lending office, (c) Taxes attributable to such Recipient's failure to comply with Section 2.15(f) and (d) any U.S. Federal withholding Taxes imposed under FATCA.
Excluded Taxes
"" means the Fourth Amended and Restated Loan and Security Agreement dated as of July 14, 2011, by and among the Acquired Company, certain of its subsidiaries party thereto, the lenders party thereto, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as agent for such lenders, and certain other parties thereto.
Existing Acquired Company Credit Agreement
 
"" means the mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents or other security document, as applicable, granting a Lien, as of the Effective Date, on the parcels of real property of the Acquired Company or its subsidiaries set forth on Schedule 1.01B.
Existing Acquired Company Mortgages
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.19(a).
Extending Lender
"" means an Extension Agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, among the Company, the Administrative Agent and one or more Extending Lenders, effecting an Extension Permitted Amendment and such other amendments hereto and to the other Loan Documents as are contemplated by Section 2.19.
Extension Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.19(a).
Extension Offer
"" means an amendment to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, effected in connection with an Extension Offer pursuant to Section 2.19, providing for an extension of the Maturity Date applicable to the Extending Lenders' Loans of the applicable Extension Request Class (such Loans being referred to as the "Extended Loans") and, in connection therewith, (a) an increase or decrease in the rate of interest accruing on such Extended Loans, (b) a modification of the scheduled amortization applicable to such Extended Loans, that the weighted average life to maturity of such Extended Loans shall be no shorter than the remaining weighted average life to maturity (determined at the time of such Extension Offer) of the Loans of the applicable Extension Request Class, (c) a modification of voluntary or mandatory prepayments applicable thereto (including prepayment premiums and other restrictions thereon), that such requirements may provide that such Extended Loans may participate in any mandatory prepayments on a pro rata basis (or on a basis that is less than a pro rata basis) with the Loans of the applicable Extension Request Class, but may not provide for mandatory prepayment requirements that are more favorable than those applicable to the Loans of the applicable Extension Request Class, (d) an increase in the fees payable to, or the inclusion of new fees to be payable to, the Extending Lenders in respect of such Extension Offer or their Extended Loans and/or (e) an addition of any affirmative or negative covenants applicable to the Company and the Subsidiaries, that any such additional covenant with which the Company and the Subsidiaries shall be required to comply prior to the latest Maturity Date in effect immediately prior to such Extension Permitted Amendment for the benefit of the Extending Lenders providing such Extended Loans shall also be for the benefit of all other Lenders.
Extension Permitted Amendment
provided
provided
provided
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.19(a).
Extension Request Class
"" means Sections 1471 through 1474 of the Code, as of the date of this Agreement (or any amended or successor version that is substantively comparable and not materially more onerous to comply with) and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof.
FATCA
 
"" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
"" means the Administrative Agent Fee Letter and the Arrangers Fee Letter.
Fee Letters
"" means, with respect to any Person, the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of such Person.
Financial Officer
"" means a Lender that is not a U.S. Person.
Foreign Lender
"" means a pledge or charge agreement granting a Lien on Equity Interests in a Foreign Subsidiary to secure the Secured Obligations, governed by the law of the jurisdiction of organization of such Foreign Subsidiary and in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Foreign Pledge Agreement
"" means a Subsidiary that (a) is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States or any State thereof or the District of Columbia or (b) substantially all the assets of which consist of Equity Interests in Subsidiaries described in clause (a) above.
Foreign Subsidiary
"" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America, applied in accordance with the consistency requirements thereof.
GAAP
"" means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national body exercising such powers or functions, such as the European Union or the European Central Bank).
Governmental Authority
"" of or by any Person (the "guarantor") means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the "primary obligor") in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to
Guarantee
 
advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or other obligation; that the term "Guarantee" shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business. The amount, as of any date of determination, of any Guarantee shall be the principal amount outstanding on such date of Indebtedness or other obligation guaranteed thereby (or, in the case of (i) any Guarantee the terms of which limit the monetary exposure of the guarantor or (ii) any Guarantee of an obligation that does not have a principal amount, the maximum monetary exposure as of such date of the guarantor under such Guarantee (as determined, in the case of clause (i), pursuant to such terms or, in the case of clause (ii), reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company)).
provided
"" means any chemical, material, substance or waste that is prohibited, limited or regulated by or pursuant to any applicable Environmental Law, including, without limitation, any petroleum products or byproducts and all other hydrocarbons, coal ash, radon gas, asbestos-containing materials, urea formaldehyde foam insulation, polychlorinated biphenyls, chlorofluorocarbons and all other ozone-depleting substances or mold.
Hazardous Materials
"" means any Subsidiary that (a) does not conduct any business operations and (b) either (i) has assets with a total book value of $1,000,000 or less or (ii) (A) was formed to conduct operations of one or more retail stores each of which has since closed and ceased to be in operation, (B) does not own any assets material to the Company and the Subsidiaries and (C) is (or after the closing of such retail stores will be) in the process of voluntary liquidation, dissolution or merger in compliance with Section 6.03.
Inactive Subsidiary
"" means an Incremental Facility Agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, among the Company, the Administrative Agent and one or more Incremental Lenders, establishing Incremental Term Commitments of any Series and effecting such other amendments hereto and to the other Loan Documents as are contemplated by Section 2.18.
Incremental Facility Agreement
"" means a Lender with an Incremental Term Commitment or an outstanding Incremental Term Loan.
Incremental Lender
"" means, with respect to any Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender, established pursuant an Incremental Facility Agreement and Section 2.18, to make Incremental Term Loans of any Series hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum principal amount of the Incremental Term Loans of such Series to be made by such Lender.
Incremental Term Commitment
 
"" means a Loan made by an Incremental Lender to the Company pursuant to Section 2.18.
Incremental Term Loan
"" means, with respect to Incremental Term Loans of any Series, the scheduled date on which such Incremental Term Loans shall become due and payable in full hereunder, as specified in the applicable Incremental Facility Agreement.
Incremental Term Maturity Date
"" of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person (excluding trade accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business), (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding (i) current accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business, (ii) deferred compensation payable to directors, officers or employees of the Company or any Subsidiary and (iii) any purchase price adjustment or earnout incurred in connection with an acquisition, except to the extent that the amount payable pursuant to such purchase price adjustment or earnout is, or becomes, reasonably determinable), (e) all Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations of such Person, (f) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty, (g) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers' acceptances, (h) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed by such Person (but only to the extent of the lesser of (x) the amount of such Indebtedness and (y) the fair market value of such property, if such Indebtedness has not been assumed by such Person), and (i) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other Person (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor by contract, as a matter of law or otherwise as a result of such Person's ownership interest in or other relationship with such other Person, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor. It is acknowledged and agreed that private label letters of credit issued by the Company or any Subsidiary for the making of payment for the purchase of Inventory in the ordinary course of business (and in respect of which no Issuing Bank or other financial institution is an issuer thereof or has any disbursement obligations thereunder) do not constitute Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary.
Indebtedness
"" means (a) Taxes, other than Excluded Taxes, imposed on or with respect to any payment made by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party under any Loan Document and (b) to the extent not otherwise described in clause (a), Other Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.03(b).
Indemnitee
 
"" means JPMCB and BofA
Initial Lenders
"" means the Intercreditor Agreement among the Loan Parties, the Administrative Agent and the administrative agent, collateral agent, collateral trustee or a similar representative for any Permitted Revolving Indebtedness, in substantially the form of Exhibit I, with such changes therefrom as are contemplated or permitted by Section 9.19.
Intercreditor Agreement
"" means a request by the Company to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.05, which shall be, in the case of any such written request, in the form of Exhibit E or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Interest Election Request
"" means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan, the first Business Day of each calendar quarter and the Maturity Date applicable to such ABR Loan and (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months' duration, such day or days prior to the last day of such Interest Period as shall occur at intervals of three months' duration after the first day of such Interest Period and the Maturity Date applicable to such Eurodollar Loan.
Interest Payment Date
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months (or, with the consent of each Lender participating therein, nine or twelve months) thereafter, as the Company may elect; that (a) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day, and (b) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
provided
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, any Equity Interests, evidences of Indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, or any capital contribution or loans or advances (other than advances made in the ordinary course of business that would be recorded as accounts receivable on the balance sheet of the specified Person prepared in accordance with GAAP) to, Guarantees of any Indebtedness or other obligations of, or any other investment (including any investment in the form of transfer of property for consideration that is less than the fair value thereof (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company)) in, any other Person that are held or made by the specified Person. The amount, as of any date of determination, of (a)
Investment
 
any Investment in the form of a loan or an advance shall be the principal amount thereof outstanding on such date, without any adjustment for write-downs or write-offs (including as a result of forgiveness of any portion thereof) with respect to such loan or advance after the date thereof, (b) any Investment in the form of a Guarantee shall be determined in accordance with the definition of the term "Guarantee", (c) any Investment in the form of a purchase or other acquisition for value of any Equity Interests, evidences of Indebtedness or other securities of any Person shall be the fair value (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company) of the consideration therefor (including any Indebtedness assumed in connection therewith), plus the fair value (as so determined) of all additions, as of such date of determination, thereto, and minus the amount, as of such date of determination, of any portion of such Investment repaid to the investor in cash as a repayment of principal or a return of capital, as the case may be, but without any other adjustment for increases or decreases in value of, or write-ups, write-downs or write-offs with respect to, such Investment after the time of such Investment, (d) any Investment (other than any Investment referred to in clause (a), (b) or (c) above) in the form of a transfer of Equity Interests or other property by the investor to the investee, including any such transfer in the form of a capital contribution, shall be the fair value (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company) of such Equity Interests or other property as of the time of such transfer (less, in the case of any investment in the form of transfer of property for consideration that is less than the fair value thereof, the fair value (as so determined) of such consideration as of the time of the transfer), minus the amount, as of such date of determination, of any portion of such Investment repaid to the investor in cash as a return of capital, but without any other adjustment for increases or decreases in value of, or write-ups, write-downs or write-offs with respect to, such Investment after the time of such transfer, and (e) any Investment (other than any Investment referred to in clause (a), (b), (c) or (d) above) in any Person resulting from the issuance by such Person of its Equity Interests to the investor shall be the fair value (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company) of such Equity Interests at the time of the issuance thereof.
"" has the meaning set forth in the Collateral Agreement.
IP Security Agreements
"" means the United States Internal Revenue Service.
IRS
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., a national banking association, in its individual capacity, and its successors.
JPMCB
"" means the Persons listed on Schedule 2.01 and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, an Incremental Facility Agreement or a Refinancing Facility Agreement, other than any such Person that shall have ceased to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption.
Lenders
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or on any successor
LIBO Rate
 
or substitute screen provided by Reuters, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such screen, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the "LIBO Rate" with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
"" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, charge, security interest or other encumbrance in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
"" has the meaning set forth in the Collateral Agreement.
Loan Document Obligations
"" means this Agreement, the Incremental Facility Agreements, the Extension Agreements, the Refinancing Facility Agreements, the Collateral Agreement, the other Collateral Documents, the Intercreditor Agreement and, except for purposes of Section 9.02, any promissory notes delivered pursuant to Section 2.05(e).
Loan Documents
"" means the Company and the Subsidiary Loan Parties.
Loan Parties
"" means the loans made by the Lenders to the Company pursuant to this Agreement.
Loans
"", when used in reference to Lenders of any Class, means, at any time, Lenders holding outstanding Loans of such Class representing more than 50% of all Loans of such Class outstanding at such time.
Majority in Interest
"" means any acquisition, or a series of related acquisitions, of (a) Equity Interests in any Person if, after giving effect thereto, such Person will become a Subsidiary or (b) assets comprising all or substantially all the assets of (or all or substantially all the assets constituting a business unit, division, product line or line of business of) any Person; that the aggregate consideration therefor (including Indebtedness assumed in connection therewith, all obligations in respect of deferred purchase price (including obligations under any purchase price adjustment but excluding earnout or similar payments) and all other consideration payable in connection therewith) exceeds $50,000,000.
Material Acquisition
provided
 
"" means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, operations or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Company and the Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, (b) the ability of the Company to perform any of its monetary obligations under the Loan Documents to which it is a party or (c) the rights of or benefits available to the Administrative Agent or the Lenders under the Loan Documents (other than, in the case of this clause (c) only, a material adverse effect caused by an improper act or omission of the Administrative Agent or any Lender).
Material Adverse Effect
"" means any sale, transfer or other disposition, or a series of related sales, transfers or other dispositions, of (a) all or substantially all the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in any Person that are owned by the Company or any Subsidiary or (b) assets comprising all or substantially all the assets of (or all or substantially all the assets constituting a business unit, division, product line or line of business of) any Person; that the aggregate consideration therefor (including Indebtedness assumed by the transferee in connection therewith, all obligations in respect of deferred purchase price (including obligations under any purchase price adjustment but excluding earnout or similar payments) and all other consideration payable in connection therewith) exceeds $50,000,000.
Material Disposition
provided
"" means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Guarantees under the Loan Documents), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of the Company and the Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $50,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the "principal amount" of the obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Company or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
"" means each Subsidiary (a) the consolidated total assets of which equal 5.0% or more of the consolidated total assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries or (b) the consolidated revenues of which equal 5.0% or more of the consolidated revenues of the Company and the Subsidiaries, in each case as of the end of or for the most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b) (or, prior to the first delivery of any such financial statements, as of the end of or for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company ended April 28, 2012); that if at the end of or for any such most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters the combined consolidated total assets or combined consolidated revenues of all Subsidiaries that under clauses (a) and (b) above would not constitute Material Subsidiaries shall have exceeded 10.0% of the consolidated total assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries or 10.0% of the consolidated revenues of the Company and the Subsidiaries, then one or more of such excluded Subsidiaries shall for all purposes of this Agreement be deemed to be Material Subsidiaries in descending order based on the
Material Subsidiary
provided
 
amounts of their consolidated total assets or consolidated revenues, as the case may be, until such excess shall have been eliminated. For purposes of this definition, the consolidated total assets and consolidated revenues of the Company as of any date prior to, or for any period that commenced prior to, the Effective Date shall be determined on a pro forma basis to give effect to the Acquisition and the other Transactions to occur on the Effective Date.
"" means the Tranche B Term Maturity Date or the Incremental Term Maturity Date with respect to Incremental Term Loans of any Series, as the context requires.
Maturity Date
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.15.
Maximum Rate
"" means the merger of Merger Sub with and into the Acquired Company, with the Acquired Company surviving such merger as a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Company.
Merger
"" means Colombia Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation.
Merger Sub
"" means material information concerning the Company, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing or their securities that has not been disseminated in a manner making it available to investors generally, within the meaning of Regulation FD under the Securities Act and the Exchange Act. For purposes of this definition, "material information" means information concerning the Company, the Subsidiaries or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing, or any of their securities, that could reasonably be expected to be material for purposes of the United States federal and state securities laws.
MNPI
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc., and any successor to its rating agency business.
Moody's
"" means a mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents or other security document granting a Lien on any Mortgaged Property to secure the Secured Obligations. Each Mortgage shall be in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Mortgage
"" means each parcel of real property located in the United States of America owned in fee by a Loan Party, and the improvements thereto, that (together with such improvements) has a book value of $5,000,000 or more; that for so long as such real property shall be subject to any Existing Acquired Company Mortgage, the real property set forth on Schedule 1.01B shall not constitute a "Mortgaged Property".
Mortgaged Property
provided
"" means a "multiemployer plan" as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
 
"" means, with respect to any event, (a) the cash (which term, for purposes of this definition, shall include cash equivalents) proceeds (including, in the case of any casualty, condemnation or similar proceeding, insurance, condemnation or similar proceeds) received in respect of such event, including any cash received in respect of any noncash proceeds, but only as and when received, net of (b) the sum, without duplication, of (i) all actual fees and out-of-pocket expenses paid in connection with such event by the Company and the Subsidiaries to Persons that are not Affiliates of the Company or any Subsidiary, (ii) in the case of a sale, transfer, lease or other disposition (including pursuant to a Sale/Leaseback Transaction or a casualty or a condemnation or similar proceeding) of an asset, the amount of all payments required to be made by the Company and the Subsidiaries as a result of such event to repay Indebtedness (other than Loans and Permitted Revolving Indebtedness) secured by such asset and (iii) the amount of all taxes paid (or reasonably estimated to be payable) by the Company and the Subsidiaries, and the amount of any reserves established by the Company and the Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP to fund purchase price adjustment, indemnification and similar contingent liabilities (other than any earnout obligations) reasonably estimated to be payable, in each case during the year that such event occurred or the next succeeding year and that are directly attributable to the occurrence of such event (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company). For purposes of this definition, in the event any contingent liability reserve established with respect to any event as described in clause (b)(iii) above shall be reduced, the amount of such reduction shall, except to the extent such reduction is made as a result of a payment having been made in respect of the contingent liabilities with respect to which such reserve has been established, be deemed to be receipt, on the date of such reduction, of cash proceeds in respect of such event.
Net Proceeds
"" means the United States Treasury Department Office of Foreign Assets Control.
OFAC
"" means, with respect to any Recipient, Taxes imposed as a result of a present or former connection between such Recipient and the jurisdiction imposing such Tax (other than connections arising from such Recipient having executed, delivered, become a party to, performed its obligations under, received payments under, received or perfected a security interest under, engaged in any other transaction pursuant to or enforced any Loan Document, or sold or assigned an interest in any Loan Document).
Other Connection Taxes
"" means all present or future stamp, court or documentary, intangible, recording, filing or similar Taxes that arise from any payment made under, from the execution, delivery, performance, enforcement or registration of, from the receipt or perfection of a security interest under, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document, except any such Taxes that are Other Connection Taxes imposed with respect to an assignment (other than an assignment made pursuant to Section 2.19).
Other Taxes
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04(c)(ii).
Participant Register
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04(c)(i).
Participants
 
"" means the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001 (Title III of Pub.L. No. 107-56 (Signed into law October 26, 2001)).
Patriot Act
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA.
PBGC
"" means a certificate in the form of Exhibit F or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Perfection Certificate
"" means the purchase or other acquisition by the Company or any Subsidiary of Equity Interests in, or all or substantially all the assets of (or all or substantially all the assets constituting a business unit, division, product line or line of business of), any Person if (a) in the case of any purchase or other acquisition of Equity Interests in a Person, such Person will be, upon the consummation of such acquisition a wholly owned Subsidiary (or, in the case of any such purchase or other acquisition structured as a two-step tender offer, such Person will become a wholly owned Subsidiary reasonably promptly thereafter upon the consummation of the second-step merger), in each case including as a result of a merger or consolidation between any Subsidiary and such Person, or (b) in the case of any purchase or other acquisition of other assets, such assets will be owned by the Company or a wholly owned Subsidiary; that (i) all transactions related thereto are consummated in accordance with applicable law, (ii) the business of such Person, or such assets, as the case may be, constitute a business permitted under Section 6.03(b) and (iii) with respect to each such purchase or other acquisition, all actions required to be taken with respect to each newly created or acquired Subsidiary or assets in order to satisfy the requirements set forth in Section 5.03 and the Collateral Documents shall be taken in accordance therewith.
Permitted Acquisition
provided
"" means:
Permitted Encumbrances
(a) Liens imposed by law for Taxes that are not yet delinquent or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.06;
(b) carriers', warehousemen's, mechanics', materialmen's, repairmen's and other like Liens imposed by law (other than any Lien imposed pursuant to Section 430(k) of the Code or Section 303(k) of ERISA or a violation of Section 436 of the Code), arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than 30 days or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.06;
(c) pledges and deposits made (i) in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations and (ii) in respect of letters of credit, bank guarantees or similar instruments issued for the account of the Company or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business supporting obligations of the type set forth in clause (i) above;
 
(d) deposits made to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts (other than Indebtedness for borrowed money), leases (other than Capital Lease Obligations), statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(e) judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (k) of Article VII;
(f) easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances and exceptions to title on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business or in the ordinary operation of such real property that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not materially detract from the value of the affected property or interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Company or any Subsidiary or the ordinary operation of such real property;
(g) customary rights of setoff upon deposits of cash in favor of banks and other depository institutions and Liens of a collecting bank arising under the UCC in respect of payment items in the course of collection;
(h) Liens arising from precautionary UCC financing statement filings (or similar filings under applicable law) regarding operating leases or consignments;
(i) Liens representing any interest or title of a licensor, lessor or sublicensor or sublessor, or a licensee, lessee or sublicensee or sublessee, in the property subject to any lease (other than Capital Lease Obligations), license or sublicense or concession agreement permitted by this Agreement;
(j) Liens arising in the ordinary course of business in favor of custom and forwarding agents and similar Persons in respect of imported goods and merchandise in the custody of such Persons;
(k) Liens in favor of customs and revenue authorities arising as a matter of law to secure payment of customs duties in connection with the importation of goods;
(l) Liens or rights of setoff against credit balances of the Company or any Subsidiary with credit card issuers or credit card processors to secure obligations of the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, to any such credit card issuer or credit card processor incurred in the ordinary course of business as a result of fees and chargebacks; and
(m) other Liens that are contractual rights of set-off;
that the term "Permitted Encumbrances" shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness, other than Liens referred to in clause (c) above securing letters of credit, bank guarantees or similar instruments.
provided
 
"" means:
Permitted Investments
(a) direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof;
(b) investments in commercial paper maturing within 270 days from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, the highest credit rating obtainable from S&P or from Moody's;
(c) investments in certificates of deposit, banker's acceptances and time deposits maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof that has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000;
(d) fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above;
(e) money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in SEC Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) are rated AAA by S&P or Aaa by Moody's and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $5,000,000,000;
(f) marketable direct obligations issued by any state of the United States or any political subdivision of any such state or any public instrumentality thereof and rated, at the time of the acquisition thereof, at least A by S&P or Moody's; and
(g) in the case of any Foreign Subsidiary, other short-term investments that are analogous to the foregoing, are of comparable credit quality and are customarily used by companies in the jurisdiction of such Foreign Subsidiary for cash management purposes.
"" means David Jaffe (or any member of his family that is actively involved in the management of the Company) and Armand Correia.
Permitted Investors
"" means Indebtedness of the Company or any other Loan Party, and the Guarantees thereof by any Loan Party, that (a) no Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall guarantee obligations of the Company or any other Loan Party under such Indebtedness, (b) such Indebtedness shall not be secured by any Lien on any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary other than assets that constitute Collateral and (c) if such Indebtedness or Guarantees thereof is secured, the administrative agent, collateral agent, trustee and/or any similar representative (in each
Permitted Revolving Indebtedness
provided
 
case, as determined by the Administrative Agent) acting on behalf of the holders of such Indebtedness shall become party to the Intercreditor Agreement and Liens on the Term First Priority Collateral securing such Indebtedness and Guarantees shall be junior and subordinate to the Liens thereon securing the Secured Obligations pursuant to the Intercreditor Agreement. As of the date hereof, Indebtedness under the ABL Credit Agreement constitutes Permitted Revolving Indebtedness.
"" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
"" means any "employee pension benefit plan", as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA (other than a Multiemployer Plan), that is subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.01(d).
Platform
"" means the certain Post-Closing Letter Agreement, dated as of the date hereof, between the Company and the Administrative Agent.
Post-Closing Letter Agreement
"" means:
Prepayment Event
(a) any sale, transfer, lease or other disposition (including pursuant to a Sale/Leaseback Transaction or by way of merger or consolidation) of any asset of the Company or any Subsidiary, including any sale or issuance to a Person other than the Company or any Subsidiary of Equity Interests in any Subsidiary, other than (i) dispositions described in clauses (a) through (f) of Section 6.05 and (ii) other dispositions resulting in aggregate Net Proceeds not exceeding $5,000,000 during any fiscal year of the Company;
(b) any casualty or other insured damage to, or any taking under power of eminent domain or by condemnation or similar proceeding of, any asset of the Company or any Subsidiary resulting in aggregate Net Proceeds of $5,000,000 or more;
(c) any issuance by the Company of any Equity Interests, or the receipt by the Company or any Subsidiary of any capital contribution, other than (i) any issuance of directors' qualifying shares or of nominal amounts of other Equity Interests that are required to be held by specified Persons under applicable law and (ii) any issuance of common stock in the Company to management or employees of the Company or any Subsidiary under any employee stock option or stock purchase plan or employee benefit plan; or
 
(d) the incurrence by the Company or any Subsidiary of any Indebtedness, other than any Indebtedness permitted to be incurred by Section 6.01.
"" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMCB as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City. Each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
"" means, with respect to any Lender, representatives of such Lender that are not Public Side Lender Representatives.
Private Side Lender Representatives
"" means, with respect to any computation hereunder required to be made on a pro forma basis giving effect to any proposed Investment or other acquisition (including any Permitted Acquisition or any Material Acquisition), any Material Disposition, any Restricted Payment or any payment of or in respect of any Indebtedness (collectively, ""), computation thereof after giving pro forma effect to such Pro Forma Event in accordance with Regulation S-X under the Securities Act (including pro forma adjustments arising out of events which are directly attributable to such Pro Forma Event, are factually supportable and are expected to have a continuing impact), using, for purposes of making such computation, the consolidated financial statements of the Company and the Subsidiaries (and, to the extent applicable, the historical financial statements of any entities or assets so acquired or to be acquired, or so disposed or to be disposed), which shall be reformulated as if such Pro Forma Event (and, in the case of any pro forma computations made hereunder to determine whether such Pro Forma Event is permitted to be consummated hereunder, to any other Pro Forma Event consummated since the first day of the period covered by any component of such pro forma computation and on or prior to the date of such computation), and any Indebtedness or other liabilities incurred in connection with any such Pro Forma Event, had been consummated and incurred at the beginning of such period. If any Indebtedness bears a floating rate of interest and is being given pro forma effect, the interest on such Indebtedness shall be calculated as if the rate in effect on the date of determination had been the applicable rate for the entire period (taking into account any Swap Agreement applicable to such Indebtedness if such Swap Agreement has a remaining term in excess of 12 months).
Pro Forma Basis
Pro Forma Events
"" means, at any date of determination, that the Company shall be in compliance with the covenant set forth in Section 6.12, calculated on a Pro Forma Basis.
Pro Forma Compliance
"" means a Deposit Account in which the Net Proceeds in respect of any Prepayment Event described in clause (a) or (b) of the definition of the term "Prepayment Event" are deposited by the Company or any Subsidiary to be held pending release as contemplated by Section 2.09(b) for reinvestment or prepayment, and which has no other funds contained therein (other than interest on any such proceeds) and is subject to a Control Agreement in favor of the Administrative Agent.
Proceeds Collateral Account
 
"" means, with respect to any Lender, representatives of such Lender that do not wish to receive MNPI.
Public Side Lender Representatives
"" means the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any combination thereof (as the context requires).
Recipient
"" means a Refinancing Facility Agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, among the Company, the Administrative Agent and one or more Refinancing Lenders, establishing Refinancing Term Commitments and effecting such other amendments hereto and to the other Loan Documents as are contemplated by Section 2.20.
Refinancing Facility Agreement
"" means, in respect of any Indebtedness (the ""), any Indebtedness that extends, renews or refinances such Original Indebtedness (or any Refinancing Indebtedness in respect thereof); that (a) the principal amount of such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not exceed the principal amount of such Original Indebtedness except by an amount no greater than accrued and unpaid interest with respect to such Original Indebtedness; (b) the stated final maturity of such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not be earlier than that of such Original Indebtedness; (c) such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not constitute an obligation (including pursuant to a Guarantee) of any Subsidiary that shall not have been (or, in the case of after-acquired Subsidiaries, shall not have been required to become pursuant to the terms of the Original Indebtedness) an obligor in respect of such Original Indebtedness and shall constitute an obligation of such Subsidiary only to the extent of their obligations in respect of such Original Indebtedness; and (d) such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not be secured by any Lien on any asset other than the assets that secured such Original Indebtedness (or would have been required to secure such Original Indebtedness pursuant to the terms thereof).
Refinancing Indebtedness
Original Indebtedness
provided
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.20(a).
Refinancing Term Commitments
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.20(a).
Refinancing Term Lender
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.20(a).
Refinancing Term Loan
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04(b).
Register
"" means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the directors, officers, partners, members, trustees, employees, agents, administrators, managers, representatives and advisors of such Person and of such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
"" means any actual release, spill, emission, leaking, dumping, injection, pouring, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migration into or through the environment or within or upon any building, structure, facility or fixture.
Release
 
"" means (a) any prepayment or repayment of any Tranche B Term Loan with the proceeds of any Indebtedness (other than Permitted Revolving Indebtedness), or any conversion of any Tranche B Term Loan into any new or replacement tranche of term loans, in each case having a Weighted Average Yield lower than the Weighted Average Yield of such Tranche B Term Loan at the time of such prepayment or repayment or conversion and (b) any amendment or other modification of this Agreement that, directly or indirectly, reduces the Weighted Average Yield of any Tranche B Term Loan.
Repricing Event
"" means, at any time, Lenders having aggregate Loans (or, prior to the borrowing hereunder on the date hereof, Commitments) representing more than 50% of the aggregate principal amount of the Loans (or, prior to the borrowing hereunder on the date hereof, the aggregate Commitments) at such time.
Required Lenders
"" means any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary, or any payment or distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, exchange, conversion, cancellation or termination of any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary.
Restricted Payment
"" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc., and any successor to its rating agency business.
S&P
"" means an arrangement relating to property owned by the Company or any Subsidiary whereby the Company or such Subsidiary sells or transfers such property to any Person and the Company or any Subsidiary leases such property, or other property that it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property sold or transferred, from such Person or its Affiliates.
Sale/Leaseback Transaction
"" means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
SEC
"" has the meaning set forth in the Collateral Agreement.
Secured Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in the Collateral Agreement.
Secured Parties
"" means the United States Securities Act of 1933.
Securities Act
"" means, as of any date, the sum, without duplication, of (a) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Company and the Subsidiaries outstanding as of such date that is secured by any Lien on any asset of the Company or any Subsidiary (other than Indebtedness of any Foreign Subsidiary that is secured by a Lien only on assets of one or more Foreign Subsidiaries), in the amount that would be reflected on a balance sheet prepared as of such date on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP (but without giving effect to any election to value any Indebtedness at "fair value", as described in Section 1.04(a), or any other accounting
Senior Secured Indebtedness
 
principle that results in the amount of any such Indebtedness (other than zero coupon Indebtedness) as reflected on such balance sheet to be below the stated principal amount of such Indebtedness), (b) the aggregate amount of Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations of the Company and the Subsidiaries outstanding as of such date (other than Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations of any Foreign Subsidiary that is not Guaranteed by, or otherwise recourse to, the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary), determined on a consolidated basis, and (c) the aggregate obligations of the Company and the Subsidiaries as an account party in respect of letters of credit or letters of guaranty that is secured by any Lien on any asset of the Company or any Subsidiary (other than any such obligations of any Foreign Subsidiary that is not Guaranteed by, or otherwise recourse to, the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary), other than contingent obligations in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty to the extent such letter of credit or letter of guaranty does not support Indebtedness.
"" means, as of any date of determination, the ratio of (a) Senior Secured Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company most recently ended on or prior to such date.
Senior Secured Leverage Ratio
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.18(b).
Series
"" means the representations and warranties set forth in Sections 3.01, 3.02, 3.03(b), 3.03(c), 3.07(b), 3.08, 3.14, 3.15 and 3.16.
Specified Representations
"" means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves), expressed as a decimal, established by the Board of Governors to which the Administrative Agent is subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency Liabilities" in Regulation D of the Board of Governors). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
"" of a Person means any Indebtedness of such Person the payment of which is subordinated to payment of the Secured Obligations.
Subordinated Indebtedness
"" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, (a) any Person the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date and (b) any other Person (i) of which Equity Interests representing more than 50% of the equity value or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general
subsidiary
parent
 
partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (ii) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
"" means any direct or indirect subsidiary of the Company.
Subsidiary
"" means each Subsidiary that is a party to the Collateral Agreement.
Subsidiary Loan Party
"" means a certificate in the form of Exhibit G or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Supplemental Perfection Certificate
"" means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Company or any Subsidiary shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
"" means BofA.
Syndication Agent
"" means, as to any Person, any lease (including leases that may be terminated by the lessee at any time) of any property (whether real, personal or mixed) (a) that is accounted for as an operating lease under GAAP and (b) in respect of which the lessee retains or obtains ownership of the property so leased for US federal income tax purposes, other than any such lease under which such Person is the lessor.
Synthetic Lease
"" means, as to any Person, an amount equal to the sum, without duplication, of (a) the obligations of such person to pay rent or other amounts under any Synthetic Lease which are attributable to principal and (b) the amount of any purchase price payment under any Synthetic Lease assuming the lessee exercises the option to purchase the leased property at the end of the lease term. For purposes of Section 6.02, a Synthetic Lease Obligation shall be deemed to be secured by a Lien on the property being leased and such property shall be deemed to be owned by the lessee.
Synthetic Lease Obligations
"" means all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, withholdings (including backup withholding), assessments, fees or other charges imposed by any Governmental Authority, including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto.
Taxes
"" has the meaning set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement.
Term Priority Collateral
"" means, as of any date, the sum, without duplication, of (a) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Company and the
Total Indebtedness
 
Subsidiaries outstanding as of such date, in the amount that would be reflected on a balance sheet prepared as of such date on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP (but without giving effect to any election to value any Indebtedness at "fair value", as described in Section 1.04(a), or any other accounting principle that results in the amount of any such Indebtedness (other than zero coupon Indebtedness) as reflected on such balance sheet to be below the stated principal amount of such Indebtedness), (b) the aggregate amount of Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations of the Company and the Subsidiaries outstanding as of such date, determined on a consolidated basis, and (c) the aggregate obligations of the Company and the Subsidiaries as an account party in respect of letters of credit or letters of guaranty, other than contingent obligations in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty to the extent such letter of credit or letter of guaranty does not support Indebtedness.
"" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company most recently ended on or prior to such date.
Total Leverage Ratio
"" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make a Tranche B Term Loan on the Effective Date, expressed as an amount representing the maximum principal amount of the Tranche B Term Loan to be made by such Lender, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.06 and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Tranche B Term Commitment is set forth on Schedule 2.01, or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Tranche B Term Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Tranche B Term Commitments is $300,000,000.
Tranche B Term Commitment
"" means a Lender with a Tranche B Term Commitment or an outstanding Tranche B Term Loan.
Tranche B Term Lender
"" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.01.
Tranche B Term Loan
"" means June 14, 2018.
Tranche B Term Maturity Date
"" means the (a) execution, delivery and performance by the Loan Parties of this Agreement, the borrowing of the Loans and the use of the proceeds thereof, (b) the execution, delivery and performance by the Loan Parties of the ABL Second Restatement Agreement, (c) the creation and perfection of the security interests provided for in the Collateral Documents, (d) the consummation of the Acquisition, (e) the repayment in full of all principal, premium, if any, interest, fees and other amounts due or outstanding under the Existing Acquired Company Credit Agreement, the termination of the commitments and letters of credit outstanding thereunder and the discharge and release of the guarantees and liens existing in connection therewith, and (f) the payment of all fees and expenses in connection with the foregoing.
Transactions
 
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
"" means the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect from time to time in the State of New York or any other state the laws of which are required to be applied in connection with the perfection of security interests created by the Collateral Documents.
UCC
"" means a "United States person" within the meaning of Section 7701(a)(30) of the Code.
U.S. Person
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.15(f)(ii)(B)(3).
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
"" means, at any time, with respect to any Loan or other Indebtedness, the weighted average yield to stated maturity of such Loan or other Indebtedness based on the interest rate or rates applicable thereto and giving effect to all upfront or similar fees (but not, for the avoidance of doubt, any arrangement or other similar fees paid solely to the arrangers or persons acting in similar capacities) or original issue discount payable to the Lenders or other applicable creditor advancing such Loan or other Indebtedness with respect thereto (in each case, with upfront or similar fees being deemed to constitute like amounts of original issue discount, and such fees and original discount being equated to interest margins in a manner consistent with generally accepted financial practice based on an assumed life to maturity of the lesser of four years and the tenor of such Loan or other Indebtedness) and to any interest rate "floor". For purposes of determining the Weighted Average Yield of any floating rate Indebtedness at any time, the rate of interest applicable to such Indebtedness at such time shall be assumed to be the rate applicable at all times prior to maturity; that appropriate adjustments shall be made for any scheduled changes in rates of interest provided for in the documents governing such Indebtedness. Determinations of the Weighted Average Yield of any Loans for purposes of Section 2.09 and Section 2.18 shall be made by the Administrative Agent at the request of the Company and in a manner determined by the Administrative Agent to be consistent with accepted financial practice, and any such determination shall be conclusive, absent manifest error.
Weighted Average Yield
provided
"", when used in reference to a subsidiary of any Person, means that all the Equity Interests in such subsidiary (other than directors' qualifying shares and other nominal amounts of Equity Interests that are required to be held by other Persons under applicable law) are owned, beneficially and of record, by such Person, another wholly-owned subsidiary of such Person or any combination thereof.
wholly-owned
"" means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
SECTION 1.02. . For purposes of this Agreement, Loans and Borrowings may be classified and referred to by Class or by Type or by Class and Type.
Classification of Loans and Borrowings
SECTION 1.03. The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". The words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all real and personal, tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights. The word "law" shall be construed as referring to all statutes, rules, regulations, codes and other laws (including official rulings and interpretations thereunder having the force of law or with which affected Persons customarily comply), and all judgments, orders, writs and decrees, of all Governmental Authorities. Except as otherwise provided herein and unless the context requires otherwise, (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document (including this Agreement and the other Loan Documents) shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any definition of or reference to any statute, rule or regulation shall be construed as referring thereto as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (including by succession of comparable successor laws), and all references to any statute shall be construed as referring to all rules, regulations, rulings and official interpretations promulgated or issued thereunder, (c) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and permitted assigns (subject to any restrictions on assignment set forth herein) and, in the case of any Governmental Authority, any other Governmental Authority that shall have succeeded to any or all functions thereof, (d) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof and (e) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement.
Terms Generally.
SECTION 1.04. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature used herein shall be construed in accordance with GAAP as in effect from time to time; that (a) if the Company notifies the Administrative Agent that the Company requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the Effective Date in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Company that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice
Accounting Terms; GAAP.
provided
 
shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith; that the Company, on the one hand, and the Lenders, on the other hand, agree to negotiate in good faith with respect to any proposed amendment to eliminate or adjust for the effect of any such change in GAAP; and (b) notwithstanding any other provision contained herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature used herein shall be construed, and all computations of amounts and ratios referred to herein shall be made, without giving effect to (i) any election under Statement of Financial Accounting Standards 159, The Fair Value Option for Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities, or any successor thereto (including pursuant to the Accounting Standards Codification), to value any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary at "fair value", as defined therein, and (ii) any change in GAAP occurring after the date hereof as a result of the adoption of any proposals set forth in the Proposed Accounting Standards Update, Leases (Topic 840), issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board on August 17, 2010, or any other proposals issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board in connection therewith, in each case if such change would require treating any lease (or similar arrangement conveying the right to use) as a capital lease where such lease (or similar arrangement) was not required to be so treated under GAAP as in effect on the date hereof.
provided
SECTION 1.05. All references herein to the Company and the Subsidiaries shall be deemed to be references to such Persons, and all the representations and warranties of the Company and the other Loan Parties contained in this Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall be deemed made, in each case, after giving effect to the Acquisition and the other Transactions to occur on the Effective Date, unless the context otherwise requires.
Effectuation of Transactions.
SECTION 2.01. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender agrees to make a Tranche B Term Loan to the Company on the Effective Date in a principal amount not exceeding its Tranche B Term Commitment. Additional Classes of Commitments may be established in accordance with Section 2.18. Amounts repaid or prepaid in respect of Loans may not be reborrowed.
Commitments.
SECTION 2.02. (a) Each Loan shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans of the same Class and Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments of the applicable Class.
Loans and Borrowings.
(b) Subject to Section 2.12, each Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Company may request in accordance herewith; that all Borrowings made on the Effective Date must be made as ABR Borrowings unless the Company shall have given the notice required for a Eurodollar Borrowing under Section 2.03 and provided an indemnity letter, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, extending the benefits of Section 2.14 to Lenders in respect of such Borrowings. Each Lender at its option may make any Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Company to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
provided
 
(c) At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate principal amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000; that a Eurodollar Borrowing that results from a continuation of an outstanding Eurodollar Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to such outstanding Borrowing. At the time that each ABR Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate principal amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000 and not less than $1,000,000. Borrowings of more than one Type and Class may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of 10 (or such greater number as may be agreed to by the Administrative Agent) Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
provided
provided
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Company shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert to or continue, any Eurodollar Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date applicable thereto.
SECTION 2.03. To request a Borrowing, the Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request either in writing (delivered by hand or facsimile) or by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 12:00 p.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing (or, in the case of any Eurodollar Borrowing to be made on the Effective Date, such shorter period of time as may be agreed to by the Administrative Agent) or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 12:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of an executed written Borrowing Request. Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Requests for Borrowings.
(i) whether the requested Borrowing is to be a Tranche B Term Borrowing or an Incremental Term Borrowing of a particular Series;
(ii) the aggregate amount of such Borrowing;
(iii) the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
(iv) whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
(v) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period"; and
 
(vi) the location and number of the account of the Company to which funds are to be disbursed.
If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the Company shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the applicable Class of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
SECTION 2.04. (a) Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 2:00 p.m., New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Company by promptly remitting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Company specified by the Company in the applicable Borrowing Request.
Funding of Borrowings.
(b) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance on such assumption, make available to the Company a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Company severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Company to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of a payment to be made by such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of a payment to be made by the Company, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans of the applicable Class. If the Company and such Lender shall pay such interest to the Administrative Agent for the same or an overlapping period, the Administrative Agent shall promptly remit to the Company the amount of such interest paid by the Company for such period. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing. Any payment by the Company shall be without prejudice to any claim the Company may have against a Lender that shall have failed to make such payment to the Administrative Agent.
SECTION 2.05. . (a) Each Borrowing initially shall be of the Type and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in the applicable Borrowing Request or as otherwise provided in Section 2.03. Thereafter, the Company may elect to convert such Borrowing to a Borrowing of a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a
Interest Elections
 
Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. The Company may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing.
(b) To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Company were requesting a Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of an executed written Interest Election Request. Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
(i) the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
(ii) the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
(iii) whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
(iv) if the resulting Borrowing is to be a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period".
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Company shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.
(c) Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the applicable Class of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
(d) If the Company fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing for an additional Interest Period of one month. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default under clause (i) or (j) of Article VII has occurred and is continuing
 
with respect to the Company, or if any other Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of a Majority in Interest of Lenders of any Class, has notified the Company of the election to give effect to this sentence on account of such other Event of Default, then, in each such case, so long as such Event of Default is continuing, (i) no outstanding Borrowing of such Class may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing of such Class shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
SECTION 2.06. . (a) Unless previously terminated, the Tranche B Term Commitments shall automatically terminate at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the Effective Date.
Termination of Commitments
(b) The Company may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Commitments of any Class; that each reduction of the Commitments of any Class shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000.
provided
(c) The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any such notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the applicable Class of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Company pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable. Any termination or reduction of the Commitments of any Class shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Commitments of any Class shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments of such Class.
SECTION 2.07. . (a) The Company hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Loan of such Lender as provided in Section 2.08.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
(b) Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Company to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
(c) The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Company to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
(d) The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the
prima
facie
 
obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Company to pay any amounts due hereunder in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
(e) Any Lender may request that Loans of any Class made by it be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the Company shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
SECTION 2.08. (a) The Company shall repay Tranche B Term Borrowings on the last day of each December, March, June and September, beginning with September 30, 2012, and ending with the last such day to occur prior to the Tranche B Term Maturity Date, in an aggregate principal amount for each such date equal to 0.25% of the aggregate principal amount of the Tranche B Term Borrowings outstanding on the Effective Date (as such amount may be adjusted pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section). The Company shall repay Incremental Term Loans of any Series in such amounts and on such date or dates as shall be specified therefor in the Incremental Facility Agreement establishing the Incremental Term Commitments of such Series (as such amounts may be adjusted pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section or pursuant to such Incremental Facility Agreement).
Amortization of Term Loans.
(b) To the extent not previously paid, (i) all Tranche B Term Loans shall be due and payable on the Tranche B Term Maturity Date and (ii) all Incremental Term Loans of any Series shall be due and payable on the Incremental Term Maturity Date applicable thereto.
(c) Any prepayment of a Borrowing of any Class shall be applied to reduce the subsequent scheduled repayments of the Borrowings of such Class to be made pursuant to this Section ratably based on the amount of such scheduled repayments; that (i) any prepayment of a Borrowing of any Class made pursuant to Section 2.09(a) shall be applied to reduce the subsequent scheduled repayments of Borrowings of such Class to be made pursuant to this Section in the manner specified by the Company in the applicable notice of prepayment (or, if no such specification is made therein, ratably as provided above) and (ii) any prepayment of Borrowings of any Class contemplated by Section 2.20 shall be applied to reduce the remaining scheduled repayments as set forth in such Section. Any prepayment of an Incremental Term Borrowing of any Series shall be applied to reduce the subsequent scheduled repayments of Incremental Term Borrowings of such Series to be made pursuant to this Section as shall be specified therefor in the Incremental Facility Agreement establishing the Incremental Term Commitments of such Series.
provided
 
(d) Prior to any repayment of any Borrowings of any Class under this Section, the Company shall select the Borrowing or Borrowings of the applicable Class to be repaid and shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by hand delivery or facsimile) of such selection not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the scheduled date of such repayment. Each repayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the repaid Borrowing. Repayments of Borrowings shall be accompanied by accrued interest on the amounts repaid.
SECTION 2.09. (a) The Company shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to the requirements of this Section.
Prepayment of Loans.
(b) In the event and on each occasion that any Net Proceeds are received by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary in respect of any Prepayment Event, the Company shall, on the day such Net Proceeds are received (or, in the case of a Prepayment Event described in clause (a) or (b) of the definition of the term "Prepayment Event", within three Business Days after such Net Proceeds are received), prepay Borrowings in an amount equal to (i) in the case of a Prepayment Event described in clause (a), (b) or (d) of the definition of the term "Prepayment Event," 100% of such Net Proceeds or (ii) in the case of a Prepayment Event described in clause (c) of the definition of the term "Prepayment Event," 50% of such Net Proceeds; that, in the case of any event described in clause (a) or (b) of the definition of the term "Prepayment Event" (other than any sale, transfer, or other disposition referred to in Section 6.05(g) or 6.05(j)), if the Company shall (a) prior to the date of the required prepayment, deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company to the effect that the Company intends to cause the Net Proceeds from such event (or a portion thereof specified in such certificate) to be applied within 270 days after receipt of such Net Proceeds to acquire real property, equipment or other tangible assets to be used in the business of the Company or the Subsidiaries, or to consummate any Permitted Acquisition (or any other acquisition of all or substantially all the assets of (or all or substantially all the assets constituting a business unit, division, product line or line of business of) any Person) permitted hereunder, and certifying that no Default has occurred and is continuing, and (b) deposit all such Net Proceeds in a Proceeds Collateral Account pending such application, then no prepayment shall be required pursuant to this paragraph in respect of the Net Proceeds from such event (or the portion of such Net Proceeds specified in such certificate, if applicable) except to the extent of any such Net Proceeds that have not been so applied by the end of such 270-day period (or within a period of 120 days thereafter if by the end of such initial 270-day period the Company or one or more Subsidiaries shall have entered into an agreement with a third party to acquire such real property, equipment or other tangible assets, or to consummate such Permitted Acquisition or other acquisition, with such Net Proceeds), at which time a prepayment shall be required in an amount equal to the Net Proceeds that have not been so applied; that to the extent any such Net Proceeds shall be received in respect of assets owned by a Loan Party, such Net Proceeds may be reinvested only in assets owned by a Loan Party or, in the case of a Permitted Acquisition or other
provided
provided
further
 
acquisition, by any Person that shall become a Subsidiary Loan Party upon the consummation thereof (other than, in each case, Equity Interests in Foreign Subsidiaries, except to the extent such Net Proceeds shall have resulted from the sale of Equity Interests in one or more Foreign Subsidiaries). Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Net Proceeds received by the Company or any Subsidiary in respect of any Prepayment Event described in clause (a) or (b) of the definition of the term "Prepayment Event" involving any ABL Priority Collateral (whether in the form of a direct sale, transfer or other disposition of such ABL Priority Collateral or a sale, transfer or other disposition of Equity Interests in any Subsidiary owning such ABL Priority Collateral) that secures any Permitted Revolving Indebtedness at the time such Prepayment Event occurs shall not, solely to the extent such Net Proceeds are attributable to the fair value of such ABL Priority Collateral (net of any related transferred liabilities, in each case as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company), be subject to the requirements of this Section 2.09(b).
(c) Prior to any optional or mandatory prepayment of Borrowings under this Section, the Company shall, subject to the next sentence, specify the Borrowing or Borrowings to be prepaid in the notice of such prepayment delivered pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section. In the event of any mandatory prepayment of Borrowings made at a time when Borrowings of more than one Class remain outstanding, the Company shall select Borrowings to be prepaid so that the aggregate amount of such prepayment is allocated among the Borrowings pro rata based on the aggregate principal amounts of outstanding Borrowings of each such Class; that the amounts so allocable to Incremental Term Loans of any Series may be applied to other Borrowings as provided in the applicable Incremental Facility Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Tranche B Lender may elect, by notice to the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by hand delivery or facsimile) at least one Business Day (or such shorter period as may be established by the Administrative Agent) prior to the required prepayment date, to decline all or any portion of any prepayment of its Tranche B Term Loans pursuant to this Section (other than an optional prepayment pursuant to paragraph (a) of this Section, which may not be declined), in which case the aggregate amount of the payment that would have been applied to prepay Tranche B Term Loans but was so declined shall be retained by the Company.
provided
(d) In the event any Tranche B Term Loans are subject to a Repricing Event prior to the first anniversary of the Effective Date, then each Lender whose Tranche B Term Loans are prepaid or repaid in whole or in part, or which is required to assign any of its Tranche B Term Loans pursuant to Section 2.17, in connection with such Repricing Event or which holds a Tranche B Term Loan the Weighted Average Yield of which is reduced as a result of a Repricing Event shall be paid an amount equal to 1.00% of the aggregate principal amount of such Lender's Tranche B Term Loans so prepaid, repaid, assigned or repriced.
(e) The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by hand delivery or facsimile) of any optional prepayment and, to the extent practicable, any mandatory prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a
 
Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment or (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date, the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid and, in the case of a mandatory prepayment, a reasonably detailed calculation of the amount of such prepayment; that a notice of prepayment of Borrowings pursuant to paragraph (a) of this Section may state that such notice is conditioned upon the occurrence of one or more events specified therein, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Company (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified date of prepayment) if such condition is not satisfied. Promptly following receipt of any such notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the applicable Class of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02, except as necessary to apply fully the required amount of a mandatory prepayment. Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest as required by Section 2.11.
provided
(f) In the case of any mandatory prepayment of any Eurodollar Borrowing pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section, the Company may, at its option, instead of making such mandatory prepayment by the time otherwise due hereunder, deposit on or prior to such time into the Prepayment Escrow Account (as defined below) an amount in cash equal to the sum of (i) the amount of such mandatory prepayment and (ii) the aggregate amount of the accrued interest that would be due thereon pursuant to Section 2.11 on the last day of the Interest Period of such Eurodollar Borrowing. The Administrative Agent shall apply any funds on deposit in the Prepayment Escrow Account solely to prepay the Eurodollar Borrowing with respect to which such deposit was made, and to pay accrued interest thereon, on the last day of such Interest Period or, at the discretion of the Administrative Agent, on an earlier date if a Default shall have occurred and be continuing. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "" means an account established by the Company with the Administrative Agent and over which the Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right to withdraw funds. Other than any interest earned on the investment of the funds on deposit in the Prepayment Escrow Account, which investment shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Company's risk and expense, such funds shall not bear interest. Any funds remaining in the Prepayment Escrow Account after the application of funds on deposit therein in accordance with the foregoing provisions of this paragraph shall be paid by the Administrative Agent to the Company.
Prepayment Escrow Account
SECTION 2.10. (a) The Company agrees to pay on the Effective Date to each Tranche B Term Lender, as fee compensation for the funding of such Lender's Tranche B Term Loan, a closing fee in an amount equal to 1.00% of the aggregate principal amount of such Tranche B Term Lender's Tranche B Term Loan.
Fees.
 
(b) The Company agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees in the amounts and payable at the times separately agreed upon between the Company and the Administrative Agent.
(c) All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent for distribution, in the case of closing fees, to the Tranche B Term Lenders entitled thereto. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances (absent manifest error in the amount paid).
SECTION 2.11. (a) The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
Interest.
(b) The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Company hereunder is not paid when due (after giving effect to any applicable grace period), whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% per annum plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other overdue amount, 2% per annum plus the rate applicable to ABR Revolving Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
(d) Accrued interest on each Loan (for ABR Loans, accrued through the last day of the prior calendar quarter) shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan; that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan, accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
provided
(e) All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate or Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
SECTION 2.12. If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing of any Class:
Alternate Rate of Interest.
(a) the Administrative Agent determines in good faith (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period; or
(b) the Administrative Agent is advised by a Majority in Interest of the Lenders of such Class that the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period;
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice (which may be telephonic) thereof to the Company and the Lenders of such Class as promptly as practicable and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Company and the Lenders of such Class that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist (which notification shall be made promptly after the Administrative Agent obtains knowledge of the cessation of such circumstances), (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing of such Class to, or continuation of any Borrowing of such Class as, a Eurodollar Borrowing of such Class shall be ineffective, and such Borrowing shall be continued as an ABR Borrowing, and (ii) any Borrowing Request for a Eurodollar Borrowing of such Class shall be treated as a request for an ABR Borrowing.
SECTION 2.13. (a) If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs.
(i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended or participated in by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate);
(ii) impose on any Lender or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense (other than Taxes) affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender; or
(iii) subject any Recipient to any Taxes (other than (A) Indemnified Taxes, (B) Taxes described in clauses (b) through (d) of the definition of the term "Excluded Taxes" and (C) Connection Income Taxes) on its loans, loan principal, letters of credit, commitments or other obligations, or its deposits, reserves, other liabilities or capital attributable thereto;
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender or other Recipient of making, converting to, continuing or maintaining any Loan or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan, or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or other Recipient hereunder (whether of principal, interest or any other amount) then, from time to time upon request of such Lender or other Recipient, the Company will pay to such Lender or other Recipient, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or other
 
Recipient, as the case may be, for such additional costs or expenses incurred or reduction suffered. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Company reasonably believes that any such Taxes were not correctly or legally asserted, the applicable Recipient will use commercially reasonable efforts to cooperate with the Company to obtain a refund of such Taxes so long as such efforts would not, in the sole determination of such Recipient result in any non-reimbursable additional costs, expenses or risks or be otherwise disadvantageous to it.
(b) If any Lender determines that any Change in Law regarding capital or liquidity requirements has had or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's capital or on the capital of such Lender's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement, the Commitments of such Lender or the Loans made by such Lender to a level below that which such Lender or such Lender's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's policies and the policies of such Lender's holding company with respect to capital adequacy or liquidity), then, from time to time upon request of such Lender, the Company will pay to such Lender such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Lender's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
(c) A certificate of a Lender setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section delivered to the Company shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Company shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
(d) Failure or delay on the part of any Lender to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's right to demand such compensation; that the Company shall not be required to compensate a Lender pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or expenses incurred or reductions suffered more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender notifies the Company of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or expenses or reductions and of such Lender's or intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or expenses or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
SECTION 2.14. In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Eurodollar Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.09(e) and is revoked in accordance therewith) or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Company pursuant to Section 2.17, then, in any such event, the Company shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. Such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be
Break Funding Payments.
 
deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan (but not including the Applicable Rate applicable thereto), for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest that would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate such Lender would bid if it were to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the London interbank market. The Company shall also compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to any failure by the Company to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Loan. A certificate of any Lender delivered to the Company and setting forth and explaining in reasonable detail any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Company shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 30 days after receipt thereof.
SECTION 2.15. (a)  Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party under any Loan Document shall be made without deduction or withholding for any Taxes, except as required by applicable law. If any applicable law (as determined in the good faith discretion of an applicable withholding agent) requires the deduction or withholding of any Tax from any such payment by a withholding agent, then the applicable withholding agent shall be entitled to make such deduction or withholding and shall timely pay the full amount deducted or withheld to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law and, if such Tax is an Indemnified Tax, then the sum payable by the applicable Loan Party shall be increased as necessary so that after such deduction or withholding has been made (including such deductions and withholdings applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the applicable Recipient receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deduction or withholding been made.
Taxes.
Payments Free of Taxes.
(b) The Loan Parties shall timely pay to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law, or at the option of the Administrative Agent timely reimburse it for the payment of, any Other Taxes.
Payment of Other Taxes by the Loan Parties.
(c) As soon as practicable after any payment of Taxes by any Loan Party to a Governmental Authority pursuant to this Section, such Loan Party shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Evidence of Payment.
(d) The Loan Parties shall jointly and severally indemnify each Recipient, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for
Indemnification by the Loan Parties.
 
the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes (including Indemnified Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) payable or paid by such Recipient or required to be withheld or deducted from a payment to such Recipient and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to the Company by a Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
(e) Each Lender shall severally indemnify the Administrative Agent, within 10 days after demand therefor, for (i) any Indemnified Taxes attributable to such Lender (but only to the extent that any Loan Party has not already indemnified the Administrative Agent for such Indemnified Taxes and without limiting the obligation of the Loan Parties to do so), (ii) any Taxes attributable to such Lender's failure to comply with the provisions of Section 9.04(c)(ii) relating to the maintenance of a Participant Register and (iii) any Excluded Taxes attributable to such Lender, in each case, that are payable or paid by the Administrative Agent in connection with any Loan Document, and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Lender by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive absent manifest error. Each Lender hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent to set off and apply any and all amounts at any time owing to such Lender under any Loan Document or otherwise payable by the Administrative Agent to the Lender from any other source against any amount due to the Administrative Agent under this paragraph (e).
Indemnification by the Lenders.
(f) (i) Any Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding Tax with respect to payments made under any Loan Document shall deliver to the Company and the Administrative Agent, at the time or times reasonably requested by the Company or the Administrative Agent, such properly completed and executed documentation reasonably requested by the Company or the Administrative Agent as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate of withholding. In addition, any Lender, if reasonably requested by the Company or the Administrative Agent, shall deliver such other documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Company or the Administrative Agent as will enable the Company or the Administrative Agent to determine whether or not such Lender is subject to backup withholding or information reporting requirements. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the preceding two sentences, the completion, execution and submission of such documentation (other than such documentation set forth in Section 2.15(f)(ii)(A), (ii)(B) and (ii)(D) below) shall not be required if in the Lender's reasonable judgment such completion, execution or submission would subject such Lender to any material unreimbursed cost or expense or would materially prejudice the legal or commercial position of such Lender.
Status of Lenders.
(i) Without limiting the generality of the foregoing:
(A) any Lender that is a U.S. Person shall deliver to the Company and the Administrative Agent on or prior to the date on which such Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Company or the Administrative Agent), executed originals of IRS Form W-9 certifying that such Lender is exempt from U.S. Federal backup withholding tax;
 
(B) any Foreign Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to the Company and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Foreign Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Company or the Administrative Agent), whichever of the following is applicable:
(1) in the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party (x) with respect to payments of interest under any Loan Document, executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN establishing an exemption from, or reduction of, U.S. Federal withholding Tax pursuant to the "interest" article of such tax treaty and (y) with respect to any other applicable payments under any Loan Document, executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN establishing an exemption from, or reduction of, U.S. Federal withholding Tax pursuant to the "business profits" or "other income" article of such tax treaty;
(2) executed originals of IRS Form W-8ECI;
(3) in the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of the exemption for portfolio interest under Section 881(c) of the Code, (x) a certificate substantially in the form of Exhibit H-1 to the effect that such Foreign Lender is not a "bank" within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, a "10 percent shareholder" of the Company within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, or a "controlled foreign corporation" described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code (a "") and (y) executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN; or
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
(4) to the extent a Foreign Lender is not the beneficial owner, executed originals of IRS Form W-8IMY, accompanied by IRS Form W-8ECI, IRS Form W-8BEN, a U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate substantially in the form of Exhibit H-2 or Exhibit H-3, IRS Form W-9, and/or other certification documents from each beneficial owner, as applicable; that if the Foreign Lender is a partnership and one or more direct or indirect partners of such
provided
 
Foreign Lender are claiming the portfolio interest exemption, such Foreign Lender may provide a U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate substantially in the form of Exhibit H-4 on behalf of each such direct and indirect partner;
(C) any Foreign Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to the Company and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Foreign Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Company or the Administrative Agent), executed originals of any other form prescribed by applicable law as a basis for claiming exemption from or a reduction in U.S. Federal withholding Tax, duly completed, together with such supplementary documentation as may be prescribed by applicable law to permit the Company or the Administrative Agent to determine the withholding or deduction required to be made; and
(D) if a payment made to a Lender under any Loan Document would be subject to U.S. Federal withholding Tax imposed by FATCA if such Lender were to fail to comply with the applicable reporting requirements of FATCA (including those contained in Section 1471(b) or 1472(b) of the Code, as applicable), such Lender shall deliver to the Company and the Administrative Agent at the time or times prescribed by law and at such time or times reasonably requested by the Company or the Administrative Agent such documentation prescribed by applicable law (including as prescribed by Section 1471(b)(3)(C)(i) of the Code) and such additional documentation reasonably requested by the Company or the Administrative Agent as may be necessary for the Company and the Administrative Agent to comply with their obligations under FATCA and to determine that such Lender has complied with such Lender's obligations under FATCA or to determine the amount to deduct and withhold from such payment. Solely for purposes of this clause (D), "FATCA" shall include any amendments made to FATCA after the date of this Agreement.
Each Lender agrees that if any form or certification it previously delivered expires or becomes obsolete or inaccurate in any respect, it shall promptly update such form or certification or promptly notify the Company and the Administrative Agent in writing of its legal inability to do so.
(g) . If any party determines, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, that it has received a refund of any Taxes as to which it has been indemnified pursuant to this Section (including by the payment of additional amounts pursuant to this Section), it shall pay to the indemnifying party an amount equal to such refund (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made under this Section with respect to the Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses (including Taxes) of such indemnified party and without interest (other than any interest
Treatment of Certain Refunds
 
paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund). Such indemnifying party, upon the request of such indemnified party, shall repay to such indemnified party the amount paid over pursuant to this paragraph (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) in the event that such indemnified party is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in no event will the indemnified party be required to pay any amount to an indemnifying party pursuant to this paragraph the payment of which would place the indemnified party in a less favorable net after-Tax position than the indemnified party would have been in if the indemnification payments or additional amounts giving rise to such refund had never been paid. This paragraph shall not be construed to require any indemnified party to make available its Tax returns (or any other information relating to its Taxes that it deems confidential) to the indemnifying party or any other Person.
SECTION 2.16. (a) The Company shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder or under any other Loan Document on or prior to the time expressly required hereunder or under such other Loan Document for such payment (or, if no such time is expressly required, on or prior to 3:00 p.m., New York City time), on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without any defense, setoff, recoupment or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to such account as may be specified by the Administrative Agent; that payments pursuant to Sections 2.13, 2.14, 2.15 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto and payments pursuant to other Loan Documents shall be made to the Persons specified therein. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payment received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments under each Loan Document shall be made in dollars.
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs.
provided
(b) If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied towards payment of the amounts then due hereunder ratably among the parties entitled thereto, in accordance with the amounts then due to such parties.
(c) If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loans and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall notify the Administrative Agent of such fact and shall purchase (for cash at face value)
 
participations in the Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the amount of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amounts of principal of and accrued interest on their Loans; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Company pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement (for the avoidance of doubt, as in effect from time to time) or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans to any Person that is an Eligible Assignee (as such term is defined from time to time). The Company consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Company rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Company in the amount of such participation.
provided
(d) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Company prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders hereunder that the Company will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Company has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders the amount due. In such event, if the Company has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
(e) If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it hereunder to or for the account of the Administrative Agent, then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), (i) apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lender's obligations in respect of such payment until all such unsatisfied obligations have been discharged and/or (ii) hold any such amounts in a segregated account as cash collateral for, and apply any such amounts to, any future payment obligations of such Lender hereunder to or for the account of the Administrative Agent.
SECTION 2.17. (a) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.13, or if the Company is required to pay any Indemnified Taxes or additional amounts to any Lender or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.15, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign and delegate its rights and obligations hereunder to another
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders.
 
of its offices, branches or Affiliates if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment and delegation (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.13 or 2.15, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Company hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment and delegation.
(b) If (i) any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.13, (ii) the Company is required to pay any Indemnified Taxes or additional amounts to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.15 or (iii) any Lender has failed to consent to a proposed amendment, waiver, discharge or termination that under Section 9.02 requires the consent of all the Lenders (or all the affected Lenders or all the Lenders of the affected Class) and with respect to which the Required Lenders (or, in circumstances where Section 9.02 does not require the consent of the Required Lenders, a Majority in Interest of the Lenders of the affected Class) shall have granted their consent, then the Company may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent by the Company, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights (other than its existing rights to payments pursuant to Section 2.13 or 2.15) and obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents (or, in the case of any such assignment and delegation resulting from a failure to provide a consent, all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents as a Lender of a particular Class) to an Eligible Assignee that shall assume such obligations (which may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment and delegation); that (A) the Company shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (B) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder (including, if applicable, the prepayment fee pursuant to Section 2.09(d)) (if applicable, in each case only to the extent such amounts relate to its interest as a Lender of a particular Class) from the assignee (in the case of such principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Company (in the case of all other amounts), (C) in the case of any such assignment and delegation resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.13 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.15, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments, (D) such assignment and delegation does not conflict with applicable law and (E) in the case of any such assignment and delegation resulting from the failure to provide a consent, the assignee shall have given such consent and, as a result of such assignment and delegation and any contemporaneous assignments and delegations and consents, the applicable amendment, waiver, discharge or termination can be effected. A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver or consent by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Company to require such assignment and delegation have ceased to apply. Each party hereto agrees that an assignment and delegation required pursuant to this paragraph may be effected pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption executed by the Company, the Administrative Agent and the assignee and that the Lender required to make such assignment and delegation need not be a party thereto.
provided
 
SECTION 2.18. (a) The Company may on one or more occasions, by written notice to the Administrative Agent, request the establishment of Incremental Term Commitments, that the aggregate amount of all the Incremental Term Commitments established hereunder shall not exceed $100,000,000 during the term of this Agreement. Each such notice shall specify (i) the date on which the Company proposes that the Incremental Term Commitments shall be effective, which shall be a date not less than 10 Business Days (or such shorter period as may be agreed to by the Administrative Agent) after the date on which such notice is delivered to the Administrative Agent, and (ii) the amount of Incremental Term Commitments being requested (it being agreed that (x) any Lender approached to provide any Incremental Term Commitment may elect or decline, in its sole discretion, to provide such Incremental Term Commitment and (y) any Person that the Company proposes to become an Incremental Lender, if such Person is not then a Lender, must be an Eligible Assignee and must be reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent).
Incremental Term Facilities.
provided
(b) The terms and conditions of any Incremental Term Commitments and the Incremental Term Loans to be made thereunder shall be, except as otherwise set forth herein or in the applicable Incremental Facility Agreement, identical to those of the Tranche B Term Commitments and the Tranche B Term Loans; that (i) if the Weighted Average Yield applicable to any Incremental Term Loans exceeds by more than 0.25% per annum the applicable Weighted Average Yield payable pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, as amended through the date of such calculation, with respect to Tranche B Term Loans, then the Applicable Rate then in effect for Tranche B Term Loans shall automatically be increased to eliminate such excess, (ii) no Incremental Term Maturity Date shall be earlier than the Tranche B Term Maturity Date, (iii) the weighted average life to maturity of any Incremental Term Loans shall be no shorter than the remaining weighted average life to maturity of the Tranche B Term Loans and (iv) the Incremental Term Loans may participate on a pro rata basis (or on a basis that is less than pro rata) in any mandatory prepayments of the Tranche B Term Loans, but may not provide for mandatory prepayment requirements that are more favorable than those applicable to the Tranche B Term Loans. Any Incremental Term Commitments established pursuant to an Incremental Facility Agreement that have identical terms and conditions, and any Incremental Term Loans made thereunder, shall be designated as a separate series (each a "") of Incremental Term Commitments and Incremental Term Loans for all purposes of this Agreement.
provided
Series
(c) The Incremental Term Commitments shall be effected pursuant to one or more Incremental Facility Agreements executed and delivered by the Company, each Incremental Lender providing such Incremental Term Commitments and the Administrative Agent; that no Incremental Term Commitments shall become effective unless (i) on the date of effectiveness thereof, both immediately prior to and immediately after giving effect to such Incremental Term Commitments (and assuming that the full amount of such Incremental Term Commitments shall have been funded as
provided
 
Loans on such date), no Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (ii) on the date of effectiveness thereof, and after giving effect to the making of Loans to be made on such date, the representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct (A) in the case of the representations and warranties qualified as to materiality, in all respects and (B) otherwise, in all material respects, in each case on and as of such date, except in the case of any such representation and warranty that expressly relates to a prior date, in which case such representation and warranty shall be so true and correct on and as of such prior date, (iii) after giving effect to such Incremental Term Commitments (and assuming that the full amount of such Incremental Term Commitments shall have been funded as Loans on such date), and any related transaction, the Company shall be in Pro Forma Compliance (calculated as of the last day of the fiscal quarter of the Company then most recently ended for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b) (or prior to the first such delivery, as of April 28, 2012 ), that, for purposes of the foregoing, the Senior Secured Indebtedness shall be determined on a Pro Forma Basis as of the date of the effectiveness thereof) and (iv) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent such legal opinions, board resolutions, secretary's certificates, officer's certificates, reaffirmation agreement and other documents as shall reasonably be requested by the Administrative Agent in connection with any such transaction. Each Incremental Facility Agreement may, without the consent of any Lender, effect such amendments to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents as may be necessary or appropriate, in the opinion of the Administrative Agent, to give effect to the provisions of this Section.
provided
(d) Upon the effectiveness of an Incremental Term Commitment of any Incremental Lender, such Incremental Lender shall be deemed to be a "Lender" (and a Lender in respect of Commitments and Loans of the applicable Class) hereunder, and henceforth shall be entitled to all the rights of, and benefits accruing to, Lenders (or Lenders in respect of Commitments and Loans of the applicable Class) hereunder and shall be bound by all agreements, acknowledgements and other obligations of Lenders (or Lenders in respect of Commitments and Loans of the applicable Class) hereunder and under the other Loan Documents.
(e) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the applicable Incremental Facility Agreement, each Lender holding an Incremental Term Commitment of any Series shall make a loan to the Company in an amount equal to such Incremental Term Commitment on the date specified in such Incremental Facility Agreement.
(f) The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders promptly upon receipt by the Administrative Agent of any notice from the Company referred to in Section 2.18(a) and of the effectiveness of any Incremental Term Commitments, in each case advising the Lenders of the details thereof.
SECTION 2.19. (a) The Company may on one or more occasions, by written notice to the Administrative Agent, make one or more offers (each, an "") to all the Lenders of one or more Classes (each Class
Extension Offers.
Extension Offer
 
subject to such an Extension Offer, an "") to make one or more Extension Permitted Amendments pursuant to procedures reasonably specified by the Administrative Agent and reasonably acceptable to the Company. Such notice shall set forth (i) the terms and conditions of the requested Extension Permitted Amendment and (ii) the date on which such Extension Permitted Amendment is requested to become effective (which shall not be less than 10 Business Days nor more than 30 Business Days after the date of such notice, unless otherwise agreed to by the Administrative Agent). Extension Permitted Amendments shall become effective only with respect to the Loans of the Lenders of the Extension Request Class that accept the applicable Extension Offer (such Lenders, the "") and, in the case of any Extending Lender, only with respect to such Lender's Loans of such Extension Request Class as to which such Lender's acceptance has been made.
Extension Request Class
Extending Lenders
(b) An Extension Permitted Amendment shall be effected pursuant to an Extension Agreement executed and delivered by the Company, each applicable Extending Lender and the Administrative Agent; that no Extension Permitted Amendment shall become effective unless (i) no Default shall have occurred and be continuing on the date of effectiveness thereof, (ii) on the date of effectiveness thereof, the representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct (A) in the case of the representations and warranties qualified as to materiality, in all respects and (B) otherwise, in all material respects, in each case on and as of such date, except in the case of any such representation and warranty that specifically relates to an earlier date, in which case such representation and warranty shall be so true and correct on and as of such earlier date, and (iii) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent such legal opinions, board resolutions, secretary's certificates, officer's certificates, reaffirmation agreements and other documents as shall reasonably be requested by the Administrative Agent in connection therewith. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender as to the effectiveness of each Extension Agreement. Each Extension Agreement may, without the consent of any Lender other than the applicable Extending Lenders, effect such amendments to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents as may be necessary or appropriate, in the opinion of the Administrative Agent, to give effect to the provisions of this Section, including any amendments necessary to treat the applicable Loans of the Extending Lenders as a new "Class" of loans hereunder.
provided
SECTION 2.20. (a) The Company may, on one or more occasions, by written notice to the Administrative Agent, request the establishment hereunder of one or more additional Classes of term loan commitments (the "") pursuant to which each Person providing such a commitment (a "") will make term loans to the Company (the ""); that each Refinancing Term Loan Lender shall be an Eligible Assignee and, if not already a Lender, shall otherwise be reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
Refinancing Term Facilities.
Refinancing Term Commitments
Refinancing Term Lender
Refinancing Term Loans
provided
(b) The Refinancing Term Commitments shall be effected pursuant to one or more Refinancing Facility Agreements executed and delivered by the Company, each
 
Refinancing Term Lender providing such Refinancing Term Loan Commitment and the Administrative Agent; that no Refinancing Term Commitments shall become effective unless (i) no Default shall have occurred and be continuing on the date of effectiveness thereof, (ii) on the date of effectiveness thereof, the representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct (A) in the case of the representations and warranties qualified as to materiality, in all respects and (B) otherwise, in all material respects, in each case on and as of such date, except in the case of any such representation and warranty that specifically relates to an earlier date, in which case such representation and warranty shall be so true and correct on and as of such earlier date, (iii) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent such legal opinions, board resolutions, secretary's certificates, officer's certificates, reaffirmation agreements and other documents as shall reasonably be requested by the Administrative Agent in connection with any such transaction and (iv) substantially concurrently with the effectiveness of such Refinancing Term Commitment, the Company shall obtain Refinancing Term Loans thereunder and shall repay or prepay then outstanding Borrowings of any Class in an aggregate principal amount equal to the aggregate amount of such Refinancing Term Commitments (less the aggregate amount of accrued and unpaid interest with respect to such outstanding Borrowings and any reasonable fees, premium and expenses relating to such refinancing) (and any such prepayment of Borrowings of any Class shall be applied to reduce the subsequent scheduled repayments of Borrowings of such Class to be made pursuant to Section 2.09(a) ratably based on the amount of such scheduled repayments) and, in the case of a prepayment of Eurodollar Borrowings, shall be subject to Section 2.14.
provided
(c) The Refinancing Facility Agreement shall set forth, with respect to the Refinancing Term Commitments established thereby and the Refinancing Term Loans and other extensions of credit to be made thereunder, to the extent applicable, the following terms thereof: (i) the designation of such Refinancing Term Commitments and Refinancing Term Loans as a new "Class" for all purposes hereof, (ii) the stated termination and maturity dates applicable to the Refinancing Term Commitments or Refinancing Term Loans of such Class, that (A) such stated termination and maturity dates shall not be earlier than the Maturity Date applicable to the Loans of any Class repaid or prepaid with the proceeds thereof, (iii) any amortization applicable to the Refinancing Term Loans of such Class and the effect thereon of any prepayment of such Refinancing Term Loans, that the weighted average life to maturity of any Refinancing Term Loans shall be no shorter than the remaining weighted average life to maturity of the Loans of any Class repaid or prepaid with the proceeds thereof, (iv) the interest rate or rates applicable to the Refinancing Term Loans of such Class, (v) the fees applicable to the Refinancing Term Loan Commitment or Refinancing Term Loans of such Class, (vi) any original issue discount applicable to the Refinancing Term Loans of such Class, (vii) the initial Interest Period or Interest Periods applicable to the Refinancing Term Loans of such Class, (viii) any voluntary or mandatory commitment reduction or prepayment requirements applicable to the Refinancing Term Commitments or Refinancing Term Loans of such Class (which prepayment requirements may provide that such Refinancing Term Loans may participate in any mandatory prepayment on a pro rata basis (or on a basis that is less than pro rata) with the Tranche B Term Loans, but
provided
provided
 
may not provide for mandatory prepayment requirements that are more favorable to the Lenders holding such Refinancing Term Loans than to the Lenders holding Tranche B Term Loans) and any restrictions on the voluntary or mandatory reductions or prepayments of the Refinancing Term Commitments or Refinancing Term Loans of such Class (including any prepayment premium) and (ix) any financial covenant with which the Company shall be required to comply ( that any such financial covenant for the benefit of any Class of Refinancing Term Lenders shall also be for the benefit of all other Lenders). Except as contemplated by the preceding sentence, the terms of the Refinancing Term Commitments and Refinancing Term Loans shall be substantially the same as the terms of the Tranche B Term Commitments and the Tranche B Term Loans. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify each Lender as to the effectiveness of each Refinancing Facility Agreement. Each Refinancing Facility Agreement may, without the consent of any Lender other than the applicable Refinancing Term Lenders, effect such amendments to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents as may be necessary or appropriate, in the opinion of the Administrative Agent, to give effect to the provisions of this Section, including any amendments necessary to treat the applicable Refinancing Term Commitments and Refinancing Term Loans as a new "Class" of loans and/or commitments hereunder.
provided
The Company represents and warrants to the Lenders as follows:
SECTION 3.01. The Company and each Subsidiary is duly organized, validly existing and (to the extent the concept is applicable in such jurisdiction and, in the case of any Subsidiary, except where the failure to be so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect) in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Organization; Powers.
SECTION 3.02. (a) The Transactions, insofar as they are to be carried out by each Loan Party, are within such Loan Party's corporate or other organizational powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or other organizational and, if required, shareholder or other equityholder action. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which any Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company or such Loan Party, as the case may be, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Authorization; Enforceability; Benefit to Loan Parties.
 
(b) Each Loan Party expects to derive benefit (and its board of directors or other governing body has determined that it may reasonably be expected to derive benefit), directly and indirectly, from (i) successful operations of each of the other Loan Parties and (ii) the credit extended by the Lenders to the Company hereunder. Each Loan Party has determined that execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement and any other Loan Documents to be executed by such Loan Party is within its purpose, will be of direct and indirect benefit to such Loan Party, and is in its best interest.
SECTION 3.03. The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except such as have been (or, in the case of filings relating to the consummation of the Merger, substantially contemporaneously with the funding of Loans on the Effective Date will be) obtained or made and are (or will so be) in full force and effect and except for filings necessary to perfect Liens created under the Loan Documents, (b) will not violate any applicable law, including any order of any Governmental Authority, or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company or any Subsidiary, except, in the case of any applicable law, a violation which would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any indenture, material agreement (including the ABL Credit Agreement or other material instrument binding upon the Company or any Subsidiary or any of their assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Company or any Subsidiary, and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Company or any Subsidiary, except Liens created pursuant to the Loan Documents or Liens created in connection with the ABL Credit Agreement.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts.
SECTION 3.04. (a) The Company has heretofore furnished to the Lenders (i)(A) the consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the fiscal years ended July 30, 2011 and July 31, 2010, each audited by and accompanied by the unqualified opinion of Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent registered public accounting firm, and (B) the unaudited consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for each of the fiscal quarters and the portions of the fiscal year ended October 29, 2011, January 28, 2012 and April 28, 2012 and (ii)(A) the consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations and comprehensive income, stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Acquired Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of and for the fiscal years ended January 28, 2012 and January 29, 2011, each audited by and accompanied by the unqualified opinion of Ernst & Young LLP, independent registered public accounting firm, and (B) the unaudited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations and cash flows of the Acquired Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of and for the fiscal quarter ended April 28, 2012. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries or the Acquired Company and its consolidated subsidiaries, as the case may be, as of such dates
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change.
 
and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clauses (i)(B) and (ii)(B) above.
(b) The Company has heretofore furnished to the Lenders a pro forma consolidated balance sheet and related pro forma consolidated statement of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the period of 12 consecutive months ended January 28, 2012, prepared giving effect to the Transactions as if the Transactions had occurred on such date, in the case of such balance sheet, or at the beginning of such period, in the case of such statements of operations. Such pro forma consolidated balance sheet and pro forma statements of operations (i) have been prepared by the Company in good faith based on the same assumptions used to prepare the pro forma financial statements included in the Confidential Information Memorandum (which assumptions are believed on the date hereof by the Company to be reasonable), (ii) are based on the best information available to the Company, (iii) accurately reflect all adjustments necessary to give effect to the Transactions and (iv) present fairly, in all material respects, the pro forma financial position and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the period of 12 consecutive months ended on January 28, 2012, as if the Transactions had occurred on such date or at the beginning of such period, as the case may be.
(c) Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto or in the Confidential Information Memorandum and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has, as of the Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities, material unusual long-term commitments or material unrealized losses.
(d) Since July 30, 2011, there has been no event, development or circumstance that has had, or could reasonably be expected to have, a material adverse effect on the business, assets, results of operations or financial condition of the Company, the Acquired Company and their respective subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
SECTION 3.05. (a) The Company and each Subsidiary has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its property material to its business (including its Mortgaged Properties), except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes and Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02.
Properties.
(b) The Company and each Subsidiary owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, tradenames, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by the Company and the Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) Schedule 3.05 sets forth the address of each real property that is owned in fee by the Loan Parties as of the Effective Date and, with respect to any such real property that constitutes a Mortgaged Property, the proper jurisdiction for the filing
 
of a Mortgage in respect thereof. As of the Effective Date, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary (i) has received notice, or has knowledge, of any pending or contemplated condemnation proceeding affecting any Mortgaged Property or any sale or disposition thereof in lieu of condemnation or (ii) is or could be obligated under any right of first refusal, option or other contractual right to sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of any Mortgaged Property or any interest therein.
SECTION 3.06. (a) There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
Litigation and Environmental Matters.
(b) Except for the Disclosed Matters or matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received written notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
(c) Since the date of this Agreement, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 3.07. (a) The Company and each Subsidiary is in compliance with all laws, including all orders of Governmental Authorities, applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect (it being agreed that this Section does not apply to any law which is specifically addressed in Section 3.06(b), 3.07(b), 3.08, 3.09, 3.10 or 3.14). No Default has occurred and is continuing.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements.
(b) To the extent applicable, the Company and the Subsidiaries are in compliance, in all material respects, with (i) the Trading with the Enemy Act and each of the foreign assets control regulations of the United States Treasury Department (31 CFR, Subtitle B, Chapter V) and any other enabling legislation or executive order relating thereto, and (ii) the USA Patriot Act. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee or Affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary, is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by OFAC that could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. No part of the proceeds of the Loans will be used, directly or indirectly, or otherwise made available (A) for any payments to any officer or employee of a Governmental Authority, or any Person controlled by a Governmental Authority, or
 
any political party, official of a political party, candidate for political office, or anyone else acting in an official capacity, in order to obtain, retain or direct business or obtain any improper advantage, in violation of the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977 or (B) to any Person for the purpose of financing the activities of any Person currently subject to any United States sanctions administered by OFAC.
SECTION 3.08. No Loan Party is an "investment company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Investment Company Status.
SECTION 3.09. The Company and each Subsidiary has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) any Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Company or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books reserves with respect thereto to the extent required by GAAP or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes.
SECTION 3.10. (a) No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan that is subject to Title IV of ERISA (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Accounting Standards Codification Topic 715) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $2,000,000 the fair value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans that are subject to Title IV of ERISA (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Accounting Standards Codification Topic 715) did not, as of the date or dates of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed the fair value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans by any material amount.
ERISA; Labor Matters.
(b) As of the Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts, slowdowns or any other material labor disputes against the Company or any Subsidiary pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened. The hours worked by and payments made to employees of the Company and the Subsidiaries have not been in violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act or any other applicable Federal, state, local or foreign law dealing with such matters, except for any such violation that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. All payments due from the Company or any Subsidiary, or for which any claim may be made against the Company or any Subsidiary, on account of wages and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a liability on the books of the Company or such Subsidiary to the extent required by GAAP. The consummation of the Transactions will not give rise to any right of termination or right of renegotiation on the part of any union under any collective bargaining agreement to which the Company or any Subsidiary is bound.
 
SECTION 3.11. The Company has disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which the Company or any Subsidiary is subject, and all other matters known to the Company, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Confidential Information Memorandum nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary to the Administrative Agent, any Arranger or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to forecasts and projected financial information, the Company represents only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed by it to be reasonable at the time made and at the time so furnished and, if furnished prior to the Effective Date, as of the Effective Date (it being understood that such forecasts and projections may vary from actual results and that such variances may be material).
Disclosure.
provided
SECTION 3.12. Schedule 3.12 sets forth, as of the Effective Date, the name, type of organization and jurisdiction of organization of, and the percentage of each class of Equity Interests owned by the Company or any Subsidiary in, (a) each Subsidiary and (b) each joint venture in which the Company or any Subsidiary owns any Equity Interests, and identifies each Designated Subsidiary and each Inactive Subsidiary as such. None of the Subsidiaries set forth on Schedule 1.01A conducts any business operations or owns any assets material to the Company and the Subsidiaries. All the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in each Subsidiary owned by any Loan Party have been (to the extent such concepts are relevant with respect to such Equity Interests) duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable. Except as set forth on Schedule 3.12, as of the Effective Date, there is no existing option, warrant, call, right, commitment or other agreement to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party requiring, and there are no Equity Interests in any Subsidiary outstanding that upon exercise, conversion or exchange would require, the issuance by any Subsidiary of any additional Equity Interests or other securities exercisable for, convertible into, exchangeable for or evidencing the right to subscribe for or purchase any Equity Interests in any Subsidiary.
Subsidiaries and Joint Ventures.
SECTION 3.13. Schedule 3.13 sets forth a description of all insurance maintained by or on behalf of the Company and the Subsidiaries as of the Effective Date. As of the Effective Date, all premiums due and payable in respect of such insurance have been paid. The Company believes that the insurance maintained by or on behalf of the Company and the Subsidiaries is adequate.
Insurance.
SECTION 3.14. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is principally, or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying margin stock (within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors), or extending credit for the purpose
Federal Reserve Regulations.
 
of purchasing or carrying margin stock. No part of the proceeds of the Loans will be used, whether directly or indirectly, and whether immediately, incidentally or ultimately, in any manner or for any purpose that would entail a violation of Regulations T, U or X of the Board of Governors.
SECTION 3.15. Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Effective Date, (a) the fair value of the assets of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries, at a fair valuation, will exceed their debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries (determined on the basis of such property being liquidated with reasonable promptness in an arm's-length transaction) will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of their debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (c) the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries will be able to pay their debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise (it being understood and agreed that for purposes of this Section, contingent liabilities mean the maximum amount of liability that could reasonably be likely to result from pending litigation, asserted claims and assessments, guaranties, indemnification obligations, adjustment of purchase price or other post-closing payment adjustments (including earn-outs and other similar arrangements) and uninsured risks of the Company and its Subsidiaries), as such debts and liabilities become absolute and matured; and (d) the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the businesses in which they are engaged as such businesses are now conducted and are proposed to be conducted following the Effective Date.
Solvency.
SECTION 3.16. (a) The Collateral Agreement, upon execution and delivery thereof by the parties thereto, will create in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a valid and enforceable security interest in the Collateral (as defined therein) and (i) when the Collateral (as defined therein) constituting certificated securities (as defined in the UCC) is delivered to the Administrative Agent, together with instruments of transfer duly endorsed in blank, the security interest created under the Collateral Agreement will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the pledgors thereunder in such Collateral, prior and superior in right to any other Person, and (ii) when financing statements in appropriate form are filed in the applicable filing offices, the security interest created under the Collateral Agreement will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in the remaining Collateral (as defined therein) to the extent perfection can be obtained by filing UCC financing statements, prior and superior to the rights of any other Person, except for rights secured by Liens permitted under Section 6.02.
Collateral Matters.
(b) Each Mortgage, upon execution and delivery thereof by the parties thereto, will create in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a legal, valid and enforceable security interest in all the applicable mortgagor's right, title and interest in and to the Mortgaged Properties subject thereto and the
 
proceeds thereof, and when the Mortgages have been filed in the jurisdictions specified therein, the Mortgages will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the mortgagors in the Mortgaged Properties and the proceeds thereof, prior and superior in right to any other Person, but subject to Liens permitted under Section 6.02.
(c) Upon the recordation of the IP Security Agreements with the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, and the filing of the financing statements referred to in paragraph (a) of this Section, the security interest created under the Collateral Agreement will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in the Intellectual Property (as defined in the Collateral Agreement) in which a security interest may be perfected by filing in the United States of America, in each case prior and superior in right to any other Person, but subject to Liens permitted under Section 6.02 (it being understood that subsequent recordings in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office may be necessary to perfect a security interest in such Intellectual Property acquired by the Loan Parties after the Effective Date).
The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans hereunder shall not become effective until the date on which each of the following conditions shall be satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02):
(a) The Administrative Agent shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include a facsimile transmission) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement.
(b) The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of (i) Proskauer Rose LLP, New York counsel for the Loan Parties, (ii) Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, counsel for the Acquired Company and California and Pennsylvania counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, (iii) Day Pitney LLP, Connecticut counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, (iv) Baker Donelson, Bearman, Caldwell & Berkowitz, PC, Tennessee counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, (v) Harrison & Moberly, LLP, Indiana counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, (vi) Wilcox & Savage PC, Virginia counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, (vii) Thompson Hine LLP, Ohio counsel to certain of the Loan Parties and (viii) Greenberg Traurig LLP, Nevada counsel to certain of the Loan Parties, in each case in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
 
(c) The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of each Loan Party, the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
(d) The representations and warranties of the Loan Parties set forth in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct (i) in the case of the representations and warranties qualified as to materiality, in all respects and (ii) otherwise, in all material respects, in each case on and as of the Effective Date, except in the case of any such representation and warranty that expressly relates to a prior date, in which case such representation and warranty shall be so true and correct on and as of such prior date.
(e) No Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
(f) The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, dated the Effective Date and signed by the chief financial officer of the Company, confirming compliance with the conditions set forth in the first sentence of paragraphs (h) of this Section, in paragraphs (d) and (e) and in the first sentence of paragraph (j) of this Section.
(g) The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, dated the Effective Date and signed by the chief financial officer of the Company, as to the solvency of the Loan Parties on a consolidated basis after giving effect to the Transactions, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
(h) The Collateral and Guarantee Requirement shall have been satisfied (subject to the penultimate paragraph of this Section). The Administrative Agent shall have received a completed Perfection Certificate, dated the Effective Date and signed by an executive officer or a Financial Officer of each of the Company and the Acquired Company, together with all attachments contemplated thereby, including the results of a search of the UCC (or equivalent) filings made with respect to the Loan Parties in the jurisdictions contemplated by the Perfection Certificate and copies of the financing statements (or similar documents) disclosed by such search and evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent that the Liens indicated by such financing statements (or similar documents) are permitted under Section 6.02 or have been, or substantially contemporaneously with the initial funding of Loans on the Effective Date will be, released.
(i) The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence that the insurance required by Section 5.08 is in effect, together with endorsements naming the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, as additional insured and loss payee thereunder to the extent required under Section 5.08.
 
(j) The Acquisition shall have been consummated, or substantially concurrently with the Effective Date shall be consummated, pursuant to and on the terms set forth in the Acquisition Agreement (and the Acquired Company shall have become, or substantially concurrently with the Effective Date shall become, a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Company), and all conditions precedent to the consummation of the Offer (as defined in the Acquisition Agreement as in effect on the original date thereof) and the Merger (as defined in the Acquisition Agreement as in effect on the original date thereof) shall have been satisfied, in each case without giving effect to any amendments, waivers or consents that are adverse in any material respect to the Loan Parties that have not been approved by the Arrangers. The Administrative Agent shall have received a copy of the Acquisition Agreement, certified by a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Company as being complete and correct and as enclosing all closing certificates, opinions and other closing documents delivered in satisfaction of the closing conditions set forth in the Acquisition Agreement.
(k) All principal, premium, if any, interest, fees and other amounts due or outstanding under the Existing Acquired Company Credit Agreement shall have been paid in full, or substantially concurrently with the Effective Date shall be paid in full, the commitments and letters of credit outstanding thereunder shall have been terminated, or substantially concurrently with the Effective Date shall be terminated or backstopped by letters of credit issued under the ABL Credit Agreement, and all guarantees and liens existing in connection therewith shall have been discharged and released, or substantially concurrently with the Effective Date shall be released, and the Administrative Agent shall have received reasonably satisfactory evidence thereof.
(l) The Lenders shall have received projections for the Company and the Subsidiaries through end of the sixth fiscal year of the Company after the Effective Date.
(m) The Lenders shall have received the financial statements, opinions and certificates referred to in Section 3.04.
(n) The Administrative Agent and the Arrangers shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, payment or reimbursement of all fees and expenses (including fees, charges and disbursements of counsel) required to be paid or reimbursed by any Loan Party under the Commitment Letter, the Administrative Agent Fee Letter or any Loan Document.
(o) The Lenders shall have received all documentation and other information required by bank regulatory authorities under applicable "know your customer" and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the USA Patriot Act, at least five days prior to the Effective Date.
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in clauses (d) or (e) above, the only representations and warranties relating to the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries the making of which shall be a condition to the obligations of the Lenders to make Loans hereunder shall be the Acquired Company Acquisition Agreement Representations and the Specified Representations. Notwithstanding the foregoing, solely with respect to the matters expressly identified in the Post-Closing Letter Agreement, the satisfaction of the foregoing conditions shall not be required on the Effective Date, and shall not be a condition to the obligations of the Lenders to make Loans hereunder, but shall be required to be accomplished in accordance with the Post-Closing Letter Agreement.
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Company and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations of the Lenders to make Loans shall not become effective unless each of the foregoing conditions shall have been satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02) at or prior to 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on June 14, 2012 (and, in the event such conditions shall not have been so satisfied or waived, the Commitments shall terminate at such time).
Until the Commitments shall have expired or been terminated, the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full, the Company covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
SECTION 5.01. The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent, on behalf of each Lender:
Financial Statements and Other Information.
(a) within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, its audited consolidated balance sheet and related consolidated statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all audited by and accompanied by the opinion of Deloitte & Touche LLP or another independent registered public accounting firm of recognized national standing (without a "going concern" or like qualification, exception or emphasis and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP;
(b) within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Company, its consolidated balance sheet as of the end of
 
such fiscal quarter, the related consolidated statements of operations for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year and the related consolidated statement of cash flows for the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by a Financial Officer of the Company as presenting fairly, in all material respects, the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and such portion of the fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
(c) concurrently with each delivery of financial statements under clause (a) or (b) above, a completed Compliance Certificate signed by a Financial Officer of the Company, (i) certifying, in the case of the financial statements delivered under clause (b) above, that such financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes, (ii) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (iii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Section 6.12 and calculating the Total Leverage Ratio as of the end of the applicable fiscal year or fiscal quarter, (iv) if any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of the consolidated balance sheet of the Company most recently theretofore delivered under clause (a) or (b) above (or, prior to the first such delivery, referred to in Section 3.04) that has had, or could have, a significant effect on the calculations of the Senior Secured Leverage Ratio or the Total Leverage Ratio, specifying the nature of such change and the effect thereof on such calculations and (v) certifying that all notices required to be provided under Sections 5.03 and 5.04 have been provided;
(d) concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, a certificate of the accounting firm that audited such financial statements stating whether it obtained knowledge during the course of its examination of such financial statements of any Default and, in the case it shall have obtained knowledge of any Default, specifying the details thereof (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines); that such certificate shall not be required to be delivered if the Company has used commercially reasonable efforts to cause such certificate to be delivered by such accounting firm and such accounting firm has informed the Company that it is not willing to provide such certificate;
provided
(e) within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, a completed Supplemental Perfection Certificate, signed by a Financial Officer of the Company, setting forth the information required pursuant to the Supplemental Perfection Certificate;
 
(f) as soon as available, but within 15 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, a copy of the plan and forecast (including a projected consolidated and consolidating balance sheet, statement of operations and statement of cash flow) of the Company for each month of the upcoming fiscal year;
(g) promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by the Company to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
(h) promptly after any request therefor by the Administrative Agent, copies of (i) any documents described in Section 101(k)(1) of ERISA that the Loan Parties or any ERISA Affiliate may request with respect to any Multiemployer Plan (following the receipt thereof from the administrator or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan) and (ii) any notices described in Section 101(l)(1) of ERISA that the Loan Parties or any ERISA Affiliate may request with respect to any Multiemployer Plan (following the receipt thereof from the administrator or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan); that if an ERISA Event has occurred or, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, is reasonably likely to occur, and the Loan Parties or any ERISA Affiliate have not requested such documents or notices from the administrator or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan, upon request by the Administrative Agent, the applicable Loan Party or ERISA Affiliate shall promptly make a request for such documents and notices from such administrator or sponsor and shall provide copies of such documents and notices to the Administrative Agent promptly after receipt thereof; and
provided
(i) promptly after any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Company or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of any Loan Document, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request.
Information required to be delivered pursuant to clause (a), (b) or (g) of this Section shall be deemed to have been delivered if such information, or one or more annual or quarterly reports containing such information, shall have been posted by the Administrative Agent on an IntraLinks or similar site to which the Lenders have been granted access or shall be available on the website of the SEC at http://www.sec.gov. Information required to be delivered pursuant to this Section may also be delivered by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent.
SECTION 5.02. The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent (for distribution to the Lenders) written notice promptly
Notices of Material Events.
 
upon any Financial Officer, or other officer or employee responsible for compliance with the Loan Documents, of the Company or any Subsidiary becoming aware of any of the following:
(a) the occurrence of any Default;
(b) the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary, or any adverse development in any such pending action, suit or proceeding not previously disclosed in writing by the Company to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, that in each case could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect or that in any manner questions the validity of any Loan Document; or
(c) any other development that has resulted, or could reasonably be expected to result, in a Material Adverse Effect.
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Company setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
SECTION 5.03. If any additional Domestic Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Effective Date, the Company will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will, as promptly as practicable, and in any event within 30 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in writing) after such Domestic Subsidiary is formed or acquired cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied with respect to such Domestic Subsidiary and with respect to any Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of such Domestic Subsidiary owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party. If any additional Eligible Foreign Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Effective Date, the Company will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will, as promptly as practicable, and in any event within 60 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in writing) after such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary is formed or acquired, cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied with respect to any Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party.
Additional Subsidiaries.
SECTION 5.04. (a) The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent prompt written notice of any change in (i) the legal name of any Loan Party, as set forth in its organizational documents, (ii) the jurisdiction of organization or the form of organization of any Loan Party (including as a result of any merger or consolidation), (iii) the location of the chief executive office of any Loan Party or (iv) the organizational identification number, if any, or, with respect to any Loan Party organized under the laws of a jurisdiction that requires such information to be set forth on the face of a UCC financing statement, the Federal Taxpayer Identification Number of such Loan Party. The Company agrees not to effect or permit
Information Regarding Collateral.
 
any change referred to in the preceding sentence unless all filings have been made under the UCC or otherwise that are required in order for the Administrative Agent to continue at all times following such change to have a valid, legal and perfected security interest in all the Collateral affected thereby. The Company also agrees promptly to notify the Administrative Agent if any material portion of the Collateral is damaged or destroyed.
(b) If (i) any Mortgaged Property is acquired by any Loan Party after the Effective Date or (ii) any material assets are acquired by any Loan Party after the Effective Date (other than assets constituting Collateral under the Collateral Documents that become subject to the Lien of the Collateral Documents upon the acquisition thereof), the Company will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will cause such assets to be subjected to a Lien securing the Secured Obligations and will take such actions as shall be necessary or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to grant and perfect such Lien, all at the expense of the Company. It is understood and agreed that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this Agreement or in any Collateral Document, the Loan Parties shall not be required to (A) grant leasehold mortgages, (B) obtain landlord lien waivers or collateral access agreements with respect to any of their retail operating store locations or (C) enter into Control Agreements in respect of any Excluded Deposit Account
SECTION 5.05. The Company will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, do or cause to be done all things reasonably necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation, dissolution, disposition or other transaction permitted under Section 6.03 or 6.05.
Existence; Conduct of Business.
provided
SECTION 5.06. The Company will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, pay or discharge all its material obligations, including Tax liabilities, before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) (i) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (ii) the Company or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books reserves with respect thereto to the extent required by GAAP and (iii) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and the enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation or (b) the failure to make payment could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Obligations.
SECTION 5.07. The Company will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
Maintenance of Properties.
SECTION 5.08. The Company will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies, insurance in such amounts (with no greater risk retention) and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies of established repute engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations. Each such policy of
Insurance.
 
liability or casualty insurance maintained by or on behalf of Loan Parties shall (a) in the case of each liability insurance policy (other than workers' compensation, director and officer liability or other policies in which such endorsements are not customary), name the Administrative Agent, on behalf of the Secured Parties, as an additional insured thereunder, (b) in the case of each casualty insurance policy, contain a loss payable clause or endorsement that names the Administrative Agent, on behalf of the Secured Parties, as a loss payee thereunder and (c) provide for at least 30 days' (or such shorter number of days as may be agreed to by the Administrative Agent) prior written notice to the Administrative Agent of any cancellation of such policy. With respect to each Mortgaged Property that is located in an area determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency to have special flood hazards, the applicable Loan Party has obtained, and will maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies, such flood insurance as is required under applicable law, including Regulation H of the Board of Governors.
SECTION 5.09. The Company will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, (a) keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct (in all material respects) entries in accordance with GAAP and applicable law are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities and (b) permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender (including employees of the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any consultants, accountants, lawyers and appraisers retained by the Administrative Agent), upon reasonable prior notice (but in no event more than once each fiscal year of the Company unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing), to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and, accompanied by one or more such officers or their designees if requested by the Company, independent accountants, all at such reasonable times during normal business hours and as often as reasonably requested.
Books and Records; Inspection and Rights.
SECTION 5.10. The Company will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, comply with all laws, including all orders of any Governmental Authority, applicable to it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws.
SECTION 5.11. The proceeds of the Tranche B Term Loans made on the Effective Date will be used solely to finance the Acquisition, fund the repayment in full of the Existing Acquired Company Credit Agreement, any redemption of the Acquired Company Convertible Notes required to be made by the Acquired Company as a result of the Acquisition and the payment of all fees and expenses in connection with the foregoing. The proceeds of the Incremental Term Loans will be used solely for the purpose or purposes set forth in the applicable Incremental Facility Agreement.
Use of Proceeds.
SECTION 5.12. The Company will, and will cause each other Loan Party to, execute any and all further documents, financing statements,
Further Assurances.
 
agreements and instruments, and take all such further actions (including the filing and recording of financing statements, fixture filings, mortgages, deeds of trust and other documents), that may be required under any applicable law, or that the Administrative Agent may reasonably request, to cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be and remain satisfied at all times. The Company will provide to the Administrative Agent, from time to time upon request, evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent as to the perfection and priority of the Liens created or intended to be created by the Collateral Documents.
SECTION 5.13. The Company will use commercially reasonable efforts to maintain continuously in effect a corporate rating from S&P and a corporate family rating from Moody's, in each case in respect of the Company, and a rating of the credit facilities created hereunder by each of S&P and Moody's.
Maintenance of Ratings.
SECTION 5.14. The Company will, and will cause the other Loan Parties to, deliver, when and as required by the terms of the Post-Closing Letter Agreement, the items referenced therein.
Certain Post-Closing Collateral Obligations.
Until the Commitments shall have expired or been terminated, the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full, the Company covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
SECTION 6.01. (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
Indebtedness; Certain Equity Securities.
(i) Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
(ii) Indebtedness existing on the date hereof and set forth on Schedule 6.01 and Refinancing Indebtedness in respect thereof;
(iii) Indebtedness of the Company to any Subsidiary and of any Subsidiary to the Company or any other Subsidiary; that (A) such Indebtedness shall not have been transferred to any Person other than the Company or any Subsidiary, (B) any such Indebtedness owing by any Loan Party shall be unsecured and subordinated in right of payment to the Loan Document Obligations on terms customary for intercompany subordinated Indebtedness, as reasonably determined by the Administrative Agent, (C) any such Indebtedness owing to any Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note (which may be a global promissory note) that shall have been pledged pursuant to the Collateral Agreement and (D) any such Indebtedness owing by any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to any Loan Party shall be incurred in compliance with Section 6.04;
provided
 
(iv) Guarantees incurred in compliance with Section 6.04;
(v) Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary (A) incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations, that such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 180 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and the principal amount of such Indebtedness does not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets or (B) assumed in connection with the acquisition of any fixed or capital assets, and Refinancing Indebtedness in respect of any of the foregoing; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (v) shall not exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
provided
(vi) Indebtedness in respect of netting services, overdraft protections (in an aggregate amount not to exceed $1,000,000 at any time outstanding) and otherwise in connection with deposit and checking accounts;
(vii) Indebtedness in respect of letters of credit, bank guarantees and similar instruments issued for the account of the Company or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business supporting obligations under workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws;
(viii) Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary in the form of purchase price adjustments or earn-outs incurred in connection with any Permitted Acquisition or other Investment permitted by Section 6.04;
(ix) the Acquired Company Convertible Notes;
(x) Permitted Revolving Indebtedness in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $300,000,000 at any time outstanding;
(xi) Indebtedness of Loan Parties in respect of surety bonds (whether bid performance or otherwise) and other obligations of a like nature, in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business; and
(xii) other Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary; that, after giving effect to the incurrence of such Indebtedness and any related transaction on a Pro Forma Basis the Total Leverage Ratio shall not exceed 2.50 to 1.00 and the Company shall be in Pro Forma Compliance (in each case calculated as of the last day of the fiscal quarter of the Company then most recently ended for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b) (or prior to the first such delivery, as of April 28, 2012), that, for purposes of the foregoing, the Total Indebtedness and the Senior Secured Indebtedness shall be determined on a Pro Forma Basis as of the date of such incurrence); that (A) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties permitted by
provided
provided
provided
further
 
this clause (xii) shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding and (B) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (xii) that is secured by Liens on the assets of the Loan Parties may not exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding.
(b) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, issue any Disqualified Stock, other than, in the case of the Subsidiaries, to the Company or a Subsidiary; that any issuance of Equity Interests of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to any Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.04.
provided
SECTION 6.02. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any asset now owned or hereafter acquired, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Liens.
(a) Liens created under the Loan Documents;
(b) Permitted Encumbrances;
(c) any Lien on any asset of the Company or any Subsidiary existing on the date hereof and set forth on Schedule 6.02; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other asset of the Company or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations that it secures on the date hereof and any extensions, renewals and refinancings thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
(d) any Lien existing on any asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Company or any Subsidiary or existing on any asset of any Person that becomes (including pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition) a Subsidiary (or of any Person not previously a Subsidiary that is merged or consolidated with or into a Subsidiary in a transaction permitted hereunder) after the date hereof prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary (or is so merged or consolidated); that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary (or such merger or consolidation), (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other assets of the Company or any Subsidiary (other than, in the case of any such merger or consolidation, the assets of any special purpose merger Subsidiary that is a party thereto) and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations that it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary (or is so merged or consolidated), and any extensions, renewals and refinancings thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
(e) Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Company or any Subsidiary; that (i) such Liens secure only Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(a)(v) and obligations relating thereto not constituting Indebtedness and (ii) such Liens shall not apply to any other asset of the Company or any Subsidiary (other than the proceeds and products thereof); that in the event purchase money obligations are owed to any Person with respect to financing of more than one purchase of any fixed or capital assets, such Liens may secure all such purchase money obligations and may apply to all such fixed or capital assets financed by such Person;
provided
provided
further
 
(f) in connection with the sale or transfer of any Equity Interests or other assets in a transaction permitted under Section 6.05, customary rights and restrictions contained in agreements relating to such sale or transfer pending the completion thereof;
(g) in the case of (i) any Subsidiary that is not a wholly-owned Subsidiary or (ii) the Equity Interests in any Person that is not a Subsidiary, any encumbrance or restriction, including any put and call arrangements, related to Equity Interests in such Subsidiary or such other Person set forth in the organizational documents of such Subsidiary or such other Person or any related joint venture, shareholders' or similar agreement;
(h) Liens solely on any cash earnest money deposits, escrow arrangements or similar arrangements made by the Company or any Subsidiary in connection with any letter of intent or purchase agreement for a Permitted Acquisition or other transaction permitted hereunder;
(i) Liens securing Permitted Revolving Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(a)(x) and obligations relating thereto not constituting Indebtedness; that such Liens (i) attach only to the Collateral and (ii) are subject to the Intercreditor Agreement;
provided
(j) any Lien on assets of any Foreign Subsidiary; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any Collateral (including any Equity Interests in any Foreign Subsidiary that constitute Collateral) or any other asset of the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary and (B) such Lien shall secure only Indebtedness of such Foreign Subsidiary permitted by Section 6.01(a)(xii) and obligations relating thereto not constituting Indebtedness; and
provided
(k) other Liens securing Indebtedness or other obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding.
SECTION 6.03. (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (i) any Subsidiary may merge into the Company in a transaction in which the Company is the surviving corporation, (ii) any Person (other than the Company) may merge into or consolidate with any Subsidiary in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary and, if any party to such merger or consolidation is a Loan Party, a Loan Party, (iii) any Subsidiary may merge into or consolidate with any Person (other than the Company) in a transaction permitted under Section 6.05 in which, after giving effect to such transaction, the surviving entity is not a Subsidiary and (iv) any Subsidiary may liquidate or dissolve if the Company determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best
Fundamental Changes; Business Activities.
 
interests of the Company and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders; that any such merger or consolidation involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger or consolidation shall not be permitted unless it is also permitted by Section 6.04. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the Company or any Subsidiary from effecting the Acquisition.
provided
(b) The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Company and the Subsidiaries on the date hereof and businesses reasonably related or complementary thereto, including development, operation and promotion of certain gift products, of other apparel or accessories in a specialty store, catalogue or e-commerce environment.
SECTION 6.04. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, purchase, hold, acquire (including pursuant to any merger or consolidation with any Person that was not a wholly-owned Subsidiary prior thereto), make or otherwise permit to exist any Investment in any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) all or substantially all the assets of any other Person or of a business unit, division, product line or line of business of any other Person, except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions.
(a) Permitted Investments;
(b) Investments existing on the date hereof and set forth on Schedule 6.04 (but not any additions thereto (including any capital contributions) made after the date hereof);
(c) Investments by the Company and the Subsidiaries in Equity Interests in their respective subsidiaries; that (i) such subsidiaries are Subsidiaries prior to such Investments, (ii) any such Equity Interests held by a Loan Party shall be pledged in accordance with the requirements of the definition of the term "Collateral and Guarantee Requirement" and (iii) the aggregate amount of such Investments by the Loan Parties in, and loans and advances by the Loan Parties to, and Guarantees by the Loan Parties of Indebtedness and other obligations of, Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties (excluding all such Investments, loans, advances and Guarantees existing on the date hereof and permitted by clause (b) above) shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
(d) loans or advances made by the Company to any Subsidiary or made by any Subsidiary to the Company or any other Subsidiary; that (i) the Indebtedness resulting therefrom is permitted by Section 6.01(a)(iii), (ii) any such loans and advances made by a Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note (which may be in the form of a grid note) pledged pursuant to the Collateral Agreement and (iii) the amount of such loans and advances made by the Loan Parties to Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties shall be subject to the limitation set forth in clause (c) above;
provided
 
(e) Guarantees by the Company or any Subsidiary of Indebtedness or other obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary (including any such Guarantees (i) arising as a result of any such Person being a joint and several co-applicant with respect to any letter of credit or letter of guaranty or (ii) of any leases of retail store locations and related obligations arising thereunder); that the aggregate amount of Indebtedness and other obligations of Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties that is Guaranteed by any Loan Party shall be subject to the limitation set forth in clause (c) above;
provided
(f) Guarantees of the obligations of the Canadian Subsidiaries under real property leases; that the aggregate amount of Guarantees under this clause (f) may not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
(g) Investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(h) any Permitted Acquisition; that (i) both before and after giving effect to such acquisition no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (ii) after giving effect to such acquisition on a Pro Forma Basis, the Total Leverage Ratio shall not exceed 2.50 to 1.00 and the Senior Secured Leverage Ratio shall not exceed 1.25 to 1.00 (in each case calculated as of the last day of the fiscal quarter of the Company then most recently ended for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b) (or prior to the first such delivery, as of April 28, 2012), that, for purposes of the foregoing, the Total Indebtedness and the Senior Secured Indebtedness shall be determined on a Pro Forma Basis as of the date of such acquisition), and (iii) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clause (ii) above and confirming that the other requirements of the definition of the term "Permitted Acquisition" and this clause (h) have been satisfied;
provided
provided
(i) deposits, prepayments and other credits to suppliers, lessors and landlords made in the ordinary course of business;
(j) advances by the Company or any Subsidiary to employees in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices for travel and entertainment expenses, relocation costs and similar purposes;
(k) Investments made as a result of receipt of non-cash consideration from a sale, transfer or other disposition of assets permitted under Section 6.05; that any such Investment in the form of a promissory note in an amount in excess of $5,000,000 shall be pledged pursuant to the Collateral Agreement;
provided
 
(l) Investments in the form of Swap Agreements permitted under Section 6.07;
(m) investments constituting deposits described in clauses (c) and (d) of the definition of "Permitted Encumbrances" and endorsements of instruments for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business;
(n) acquisitions of individual retail store locations and leases;
(o) Investments in unconsolidated entities that do not constitute Subsidiaries of the Company; that the aggregate amount of Investments under this clause (o) may not exceed $35,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
(p) other Investments and other acquisitions; that, at the time each such Investment or acquisition is purchased, made or otherwise acquired, (i) no Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom, (ii) the Company shall be in Pro Forma Compliance (calculated as of the last day of the fiscal quarter of the Company then most recently ended for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b) (or prior to the first such delivery, as of April 28, 2012), that, for purposes of the foregoing, the Senior Secured Indebtedness shall be determined on a Pro Forma Basis as of the date of such Investment or other acquisition), (iii) the aggregate amount of all Investments made in reliance on this clause (p) outstanding at any time, together with the aggregate amount of all consideration paid in connection with all other acquisitions made in reliance on this clause (p), shall not exceed $100,000,000 in the aggregate at any time and (iv) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clause (ii) above and confirming that the other requirements of this clause (p) have been satisfied; and
provided
provided
(q) the Acquisition.
For the purposes of this Section, any unreimbursed payment by the Company or any Subsidiary for goods or services delivered to any Subsidiary shall be deemed to be an Investment in such Subsidiary.
SECTION 6.05. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any asset, including any Equity Interest owned by it, nor will the Company permit any Subsidiary to issue any additional Equity Interests in such Subsidiary (other than to the Company or any other Subsidiary in compliance with Section 6.04, and other than directors' qualifying shares and other nominal amounts of Equity Interests that are required to be held by other Persons under applicable law), except:
Asset Sales.
(a) (i) sales of inventory, (ii) sales, transfers and other dispositions of used, surplus, obsolete or outmoded machinery or equipment, (iii) contributions of merchandise to charitable organizations and (iv) dispositions of cash and Permitted Investments, in each case (other than in the case of clause (iv)) in the ordinary course of business;
 
(b) sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions to the Company or any Subsidiary; that any such sales, transfers, leases or other dispositions involving a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be made in compliance with Sections 6.04 and 6.09;
provided
(c) the sale or discount of accounts receivable arising in the ordinary course of business, but only in connection with the compromise or collection thereof and not in connection with any financing transaction;
(d) dispositions of assets subject to any casualty or condemnation proceeding (including in lieu thereof);
(e) leases or subleases of real property granted by the Company or any Subsidiary to third Persons not interfering in any material respect with the business of the Company or any Subsidiary, including retail store lease assignments and surrenders;
(f) the sale, transfer or other disposition of patents, trademarks, copyrights and other intellectual property (i) in the ordinary course of business, including pursuant to non-exclusive licenses of intellectual property, or (ii) which, in the reasonable judgment of the Company or any Subsidiary, are determined to be uneconomical, negligible or obsolete in the conduct of business;
(g) Sale/Leaseback Transactions permitted by Section 6.06; that the Net Proceeds received by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary in respect of any such Sale/Leaseback Transaction shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.09(b) to prepay the Borrowings within three Business Days of the receipt thereof;
provided
(h) the sale, transfer or other disposition of certain operations acquired as part of the Acquisition and consistent with the plan therefor previously communicated by the Company to the Administrative Agent;
(i) sales, transfers and other dispositions of assets that are not permitted by any other clause of this Section; that the aggregate fair value of all assets sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance on this clause (i) shall not exceed $35,000,000 during any fiscal year of the Company; and
provided
(j) sales, transfers and other dispositions of any real property; that the Net Proceeds received by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary in respect of any such sale, transfer or other disposition shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.09(b) to prepay the Borrowings within three Business Days of the receipt thereof;
provided
 
that all sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions permitted hereby (other than those permitted by clause (a)(ii), (a)(iii), (b) or (d) above) shall be made for fair value and, in the case of sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions permitted by clauses (c), (f)(ii), (g), (h), (i) and (j) above, for at least 75% cash consideration.
provided
Notwithstanding the foregoing, other than dispositions to the Company or any Subsidiary in compliance with Section 6.04, and other than directors' qualifying shares and other nominal amounts of Equity Interests that are required to be held by other Persons under applicable requirements of law, no such sale, transfer or other disposition of any Equity Interests in any Subsidiary shall be permitted unless (a) such Equity Interests constitute all the Equity Interests in such Subsidiary held by the Company and the Subsidiaries and (b) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, the Company and the Subsidiaries shall otherwise be in compliance with Section 6.04.
SECTION 6.06. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Sale/Leaseback Transaction, except for any such sale of any fixed or capital assets that is made for cash consideration in an amount not less than the cost of such fixed or capital asset and is consummated within 180 days after the Company or a Subsidiary acquires or completes the construction of such fixed or capital assets.
Sale/Leaseback Transactions.
SECTION 6.07. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Swap Agreement, other than Swap Agreements entered into in the ordinary course of business to hedge or mitigate risks to which the Company or a Subsidiary is exposed in the conduct of its business or the management of its liabilities and not for speculative purposes.
Swap Agreements.
SECTION 6.08. (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, or incur any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to do so, except that (i) the Company may declare and pay dividends with respect to its Equity Interests payable solely in additional Equity Interests (other than Disqualified Stock), (ii) any Subsidiary may declare and pay dividends or make other distributions with respect to its capital stock, partnership or membership interests or other similar Equity Interests, or make other Restricted Payments in respect of its Equity Interests, in each case ratably to the holders of such Equity Interests (or, if not ratably, on a basis more favorable to the Company and the Subsidiaries), (iii) the Company may make Restricted Payments, not exceeding $1,000,000 during any fiscal year of the Company, pursuant to and in accordance with stock option plans or other benefit plans for management or employees of the Company and the Subsidiaries, (iv) the Company may repurchase Equity Interests upon the exercise of stock options if such Equity Interests represent a portion of the exercise price of such options, (v) the Company may make cash payments in lieu of the issuance of fractional shares representing insignificant interests in the Company in connection with the exercise
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments of Indebtedness.
 
of warrants, options or other securities convertible into or exchangeable for shares of common stock in the Company and (vi) the Company may repurchase shares of its common stock and make other Restricted Payments, that at the time of and immediately after giving effect to any such repurchase or other Restricted Payment referred to in this clause (vi), (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) the Company shall be in Pro Forma Compliance (calculated as of the last day of the fiscal quarter of the Company then most recently ended for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b) (or prior to the first such delivery, as of April 28, 2012), that, for purposes of the foregoing, the Senior Secured Indebtedness shall be determined on a Pro Forma Basis as of the date of such Restricted Payment), (C) the amount of such repurchase or other Restricted Payment shall not exceed the Available Amount as of the date thereof and (D) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent conforming compliance with this clause (vi), including computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clause (B) above.
provided
provided
(b) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, make or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) of or in respect of principal of or interest on any Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(xii), or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(xii), except:
(i) payments of regularly scheduled interest and principal payments as and when due in respect of any Indebtedness, other than payments in respect of any Subordinated Indebtedness prohibited by the subordination provisions thereof;
(ii) refinancings of Indebtedness with the proceeds of other Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01;
(iii) payment of secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of (A) any voluntary sale or transfer of any assets securing such Indebtedness or (B) any casualty or condemnation proceeding (including a disposition in lieu thereof) of any assets securing such Indebtedness;
(iv) payments of or in respect of Indebtedness solely by issuance of the common stock of the Company;
(v) payments of or in respect of Indebtedness incurred by any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party; and
(vi) other payments of or in respect of Indebtedness; that at the time of and immediately after giving effect thereto, (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) the amount of such payment shall not exceed the Available Amount as of the date thereof and (C) the
provided
 
Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent conforming compliance with this clause (vi), including computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clause (B) above.
SECTION 6.09. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease, license or otherwise transfer any assets to, or purchase, lease, license or otherwise acquire any assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) transactions in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than those that would prevail in an arm's-length transactions with unrelated third parties, (b) transactions between or among the Loan Parties not involving any other Affiliate, (c) any Restricted Payment permitted by Section 6.08, (d) the payment of reasonable fees and compensation to, and the providing of reasonable indemnities on behalf of, directors and officers of the Company or any Subsidiary, as determined by the board of directors of the Company in good faith and (e) the transactions described on Schedule 6.09.
Transactions with Affiliates.
SECTION 6.10. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of the Company or any Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its assets to secure any Secured Obligations or (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to its Equity Interests or to make or repay loans or advances to the Company or any Subsidiary or to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to (A) restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by any Loan Document, (B) restrictions and conditions existing on the Effective Date identified on Schedule 6.10 (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (C) customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary pending such sale, that such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (D) in the case of any Subsidiary that is not a wholly-owned Subsidiary, restrictions and conditions imposed by its organizational documents or any related joint venture or similar agreement, that such restrictions and conditions apply only to such Subsidiary and to any Equity Interests in such Subsidiary, (E) restrictions and conditions set forth in the definitive documentation governing any Permitted Revolving Indebtedness, that, in the case of clause (a) above, such restrictions and conditions are no more onerous than those set forth in the ABL Credit Agreement as in effect on the Effective Date, and (F) restrictions and conditions imposed by agreements relating to Indebtedness of Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties permitted under Section 6.01(a), that such restrictions and conditions apply only to such Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties, (ii) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to (A) restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(a)(v) if such restrictions or
Restrictive Agreements.
provided
provided
provided
provided
provided
 
conditions apply only to the assets securing such Indebtedness and (B) customary provisions in leases and other agreements restricting the assignment thereof and (iii) clause (b) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by agreements relating to Indebtedness of any Subsidiary in existence at the time such Subsidiary became a Subsidiary and otherwise permitted under Section 6.01(a) (but shall apply to any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), that such restrictions and conditions apply only to such Subsidiary. Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to modify the requirements set forth in the definition of the term "Guarantee and Collateral Requirement" or the obligations of the Loan Parties under Sections 5.03, 5.04 or 5.12 or under the Collateral Documents.
provided
SECTION 6.11. The Company will not, or will permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive any of its rights under its certificate of incorporation, by-laws or other organizational documents, in either case, to the extent such amendment, modification or waiver would be adverse in any material respect to the rights or interests of the Lenders hereunder or under any other Loan Document.
Amendment of Organizational Documents.
SECTION 6.12. The Company will not permit the Senior Secured Leverage Ratio as of the last day of any fiscal quarter of the Company to exceed 1.75 to 1.00.
Senior Secured Leverage Ratio.
SECTION 6.13. The Company will not change its fiscal year or its method of determining fiscal quarters (it being understood that the foregoing shall not restrict changes to the fiscal years of each of the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries in order to conform to the fiscal year of the Company).
Changes in Fiscal Periods.
If any of the following events ("") shall occur:
Events of Default
(a) the Company shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
(b) the Company shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days;
(c) any representation, warranty or certification made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or
 
other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been materially incorrect when made or deemed made;
(d) the Company shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 5.02(a), 5.05 (with respect to the existence of the Company) or 5.11 or in Article VI;
(e) any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement or any other Loan Document (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after the earlier of (i) any Loan Party's knowledge of such breach or (ii) notice thereof from the Administrative Agent;
(f) the Company or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal, interest, termination payment or other payment obligation and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable (after giving effect to any applicable grace period);
(g) any event or condition shall occur that results in any Material Indebtedness (other than with respect to the Acquired Company Convertible Notes) becoming due or being terminated or required to be prepaid, repurchased, redeemed or defeased prior to its scheduled maturity, or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness (other than with respect to the Acquired Company Convertible Notes) or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf, or, in the case of any Swap Agreement, the applicable counterparty, to cause any Material Indebtedness (other than with respect to the Acquired Company Convertible Notes) to become due, or to terminate or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to (i) any secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the assets securing such Indebtedness or (ii) any Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of a voluntary refinancing thereof permitted under Section 6.01;
provided
(h) an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of the Company or any Material Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Material Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
 
(i) the Company or any Material Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation (other than any liquidation permitted by Section 6.03(a)(iv)), reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (i) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Material Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding or (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, or the board of directors (or similar governing body) of the Company or any Material Subsidiary (or any committee thereof) shall adopt any resolution or otherwise authorize any action to approve any of the actions referred to above in this clause (j) or clause (i) of this Article;
(j) the Company or any Material Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
(k) one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $50,000,000 (to the extent not covered by independent third-party insurance as to which the insurer has been notified of such judgment and has not denied coverage) shall be rendered against the Company or any Subsidiary, or any combination thereof, and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor to attach or levy upon any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
(l) one or more ERISA Events shall have occurred that could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
(m) a Change in Control shall occur;
(n) any Guarantee purported to be created under any Loan Document shall cease to be, or shall be asserted by any Loan Party not to be, in full force and effect, except as a result of the release thereof as provided in the applicable Loan Document or Section 9.16;
(o) any Lien purported to be created under any Collateral Document shall cease to be, or shall be asserted by any Loan Party not to be, a valid and perfected Lien or any material Collateral, with the priority required by the applicable Collateral Document, except (i) as a result of the sale or other disposition of the applicable Collateral in a transaction permitted under the Loan Documents, (ii) the release thereof as provided in the applicable Collateral Document or Section 9.16 or (iii) as a result of the failure of the Administrative Agent (or, in the case of the ABL Priority Collateral, the failure of the collateral agent under the ABL Credit Agreement) to (A) maintain possession of any stock certificates,
 
promissory notes or other instruments delivered to it under the Collateral Agreement or (B) continue in accordance with applicable law the effectiveness of any UCC financing statement; or
(p) the Intercreditor Agreement is not or ceases to be binding on or enforceable against any party thereto (or against any Person on whose behalf any such party makes any covenant or agreements therein), or shall otherwise not be effective to create the rights and obligations purported to be created thereunder, in each case in any respect material to the Administrative Agent or the other Secured Parties;
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Company described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Company, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part (but ratably as among the Classes of Loans and the Loans of each Class at the time outstanding), in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Company hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, in each case without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Company; and in the case of any event with respect to the Company described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Company hereunder, shall immediately and automatically become due and payable, in each case without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Company to the extent permitted by applicable law.
Each of the Lenders hereby irrevocably appoints the entity named as Administrative Agent in the heading of this Agreement and its successors to serve as administrative agent and collateral agent under the Loan Documents, and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms of the Loan Documents, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. In addition, to the extent required under the laws of any jurisdiction other than the United States of America, each of the Lenders hereby grants to the Administrative Agent any required powers of attorney to execute any Collateral Document governed by the laws of such jurisdiction on such Lender's behalf.
The Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise
 
the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such Person and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, own securities of, act as the financial advisor or in any other advisory capacity for and generally engage in any kind of business with the Company or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if such Person were not the Administrative Agent hereunder and without any duty to account therefor to the Lenders.
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, and its duties hereunder shall be administrative in nature. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing (and it is understood and agreed that the use of the term "agent" herein or in any other Loan Documents (or any other similar term) with reference to the Administrative Agent is not intended to connote any fiduciary or other implied (or express) obligations arising under agency doctrine of any applicable law, and that such term is used as a matter of market custom and is intended to create or reflect only an administrative relationship between contracting parties), (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or to exercise any discretionary power, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise as directed in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary, or as the Administrative Agent shall believe in good faith to be necessary, under the circumstances as provided in the Loan Documents), that the Administrative Agent shall not be required to take any action that, in its opinion, could expose the Administrative Agent to liability or be contrary to any Loan Document or applicable law, and (c) except as expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Company or any Subsidiary or any other Affiliate thereof that is communicated to or obtained by the Person serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary, or as the Administrative Agent shall believe in good faith to be necessary, under the circumstances as provided in the Loan Documents) or in the absence of its own bad faith, gross negligence or wilful misconduct (such absence to be presumed unless otherwise determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and nonappealable judgment). The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof (stating that it is a "notice of default") is given to the Administrative Agent by the Company or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or in connection with any Loan Document, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth in any Loan Document or the occurrence of any Default, (iv) the sufficiency, validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of any Loan Document or any other
provided
 
agreement, instrument or document, (v) the creation, perfection or priority of Liens on the Collateral or the existence of the Collateral or (vi) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent or satisfaction of any condition that expressly refers to the matters described therein being acceptable or satisfactory to the Administrative Agent. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Administrative Agent shall not be liable for, or be responsible for any loss, cost or expense suffered by the Company or any Lender as a result of, any determination of the Weighted Average Yield.
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely, and shall not incur any liability for relying, upon any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing (including any electronic message, Internet or intranet website posting or other distribution) believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed, sent or otherwise authenticated by the proper Person (whether or not such Person in fact meets the requirements set forth in the Loan Documents for being the signatory, sender or authenticator thereof). The Administrative Agent also shall be entitled to rely, and shall not incur any liability for relying, upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person (whether or not such Person in fact meets the requirements set forth in the Loan Documents for being the signatory, sender or authenticator thereof), and may act upon any such statement prior to receipt of written confirmation thereof. In determining compliance with any condition hereunder to the making of a Loan that by its terms must be fulfilled to the satisfaction of a Lender, the Administrative Agent may presume that such condition is satisfactory to such Lender or unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice to the contrary from such Lender prior to the making of such Loan. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Company), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers hereunder or under any other Loan Document by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all their duties and exercise their rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of this Article shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for the bad faith, negligence or misconduct of any sub-agents except to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction determines in a final and nonappealable judgment that the Administrative Agent acted with bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct in the selection of such sub-agents.
Subject to the terms of this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time from its capacity as such. In connection with such resignation, the
 
Administrative Agent shall give notice of its intent to resign to the Lenders and the Company. Upon receipt of any such notice of resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Company, to appoint a successor. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its intent to resign, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders, appoint a successor Administrative Agent, which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents. The fees payable by the Company to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed by the Company and such successor. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event no successor Administrative Agent shall have been so appointed and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its intent to resign, the retiring Administrative Agent may give notice of the effectiveness of its resignation to the Lenders and the Company, whereupon, on the date of effectiveness of such resignation stated in such notice, (a) the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, that, solely for purposes of maintaining any security interest granted to the Administrative Agent under any Collateral Document for the benefit of the Secured Parties, the retiring Administrative Agent shall continue to be vested with such security interest as collateral agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties and, in the case of any Collateral in the possession of the Administrative Agent, shall continue to hold such Collateral, in each case until such time as a successor Administrative Agent is appointed and accepts such appointment in accordance with this paragraph (it being understood and agreed that the retiring Administrative Agent shall have no duty or obligation to take any further action under any Collateral Document, including any action required to maintain the perfection of any such security interest), and (b) the Required Lenders shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, that (i) all payments required to be made hereunder or under any other Loan Document to the Administrative Agent for the account of any Person other than the Administrative Agent shall be made directly to such Person and (ii) all notices and other communications required or contemplated to be given or made to the Administrative Agent shall also directly be given or made to each Lender. Following the effectiveness of the Administrative Agent's resignation from its capacity as such, the provisions of this Article and Section 9.03, as well as any exculpatory, reimbursement and indemnification provisions set forth in any other Loan Document, shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent and in respect of the matters referred to in the proviso under clause (a) above.
provided
provided
 
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any Arranger or any other Lender, or any of the Related Parties of any of the foregoing, and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any Arranger or any other Lender, or any of the Related Parties of any of the foregoing, and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
Each Lender, by delivering its signature page to this Agreement and funding its Loans on the Effective Date, or delivering its signature page to an Assignment and Assumption or any other Loan Document pursuant to which it shall become a Lender hereunder, shall be deemed to have acknowledged receipt of, and consented to and approved, each Loan Document and each other document required to be delivered to, or be approved by or satisfactory to, the Administrative Agent or the Lenders on the Effective Date.
Except with respect to the exercise of setoff rights of any Lender in accordance with the Loan Documents or with respect to a Lender's right to file a proof of claim in an insolvency proceeding, no Secured Party shall have any right individually to realize upon any of the Collateral or to enforce any Guarantee of the Secured Obligations, it being understood and agreed that all powers, rights and remedies under the Loan Documents may be exercised solely by the Administrative Agent on behalf of the Secured Parties in accordance with the terms thereof. In the event of a foreclosure by the Administrative Agent on any of the Collateral pursuant to a public or private sale or other disposition, the Administrative Agent or any Lender may be the purchaser or licensor of any or all of such Collateral at any such sale or other disposition, and the Administrative Agent, as agent for and representative of the Secured Parties (but not any Lender or Lenders in its or their respective individual capacities unless the Required Lenders shall otherwise agree in writing) shall be entitled, for the purpose of bidding and making settlement or payment of the purchase price for all or any portion of the Collateral sold at any such public sale, to use and apply any of the Loan Document Obligations as a credit on account of the purchase price for any collateral payable by the Administrative Agent on behalf of the Secured Parties at such sale or other disposition.
In furtherance of the foregoing and not in limitation thereof, no Swap Agreement the obligations under which constitute Secured Obligations will create (or be deemed to create) in favor of any Secured Party that is a party thereto any rights in connection with the management or release of any Collateral or of the obligations of any Loan Party under any Loan Document. By accepting the benefits of the Collateral, each Secured Party that is a party to any such Swap Agreement shall be deemed to have appointed the Administrative Agent to serve as administrative agent and collateral agent under the Loan Documents and agreed to be bound by the Loan Documents as a Secured Party thereunder, subject to the limitations set forth in this paragraph.
 
The Secured Parties irrevocably authorize the Administrative Agent, at its option and in its discretion, to subordinate any Lien on any property granted to or held by the Administrative Agent under any Loan Document to the holder of any Lien on such property that is permitted by Section 6.02(a)(v). The Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have a duty to ascertain or inquire into any representation or warranty regarding the existence, value or collectability of the Collateral, the existence, priority or perfection of the Administrative Agent's Lien thereon, or any certificate prepared by any Loan Party in connection therewith, nor shall the Administrative Agent be responsible or liable to the Lenders for any failure to monitor or maintain any portion of the Collateral.
In case of the pendency of any proceeding with respect to any Loan Party under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, the Administrative Agent (irrespective of whether the principal of any Loan shall then be due and payable as herein expressed or by declaration or otherwise and irrespective of whether the Administrative Agent shall have made any demand on the Company) shall be entitled and empowered (but not obligated) by intervention in such proceeding or otherwise:
(a) to file and prove a claim for the whole amount of the principal and interest owing and unpaid in respect of the Loans, and all other Secured Obligations that are owing and unpaid and to file such other documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Lenders and the Administrative Agent (including any claim under Sections 2.10, 2.11, 2.13, 2.14, 2.15 and 9.03) allowed in such judicial proceeding; and
(b) to collect and receive any monies or other property payable or deliverable on any such claims and to distribute the same;
(c) and any custodian, receiver, assignee, trustee, liquidator, sequestrator or other similar official in any such proceeding is hereby authorized by each Lender and each Secured Party to make such payments to the Administrative Agent and, in the event that the Administrative Agent shall consent to the making of such payments directly to the Lenders or the other Secured Parties, to pay to the Administrative Agent any amount due to it, in its capacity as the Administrative Agent, under the Loan Documents (including under Section 9.03).
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, neither the Arrangers nor any Person named on the cover page of this Agreement as a Syndication Agent shall have any duties or obligations under this Agreement or any other Loan Document (except in its capacity, as applicable, as a Lender), but all such Persons shall have the benefit of the indemnities provided for hereunder.
The provisions of this Article are solely for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, and, except solely to the extent of the Company's rights to consent pursuant to and subject to the conditions set forth in this Article, none of the Company or any other Loan Party shall have any rights as a third party beneficiary of any such provisions. Each Secured Party, whether or not a party hereto, will be deemed,
 
by its acceptance of the benefits of the Collateral and of the Guarantees of the Secured Obligations provided under the Loan Documents, to have agreed to the provisions of this Article.
SECTION 9.01. (a) Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) of this Section), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by facsimile, as follows:
Notices.
(i) if to the Company, to it at 30 Dunnigan Drive, Suffern, New York 10901, Attention: Mr. Armand Correia, Chief Financial Office (Fax No. (845) 369-4625);
(ii) if to the Administrative Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 South Dearborn, Chicago, Illinois 60603, Attention of Margaret Seweryn (Fax No. (888) 292-9533) (with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 270 Park Avenue, 44th Floor, Mail Code: NY1-K855, New York, New York 10177, Attention of Donna DiForio (Fax No. (646) 534-2274)); and
(iii) if to any other Lender, to it at its address (or facsimile number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
All such notices and other communications (i) sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received or (ii) sent by facsimile shall be deemed to have been given when sent (or, if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient) and (iii) delivered through electronic communications to the extent provided in paragraph (b) of this Section shall be effective as provided in such paragraph.
(b) Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications (including e-mail and internet or intranet websites) pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices under Article II to any Lender if such Lender has notified the Administrative Agent that it is incapable of receiving notices under such Article by electronic communication. The Administrative Agent or the Company (on behalf of the Loan Parties) may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it, that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications. All such notices and other communications (i) sent to an e-mail address shall be deemed received upon the sender's receipt of an
provided
provided
 
acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by return e-mail or other written acknowledgement); that if not given during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient, and (ii) posted to an internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its e-mail address as described in the foregoing clause (b)(i) of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor.
provided
(c) Any party hereto may change its address or facsimile number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.
(d) The Company agrees that the Administrative Agent may, but shall not be obligated to, make any Communication by posting such Communication on Debt Domain, Intralinks, Syndtrak or a similar electronic transmission system (the ""). The Platform is provided "as is" and "as available". Neither the Administrative Agent nor any its Related Parties warrants, or shall be deemed to warrant, the adequacy of the Platform and expressly disclaim liability for errors or omissions in the Communications. No warranty of any kind, express, implied or statutory, including any warranty of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, non-infringement of third-party rights or freedom from viruses or other code defects, is made, or shall be deemed to be made, by the Administrative Agent or any of its Related Parties in connection with the Communications or the Platform.
Platform
SECTION 9.02. (a) No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders hereunder and under any other Loan Document are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by any Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the making of a Loan shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
Waivers; Amendments.
(b) Except as provided in Sections 2.18, 2.19, 2.20, 9.02(c) and 9.19, none of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any provision hereof or thereof may be waived, amended or modified except, in the case of this Agreement, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Company, the Administrative Agent and the Required Lenders and, in the case of any other Loan Document, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and
 
the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, in each case with the consent of the Required Lenders, that (i) any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document may be amended by an agreement in writing entered into by the Company and the Administrative Agent to cure any ambiguity, omission, defect or inconsistency so long as, in each case, (A) such amendment does not adversely affect the rights of any Lender or (B) the Lenders shall have received at least five Business Days' prior written notice thereof and the Administrative Agent shall not have received, within five Business Days of the date of such notice to the Lenders, a written notice from the Required Lenders stating that the Required Lenders object to such amendment and (ii) no such agreement shall (A) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (B) reduce or forgive the principal amount of any Loan or reduce the rate of interest thereon or reduce or forgive any interest or fees (including any prepayment fees) payable hereunder (in each case, other than as a result of any change in the definition of, or in any components of, the term "Total Leverage Ratio") without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby, (C) postpone the scheduled maturity date of any Loan, or the date of any scheduled payment of the principal amount of any Term Loan under Section 2.06, or any date for the payment of any interest or fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby, (D) change Section 2.16(b) or 2.16(c) in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby without the written consent of each Lender, (E) change any of the provisions of this Section or the percentage set forth in the definition of the term "Required Lenders" or any other provision of any Loan Document specifying the number or percentage of Lenders (or Lenders of any Class) required to waive, amend or modify any rights thereunder or make any determination or grant any consent thereunder, without the written consent of each Lender (or each Lender of such Class, as the case may be); that, with the consent of the Required Lenders, the provisions of this Section and the definition of the term "Required Lenders" may be amended to include references to any new class of loans created under this Agreement (or to lenders extending such loans) on substantially the same basis as the corresponding references relating to the existing Classes of Loans or Lenders, (F) release substantially all of the value of the Guarantees provided by the Subsidiary Loan Parties (including, in each case, by limiting liability in respect thereof) created under the Collateral Agreement without the written consent of each Lender (except as expressly provided in Section 9.16 or the Collateral Agreement) (including any such release by the Administrative Agent in connection with any sale or other disposition of any Subsidiary upon the exercise of remedies under the Collateral Documents), it being understood that an amendment or other modification of the type of obligations guaranteed under the Collateral Agreement shall not be deemed to be a release or limitation of any Guarantee), (G) release all or substantially all the Collateral from the Liens of the Collateral Documents, without the written consent of each Lender (except as expressly provided in Section 9.16 or the applicable Collateral Document (including any such release by the Administrative Agent in connection with any sale or other disposition of the Collateral upon the exercise of remedies under the Collateral Documents), it being understood that an amendment or other modification of the type of obligations secured by the Collateral Documents shall not be deemed to be a release of the Collateral from the
provided
provided
 
Liens of the Collateral Documents), and (H) change any provisions of any Loan Document in a manner that by its terms adversely affects the rights in respect of payments due to Lenders holding Loans of any Class differently than those holding Loans of any other Class, without the written consent of Lenders representing a Majority in Interest of each affected Class; that (1) no such agreement shall amend, modify, extend or otherwise affect the rights or obligations of the Administrative Agent without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and (2) any amendment, waiver or other modification of this Agreement that by its terms affects the rights or duties under this Agreement of the Lenders of one or more Classes (but not the Lenders of any other Class), may be effected by an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Company and the requisite number or percentage in interest of each affected Class of Lenders that would be required to consent thereto under this Section if such Class of Lenders were the only Class of Lenders hereunder at the time. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no consent with respect to any amendment, waiver or other modification of this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be required of, in the case of any amendment, waiver or other modification referred to in clause (ii) of the first proviso of this paragraph, any Lender that receives payment in full of the principal of and interest accrued on each Loan made by, and all other amounts owing to, such Lender or accrued for the account of such Lender under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents at the time such amendment, waiver or other modification becomes effective and whose Commitments terminate by the terms and upon the effectiveness of such amendment, waiver or other modification.
provided
further
(c) Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Administrative Agent may, without the consent of any Secured Party, consent to a departure by any Loan Party from any covenant of such Loan Party set forth in this Agreement, the Collateral Agreement or in any other Collateral Document to the extent such departure is consistent with the authority of the Administrative Agent set forth in the definition of the term "Collateral and Guarantee Requirement".
(d) The Administrative Agent may, but shall have no obligation to, with the concurrence of any Lender, execute amendments, waivers or other modifications on behalf of such Lender. Any amendment, waiver or other modification effected in accordance with this Section 9.02 shall be binding upon each Person that is at the time thereof a Lender and each Person that subsequently becomes a Lender.
SECTION 9.03. (a) The Company shall pay (i) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Syndication Agent, the Arrangers and their respective Affiliates, including the reasonable and documented fees, charges and disbursements of one primary counsel for the Administrative Agent, the Arranger and their Affiliates, and if deemed necessary by the Administrative Agent, one local counsel in each applicable jurisdiction, in connection with the structuring, arrangement and syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein and any credit or similar facility refinancing or replacing, in whole or in part, any of the credit facilities provided for herein, including the preparation, execution and delivery of the Commitment Letter and the Fee Letters, as well as the
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.
 
preparation, execution, delivery and administration of this Agreement, the other Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof or thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated) and (ii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Arranger or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any of the foregoing, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans.
(b) The Company shall indemnify the Administrative Agent (and any sub-agent thereof), each Arranger, the Syndication Agent and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an ""), against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, penalties, liabilities and related expenses, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the structuring, arrangement and the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation, execution, delivery and administration of the Commitment Letter, the Fee Letters, this Agreement, the other Loan Documents or any other agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the performance by the parties to the Commitment Letter, the Fee Letters, this Agreement or the other Loan Documents of their obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated thereby, (ii) any Loan or the use of the proceeds therefrom, (iii) any actual or alleged presence or Release of Hazardous Materials on, at, to or from any property owned or operated by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Company or any Subsidiary, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether such proceeding is initiated against or by any party to this Agreement, or any Affiliate thereof, by an Indemnitee or any third party or whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, penalties, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and non appealable judgment to have resulted from the bad faith, gross negligence or wilful misconduct of such Indemnitee. This Section shall not apply to any Taxes (other than Other Taxes or any Taxes that represent losses, claims, damages or related expenses arising from any non-Tax claim).
Indemnitee
provided
(c) To the extent that the Company fails to indefeasibly pay any amount required to be paid by them under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section to the Administrative Agent (or any sub-agent thereof) or any Related Party of the Administrative Agent (or any sub-agent thereof) (and without limiting its obligation to do so), each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent), or such Related Party, such Lender's pro rata share (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage,
provided
 
liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent (or such sub-agent) in its capacity as such, or against any Related Party of the Administrative Agent (or any sub-agent thereof) acting for the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent) in connection with such capacity. For purposes of this Section, a Lender's "pro rata share" shall be determined based upon its share of the sum of the total outstanding Loans and unused Commitments, in each case, at the time (or most recently outstanding and in effect).
(d) To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Company shall not assert, or permit any of its Affiliates or Related Parties to assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee (i) for any damages arising from the use by others of information or other materials obtained through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems (including the Internet), or (ii) on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the Transactions, any Loan or the use of the proceeds thereof.
(e) All amounts due under this Section shall be payable not later than 10 days after written demand therefor.
SECTION 9.04. (a) The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, except that (i) the Company may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Company without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section), the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the sub-agents of the Administrative Agent and the Related Parties of any of the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent and any Lender) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns.
(b) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
(i) the Company; that no consent of the Company shall be required (1) for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund, (2) for an assignment by any Initial Lender in connection with the syndication of the credit facility provided for herein at any time prior to the
provided
 
60th day following the Effective Date and (3) if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, for any other assignment; that the Company shall be deemed to have consented to any such assignment unless it shall object thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within 10 Business Days after having received notice thereof; and
provided
further
(ii) the Administrative Agent; that no consent of the Administrative Agent shall be required for an assignment of any Loan to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund.
provided
(iii) Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
(A) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment or Loans of any Class, the amount of the Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $1,000,000 unless each of the Company and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent; that no such consent of the Company shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
provided
(B) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement; that this clause (B) shall not be construed to prohibit the assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations in respect of one Class of Commitments or Loans;
provided
(C) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500, that only one such processing and recordation fee shall be payable in the event of simultaneous assignments from any Lender or its Approved Funds to one or more other Approved Funds of such Lender; and
provided
(D) the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire in which the assignee designates one or more credit contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain MNPI) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the assignee's compliance procedures and applicable law, including Federal, State and foreign securities laws.
(iv) Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(v) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each
 
Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.13, 2.14, 2.15 and 9.03). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with Section 9.04(c).
(v) The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as a non-fiduciary agent of the Company, shall maintain at one of its offices a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and records of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount (and stated interest) of the Loans owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and the Company, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Company and, as to entries pertaining to it, any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
(vi) Upon receipt by the Administrative Agent of an Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignee's completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder) and the processing and recordation fee referred to in this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register; that the Administrative Agent shall not be required to accept such Assignment and Assumption or so record the information contained therein if the Administrative Agent reasonably believes that such Assignment and Assumption lacks any written consent required by this Section or is otherwise not in proper form, it being acknowledged that the Administrative Agent shall have no duty or obligation (and shall incur no liability) with respect to obtaining (or confirming the receipt) of any such written consent or with respect to the form of (or any defect in) such Assignment and Assumption, any such duty and obligation being solely with the assigning Lender and the assignee. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph, and following such recording, unless otherwise determined by the Administrative Agent (such determination to be made in the sole discretion of the Administrative Agent, which determination may be conditioned on the consent of the assigning Lender and the assignee), shall be
provided
 
effective notwithstanding any defect in the Assignment and Assumption relating thereto. Each assigning Lender and the assignee, by its execution and delivery of an Assignment and Assumption, shall be deemed to have represented to the Administrative Agent that all written consents required by this Section with respect thereto (other than the consent of the Administrative Agent) have been obtained and that such Assignment and Assumption is otherwise duly completed and in proper form, and each assignee, by its execution and delivery of an Assignment and Assumption, shall be deemed to have represented to the assigning Lender and the Administrative Agent that such assignee is an Eligible Assignee.
(c) (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Company or the Administrative Agent, sell participations to one or more Eligible Assignees ("") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitments and Loans of any Class); that (A) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Company, the Administrative Agent and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under the Loan Documents. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce the Loan Documents and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of the Loan Documents; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.02(b) that affects such Participant or requires the approval of all the Lenders. The Company agree that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.13, 2.14 and 2.15 (subject to the requirements and limitations therein, including the requirements under Section 2.15(f) (it being understood that the documentation required under Section 2.15(f) shall be delivered to the participating Lender)) to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section; that such Participant (x) agrees to be subject to the provisions of Sections 2.16 and 2.17 as if it were an assignee under paragraph (b) of this Section and (y) shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.13 or 2.15, with respect to any participation, than its participating Lender would have been entitled to receive, except to the extent such entitlement to receive a greater payment results from a Change in Law that occurs after the Participant acquired the applicable participation. Each Lender that sells a participation agrees, at the Company's request and expense, to use reasonable efforts to cooperate with the Company to effectuate the provisions of Section 2.17(b) with respect to any Participant. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender; that such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.16(c) as though it were a Lender.
Participants
provided
provided
provided
provided
(ii) Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as a non-fiduciary agent of the Company, maintain records of the name and
 
address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each Participant's interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement or any other Loan Document (the ""); that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of the Participant Register (including the identity of any Participant or any information relating to a Participant's interest in any Commitments or Loans or its other obligations under this Agreement or any other Loan Document) to any Person except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that such Commitment or Loan or other obligation is in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations. The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary. For the avoidance of doubt, the Administrative Agent (in its capacity as Administrative Agent) shall have no responsibility for maintaining a Participant Register.
Participant Register
provided
(d) Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
SECTION 9.05. All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, the Syndication Agent, any Lender or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any Loan Document is executed and delivered or any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of Sections 2.13, 2.14, 2.15, 2.16(e) and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Survival.
SECTION 9.06. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement and the other Loan Documents constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness.
 
hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof, including the commitments of the Lenders and, if applicable, their Affiliates under the Commitment Letter and any commitment advices submitted by them (but do not supersede any other provisions of the Commitment Letter or the Fee Letters (or any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent) that do not by the terms of such documents terminate upon the effectiveness of this Agreement, all of which provisions shall remain in full force and effect). Except as provided in Article IV, this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof that, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective permitted successors and assigns. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
SECTION 9.07. Any provision of any Loan Document held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions thereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability.
SECTION 9.08. If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Loan Party against any of and all the Secured Obligations held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under the Loan Documents and although such obligations may be unmatured. The applicable Lender shall notify the Company and the Administrative Agent of such set-off or application; that any failure to give or any delay in giving such notice shall not affect the validity of any such set-off or application under this Section. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff.
provided
SECTION 9.09. (a) This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
(b) Each party hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and the Company hereby irrevocably
 
and unconditionally agrees that all claims arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document brought by it or any of its Affiliates shall be brought, and shall be heard and determined, exclusively in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each party hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against any Loan Party or any of its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
(c) The Company hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
(d) Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
SECTION 9.10. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
SECTION 9.11. Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings.
SECTION 9.12. Each of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below) with the same degree of care that it uses to protect its own confidential information, but in no event less than a commercially reasonable degree of care, except that Information
Confidentiality.
 
may be disclosed (a) to its Related Parties, including accountants, legal counsel and other agents and advisors, it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential, (b) to the extent required or requested by any regulatory authority purporting to have jurisdiction over such Person or its Related Parties (including any self-regulatory authority, such as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners), (c) to the extent required by applicable law or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies under this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing confidentiality undertakings substantially similar to those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its Related Parties) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Company or any Subsidiary or its obligations, (g) on a confidential basis to (i) any rating agency in connection with rating the Company or the Subsidiaries or the credit facilities provided for herein or (ii) the CUSIP Service Bureau or any similar agency in connection with the issuance and monitoring of CUSIP numbers with respect to the credit facilities provided for herein, (h) with the consent of the Company or (i) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent or any Lender or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Company; that, in the case of clause (c) above, the party disclosing such information shall provide to the Company prior written notice of such disclosure to the extent permitted by applicable law (and to the extent commercially feasible under the circumstances) and shall cooperate with the Company in obtaining a protective order for, or other confidential treatment of, such disclosure. For the purposes of this Section, "" means all information received from the Company relating to the Company or any Subsidiary or their businesses or the Collateral, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent or any Lender, or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing, on a non-confidential basis prior to disclosure by the Company; that, in the case of information received from the Company after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential.
provided
Information
provided
SECTION 9.13. The respective obligations of the Lenders hereunder are several and not joint and the failure of any Lender to make any Loan or perform any of its obligations hereunder shall not relieve any other Lender from any of its obligations hereunder. Anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, no Lender shall be obligated to extend credit to the Company in violation of applicable law.
Several Obligations; Nonreliance; Violation of Law.
SECTION 9.14. Each Lender and the Administrative Agent (for itself and not on behalf of any Lender) hereby notifies each Loan Party that pursuant to the requirements of the Patriot Act it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies such Loan Party, which information includes
USA Patriot Act Notice.
 
the name and address of such Loan Party and other information that will allow such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, to identify such Loan Party in accordance with such Act.
SECTION 9.15. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan, together with all fees, charges and other amounts that are treated as interest on such Loan under applicable law (collectively the ""), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the "") that may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding such Loan in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan hereunder, together with all Charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and Charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated and the interest and Charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
Interest Rate Limitation.
Charges
Maximum Rate
SECTION 9.16. A Subsidiary Loan Party shall automatically be released from its obligations under the Loan Documents, and all security interests created by the Collateral Documents in Collateral owned by such Subsidiary Loan Party shall be automatically released, upon the consummation of any transaction permitted by this Agreement as a result of which such Subsidiary Loan Party ceases to be a Subsidiary (including any voluntary liquidation or dissolution of such Subsidiary Loan Party in accordance with Section 6.03); that, if so required by this Agreement, the Required Lenders shall have consented to such transaction and the terms of such consent shall not have provided otherwise. Upon any sale or other transfer by any Loan Party (other than to the Company or any Subsidiary) of any Collateral in a transaction permitted under this Agreement, or upon the effectiveness of any written consent to the release of the security interest created under any Collateral Document in any Collateral pursuant to Section 9.02, the security interests in such Collateral created by the Collateral Documents shall be automatically released. In connection with any termination or release pursuant to this Section, the Administrative Agent shall execute and deliver to any Loan Party, at such Loan Party's expense, all documents that such Loan Party shall reasonably request to evidence such termination or release. Any execution and delivery of documents pursuant to this Section shall be without recourse to or warranty by the Administrative Agent.
Release of Liens and Guarantees.
provided
SECTION 9.17. The Company, on behalf of itself and the Subsidiaries, agrees that in connection with all aspects of the transactions contemplated hereby and any communications in connection therewith, the Company, the Subsidiaries and its other Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Lenders and their Affiliates, on the other hand, will have a business relationship that does not create, by implication or otherwise, any fiduciary duty on the part of the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication
No Fiduciary Relationship.
 
Agent, the Lenders or their Affiliates, and no such duty will be deemed to have arisen in connection with any such transactions or communications. The Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Lenders and their Affiliates may be engaged, for their own accounts or the accounts of customers, in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company, the Subsidiaries and its other Affiliates, and none of the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Lenders or their Affiliates has any obligation to disclose any of such interests to the Company, the Subsidiaries or its other Affiliates. To the fullest extent permitted by law, the Company hereby waives and releases any claims that it or any of its Affiliates may have against the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Lenders and their Affiliates with respect to any breach or alleged breach of agency or fiduciary duty in connection with any aspect of any transaction contemplated hereby.
SECTION 9.18. (a) Each Lender acknowledges that all information, including requests for waivers and amendments, furnished by the Company or the Administrative Agent pursuant to or in connection with, or in the course of administering, this Agreement will be syndicate-level information, which may contain MNPI. Each Lender represents to the Company and the Administrative Agent that (i) it has developed compliance procedures regarding the use of MNPI and that it will handle MNPI in accordance with such procedures and applicable law, including Federal, state and foreign securities laws, and (ii) it has identified in its Administrative Questionnaire a credit contact who may receive information that may contain MNPI in accordance with its compliance procedures and applicable law, including Federal, state and foreign securities laws.
Non-Public Information.
(b) The Company and each Lender acknowledge that, if information furnished by the Company pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement is being distributed by the Administrative Agent through the Platform, (i) the Administrative Agent may post any information that the Company has indicated as containing MNPI solely on that portion of the Platform designated for Private Side Lender Representatives and (ii) if the Company has not indicated whether any information furnished by it pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement contains MNPI, the Administrative Agent reserves the right to post such information solely on that portion of the Platform designated for Private Side Lender Representatives. The Company agrees to clearly designate all information provided to the Administrative Agent by or on behalf of the Company that is suitable to be made available to Public Side Lender Representatives, and the Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely on any such designation by the Company without liability or responsibility for the independent verification thereof.
SECTION 9.19. The Lenders acknowledge that the obligations of the Company under the ABL Credit Agreement are (and obligations in respect of any other Permitted Revolving Indebtedness may in the future be) secured by Liens on assets of the Company and the other Loan Parties that constitute Collateral and that the relative Lien priority and other creditor rights of the Lender Parties hereunder and the secured parties under the ABL Credit Agreement (or in respect of such other Permitted Revolving Indebtedness) will be set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement. Each
Intercreditor Agreement.
 
Lender hereby acknowledges that it has received a copy of the Intercreditor Agreement. Each Lender hereby irrevocably (a) consents to the subordination of the Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral securing the Secured Obligations on the terms set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement, (b) authorizes and directs the Administrative Agent to execute and deliver the Intercreditor Agreement and any documents relating thereto, in each case on behalf of such Lender and without any further consent, authorization or other action by such Lender, (c) agrees that, upon the execution and delivery thereof, such Lender will be bound by the provisions of the Intercreditor Agreement as if it were a signatory thereto and will take no actions contrary to the provisions of the Intercreditor Agreement and (d) agrees that no Lender shall have any right of action whatsoever against the Administrative Agent as a result of any action taken by the Administrative Agent pursuant to this Section or in accordance with the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement. Each Lender hereby further irrevocably authorizes and directs the Administrative Agent (i) to take such actions as shall be required to release Liens on the Collateral in accordance with the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement and (ii) to enter into such amendments, supplements or other modifications to the Intercreditor Agreement in connection with any extension, renewal, refinancing or replacement of any Secured Obligations and any Permitted Revolving Indebtedness as are reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent to give effect thereto, in each case on behalf of such Lender and without any further consent, authorization or other action by such Lender. The Administrative Agent shall have the benefit of the provisions of Article VIII with respect to all actions taken by it pursuant to this Section or in accordance with the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement to the full extent thereof. The foregoing provisions are intended as an inducement to the secured parties under the ABL Credit Agreement (or in respect of other Permitted Revolving Indebtedness) to extend credit to the Company and such secured parties are intended third party beneficiaries of such provisions.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
:
Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
 
 
:
Company
Mortgaged Property
 
All Other Real Property
None.
:
Acquired Company
Mortgaged Property
 
All Other Real Property
 
:
Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
None.
:
Company
 
 
:
Acquired Company
 
 
:
Company
 
:
Acquired Company
 
:
Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
 
 
 
:
Company
 
 
 
 
:
Acquired Company
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
:
Company
 
 
 
 
 
:
Acquired Company
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
:
Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
 
 
 
:
Company
None.
:
Acquired Company
 
 
EXHIBIT A
This Assignment and Assumption (this "") is dated as of the Effective Date set forth below and is entered into by and between the Assignor (as defined below) and the Assignee (as defined below). Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Credit Agreement identified below (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, the ""), receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged by the Assignee. The Standard Terms and Conditions set forth in Annex 1 attached hereto are hereby agreed to and incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Assignment and Assumption as if set forth herein in full.
Assignment and Assumption
Credit Agreement
For an agreed consideration, the Assignor hereby irrevocably sells and assigns to the Assignee, and the Assignee hereby irrevocably purchases and assumes from the Assignor, subject to and in accordance with the Standard Terms and Conditions referred to below and the Credit Agreement, as of the Effective Date inserted by the Administrative Agent as contemplated below, (a) all of the Assignor's rights and obligations in its capacity as a Lender under the Credit Agreement and any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto to the extent related to the amount and percentage interest identified below of all of such outstanding rights and obligations of the Assignor under the facility identified below (including any Guarantees included in such facility) and (b) to the extent permitted to be assigned under applicable law, all claims, suits, causes of action and any other right of the Assignor (in its capacity as a Lender) against any Person, whether known or unknown, arising under or in connection with the Credit Agreement, any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto or the loan transactions governed thereby or in any way based on or related to any of the foregoing, including contract claims, tort claims, malpractice claims, statutory claims and all other claims at law or in equity related to the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clause (a) above (the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clauses (a) and (b) above being referred to herein collectively as the ""). Such sale and assignment is without recourse to the Assignor and, except as expressly provided in this Assignment and Assumption, without representation or warranty by the Assignor.
Assigned Interest
 
 
 
Effective Date:                  , 20     [TO BE INSERTED BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND WHICH SHALL BE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF RECORDATION OF TRANSFER IN THE REGISTER THEREFOR.]
The Assignee, if not already a Lender, agrees to deliver to the Administrative Agent a completed Administrative Questionnaire in which the Assignee designates one or more credit contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain MNPI) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the Assignee's compliance procedures and applicable law, including Federal, State and foreign securities laws.
 
 
ANNEX 1 TO ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION
1. .
Representations and Warranties
1.1 . The Assignor (a) represents and warrants that (i) it is the legal and beneficial owner of the Assigned Interest, (ii) the Assigned Interest is free and clear of any lien, encumbrance or other adverse claim and (iii) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby; and (b) assumes no responsibility with respect to (i) any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, other than statements made by it herein, (ii) the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of the Loan Documents or any collateral thereunder, (iii) the financial condition of the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or other Affiliates or any other Person obligated in respect of any Loan Document or (iv) the performance or observance by the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or other Affiliates or any other Person of any of their respective obligations under any Loan Document.
Assignor
1.2. . The Assignee (a) represents and warrants that (i) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and to become a Lender under the Credit Agreement, (ii) it satisfies the requirements, if any, specified in the Credit Agreement that are required to be satisfied by it in order to acquire the Assigned Interest and become a Lender, (iii) from and after the Effective Date, it shall be bound by the provisions of the Credit Agreement as a Lender thereunder and, to the extent of the Assigned Interest, shall have the obligations of a Lender thereunder, (iv) it has received a copy of the Credit Agreement, together with copies of the most recent financial statements delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 thereof (or, prior to the first such delivery, the financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 thereof), and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Assignment and Assumption and to purchase the Assigned Interest on the basis of which it has made such analysis and decision independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent or any other Lender(v) if it is a Lender that is a U.S. Person, attached hereto is an executed original of IRS Form W-9 certifying that such Lender is exempt from U.S. Federal backup withholding tax and (vi) if it is a Foreign Lender, attached hereto is any documentation required to be delivered by it pursuant to the terms the Credit Agreement (including Section 2.15(f) thereof), duly completed and executed by the Assignee; and (b) agrees that (i) it will, independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent, the Assignor or any other Lender, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Loan Documents, and (ii) it will perform in accordance with their terms all of the obligations which by the terms of the Loan Documents are required to be performed by it as a Lender.
Assignee
2. . From and after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments in respect of the Assigned Interest (including payments of principal, interest, fees and other amounts) to the Assignee whether such amounts have accrued prior to or on or after the Effective Date. The Assignor and the Assignee shall make all appropriate adjustments in payments by the Administrative Agent for periods prior to the Effective Date or with respect to the making of this assignment directly between themselves.
Payments
3. . This Assignment and Assumption shall be binding upon, and inure to the benefit of, the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. This Assignment and Assumption may be executed in any number of counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Assignment and Assumption by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Assignment and Assumption. THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BUT GIVING EFFECT TO FEDERAL LAWS APPLICABLE TO NATIONAL BANKS.
General Provisions
EXHIBIT B
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
as Administrative Agent
Loan and Agency Services Group
10 South Dearborn
Chicago, Illinois 60603
Attention: Margaret Seweryn
Fax: (888) 292-9533
[Date]
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to the Term Credit Agreement dated as of June [ ], 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent. Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings specified in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Company
This notice constitutes a Borrowing Request and the Company hereby gives you notice, pursuant to Section 2.03 of the Credit Agreement, that it requests a Borrowing under the Credit Agreement, and in connection therewith specifies the following information with respect to such Borrowing:
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT C
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Schedules
 
Exhibits
 
GUARANTEE AND COLLATERAL AGREEMENT dated as of June 14, 2012 (this ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the other Loan Parties from time to time party hereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (""), as Administrative Agent.
Agreement
Company
JPMCB
Reference is made to the Credit Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Company, the Lenders from time to time party thereto and JPMCB, as Administrative Agent. The Lenders have agreed to extend credit to the Company subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement. The obligations of the Lenders to extend such credit are conditioned upon, among other things, the execution and delivery of this Agreement. The Loan Parties (other than the Company) are Affiliates of the Company, will derive substantial benefits from the extension of credit to the Company pursuant to the Credit Agreement and are willing to execute and deliver this Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to extend such credit. Accordingly, the parties hereto agree as follows:
Credit Agreement
SECTION 1.01. . (a) Each capitalized term used but not defined herein shall have the meaning specified in the Credit Agreement, that each term defined in the New York UCC (as defined herein) and not defined in this Agreement shall have the meaning specified therein. The term "instrument" shall have the meaning specified in Article 9 of the New York UCC.
Defined Terms
provided
(b) The rules of construction specified in Section 1.03 of the Credit Agreement also apply to this Agreement, .
mutatis mutandis
SECTION 1.02. . As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Other Defined Terms
"" has the meaning set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement.
ABL Agent
"" has the meaning set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement.
ABL Collateral Documents
"" has the meaning set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement.
ABL Liens
"" has the meaning set forth in the Intercreditor Agreement.
ABL Security Agreement
"" means any Person that is or may become obligated to any Grantor under, with respect to or on account of an Account.
Account Debtor
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.01.
Article 9 Collateral
"" means Article 9 Collateral and Pledged Collateral.
Collateral
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Company
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.02.
Contributing Party
"" means any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any Person any right under any Copyright now or hereafter owned by any other Person or that such other Person otherwise has the right to license, and all rights of any such Person under any such agreement.
Copyright License
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by such Person: (a) all copyright rights in any work subject to the copyright laws of the United States of America or any other country, whether as author, assignee, transferee or otherwise, and (b) all registrations and recordings thereof, and all registration and recording applications filed in connection therewith, including registrations, recordings and applications in the United States Copyright Office or any similar office in any other country, including, in the case of any Grantor, any of the foregoing set forth next to its name on Schedule 9 to the Perfection Certificate.
Copyrights
"" means, for purposes of Section 7.16, the Secured Obligations.
Corresponding Debt
"" has the meaning set forth in the recitals hereto.
Credit Agreement
"" means the Discharge (as defined in the Intercreditor Agreement) of the ABL Obligations (as defined in the Intercreditor Agreement).
Discharge of ABL Obligations
"" means (a) any property if, to the extent and for so long the Security Interest may not be granted therein as a matter applicable law, (b) any lease, license, contract or agreement or any rights or interests thereunder if, to the extent and for so long as the grant of the Security Interest would constitute or result in (A) the unenforceability under any applicable law of any right, title or interest of any Grantor therein or (B) a breach or termination pursuant to the terms of, or a default under, any such lease, license, contract or agreement (other than to the extent that any such law or term would be rendered ineffective pursuant to UCC or any other applicable law or principles of equity); that, to the extent severable, any portion of such lease, license, contract or agreement that does not result in any of the consequences specified above, including any Proceeds of such lease, license, contract or agreement, shall not constitute an Excluded Asset; (c) the Excluded Equity Interests, (d) motor vehicles and other assets subject to certificates of title and (e) any application to register any Trademark, service mark or other mark prior to the filing under applicable law of a verified statement of use (or the equivalent) for such Trademark, service mark or other mark to the extent the creation of a security interest therein or the grant of a mortgage thereon would void or invalidate such Trademark, service mark or other mark.
Excluded Asset
provided
 
"" means (a) any Retail Store Deposit Account, (b) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for the payment of salaries and wages and (c) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for payment of medical or insurance reimbursement, workers' compensation and similar expenses.
Excluded Deposit Account
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.01.
Excluded Equity Interests
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.04.
Federal Securities Laws
"" means the Company and each other Loan Party.
Grantors
"" means the Company and each other Loan Party.
Guarantors
"" means all intellectual and similar property of every kind and nature, including inventions, designs, Patents, Copyrights, Licenses, Trademarks, trade secrets, domain names, confidential or proprietary technical and business information, know-how, show-how or other data or information, software and databases and all embodiments or fixations thereof and related documentation, registrations and franchises, and all additions, improvements and accessions to, and books and records describing or used in connection with, any of the foregoing.
Intellectual Property
"" means the Intercreditor Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time), among JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative and collateral agent for, and acting on behalf of, the ABL Secured Parties identified therein, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative and collateral agent for, and acting on behalf of, the Term Secured Parties identified therein.
Intercreditor Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.02(b).
IP Security Agreements
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
JPMCB
"" means any Patent License, Trademark License, Copyright License or other license or sublicense agreement to which any Grantor is a party, including, in the case of any Grantor, any of the foregoing set forth next to its name on Schedule 9 to the Perfection Certificate.
License
"" means (a) the due and punctual payment by the Company of (i) the principal of and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise and (ii) all other monetary obligations of the Company under the Credit Agreement and each of the other Loan Documents, including obligations to pay fees,
Loan Document Obligations
 
expense reimbursement obligations and indemnification obligations, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), (b) the due and punctual performance of all other obligations of the Company under or pursuant to the Credit Agreement and each of the other Loan Documents, and (c) the due and punctual payment and performance of all the obligations of each other Loan Party under or pursuant to this Agreement and each of the other Loan Documents (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding).
"" means the Uniform Commercial Code as from time to time in effect in the State of New York.
New York UCC
"" means any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any Person any right to make, use or sell any invention on which a Patent now or hereafter owned by any other Person, or that any other Person now or hereafter otherwise has the right to license, is in existence, and all rights of any such Person under any such agreement.
Patent License
"" means any amount that a Loan Party owes to the Administrative Agent under Section 7.16.
Parallel Debt
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by such Person: (a) all letters patent of the United States of America or the equivalent thereof in any other country, all registrations and recordings thereof and all applications for letters patent of the United States of America or the equivalent thereof in any other country, including registrations, recordings and pending applications in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or any similar offices in any other country, including, in the case of any Grantor, any of the foregoing set forth next to its name on Schedule 9 to the Perfection Certificate, and (b) all reissues, continuations, divisions, continuations-in-part, renewals or extensions thereof, and the inventions disclosed or claimed therein, including the right to make, use and/or sell the inventions disclosed or claimed therein.
Patents
"" means the Perfection Certificate dated the Effective Date delivered by the Company and the Acquired Company to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Article IV(h) of the Credit Agreement.
Perfection Certificate
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.01.
Pledged Collateral
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.01.
Pledged Debt Securities
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.01.
Pledged Equity Interests
"" means any promissory notes, stock certificates, unit certificates, limited or unlimited liability membership certificates or other certificated securities now or hereafter included in the Pledged Collateral, including all certificates, instruments or other documents representing or evidencing any Pledged Collateral.
Pledged Securities
 
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.04(b)(ii).
Pledgor
"" means any Deposit Account that is an operating account maintained by any Grantor solely for the use of one of its retail stores (or a group of 80 or fewer retail stores) in which payments received from customers are deposited and which is not an account to which amounts held in other deposit accounts of the Grantors are swept, that (a) such Grantor shall cause all amounts on deposit in such Deposit Account (other than amounts reasonably determined by such Grantor to be required for the operating needs of the retail store or stores to which such Deposit Account relates), to be swept on each business day into one or more Deposit Accounts that are not Excluded Deposit Accounts and (b) no such Deposit Account shall contain payment of or in respect of any Credit Card Account Receivable of any Grantor.
Retail Store Deposit Account
provided
"" means (a) all the Loan Document Obligations and (b) all the Secured Swap Obligations.
Secured Obligations
"" means the due and punctual payment and performance of any and all obligations of the Company and each Subsidiary under each Swap Agreement that (a) is with a counterparty that is the Administrative Agent, any Arranger or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing, or any Person that, at the time such Swap Agreement was entered into, was the Administrative Agent, an Arranger or an Affiliate of any of the foregoing, (b) is in effect on the Effective Date with a counterparty that is a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender as of the Effective Date or (c) is entered into after the Effective Date with any counterparty that is a Lender of an Affiliate of a Lender at the time such Swap Agreement is entered into.
Secured Swap Obligations
"" means (a) the Lenders, (b) the Administrative Agent, (c) the Arrangers, (d) the Syndication Agent, (e) each counterparty to a Swap Agreement the obligations under which constitute Secured Swap Obligations, (f) the beneficiaries of each indemnification obligation undertaken by any Loan Party under any Loan Document and (g) the permitted successors and assigns of each of the foregoing.
Secured Parties
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.01(a).
Security Interest
"" means (a) the Subsidiaries identified on Schedule I and (b) each other Subsidiary that becomes a party to this Agreement after the Effective Date.
Subsidiary Loan Parties
"" means an instrument in the form of Exhibit I hereto, or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Supplement
"" means any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any Person any right to use any Trademark now or hereafter owned by any other Person, or that any other Person otherwise has the right to license, and all rights of any such Person under any such agreement.
Trademark License
 
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by such Person: (a) all trademarks, service marks, trade names, corporate names, company names, business names, fictitious business names, trade styles, trade dress, logos, other source or business identifiers, designs and general intangibles of like nature, now existing or hereafter adopted or acquired, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all registration and recording applications filed in connection therewith, including registrations, recordings and applications in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or any similar offices in any other country or any political subdivision thereof, and all extensions or renewals thereof, including, in the case of any Grantor, any of the foregoing set forth next to its name on Schedule 9 to the Perfection Certificate, (b) all goodwill associated therewith or symbolized thereby and (c) all other assets, rights and interests that uniquely reflect or embody such goodwill.
Trademarks
SECTION 2.01. . Each Guarantor irrevocably and unconditionally guarantees, jointly with the other Guarantors and severally, as a primary obligor and not merely as a surety, the due and punctual payment and performance of the Secured Obligations. Each Guarantor further agrees that the Secured Obligations may be extended or renewed, in whole or in part, or amended or modified, without notice to or further assent from it, and that it will remain bound upon its guarantee hereunder notwithstanding any extension, renewal, amendment or modification of any Secured Obligation. Each Guarantor waives presentment to, demand of payment from and protest to the Company or any other Loan Party of any of the Secured Obligations, and also waives notice of acceptance of its guarantee hereunder and notice of protest for nonpayment.
Guarantee
SECTION 2.02. . Each Guarantor further agrees that its guarantee hereunder constitutes a guarantee of payment when due (whether or not any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar proceeding shall have stayed the accrual or collection of any of the Secured Obligations or operated as a discharge thereof) and not merely of collection, and waives any right to require that any resort be had by the Administrative Agent or any other Secured Party to any security held for the payment of the Secured Obligations or to any balance of any deposit account or credit on the books of the Administrative Agent or any other Secured Party in favor of the Company, any other Loan Party or any other Person. Each Guarantor agrees that its guarantee hereunder is continuing in nature and applies to all Secured Obligations, whether currently existing or hereafter incurred.
Guarantee of Payment; Continuing Guarantee
SECTION 2.03. . (a) Except for termination of a Guarantor's obligations hereunder as expressly provided in Section 7.12, the obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination for any reason, including any claim of waiver, release, surrender, alteration or compromise, and shall not be subject to any defense or set-off, counterclaim, recoupment or termination whatsoever by reason of the invalidity, illegality or
No Limitations
 
unenforceability of the Secured Obligations, any impossibility in the performance of the Secured Obligations, or otherwise. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall not be discharged or impaired or otherwise affected by (i) the failure of the Administrative Agent or any other Secured Party to assert any claim or demand or to enforce any right or remedy under the provisions of any Loan Document or otherwise; (ii) any rescission, waiver, amendment or modification of, or any release from any of the terms or provisions of, any Loan Document or any other agreement, including with respect to any other Guarantor under this Agreement; (iii) the release of any security held by the Administrative Agent or any other Secured Party for any of the Secured Obligations; (iv) any default, failure or delay, wilful or otherwise, in the performance of any of the Secured Obligations; or (v) any other act or omission that may or might in any manner or to any extent vary the risk of any Guarantor or otherwise operate as a discharge of any Guarantor as a matter of law or equity (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of all the Secured Obligations). Each Guarantor expressly authorizes the Secured Parties to take and hold security for the payment and performance of the Secured Obligations, to exchange, waive or release any or all such security (with or without consideration), to enforce or apply such security and direct the order and manner of any sale thereof in their sole discretion or to release or substitute any one or more other guarantors or obligors upon or in respect of the Secured Obligations, all without affecting the obligations of any Guarantor hereunder.
(b) To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Guarantor waives any defense based on or arising out of any defense of the Company or any other Loan Party or the unenforceability of the Secured Obligations or any part thereof from any cause, or the cessation from any cause of the liability of the Company or any other Loan Party, other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of all the Secured Obligations. The Administrative Agent and the other Secured Parties may, at their election, foreclose on any security held by one or more of them by one or more judicial or nonjudicial sales, accept an assignment of any such security in lieu of foreclosure, compromise or adjust any part of the Secured Obligations, make any other accommodation with the Company or any other Loan Party or exercise any other right or remedy available to them against the Company or any other Loan Party, without affecting or impairing in any way the liability of any Guarantor hereunder except to the extent the Secured Obligations have been indefeasibly paid in full in cash. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Guarantor waives any defense arising out of any such election even though such election operates, pursuant to applicable law, to impair or to extinguish any right of reimbursement or subrogation or other right or remedy of such Guarantor against the Company or any other Loan Party, as the case may be, or any security.
SECTION 2.04. . Each Guarantor agrees that its guarantee hereunder shall continue to be effective or be reinstated, as the case may be, if at any time payment, or any part thereof, of any Secured Obligation is rescinded or must otherwise be restored by the Administrative Agent or any other Secured Party upon the bankruptcy or reorganization of the Company, any other Loan Party or otherwise.
Reinstatement
 
SECTION 2.05. . In furtherance of the foregoing and not in limitation of any other right that the Administrative Agent or any other Secured Party has at law or in equity against any Guarantor by virtue hereof, upon the failure of the Company or any other Loan Party to pay any Secured Obligation when and as the same shall become due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, after notice of prepayment or otherwise, each Guarantor hereby promises to and will forthwith pay, or cause to be paid, to the Administrative Agent for distribution to the applicable Secured Parties in cash the amount of such unpaid Secured Obligation. Upon payment by any Guarantor of any sums to the Administrative Agent as provided above, all rights of such Guarantor against the Company or any other Loan Party arising as a result thereof by way of right of subrogation, contribution, reimbursement, indemnity or otherwise shall in all respects be subject to Article VI.
Agreement to Pay; Subrogation
SECTION 2.06. . Each Guarantor (a) assumes all responsibility for being and keeping itself informed of the Company's and each other Loan Party's financial condition and assets, and of all other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of the Secured Obligations and the nature, scope and extent of the risks that such Guarantor assumes and incurs hereunder, and (b) agrees that none of the Administrative Agent or the other Secured Parties will have any duty to advise such Guarantor of information known to it or any of them regarding such circumstances or risks.
Information
SECTION 3.01. . As security for the payment or performance, as the case may be, in full of the Secured Obligations, each Grantor hereby assigns and pledges to the Administrative Agent, its successors and assigns, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, and hereby grants to the Administrative Agent, its successors and assigns, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest in all of such Grantor's right, title and interest in, to and under (a)(i) the shares of capital stock and other Equity Interests now owned or at any time hereafter acquired by such Grantor, including those set forth opposite the name of such Grantor on Schedule 6 to the Perfection Certificate, and (ii) all certificates and any other instruments representing all such Equity Interests (collectively, the ""), that the Pledged Equity Interests shall not include (A) more than 65% of the issued and outstanding Equity Interests entitled to vote (within the meaning of Treas. Reg. Section 1.956-2(c)(2)) of any Eligible Foreign Subsidiary, (B) Equity Interests in Foreign Subsidiaries that are not Eligible Foreign Subsidiaries, (C) Equity Interests in any non-wholly owned subsidiary of any Grantor if, to the extent and for so long as such assignment, pledge and grant is prohibited by the organizational documents of such subsidiary, (D) prior to the release of the Existing Acquired Company Mortgage on the parcels of real property owned by White Marsh Distribution, LLC, a Maryland limited liability company, Equity Interests in White Marsh Distribution, LLC and (E) prior to the release of the Existing Acquired Company Mortgage on the parcels of real property owned by FB Distro Distribution Center, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, Equity Interests in FB Distro
Pledge
Pledged Equity Interests
provided
 
Distribution Center, LLC (the Equity Interests so excluded under clauses (A), (B), (C), (D) and (E) above being collectively referred to herein as the ""); (b)(i) the debt securities now owned or at any time hereafter acquired by such Grantor, including those listed opposite the name of such Grantor on Schedule 7 to the Perfection Certificate, and (ii) the promissory notes and any other instruments evidencing all such debt securities (collectively, the ""); (c) all other property that may be delivered to and held by the Administrative Agent pursuant to the terms of this Section 3.01 and Section 3.02; (d) subject to Section 3.06, all payments of principal or interest, dividends, cash, instruments and other property from time to time received, receivable or otherwise distributed in respect of, in exchange for or upon the conversion of, and all other Proceeds received in respect of, the securities referred to in clauses (a) and (b) above; (e) subject to Section 3.06, all rights and privileges of such Grantor with respect to the securities and other property referred to in clauses (a), (b), (c) and (d) above; and (f) all Proceeds of any of the foregoing (the items referred to in clauses (a) through (f) above being collectively referred to as the "").
Excluded Equity Interests
Pledged Debt Securities
Pledged Collateral
SECTION 3.02. . (a) Each Grantor agrees to deliver or cause to be delivered to the Administrative Agent any and all Pledged Securities (other than (i) promissory notes and other evidences of Indebtedness of any Person other than the Company or any Subsidiary in a principal amount of less than $5,000,000 and (ii) Pledged Equity Interests in any Inactive Subsidiary) (A) on the date hereof, in the case of any such Pledged Securities owned by such Grantor on the date hereof and (B) promptly after the acquisition thereof (and, in any event, as required under the Credit Agreement), in the case of any such Pledged Securities acquired by such Grantor after the date hereof.
Delivery of the Pledged Collateral
(b) Each Grantor will cause (i) all Indebtedness for borrowed money owed to such Grantor by the Company or any Subsidiary and (ii) all Indebtedness for borrowed money in a principal amount of $5,000,000 or more owed to such Grantor by any other Person to be evidenced by a duly executed promissory note that is delivered to the Administrative Agent (i) on the date hereof, in the case of any such promissory note existing on the date hereof, and (ii) promptly after the acquisition thereof (and, in any event, as required under the Credit Agreement), in the case of any such promissory note acquired by such Grantor after the date hereof.
(c) Upon delivery to the Administrative Agent, (i) any Pledged Securities shall be accompanied by undated stock powers duly executed by the applicable Grantor in blank or other undated instruments of transfer reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and by such other instruments and documents as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request and (ii) all other property comprising part of the Pledged Collateral shall be accompanied by undated proper instruments of assignment duly executed by the applicable Grantor in blank and such other instruments and documents as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request. Each delivery of Pledged Securities after the date hereof shall be accompanied by a schedule describing such Pledged Securities, that failure to attach any such schedule hereto shall not affect the validity of the pledge of any Pledged Securities.
provided
 
(d) In the event that any Grantor (i) merges or consolidates with any other entity or (ii) liquidates or dissolves, in each case in a transaction permitted by Section 6.03 of the Credit Agreement, the Company and the Administrative Agent shall reasonably cooperate to provide for the return to the Company, following the consummation of such transaction, of any stock certificates that represented Equity Interests of such Grantor constituting Pledged Equity Interests that are in the possession of the Administrative Agent so that such stock certificates may be cancelled.
SECTION 3.03. . The Grantors jointly and severally represent and warrant to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, that:
Representations and Warranties
(a) Schedule 6 and Schedule 7 to the Perfection Certificate set forth, respectively, as of the Effective Date, a true and complete list, with respect to each Grantor, of (i) all the Pledged Equity Interests owned by such Grantor and the percentage of the issued and outstanding units of each class of the Equity Interests of the issuer thereof represented by the Pledged Equity Interests owned by such Grantor and (ii) all the Pledged Debt Securities (other than promissory notes and other evidences of Indebtedness of any Person other than the Company or any Subsidiary in a principal amount of less than $5,000,000) owned by such Grantor;
(b) the Pledged Equity Interests and Pledged Debt Securities have been duly and validly authorized and issued by the issuers thereof and (i) in the case of Pledged Equity Interests, are fully paid and nonassessable and (ii) in the case of Pledged Debt Securities, are legal, valid and binding obligations of the issuers thereof, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law; that the foregoing representations, insofar as they relate to the Pledged Debt Securities issued by a Person other than the Company or any Subsidiary, are made to the knowledge of the Grantors;
provided
(c) except for restrictions and limitations imposed by the Loan Documents or securities laws generally and, in the case of clause (ii), except for limitations existing as of the Effective Date in the articles or certificate of incorporation, bylaws or other organizational documents of any Subsidiary, (i) the Pledged Collateral is and will continue to be freely transferable and assignable, and (ii) none of the Pledged Collateral (other than, except in the case of a prohibition, Pledged Equity Interests in any Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary) is or will be subject to any option, right of first refusal, shareholders agreement, charter or by-law provisions or contractual restriction of any nature (other than the ABL Credit Agreement and the Intercreditor Agreement) that might prohibit, impair, delay or otherwise affect the pledge of such Pledged Collateral hereunder, the sale or disposition thereof pursuant hereto or the exercise by the Administrative Agent of rights and remedies hereunder;
 
(d) each of the Grantors has the power and authority to pledge the Pledged Collateral pledged by it hereunder in the manner hereby done or contemplated;
(e) no consent or approval of any Governmental Authority, any securities exchange or any other Person is or will be required for the validity of the pledge effected hereby (other than such as have been obtained and are in full force and effect);
(f) by virtue of the execution and delivery by the Grantors of this Agreement, when any Pledged Securities are delivered to the Administrative Agent in accordance with this Agreement, the Administrative Agent will obtain a legal, valid and perfected lien upon and security interest in such Pledged Securities as security for the payment and performance of the Secured Obligations; and
(g) subject to applicable local law in the case of any Equity Interests in any Foreign Subsidiary, the pledge effected hereby is effective to vest in the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, the rights of the Administrative Agent in the Pledged Collateral as set forth herein.
SECTION 3.04. . Each Grantor acknowledges and agrees that to the extent each interest in any limited liability company or limited partnership controlled now or in the future by any Grantor and pledged hereunder shall be represented by a certificate, such interest shall be a "security" within the meaning of Article 8 of the New York UCC and shall be governed by Article 8 of the New York UCC. Each Grantor further acknowledges and agrees that with respect to any interest in any limited liability company or limited partnership controlled now or in the future by such Grantor and pledged hereunder that is not a "security" within the meaning of Article 8 of the New York UCC, such Grantor shall at no time elect to treat any such interest as a "security" within the meaning of Article 8 of the New York UCC, nor shall such interest be represented by a certificate, unless such Grantor provides prior written notification to the Administrative Agent of such election and such interest is thereafter represented by a certificate that is promptly delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to the terms hereof.
Certification of Limited Liability Company and Limited Partnership Interests
SECTION 3.05. . The Administrative Agent, on behalf of the Secured Parties, shall have the right (in its sole and absolute discretion) to hold the Pledged Securities in the name of the applicable Grantor, endorsed or assigned in blank or in favor of the Administrative Agent or, if an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, in its own name as pledgee or in the name of its nominee (as pledgee or as sub-agent). Each Grantor will promptly give to the Administrative Agent copies of any material notices or other communications received by it with respect to Pledged Securities registered in the name of such Grantor. If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, the Administrative Agent shall at all times have the right to exchange the certificates representing Pledged Securities for certificates of smaller or larger denominations for any reasonable purpose consistent with this Agreement.
Registration in Nominee Name; Denominations
 
SECTION 3.06. . (a) Unless and until an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and the Administrative Agent shall have notified the Grantors that their rights under this Section 3.06 are being suspended:
Voting Rights; Dividends and Interest
(i) each Grantor shall be entitled to exercise any and all voting and/or other consensual rights and powers inuring to an owner of Pledged Collateral or any part thereof for any purpose consistent with the terms of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, that such rights and powers shall not be exercised in any manner that could reasonably be expected to materially and adversely affect the rights inuring to a holder of any Pledged Collateral or the rights and remedies of any of the Administrative Agent or any other Secured Party under this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the ability of the Secured Parties to exercise the same;
provided
(ii) the Administrative Agent shall execute and deliver to each Grantor, or cause to be executed and delivered to such Grantor, all such proxies, powers of attorney and other instruments as such Grantor may reasonably request for the purpose of enabling such Grantor to exercise the voting and/or consensual rights and powers it is entitled to exercise pursuant to paragraph (a)(i) of this Section; and
(iii) each Grantor shall be entitled to receive and retain any and all dividends, interest, principal and other distributions paid on or distributed in respect of the Pledged Collateral, but only to the extent that such dividends, interest, principal and other distributions are permitted by, and are otherwise paid or distributed in accordance with, the terms and conditions of the Credit Agreement, the other Loan Documents and applicable laws, that any noncash dividends, interest, principal or other distributions that would constitute Pledged Equity Interests or Pledged Debt Securities, whether resulting from a subdivision, combination or reclassification of the outstanding Equity Interests of the issuer of any Pledged Securities or received in exchange for Pledged Securities or any part thereof, or in redemption thereof, or as a result of any merger, consolidation, acquisition or other exchange of assets to which such issuer may be a party or otherwise, shall be and become part of the Pledged Collateral and, if received by any Grantor and required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent hereunder, shall not be commingled by such Grantor with any of its other funds or property but shall be held separate and apart therefrom, shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the other Secured Parties and shall be forthwith delivered to the Administrative Agent in the same form as so received (with any necessary endorsements, stock or note powers and other instruments of transfer reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent).
provided
 
(b) Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, after the Administrative Agent shall have notified the Grantors of the suspension of their rights under paragraph (a)(iii) of this Section, all rights of any Grantor to dividends, interest, principal or other distributions that such Grantor is authorized to receive pursuant to paragraph (a)(iii) of this Section shall cease, and all such rights shall thereupon become vested in the Administrative Agent, which shall have the sole and exclusive right and authority to receive and retain such dividends, interest, principal or other distributions. All dividends, interest, principal or other distributions received by any Grantor contrary to the provisions of this Section shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the other Secured Parties, shall be segregated from other property or funds of such Grantor and shall be forthwith delivered to the Administrative Agent upon demand in the same form as so received (with any necessary endorsements, stock powers or other instruments of transfer reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent). Any and all money and other property paid over to or received by the Administrative Agent pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph (b) shall be retained by the Administrative Agent in an account to be established by the Administrative Agent upon receipt of such money or other property, shall be held as security for the payment and performance of the Secured Obligations and shall be applied in accordance with the provisions of Section 5.02. After all Events of Default have been cured or waived and the Company has delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company to that effect, the Administrative Agent shall promptly repay to each Grantor (without interest) all dividends, interest, principal or other distributions that such Grantor would otherwise be permitted to retain pursuant to the terms of paragraph (a)(iii) of this Section and that remain in such account.
(c) Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, after the Administrative Agent shall have notified the Grantors of the suspension of their rights under paragraph (a)(i) of this Section, all rights of any Grantor to exercise the voting and consensual rights and powers it is entitled to exercise pursuant to paragraph (a)(i) of this Section, and the obligations of the Administrative Agent under paragraph (a)(ii) of this Section, shall cease, and all such rights shall thereupon become vested in the Administrative Agent, which shall have the sole and exclusive right and authority to exercise such voting and consensual rights and powers, that, unless otherwise directed by the Required Lenders, the Administrative Agent shall have the right from time to time following and during the continuance of an Event of Default to permit the Grantors to exercise such rights. After all Events of Default have been cured or waived, and the Company has delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company to that effect, all rights vested in the Administrative Agent pursuant to this paragraph shall cease, and the Grantors shall have the voting and consensual rights and powers they would otherwise be entitled to exercise pursuant to paragraph (a)(i) of this Section and the obligations of the Administrative Agent under paragraph (a)(ii) of this Section shall be in effect.
provided
(d) Any notice given by the Administrative Agent to the Grantors suspending their rights under paragraph (a) of this Section (i) may be given by telephone if promptly confirmed in writing, (ii) may be given to one or more of the Grantors at the same or different times and (iii) may suspend the rights and powers of the Grantors under
 
paragraph (a)(i) or paragraph (a)(iii) in part without suspending all such rights or powers (as specified by the Administrative Agent in its sole and absolute discretion) and without waiving or otherwise affecting the Administrative Agent's right to give additional notices from time to time suspending other rights and powers so long as an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
SECTION 4.01. . (a) As security for the payment or performance, as the case may be, in full of the Secured Obligations, each Grantor hereby grants to the Administrative Agent, its successors and assigns, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest (the "") in all right, title and interest in, to and under any and all of the following assets now owned or at any time hereafter acquired by such Grantor or in, or to or under which such Grantor now has or at any time hereafter may acquire any right, title or interest (collectively, the ""):
Security Interest
Security Interest
Article 9 Collateral
(i) all Accounts;
(ii) all Chattel Paper;
(iii) all Money and Deposit Accounts;
(iv) all Documents;
(v) all Equipment;
(vi) all General Intangibles, including all Intellectual Property;
(vii) all Instruments;
(viii) all Inventory;
(ix) all other Goods;
(x) all Investment Property;
(xi) all Letter-of-Credit Rights;
(xii) all Commercial Tort Claims specifically described on Schedule 10 to the Perfection Certificate, as such schedule may be supplemented from time to time (it being understood such Schedule 10 shall be deemed supplemented by any reference to any Commercial Tort Claim (and the description thereof) contained in a Supplemental Perfection Certificate delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(e) of the Credit Agreement, in the same form as such reference and description are set forth on such Supplemental Perfection Certificate);
 
(xiii) all books and records pertaining to the Article 9 Collateral; and
(xiv) to the extent not otherwise included, all Proceeds and products of any and all of the foregoing and all collateral security and guarantees given by any Person with respect to any of the foregoing.
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, to the extent and for so long as any asset is an Excluded Asset, the Security Interest granted under this Section shall not attach to, and Article 9 Collateral shall not include, such asset (it being understood that the Security Interest shall immediately attach to, and Article 9 Collateral shall immediately include, any such asset (or any portion thereof) upon such asset (or such portion thereof) ceasing to be an Excluded Asset).
(b) Each Grantor hereby irrevocably authorizes the Administrative Agent at any time and from time to time to file in any relevant jurisdiction any initial financing statements (including fixture filings) with respect to the Article 9 Collateral or any part thereof and amendments thereto that (i) indicate the Collateral as all assets of such Grantor or words of similar effect as being of an equal or lesser scope or with greater detail, and (ii) contain the information required by Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code of each applicable jurisdiction for the filing of any financing statement or amendment, including (A) whether such Grantor is an organization, the type of organization and any organizational identification number issued to such Grantor and (B) in the case of a financing statement filed as a fixture filing, a sufficient description of the real property to which such Article 9 Collateral relates. Each Grantor agrees to provide such information to the Administrative Agent promptly upon request.
Each Grantor also ratifies its authorization for the Administrative Agent to file in any relevant jurisdiction any initial financing statements or amendments thereto if filed prior to the date hereof.
The Administrative Agent is further authorized to file with the United States Patent and Trademark Office or United States Copyright Office (or any successor office or any similar office in any other country) such documents as may be reasonably necessary or advisable for the purpose of perfecting, confirming, continuing, enforcing or protecting the Security Interest granted by each Grantor, without the signature of any Grantor, and naming any Grantor or the Grantors as debtors and the Administrative Agent as secured party.
(c) The Security Interest and the security interest granted pursuant to Article III are granted as security only and shall not subject the Administrative Agent or any other Secured Party to, or in any way alter or modify, any obligation or liability of any Grantor with respect to or arising out of the Collateral.
SECTION 4.02. . The Grantors jointly and severally represent and warrant to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, that:
Representations and Warranties
(a) Each Grantor has good and valid rights in and title to the Article 9 Collateral with respect to which it has purported to grant the Security Interest, except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes and Liens permitted by Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement and except as could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and has full power and authority to grant to the Administrative Agent the Security Interest in such Article 9 Collateral pursuant hereto and to execute, deliver and perform its obligations in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, without the consent or approval of any other Person other than any consent or approval that has been obtained and except to the extent that failure to obtain such consent or approval could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(b) The Perfection Certificate has been duly prepared, completed and executed and the information set forth therein, including the exact legal name of each Grantor, is correct and complete as of the Effective Date. The Uniform Commercial Code financing statements (including fixture filings) or other appropriate filings, recordings or registrations prepared by the Administrative Agent based upon the information provided to the Administrative Agent in the Perfection Certificate for filing in each governmental, municipal or other office specified in Schedules 2A and 2B to the Perfection Certificate (or specified by notice from the Company to the Administrative Agent after the Effective Date in the case of filings, recordings or registrations required by Section 5.04 or 5.12 of the Credit Agreement), are all the filings, recordings and registrations (other than filings required to be made in the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office in order to perfect the Security Interest in Article 9 Collateral consisting of United States Patents, Trademarks and Copyrights) that are necessary to publish notice of and protect the validity of and to establish a legal, valid and perfected security interest in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) in respect of all Article 9 Collateral in which the Security Interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registration in the United States of America (or any political subdivision thereof) and its territories and possessions, and no further or subsequent filing, refiling, recording, rerecording, registration or reregistration is necessary in any such jurisdiction, except as provided under applicable law with respect to the filing of continuation statements. A Patent and Trademark Security Agreement in the form of Exhibit II hereto, and a Copyright Security Agreement in the form of Exhibit III hereto (such agreements being collectively referred to herein as the ""), in each case containing a description of the Article 9 Collateral consisting of United States registered Patents, United States registered Trademarks (and Trademarks for which United States registration applications are pending) and United States registered Copyrights or exclusive Copyright Licenses, as applicable, and executed by each Grantor owning any such Article 9 Collateral, have been delivered to the Administrative Agent for recording with the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office pursuant to 35 U.S.C.  261, 15 U.S.C.  1060 or 17 U.S.C.  205 and the regulations thereunder, as applicable, to protect the validity of and to establish a legal, valid and perfected security interest in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, in respect of all Article 9 Collateral consisting of Patents, Trademarks, Copyrights and
IP Security Agreements
 
exclusive Copyright Licenses in which a security interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registration in the United States of America (or any political subdivision thereof) and its territories and possessions, and no further or subsequent filing, refiling, recording, rerecording, registration or reregistration is necessary (other than such actions as are necessary to perfect the Security Interest with respect to any Article 9 Collateral consisting of Patents, Trademarks, Copyrights and exclusive Copyright Licenses (or registration or recordation or application for registration or recordation thereof) acquired or developed after the Effective Date).
(c) The Security Interest constitutes (i) a legal and valid security interest in all the Article 9 Collateral securing the payment and performance of the Secured Obligations, (ii) subject to Section 4.02(b), a perfected security interest in all Article 9 Collateral in which a security interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registering a financing statement or analogous document in the United States of America (or any political subdivision thereof) and its territories and possessions pursuant to the Uniform Commercial Code or other applicable law in such jurisdictions and (iii) subject to Section 3.02(b), a security interest that shall be perfected in all Article 9 Collateral in which a security interest may be perfected upon the receipt and recording of the applicable IP Security Agreement with the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, within the three-month period (commencing as of the date hereof) pursuant to 35 U.S.C.  261 or 15 U.S.C.  1060 or the one month period (commencing as of the date hereof) pursuant to 17 U.S.C.  205. The Security Interest is and shall be prior to any other Lien on any of the Article 9 Collateral, other than (i) Liens permitted under Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement that have priority as a matter of law and (ii) ABL Liens in respect of any of the Article 9 Collateral that constitutes ABL Priority Collateral.
(d) Schedule 9 to the Perfection Certificate sets forth, as of the Effective Date, a true and complete list, with respect to each Grantor, of (i) all Patents that have been granted by the United States Patent and Trademark Office, (ii) all Copyrights that have been registered with the United States Copyright Office, (iii) all Trademarks that have been registered with the United States Patent and Trademark Office and Trademarks for which United States registration applications are pending, and (iv) all exclusive Copyright Licenses under which such Grantor is a licensee, in each case truly and completely specifying the name of the registered owner, title, type or mark, registration or application number, expiration date (if already registered) or filing date, a brief description thereof and, if applicable, the licensee and licensor.
(e) Schedule 10 to the Perfection Certificate sets forth, as of the Effective Date, a true and complete list, with respect to each Grantor, of each Commercial Tort Claim in respect of which a complaint or a counterclaim has been filed by such Grantor, seeking damages in an amount reasonably estimated to exceed $1,000,000, including a summary description of such claim.
SECTION 4.03. . (a) Each Grantor shall, at its own expense, take any and all actions commercially reasonable necessary to defend title to the Article 9 Collateral against all Persons, except with respect to Article 9 Collateral that such
Covenants
 
Grantor determines in its reasonable business judgment is no longer necessary or beneficial to the conduct of such Grantor's business, and to defend the Security Interest of the Administrative Agent in Article 9 Collateral and the priority thereof against any Lien not permitted pursuant to Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement.
(b) Each Grantor agrees, at its own expense, to execute, acknowledge, deliver and cause to be duly filed all such further instruments, financing statements, agreements and documents and take all such other actions as the Administrative Agent may from time to time reasonably request to assure, preserve, protect and perfect the Security Interest and the rights and remedies created hereby, including the payment of any fees and Taxes required in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the granting of the Security Interest and the filing and recording of any financing statements (including fixture filings) or other documents in connection herewith or therewith.
(c) Subject to the limitation on inspection rights and reimbursement obligations in the Credit Agreement, the Administrative Agent and such Persons as the Administrative Agent may reasonably designate shall have the right, at the Grantors' own cost and expense, to inspect the Article 9 Collateral, all records related thereto (and to make extracts and copies from such records) and the premises upon which any of the Article 9 Collateral is located, to discuss the Grantors' affairs with the officers of the Grantors and their independent accountants and to verify under reasonable procedures, in accordance with Section 5.09 of the Credit Agreement, the validity, amount, quality, quantity, value, condition and status of, or any other matter relating to, the Article 9 Collateral, including, in the case of Accounts or Article 9 Collateral in the possession of any third party, by contacting, after the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, Account Debtors or the third party possessing such Article 9 Collateral for the purpose of making such a verification. The Administrative Agent shall have the absolute right to share any information it gains from such inspection or verification with any Secured Party (it being acknowledged that such Secured Party may be subject to confidentiality obligations with respect to such information, including pursuant to Section 9.12 of the Credit Agreement).
(d) At its option, the Administrative Agent may discharge past due Taxes, assessments, charges, fees and Liens at any time levied or placed on the Article 9 Collateral that are not permitted pursuant to the Credit Agreement, and may pay for the maintenance and preservation of the Article 9 Collateral to the extent any Grantor fails to do so as required by this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, and each Grantor jointly and severally agrees to reimburse the Administrative Agent on demand for any payment made or any documented expense incurred by the Administrative Agent pursuant to the foregoing authorization, that nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted as excusing any Grantor from the performance of, or imposing any obligation on the Administrative Agent or any Secured Party to cure or perform, any covenants or other promises of any Grantor with respect to Taxes, assessments, charges, fees and Liens and maintenance as set forth herein or in the other Loan Documents.
provided
 
(e) Each Grantor shall remain liable to observe and perform all the conditions and obligations to be observed and performed by it under each contract, agreement or instrument relating to the Article 9 Collateral, all in accordance with the terms and conditions thereof, and each Grantor jointly and severally agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Administrative Agent and the Secured Parties from and against any and all liability for such performance.
(f) None of the Grantors shall make or permit to be made any transfer of the Article 9 Collateral and each Grantor shall remain at all times in possession of the Article 9 Collateral owned by it, except that unless and until the Administrative Agent shall notify the Grantors that an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and that during the continuance thereof the Grantors shall not sell, convey, lease, assign, transfer or otherwise dispose of any Article 9 Collateral (which notice may be given by telephone if promptly confirmed in writing), the Grantors may use and dispose of the Article 9 Collateral in any lawful manner not inconsistent with the provisions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
(g) None of the Grantors will, without the Administrative Agent's prior written consent, grant any extension of the time of payment of any Accounts included in the Article 9 Collateral, compromise, compound or settle the same for less than the full amount thereof, release, wholly or partly, any Person liable for the payment thereof or allow any credit or discount whatsoever thereon, other than extensions, compromises, settlements, releases, credits or discounts granted or made in the ordinary course of business and consistent with its current practices and in accordance with such prudent and standard practice used in industries that are the same as or similar to those in which such Grantor is engaged.
(h) The Grantors, at their own expense, shall maintain or cause to be maintained insurance covering physical loss or damage to their assets in accordance with the requirements set forth in Section 5.08 of the Credit Agreement. Each Grantor irrevocably makes, constitutes and appoints the Administrative Agent (and all officers, employees or agents designated by the Administrative Agent) as such Grantor's true and lawful agent (and attorney-in-fact) for the purpose, upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, of making, settling and adjusting claims in respect of Article 9 Collateral under policies of insurance, endorsing the name of such Grantor on any check, draft, instrument or other item of payment for the proceeds of such policies of insurance and for making all determinations and decisions with respect thereto. In the event that any Grantor at any time or times shall fail to obtain or maintain any of the policies of insurance required hereby or to pay any premium in whole or part relating thereto, the Administrative Agent may, without waiving or releasing any obligation or liability of the Grantors hereunder or any Event of Default, in its sole discretion, obtain and maintain such policies of insurance and pay such premium and take any other actions with respect thereto as the Administrative Agent deems advisable. All sums disbursed by the Administrative Agent in connection with this paragraph, including reasonable attorneys' fees, court costs, expenses and other charges relating thereto, shall be payable, upon demand, by the Grantors to the Administrative Agent and shall be additional Secured Obligations secured hereby.
 
SECTION 4.04. . In order to further insure the attachment, perfection and priority of, and the ability of the Administrative Agent to enforce, the Security Interest, each Grantor agrees, in each case at such Grantor's own expense, to take the following actions with respect to the following Article 9 Collateral:
Other Actions
(a) . If any Grantor shall at any time hold or acquire any Instruments or Tangible Chattel Paper (other than any Instrument or Tangible Chattel Paper, in each case with a face amount of less than $5,000,000 individually, owed to the applicable Grantor by any Person that is not the Company or a Subsidiary), such Grantor shall forthwith endorse, assign and deliver the same to the Administrative Agent, accompanied by such instruments of transfer or assignment duly executed in blank as the Administrative Agent may from time to time reasonably request.
Instruments and Tangible Chattel Paper
(b) . For each Deposit Account that any Grantor at any time opens or maintains, such Grantor shall cause the depositary bank to agree to comply with instructions from the Administrative Agent (or, in the case of the ABL Priority Collateral, prior to the Discharge of ABL Obligations, the ABL Agent) to such depositary bank directing the disposition of funds from time to time credited to such deposit account, without further consent of such Grantor or any other Person, pursuant to an agreement reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; provided that, with respect to the Deposit Accounts of the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries, the Grantors shall not be required to comply with the foregoing until the 90th day after the Effective Date. The Administrative Agent agrees with each Grantor that the Administrative Agent shall not give any such instructions or withhold any withdrawal rights from any Grantor unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or, after giving effect to any withdrawal would occur. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to (i) any Deposit Account for which any Grantor, the depositary bank and the Administrative Agent have entered into a cash collateral agreement specially negotiated among such Grantor, the depositary bank and the Administrative Agent for the specific purpose set forth therein, (ii) unless otherwise requested by the Administrative Agent, Deposit Accounts for which the Administrative Agent is the depository bank and (iii) the Excluded Deposit Accounts.
Deposit Accounts
(c) . Except to the extent otherwise provided in Article III, if any Grantor shall at any time hold or acquire any certificated securities, such Grantor shall forthwith endorse, assign and deliver the same to the Administrative Agent, accompanied by such undated instruments of transfer or assignment duly executed in blank as the Administrative Agent may from time to time specify. If any securities now or hereafter acquired by any Grantor are uncertificated and are issued to such Grantor or its nominee directly by the issuer thereof, such Grantor shall immediately notify the Administrative Agent thereof and, at the Administrative Agent's request and option, pursuant to an agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, either (i) cause the issuer to agree to comply with instructions from the Administrative Agent as to such securities, without further consent of any Grantor or such
Investment Property
 
nominee, or (ii) arrange for the Administrative Agent to become the registered owner of the securities. Without limiting the foregoing, each such Grantor that is a Material Subsidiary and is an issuer of uncertificated Equity Interests shall promptly mark its books and records with the numbers and face amounts of all such uncertificated Equity Interests to reflect the Lien of the Administrative Agent granted pursuant to this Agreement and each applicable Grantor that is a pledgor of such uncertificated Equity Interests (in such capacity, a "") hereby consents to such action. If at any time any such Grantor shall receive instructions originated by the Administrative Agent relating to any or all of its applicable uncertificated Equity Interests, such Grantor shall comply with such instructions without further consent by the Pledgor that holds such uncertificated securities or any other Person. Each such Grantor hereby further represents and warrants that, (A) it has not entered into, and shall not enter into, any agreement with any other Person (other than the ABL Agent pursuant to the ABL Security Agreement) relating to its applicable uncertificated Equity Interests pursuant to which it has agreed, or shall agree, to comply with instructions issued by such other Person and (B) it has not entered into, and shall not enter into, any agreement with the applicable Pledgor purporting to limit or condition the obligation of such Grantor to comply with instructions as set forth in the immediately preceding sentence. If any securities, whether certificated or uncertificated, or other investment property now or hereafter acquired by any Grantor are held by such Grantor or its nominee through a securities intermediary or commodity intermediary, such Grantor shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and, at the Administrative Agent's (or, in the case of the ABL Priority Collateral, prior to the Discharge of ABL Obligations, the ABL Agent's) request and option, pursuant to an agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, either (i) cause such securities intermediary or commodity intermediary, as the case may be, to agree to comply with entitlement orders or other instructions from the Administrative Agent (or, in the case of the ABL Priority Collateral, prior to the Discharge of ABL Obligations, the ABL Agent) to such securities intermediary as to such security entitlements or to apply any value distributed on account of any commodity contract as directed by the Administrative Agent (or, in the case of the ABL Priority Collateral, prior to the Discharge of ABL Obligations, the ABL Agent) to such commodity intermediary, as the case may be, in each case without further consent of any Grantor, such nominee, or any other Person, or (ii) in the case of Financial Assets or other Investment Property held through a securities intermediary, arrange for the Administrative Agent (or, in the case of the ABL Priority Collateral, prior to the Discharge of ABL Obligations, the ABL Agent) to become the entitlement holder with respect to such Investment Property, with the Grantor being permitted, only with the consent of the Administrative Agent (or, in the case of the ABL Priority Collateral, prior to the Discharge of ABL Obligations, the ABL Agent), to exercise rights to withdraw or otherwise deal with such Investment Property. The Administrative Agent agrees with each of the Grantors that the Administrative Agent shall not give any such entitlement orders or instructions or directions to any such issuer, securities
Pledgor
 
intermediary or commodity intermediary, and shall not withhold its consent to the exercise of any withdrawal or dealing rights by any Grantor, unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, or, after giving effect to any such investment and withdrawal rights, would occur. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to Financial Assets or other Investment Property credited to securities accounts for which the Administrative Agent is the securities intermediary, unless otherwise requested by the Administrative Agent.
(d) . In the event any certificate delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(e) of the Credit Agreement or any Supplement shall set forth any Letter of Credit Right that is not a Supporting Obligation with respect to any of the Collateral, the applicable Grantor, at the request and option of the Administrative Agent, shall, pursuant to an agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, either (i) use commercially reasonable efforts to arrange for the issuer and any confirmer of such letter of credit to consent to an assignment to the Administrative Agent of the proceeds of any drawing under such letter of credit or (ii) use commercially reasonable efforts to arrange for the Administrative Agent to become the transferee beneficiary of such letter of credit, with the Administrative Agent agreeing, in each case, that the proceeds of any drawing under such letter of credit are to be paid to the applicable Grantor unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
Letter-of-Credit Rights
SECTION 4.05. . (a) Each Grantor agrees that it will use commercially reasonable efforts not to do any act or omit to do any act (and will exercise commercially reasonable efforts to prevent its licensees from doing any act or omitting to do any act) whereby any Patent material to the conduct of the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries may become invalidated or dedicated to the public (except as a result of expiration of such Patent at the end of its statutory term), and agrees that it shall continue to mark any products covered by any such Patent with the relevant patent number as necessary and sufficient to establish and preserve its maximum rights under applicable patent laws.
Covenants Regarding Patent, Trademark and Copyright Collateral
(b) Each Grantor (either itself or through its licensees or its sublicensees) will use commercially reasonable efforts, for each Trademark material to the conduct of the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries, (i) to maintain such Trademark in full force free from any valid claim of abandonment or invalidity for non-use, (ii) to maintain the quality of products and services offered under such Trademark, (iii) if registered, to display such Trademark with notice of Federal or foreign registration to the extent necessary and sufficient to establish and preserve its maximum rights under applicable law and (iv) to not knowingly use or knowingly permit the use of such Trademark in violation of any third party rights.
(c) Each Grantor (either itself or through its licensees or sublicensees) will, for each work covered by a Copyright material to the conduct of the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries, use commercially reasonable efforts to continue to publish, reproduce, display, adopt and distribute the work with appropriate copyright notice as necessary and sufficient to establish and preserve its maximum rights under applicable copyright laws.
 
(d) Each Grantor shall notify the Administrative Agent promptly if it knows that any Patent, Trademark or Copyright material to the conduct of the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries may become abandoned, lost or dedicated to the public, or of any materially adverse determination or development (including the institution of, or any such determination or development in, any proceeding in the United States Patent and Trademark Office, United States Copyright Office or any court or similar office of any country) regarding such Grantor's ownership of any such Patent, Trademark or Copyright its right to register the same or its right to keep and maintain the same.
(e) Each Grantor will take all necessary steps that are consistent with its current practice (i) in any proceeding before the United States Patent and Trademark Office, United States Copyright Office or any office or agency in any political subdivision of the United States of America or in any other country or any political subdivision thereof, to maintain and pursue each material application relating to the Patents, Trademarks and/or Copyrights (and to obtain the relevant grant or registration) and (ii) to maintain each issued Patent and each registration of the Trademarks and Copyrights that is material to the conduct of any Grantor's business, including timely filings of applications for renewal, affidavits of use, affidavits of incontestability and payment of maintenance fees, and, if consistent with such Grantor's reasonable judgment, to initiate opposition, interference and cancelation proceedings against third parties.
(f) Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, each Grantor shall, upon request of the Administrative Agent, use its commercially reasonable efforts to obtain all requisite consents or approvals by the licensor of each Copyright License, Patent License or Trademark License under which such Grantor is a licensee to effect the assignment of all such Grantor's right, title and interest thereunder to the Administrative Agent or its designee.
SECTION 5.01. . Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, each Grantor agrees to deliver each item of Collateral to the Administrative Agent on demand, and it is agreed that the Administrative Agent shall have the right to take any of or all the following actions at the same or different times: (a) with respect to any Article 9 Collateral consisting of Intellectual Property, on demand, to cause the Security Interest to become an assignment, transfer and conveyance of any of or all such Article 9 Collateral by the applicable Grantors to the Administrative Agent, or to license or sublicense, whether general, special or otherwise, and whether on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis, any such Article 9 Collateral throughout the world on such terms and conditions and in such manner as the Administrative Agent shall determine (other than in violation of any then existing
Remedies Upon Default
 
licensing arrangements to the extent that waivers cannot be obtained), and (b) with or without legal process and with or without prior notice or demand for performance, to take possession of the Article 9 Collateral and without liability for trespass to enter any premises where the Article 9 Collateral may be located for the purpose of taking possession of or removing the Article 9 Collateral and, generally, to exercise any and all rights afforded to a secured party under the Uniform Commercial Code or other applicable law. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Grantor agrees that the Administrative Agent shall have the right, subject to the mandatory requirements of applicable law, to sell or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the Collateral at a public or private sale or at any broker's board or on any securities exchange, for cash, upon credit or for future delivery as the Administrative Agent shall deem appropriate. The Administrative Agent shall be authorized at any such sale of securities (if it deems it advisable to do so) to restrict the prospective bidders or purchasers to Persons who will represent and agree that they are purchasing the Collateral for their own account for investment and not with a view to the distribution or sale thereof, and upon consummation of any such sale the Administrative Agent shall have the right to assign, transfer and deliver to the purchaser or purchasers thereof the Collateral so sold. Each such purchaser at any sale of Collateral shall hold the property sold absolutely free from any claim or right on the part of any Grantor, and each Grantor hereby waives (to the extent permitted by law) all rights of redemption, stay and appraisal that such Grantor now has or may at any time in the future have under any rule of law or statute now existing or hereafter enacted.
The Administrative Agent shall give the applicable Grantors 10 days' prior written notice (which each Grantor agrees is reasonable notice within the meaning of Section 9-611 of the New York UCC or its equivalent in other jurisdictions) of the Administrative Agent's intention to make any sale of Collateral. Such notice, in the case of a public sale, shall state the time and place for such sale and, in the case of a sale at a broker's board or on a securities exchange, shall state the board or exchange at which such sale is to be made and the day on which the Collateral or portion thereof, will first be offered for sale at such board or exchange. Any such public sale shall be held at such time or times within ordinary business hours and at such place or places as the Administrative Agent may fix and state in the notice (if any) of such sale. At any such sale, the Collateral, or portion thereof, to be sold may be sold in one lot as an entirety or in separate parcels, as the Administrative Agent may (in its sole and absolute discretion) determine. The Administrative Agent shall not be obligated to make any sale of any Collateral if it shall determine not to do so, regardless of the fact that notice of sale of such Collateral shall have been given. The Administrative Agent may, without notice or publication, adjourn any public or private sale or cause the same to be adjourned from time to time by announcement at the time and place fixed for sale, and such sale may, without further notice, be made at the time and place to which the same was so adjourned. In case any sale of all or any part of the Collateral is made on credit or for future delivery, the Collateral so sold may be retained by the Administrative Agent until the sale price is paid by the purchaser or purchasers thereof, but the Administrative Agent and the other Secured Parties shall not incur any liability in case any such purchaser or purchasers shall fail to take up and pay for the Collateral so sold and, in case of any such failure, such Collateral may be sold again upon like notice. In the event of a foreclosure
 
by the Administrative Agent on any of the Collateral pursuant to a public or private sale or other disposition, the Administrative Agent or any Lender may be the purchaser or licensor of any or all of such Collateral at any such sale or other disposition, and the Administrative Agent, at the direction of the Required Lenders, as agent for and representative of the Secured Parties (but not any Lender or Lenders in its or their respective individual capacities unless the Required Lenders shall otherwise agree in writing) shall be entitled, for the purpose of bidding and making settlement or payment of the purchase price for all or any portion of the Collateral sold at any such public sale, to use and apply any of the Loan Document Obligations as a credit on account of the purchase price for any Collateral payable by the Administrative Agent on behalf of the Secured Parties at such sale or other disposition. For purposes hereof, a written agreement to purchase the Collateral or any portion thereof shall be treated as a sale thereof; the Administrative Agent shall be free to carry out such sale pursuant to such agreement and no Grantor shall be entitled, subject to Section 5.02, to the return of the Collateral or any portion thereof subject thereto, notwithstanding the fact that after the Administrative Agent shall have entered into such an agreement all Events of Default shall have been remedied and the Secured Obligations paid in full. As an alternative to exercising the power of sale herein conferred upon it, the Administrative Agent may proceed by a suit or suits at law or in equity to foreclose this Agreement and to sell the Collateral or any portion thereof pursuant to a judgment or decree of a court or courts having competent jurisdiction or pursuant to a proceeding by a court appointed receiver. Any sale pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be deemed to conform to the commercially reasonable standards as provided in Section 9 610(b) of the New York UCC or its equivalent in other jurisdictions.
SECTION 5.02. . Subject to the Intercreditor Agreement, the Administrative Agent shall apply the proceeds of any collection or sale of Collateral, including any Collateral consisting of cash, as follows:
Application of Proceeds
FIRST, to the payment of all costs and expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent in connection with such collection or sale or otherwise in connection with this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any of the Secured Obligations, including all court costs and the fees and expenses of its agents and legal counsel, the repayment of all advances made by the Administrative Agent hereunder or under any other Loan Document on behalf of any Grantor and any other costs or expenses incurred in connection with the exercise of any right or remedy hereunder or under any other Loan Document;
SECOND, to the payment in full of the Secured Obligations (the amounts so applied to be distributed among the Secured Parties pro rata in accordance with the amounts of the Secured Obligations owed to them on the date of any such distribution); and
THIRD, to the Grantors, their successors or assigns, or as a court of competent jurisdiction may otherwise direct.
 
The Administrative Agent shall have absolute discretion as to the time of application of any such proceeds, moneys or balances in accordance with this Agreement. Upon any sale of Collateral by the Administrative Agent (including pursuant to a power of sale granted by statute or under a judicial proceeding), the receipt of the Administrative Agent or of the officer making the sale shall be a sufficient discharge to the purchaser or purchasers of the Collateral so sold and such purchaser or purchasers shall not be obligated to see to the application of any part of the purchase money paid over to the Administrative Agent or such officer or be answerable in any way for the misapplication thereof.
SECTION 5.03. . For the purpose of enabling the Administrative Agent to exercise rights and remedies under this Agreement at such time as the Administrative Agent shall be lawfully entitled to exercise such rights and remedies, each Grantor hereby grants to the Administrative Agent an irrevocable, nonexclusive license (exercisable without payment of royalty or other compensation to the Grantors) to use, license or sublicense any of the Article 9 Collateral consisting of Intellectual Property now owned or hereafter acquired by such Grantor, and wherever the same may be located, and including in such license reasonable access to all media in which any of the licensed items may be recorded or stored and to all computer software and programs used for the compilation or printout thereof, the right to prosecute and maintain all Intellectual Property and the right to sue for infringement of the Intellectual Property. The use of such license by the Administrative Agent may be exercised, at the option of the Administrative Agent, only upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default, that any license, sublicense or other transaction entered into by the Administrative Agent in accordance herewith shall be binding upon the Grantors notwithstanding any subsequent cure of an Event of Default.
Grant of License to Use Intellectual Property
provided
SECTION 5.04. In view of the position of the Grantors in relation to the Pledged Collateral, or because of other current or future circumstances, a question may arise under the Securities Act of 1933, as now or hereafter in effect, or any similar statute hereafter enacted analogous in purpose or effect (such Act and any such similar statute as from time to time in effect being called the "") with respect to any disposition of the Pledged Collateral permitted hereunder. Each Grantor understands that compliance with the Federal Securities Laws might very strictly limit the course of conduct of the Administrative Agent if the Administrative Agent were to attempt to dispose of all or any part of the Pledged Collateral, and might also limit the extent to which or the manner in which any subsequent transferee of any Pledged Collateral could dispose of the same. Similarly, there may be other legal restrictions or limitations affecting the Administrative Agent in any attempt to dispose of all or part of the Pledged Collateral under applicable Blue Sky or other state securities laws or similar laws analogous in purpose or effect. Each Grantor recognizes that in light of such restrictions and limitations the Administrative Agent may, with respect to any sale of the Pledged Collateral, limit the purchasers to those who will agree, among other things, to acquire such Pledged Collateral for their own account, for investment and not with a view to the distribution or resale thereof. Each Grantor acknowledges and agrees that in light of such restrictions and limitations, the Administrative Agent, in its sole and absolute discretion, (a) may proceed to make such a sale whether or not a registration statement
Securities Act.
Federal Securities Laws
 
for the purpose of registering such Pledged Collateral or part thereof shall have been filed under the Federal Securities Laws or, to the extent applicable, Blue Sky or other state securities laws and (b) may approach and negotiate with a single potential purchaser to effect such sale. Each Grantor acknowledges and agrees that any such sale might result in prices and other terms less favorable to the seller than if such sale were a public sale without such restrictions. In the event of any such sale, the Administrative Agent shall incur no responsibility or liability for selling all or any part of the Pledged Collateral at a price that the Administrative Agent, in its sole and absolute discretion, may in good faith deem reasonable under the circumstances, notwithstanding the possibility that a substantially higher price might have been realized if the sale were deferred until after registration as aforesaid or if more than a single purchaser were approached. The provisions of this Section will apply notwithstanding the existence of a public or private market upon which the quotations or sales prices may exceed substantially the price at which the Administrative Agent sells.
SECTION 5.05. Each Grantor agrees that, upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, if for any reason the Administrative Agent desires to sell any of the Pledged Collateral at a public sale, it will, at any time and from time to time, upon the written request of the Administrative Agent, use its best efforts to take or to cause the issuer of such Pledged Collateral to take such action and prepare, distribute and/or file such documents, as are required or advisable in the reasonable opinion of counsel for the Administrative Agent to permit the public sale of such Pledged Collateral. Each Grantor further agrees to indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Administrative Agent, each other Secured Party, any underwriter and their Related Parties from and against all loss, liability, reasonable and documented out of pocket expenses, costs of counsel (including reasonable fees and expenses to the Administrative Agent of legal counsel), and claims (including the costs of investigation) that they may incur insofar as such loss, liability, expense or claim arises out of or is based upon any alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or in any notification or offering circular, or arises out of or is based upon any alleged omission to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements in any thereof not misleading, except insofar as the same may have been caused by any untrue statement or omission based upon information furnished in writing to such Grantor or the issuer of such Pledged Collateral by the Administrative Agent or any other Secured Party expressly for use therein. Each Grantor further agrees, upon such written request referred to above, to use its best efforts to qualify, file or register, or cause the issuer of such Pledged Collateral to qualify, file or register, any of the Pledged Collateral under the Blue Sky or other securities laws of such states as may be requested by the Administrative Agent and keep effective, or cause to be kept effective, all such qualifications, filings or registrations. Each Grantor will bear all costs and expenses of carrying out its obligations under this Section 5.05. Each Grantor acknowledges that there is no adequate remedy at law for failure by it to comply with the provisions of this Section 5.05 and that such failure would not be adequately compensable in damages, and therefore agrees that its agreements contained in this Section 5.05 may be specifically enforced.
Registration.
 
SECTION 6.01. . In addition to all such rights of indemnity and subrogation as the Guarantors may have under applicable law (but subject to Section 6.03), the Company agrees that (a) in the event a payment in respect of any Secured Obligation shall be made by any Guarantor under this Agreement, the Company shall indemnify such Guarantor for the full amount of such payment and such Guarantor shall be subrogated to the rights of the Person to whom such payment shall have been made to the extent of such payment and (b) in the event any assets of any Grantor shall be sold pursuant to this Agreement or any other Collateral Document to satisfy in whole or in part any Secured Obligation, the Company shall indemnify such Grantor in an amount equal to the greater of the book value or the fair market value of the assets so sold.
Indemnity and Subrogation
SECTION 6.02. . Each Guarantor and Grantor (a "") agrees (subject to Section 6.03) that, in the event a payment shall be made by any other Guarantor (other than the Company) hereunder in respect of any Secured Obligation or assets of any other Grantor (other than the Company) shall be sold pursuant to any Collateral Document to satisfy any Secured Obligation and such other Guarantor or Grantor (the "") shall not have been fully indemnified by the Company as provided in Section 6.01, the Contributing Party shall indemnify the Claiming Party in an amount equal to the amount of such payment or the greater of the book value or the fair market value of such assets, as the case may be, in each case multiplied by a fraction of which the numerator shall be the net worth of the Contributing Party on the date hereof and the denominator shall be the aggregate net worth of all the Guarantors and Grantors on the date hereof (or, in the case of any Guarantor or Grantor becoming a party hereto pursuant to Section 7.13, the date of the supplement hereto executed and delivered by such Guarantor or Grantor). Any Contributing Party making any payment to a Claiming Party pursuant to this Section 6.02 shall (subject to Section 6.03) be subrogated to the rights of such Claiming Party under Section 6.01 to the extent of such payment.
Contribution and Subrogation
Contributing Party
Claiming Party
SECTION 6.03. . (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, all rights of the Guarantors and Grantors under Sections 6.01 and 6.02 and all other rights of the Guarantors and Grantors of indemnity, contribution or subrogation under applicable law or otherwise shall be fully subordinated to the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Secured Obligations. No failure on the part of the Company or any other Guarantor or Grantor to make the payments required by Sections 6.01 and 6.02 (or any other payments required under applicable law or otherwise) shall in any respect limit the obligations and liabilities of any Guarantor or Grantor with respect to its obligations hereunder, and each Guarantor and Grantor shall remain liable for the full amount of the obligations of such Guarantor or Grantor hereunder.
Subordination
 
(b) Each Guarantor and Grantor hereby agrees that all Indebtedness and other monetary obligations owed by it to, or to it by, any other Guarantor, Grantor or any other Subsidiary shall be fully subordinated to the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Secured Obligations.
SECTION 7.01. . All communications and notices hereunder shall (except as otherwise expressly permitted herein) be in writing and given in the manner provided in Section 9.01 of the Credit Agreement. All communications and notices hereunder to any Subsidiary Loan Party shall be given to it in care of the Company in the manner provided in Section 9.01 of the Credit Agreement.
Notices
SECTION 7.02. . (a) No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under the other Loan Documents shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of this Agreement or consent to any departure by any Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the making of a Loan shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time. No notice or demand on any Loan Party in any case shall entitle any Loan Party to any other or further notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.
Waivers; Amendment
(b) Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and the Loan Party or Loan Parties with respect to which such waiver, amendment or modification is to apply, subject to any consent required in accordance with Section 9.02 of the Credit Agreement; that the Administrative Agent may without the consent of any Secured Party consent to a departure by any Loan Party from any covenant of such Loan Party set forth herein or in any other Collateral Document to the extent such departure is consistent with the authority of the Administrative Agent set forth in the definition of the term "Collateral and Guarantee Requirement" in the Credit Agreement.
provided
(c) This Agreement shall be construed as a separate agreement with respect to each Loan Party and may be amended, modified, supplemented, waived or released with respect to any Loan Party without the approval of any other Loan Party and without affecting the obligations of any other Loan Party hereunder.
 
SECTION 7.03. . (a) The Guarantors and Grantors jointly and severally agree to reimburse the Administrative Agent for its fees and expenses incurred hereunder as provided in Section 9.03(a) of the Credit Agreement; that each reference therein to "the Company" shall be deemed to be a reference to "the Guarantors and Grantors".
Administrative Agent's Fees and Expenses; Indemnification
provided
(b) The Guarantors and Grantors that are not a party to the Credit Agreement, jointly and severally agree to indemnify and hold harmless each Indemnitee as provided in Section 9.03(b) of the Credit Agreement as if each reference in such Section to "the Company" were a reference to "the Guarantors and Grantors" and with the same force and effect as if such Guarantors and Grantors were parties to the Credit Agreement.
(c) Any amounts payable as provided in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section shall be additional Secured Obligations secured hereby and by the other Security Documents. All amounts due under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
(d) To the extent permitted by applicable law, no Grantor shall assert, or permit any of its subsidiaries to assert, and each Grantor hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee (i) for any damages arising from the use by others of information or other materials obtained through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems (including the Internet), unless determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee, or (ii) on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the Transactions, any Loan or the use of the proceeds thereof.
SECTION 7.04. All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent and the Lenders and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans, regardless of any investigation made by any such person or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, the Syndication Agent and any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any Loan Document is executed and delivered or any credit is extended under the Credit Agreement, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under the Credit Agreement is outstanding and unpaid and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of Section 7.03 shall survive and remain in full force and
Survival.
 
effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
SECTION 7.05. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement shall become effective as to any Loan Party when a counterpart hereof executed on behalf of such Loan Party shall have been delivered to the Administrative Agent and a counterpart hereof shall have been executed on behalf of the Administrative Agent, and thereafter shall be binding upon such Loan Party and the Administrative Agent and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of such Loan Party, the Administrative Agent and the other Secured Parties and their respective permitted successors and assigns, except that no Loan Party may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein or in the Collateral (and any attempted assignment or transfer by any Loan Party shall be null and void), except as expressly contemplated by this Agreement or the Credit Agreement. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts; Effectiveness; Successors and Assigns.
SECTION 7.06. Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability.
SECTION 7.07. If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Loan Party against any of and all the obligations then due of such Loan Party now or hereafter existing under this Agreement held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under the Loan Documents and although such obligations may be unmatured. The applicable Lender shall notify the Company and the Administrative Agent of such set-off or application; that any failure to give or any delay in giving such notice shall not affect the validity of any such set-off or application under this Section. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Set-Off.
provided
SECTION 7.08. (a) This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
 
(b) Each party hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the Company and each Subsidiary Loan Party hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding brought by it or any of its Affiliates shall be brought, and shall be heard and determined, exclusively in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against the Company or each Subsidiary Loan Party or any of its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
(c) Each of the Loan Parties hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the Loan Parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
(d) Each party hereto irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 7.01. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement or any other Loan Document to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
SECTION 7.09. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
SECTION 7.10. Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings.
 
SECTION 7.11. All rights of the Administrative Agent hereunder, the Security Interest, the grant of the security interest in the Pledged Collateral and all obligations of each Loan Party hereunder shall be absolute and unconditional irrespective of (a) any lack of validity or enforceability of the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document, any agreement with respect to any of the Secured Obligations or any other agreement or instrument relating to any of the foregoing, (b) any change in the time, manner or place of payment of, or in any other term of, all or any of the Secured Obligations, or any other amendment to or waiver of, or any consent to any departure from, the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document, any agreement with respect to any of the Secured Obligations or any other agreement or instrument relating to any of the foregoing, (c) any exchange, release or non-perfection of any Lien on other collateral securing, or any release or amendment to or waiver of, or any consent to any departure from, any guarantee of, all or any of the Secured Obligations or (d) any other circumstance that might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Loan Party in respect of the Secured Obligations or this Agreement.
Security Interest Absolute.
SECTION 7.12. (a) This Agreement, the Guarantees made herein, the Security Interest and all other security interests granted hereby shall terminate and be released when all the Loan Document Obligations (other than contingent obligations for indemnification, expense reimbursement, tax gross-up or yield protection as to which no claim has been made) have been paid in full in cash and the Lenders have no further commitment to lend under the Credit Agreement.
Termination or Release.
(b) The Guarantees made herein, the Security Interest and all other security interests granted hereby shall also terminate and be released at the time or times and in the manner set forth in Section 9.16 of the Credit Agreement.
(c) In connection with any termination or release pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall execute and deliver to any Loan Party, at such Loan Party's expense, all documents that such Loan Party shall reasonably request to evidence such termination or release. Any execution and delivery of documents by the Administrative Agent pursuant to this Section shall be without recourse to or warranty by the Administrative Agent.
SECTION 7.13. Pursuant to the Credit Agreement, certain Subsidiaries not a party hereto on the Effective Date are required to enter in this Agreement. Upon the execution and delivery by the Administrative Agent and any such Subsidiary of a Supplement, such Subsidiary shall become a Subsidiary Loan Party, a Guarantor and a Grantor hereunder, with the same force and effect as if originally named as such herein. The execution and delivery of any Supplement shall not require the consent of any other Loan Party. The rights and obligations of each Loan Party hereunder shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding the addition of any new Subsidiary Loan Party as a party to this Agreement.
Additional Subsidiaries.
 
SECTION 7.14. Each Grantor hereby appoints the Administrative Agent the attorney-in-fact of such Grantor for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this Agreement and taking any action and executing any instrument that the Administrative Agent may deem necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this Agreement and taking any action and executing any instrument that the Administrative Agent may deem necessary or advisable to accomplish the purposes hereof, which appointment is irrevocable and coupled with an interest. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent shall have the right, upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, with full power of substitution either in the Administrative Agent's name or in the name of such Grantor: (a) to receive, endorse, assign and/or deliver any and all notes, acceptances, checks, drafts, money orders or other evidences of payment relating to the Collateral or any part thereof; (b) to demand, collect, receive payment of, give receipt for and give discharges and releases of all or any of the Collateral; (c) to sign the name of any Grantor on any invoice or bill of lading relating to any of the Collateral; (d) to send verifications of Accounts to any Account Debtor; (e) to commence and prosecute any and all suits, actions or proceedings at law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction to collect or otherwise realize on all or any of the Collateral or to enforce any rights in respect of any Collateral; (f) to settle, compromise, compound, adjust or defend any actions, suits or proceedings relating to all or any of the Collateral; (g) to notify, or to require any Grantor to notify, Account Debtors to make payment directly to the Administrative Agent; and (h) to use, sell, assign, transfer, pledge, make any agreement with respect to or otherwise deal with all or any of the Collateral, and to do all other acts and things necessary to carry out the purposes of this Agreement, as fully and completely as though the Administrative Agent were the absolute owner of the Collateral for all purposes; that nothing herein contained shall be construed as requiring or obligating the Administrative Agent to make any commitment or to make any inquiry as to the nature or sufficiency of any payment received by the Administrative Agent, or to present or file any claim or notice, or to take any action with respect to the Collateral or any part thereof or the moneys due or to become due in respect thereof or any property covered thereby. The Administrative Agent and the other Secured Parties shall be accountable only for amounts actually received as a result of the exercise of the powers granted to them herein, and neither they nor their Related Parties shall be responsible to any Grantor for any act or failure to act hereunder, except for their own gross negligence or wilful misconduct, as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final and non-appealable judgment.
Administrative Agent Appointed Attorney-in-Fact.
provided
SECTION 7.15. Each Subsidiary Loan Party not a party to the Credit Agreement hereby acknowledges the provisions of Section 2.15 of the Credit Agreement and agrees to be bound by such provisions with the same force and effect, and to the same extent, as if such Subsidiary Loan Party were a party to the Credit Agreement.
Certain Acknowledgments and Agreements.
SECTION 7.16. Each Loan Party irrevocably and unconditionally undertakes to pay to the Administrative Agent amounts equal to, and in the currency or currencies of, its Corresponding Debt.
Parallel Debt.
 
(a) The Parallel Debt of each Loan Party:
(i) shall become due and payable at the same time as its Corresponding Debt; and
(ii) is independent and separate from, and without prejudice to, its Corresponding Debt.
(b) For purposes of this Section, the Administrative Agent:
(i) is the independent and separate creditor of each Parallel Debt;
(ii) acts in its own name and not as agent, representative or trustee of the Secured Parties and its claims in respect of each Parallel Debt shall not be held in trust; and
(iii) shall have the independent and separate right to demand payment of each Parallel Debt in its own name (including, without limitation, through any suit, execution, enforcement of security, recovery of guarantees and applications for and voting in any kind of insolvency proceeding in accordance with the Loan Documents).
(c) The Parallel Debt of a Loan Party shall be (i) decreased to the extent that its Corresponding Debt has been irrevocably and unconditionally paid or discharged and (ii) increased to the extent to that its Corresponding Debt has increased, and the Corresponding Debt of a Loan Party shall be (x) decreased to the extent that its Parallel Debt has been irrevocably and unconditionally paid or discharged and (y) increased to the extent that its Parallel Debt has increased, in each case that the Parallel Debt of a Loan Party shall never exceed its Corresponding Debt.
provided
All amounts received or recovered by the Administrative Agent in connection with this Section, to the extent permitted by applicable law, shall be applied in accordance with Section 5.02.
(d) This Section applies solely for the purpose of determining the Secured Obligations governed by Dutch law.
(a) Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the lien and security interest granted pursuant to this Agreement and the exercise of any right or remedy hereunder are subject to the provisions of the Intercreditor Agreement. In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement and this Agreement, the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement shall govern and control.
 
(b) Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, for so long as the Discharge of ABL Obligations shall not have occurred and the ABL Collateral Documents shall require the delivery of possession or control to the ABL Agent of any ABL Priority Collateral, any covenant hereunder requiring (or any representation or warranty hereunder to the extent that it would have the effect of requiring) the delivery of possession or control to the Administrative Agent of such Collateral shall be deemed to have been satisfied (or, in the case of any representation and warranty, shall be deemed to be true) if, prior to the Discharge of ABL Obligations, such possession or control shall have been delivered to the ABL Agent.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit I to
Guarantee and Collateral Agreement
SUPPLEMENT NO.              dated as of [    ] (this ""), to the Guarantee and Collateral Agreement dated as of [    ], 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the other Loan Parties from time to time party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (""), as Administrative Agent.
Supplement
Collateral Agreement
Company
JPMCB
A. Reference is made to the Credit Agreement dated as of [ ], 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Company, the Lenders from time to time party thereto and JPMCB, as Administrative Agent.
Credit Agreement
B. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement and the Collateral Agreement, as applicable.
C. The Guarantors and Grantors have entered into the Collateral Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make extensions of credit to the Company under the Credit Agreement. Section 7.13 of the Collateral Agreement provides that additional Subsidiaries may become Subsidiary Loan Parties under the Collateral Agreement by the execution and delivery of an instrument in the form of this Supplement. The undersigned Subsidiary (the "") is executing this Supplement in accordance with the requirements of the Credit Agreement to become a Subsidiary Loan Party under the Collateral Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make additional extensions of credit under the Credit Agreement and as consideration for the maintenance of such extensions of credit previously made.
New Subsidiary
Accordingly, the Administrative Agent and the New Subsidiary agree as follows:
SECTION 1. In accordance with Section 7.13 of the Collateral Agreement, the New Subsidiary by its signature below becomes a Subsidiary Loan Party, a Guarantor and a Grantor under the Collateral Agreement with the same force and effect as if originally named therein as such, and the New Subsidiary hereby (a) agrees to all the terms and provisions of the Collateral Agreement applicable to it in such capacities and (b) represents and warrants that the representations and warranties made by it in such capacities thereunder are true and correct on and as of the date hereof. In furtherance of the foregoing, the New Subsidiary, as security for the payment or performance, as the case may be, in full of the Secured Obligations, does hereby grant to the Administrative Agent, its successors and assigns, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest in all of the New Subsidiary's right, title and interest in, to and under the Collateral of the New Subsidiary. Each reference to a "Loan Party," "Subsidiary Loan Party," "Guarantor" or "Grantor" in the Collateral Agreement shall be deemed to include the New Subsidiary. The Collateral Agreement is hereby incorporated herein by reference.
SECTION 2. The New Subsidiary represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent and the other Secured Parties that this Supplement has been duly executed and delivered by it and constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
SECTION 3. This Supplement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Supplement shall become effective when a counterpart hereof executed on behalf of the New Subsidiary shall have been delivered to the Administrative Agent and a counterpart hereof shall have been executed on behalf of the Administrative Agent. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Supplement by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Supplement.
SECTION 4. The New Subsidiary hereby represents and warrants that (a) Schedule I sets forth, as of the date hereof, the true and correct legal name of the New Subsidiary, its jurisdiction of organization and the location of its chief executive office, (b) Schedule II sets forth, as of the date hereof, a true and complete list of (i) all the Pledged Equity Interests owned by the New Subsidiary and the percentage of the issued and outstanding units of each class of the Equity Interests of the issuer thereof represented by the Pledged Equity Interests owned by the New Subsidiary and (ii) all the Pledged Debt Securities owned by the New Subsidiary and (c) Schedule III sets forth, as of the date hereof, a true and complete list of (i) all Copyrights that have been registered with the United States Copyright Office and that are owned by the New Subsidiary, (ii) all exclusive Copyright Licenses under which the New Subsidiary is a licensee, (iii) all Patents that have been granted by the United States Patent and Trademark Office and that are owned by the New Subsidiary and (iv) all Trademarks that have been registered with the United States Patent and Trademark Office and Trademarks for which United States registration applications are pending and that, in each case, are owned by the New Subsidiary, in each case truly and completely specifying the name of the registered owner, title, type or mark, registration or application number, expiration date (if already registered) or filing date, a brief description thereof and, if applicable, the licensee and licensor, (d) Schedule IV sets forth, as of the date hereof, each Commercial Tort Claim in respect of which a complaint or counterclaim has been filed by the New Subsidiary seeking damages in an reasonably estimated to exceed $1,000,000, including a summary description of such claim, and (e) Schedule V sets forth, as of the date hereof, each Letter of Credit Right that is not a Supporting Obligation with respect to any of the Collateral and that is owned by the New Subsidiary.
 
SECTION 5. Except as expressly supplemented hereby, the Collateral Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.
SECTION 6. This Supplement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
SECTION 7. Any provision of this Supplement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
SECTION 8. All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 7.01 of the Collateral Agreement.
SECTION 9. The New Subsidiary agrees to reimburse the Administrative Agent for its reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel, incurred by it in connection with this Supplement, including the preparation, execution and delivery thereof.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Subsidiary and the Administrative Agent have duly executed this Supplement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
Exhibit II to
Guarantee and Collateral Agreement
[FORM OF] PATENT AND TRADEMARK SECURITY AGREEMENT dated as of [            ] (this ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the other Loan Parties from time to time party hereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (""), as Administrative Agent.
Agreement
Company
JPMCB
Reference is made to (a) the Credit Agreement dated as of [    ], 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Company, the Lenders from time to time party thereto and JPMCB, as Administrative Agent, and (b) the Guarantee and Collateral Agreement dated as of [    ], 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Company, the other Loan Parties from time to time party thereto and JPMCB, as Administrative Agent. The Lenders have agreed to extend credit to the Company subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement. The obligations of the Lenders to extend such credit are conditioned upon, among other things, the execution and delivery of this Agreement. The Subsidiary Loan Parties party hereto are Affiliates of the Company, will derive substantial benefits from the extension of credit to the Company pursuant to the Credit Agreement and are willing to execute and deliver this Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to extend such credit. Accordingly, the parties hereto agree as follows:
Credit Agreement
Collateral Agreement
SECTION 1. Each capitalized term used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning specified in the Credit Agreement or the Collateral Agreement, as applicable. The rules of construction specified in Section 1.03 of the Credit Agreement also apply to this Agreement, .
Terms.
mutatis
mutandis
SECTION 2. As security for the payment or performance, as the case may be, in full of the Secured Obligations, each Grantor pursuant to the Collateral Agreement did, and hereby does, grant to the Administrative Agent, its successors and assigns, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest in all right, title and interest in, to and under any and all of the following assets now owned or at any time hereafter acquired by such Grantor or in, to or under which such Grantor now has or at any time hereafter may acquire any right, title or interest (collectively, the ""):
Grant of Security Interest.
Patent and Trademark Collateral
(a) (i) all letters patent of the United States of America or the equivalent thereof in any other country, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all applications for letters patent of the United States of America or the equivalent thereof in any other country, including registrations, recordings and pending applications in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or any similar office in any other country, including those listed on Schedule I, and (ii) all reissues, continuations, divisions, continuations-in-part, renewals or extensions thereof, and the inventions disclosed or claimed therein, including the right to make, use and/or sell the inventions disclosed or claimed therein; and
(b) (i) all trademarks, service marks, trade names, corporate names, company names, business names, fictitious business names, trade styles, trade dress, logos, other source or business identifiers, designs and general intangibles of like nature, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all registration and recording applications filed in connection therewith, including registrations and registration applications in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or any similar offices in any State of the United States of America or any other country or any political subdivision thereof, and all extensions or renewals thereof, including those listed on Schedule II, (ii) all goodwill associated therewith or symbolized thereby and (iii) all other assets, rights and interests that uniquely reflect or embody such goodwill.
SECTION 3. The security interests granted to the Administrative Agent herein are granted in furtherance, and not in limitation of, the security interests granted to the Administrative Agent pursuant to the Collateral Agreement. Each Grantor hereby acknowledges and affirms that the rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent with respect to the Patent and Trademark Collateral are more fully set forth in the Collateral Agreement, the terms and provisions of which are hereby incorporated herein by reference as if fully set forth herein. In the event of any conflict between the terms of this Agreement and the Collateral Agreement, the terms of the Collateral Agreement shall govern.
Collateral Agreement.
SECTION 4. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit III to
Guarantee and Collateral Agreement
[FORM OF] COPYRIGHT SECURITY AGREEMENT dated as of [            ] (this ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the other Loan Parties from time to time party hereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (""), as Administrative Agent.
Agreement
Company
JPMCB
Reference is made to (a) the Credit Agreement dated as of [ ], 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Company, the Lenders from time to time party thereto and JPMCB, as Administrative Agent, and (b) the Guarantee and Collateral Agreement dated as of [ ], 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Company, the other Loan Parties from time to time party thereto and JPMCB, as Administrative Agent. The Lenders have agreed to extend credit to the Company subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement. The obligations of the Lenders to extend such credit are conditioned upon, among other things, the execution and delivery of this Agreement. The Subsidiary Loan Parties party hereto are Affiliates of the Company, will derive substantial benefits from the extension of credit to the Company pursuant to the Credit Agreement and are willing to execute and deliver this Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to extend such credit. Accordingly, the parties hereto agree as follows:
Credit Agreement
Collateral Agreement
SECTION 1. Each capitalized term used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning specified in the Credit Agreement or the Collateral Agreement, as applicable. The rules of construction specified in Section 1.03 of the Credit Agreement also apply to this Agreement, .
Terms.
mutatis
mutandis
SECTION 2. As security for the payment or performance, as the case may be, in full of the Secured Obligations, each Grantor pursuant to the Collateral Agreement did, and hereby does, grant to the Administrative Agent, its successors and assigns, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest in all right, title and interest in, to and under any and all of the following assets now owned or at any time hereafter acquired by such Grantor or in, to or under which such Grantor now has or at any time hereafter may acquire any right, title or interest (collectively, the ""):
Grant of Security Interest.
Copyright Collateral
(a) (i) all copyright rights in any work subject to the copyright laws of the United States of America or any other country, whether as author, assignee, transferee or otherwise, and (ii) all registrations and recordings thereof, and all registration and recording applications filed in connection therewith, including registrations, recordings and applications in the United States Copyright Office or any similar office in any other country, including those listed on Schedule I; and
(b) all exclusive Copyright Licenses under which any Grantor is a licensee, including those listed on Schedule I.
SECTION 3. The security interests granted to the Administrative Agent herein are granted in furtherance, and not in limitation of, the security interests granted to the Administrative Agent pursuant to the Collateral Agreement. Each Grantor hereby acknowledges and affirms that the rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent with respect to the Copyright Collateral are more fully set forth in the Collateral Agreement, the terms and provisions of which are hereby incorporated herein by reference as if fully set forth herein. In the event of any conflict between the terms of this Agreement and the Collateral Agreement, the terms of the Collateral Agreement shall govern.
Collateral Agreement.
SECTION 4. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT D
[The form of this Compliance Certificate has been prepared for convenience only, and is not to affect, or to be taken into consideration in interpreting, the terms of the Credit Agreement referred to below. The obligations of the Company under the Credit Agreement are as set forth in the Credit Agreement, and nothing in this Compliance Certificate, or the form hereof, shall modify such obligations or constitute a waiver of compliance therewith in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement. In the event of any conflict between the terms of this Compliance Certificate and the terms of the Credit Agreement, the terms of the Credit Agreement shall govern and control, and the terms of this Compliance Certificate are to be modified accordingly.]
 
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Term Credit Agreement dated as of June [ ], 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent. Unless otherwise defined herein, capitalized terms used in this Compliance Certificate have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Company
THE UNDERSIGNED HEREBY CERTIFIES IN HIS CAPACITY AS AN OFFICER OF THE COMPANY AND NOT IN HIS INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY, ON BEHALF OF THE COMPANY, THAT TO HIS KNOWLEDGE AFTER DUE INQUIRY:
1. I am the duly elected [            ]
1
of the Company.
2. [Attached as hereto are the consolidated financial statements required by Section 5.01(a) of the Credit Agreement as of the end of and for the fiscal year ended [        ], setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the prior fiscal year, all audited by and accompanied by the opinion of [Deloitte & Touche LLP] required by Section 5.01(a) of the Credit Agreement.] [or] [The consolidated financial statements required by Section 5.01(a) of the Credit Agreement as the end of and for the fiscal year ended [        ], setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the prior fiscal year, all audited by and accompanied by the opinion of [Deloitte & Touche LLP] required by Section 5.01(a) of the Credit Agreement have been filed with the SEC and are available on the website of the SEC at .]
Schedule I
http://www.sec.gov
[Attached as hereto are the consolidated financial statements required by Section 5.01(b) of the Credit Agreement as of the end of and for the fiscal quarter ended [    ] and
Schedule I
 
the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year.] [or] [The consolidated financial statements required by Section 5.01(b) of the Credit Agreement as of the end of and for the fiscal quarter ended [    ] and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year have been filed with the SEC and are available on the website of the SEC at ]. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and such portion of the fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes.
http://www.sec.gov
3. I have reviewed the terms of the Credit Agreement, and I have made, or have caused to be made under my supervision, a detailed review of the transactions and conditions of the Company and the Subsidiaries during the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements.
4. The examinations described in paragraph 3 did not disclose, and I have no knowledge of[, in each case except as set forth below,] (i) the existence of any condition or event which constitutes a Default during or at the end of the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements or as of the date of this Certificate or (ii) any change in GAAP or in the application thereof that has occurred since the date of the consolidated balance sheet of the Company most recently theretofore delivered under Section 5.01(a) or (b) of the Credit Agreement (or, prior to the first such delivery, referred to in Section 3.04 of the Credit Agreement) that has had, or could have, a significant effect on the calculation of the Senior Secured Leverage Ratio or the Total Leverage Ratio.
5. hereto sets forth financial data and computations evidencing (A) the Company's compliance with the covenant set forth in Section 6.12 of the Credit Agreement and (B) the Total Leverage Ratio as of the date set forth therein, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule II
6. [Enclosed with this Compliance Certificate is a completed Supplemental Perfection Certificate required by Section 5.01(e) of the Credit Agreement.]
2
7. All notices required under Sections 5.03 and 5.04 of the Credit Agreement have been provided.
Described below are the exceptions, if any, to paragraph 4 by listing (i) the nature of each Default, the period during which it has existed and the action which the Company has taken, is taking, or propose to take with respect to each such Default or (ii) any change in GAAP or the application thereof and the effect of such change on the calculations of the Senior Secured Leverage Ratio or the Total Leverage Ratio:
 
 
The foregoing certifications, together with the computations set forth in hereto, are made solely in the capacity of the undersigned as an officer of the Company, and not individually, and delivered this      day of             , 20[    ].
Schedule II
 
SCHEDULE II
As of [    ] and for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company most recently ended on or prior to such date:
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT E
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
    as Administrative Agent
Loan and Agency Services Group
10 South Dearborn
Chicago, Illinois 60603
Attention: Margaret Seweryn
Fax: (888) 292-9533
[Date]
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to the Term Credit Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent. Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings specified in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Company
This notice constitutes an Interest Election Request and the Company hereby gives you notice, pursuant to Section 2.05 of the Credit Agreement, that it requests the conversion or continuation of a Borrowing under the Credit Agreement, and in connection therewith the Company specifies the following information with respect to such Borrowing and each resulting Borrowing:
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT F
Reference is made to the (a) Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June [14], 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, and (b) Term Credit Agreement dated as of June [14], 2012 (as it may be amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, the "" and, together with the ABL Credit Agreement, the ""), among the Company, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (in such capacity under each Credit Agreement, the ""). Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings specified in the Credit Agreements, Restated Security Agreement and Collateral Agreement referred to therein, as applicable.
ABL Credit Agreement
Company
Term Credit Agreement
Credit Agreements
Administrative Agent
The undersigned, an executive officer or a Financial Officer of each of the Company and Charming Shoppes, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ""), each solely in his capacity as an officer, and not individually, hereby certifies to the Administrative Agent and each other Lender Party and Secured Party with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries or the Acquired Company and its Subsidiaries (prior to giving effect to the Acquisition), respectively, as follows:
Acquired Company
SECTION 1. . (a) Set forth on Schedule 1 is (i) the exact legal name of each Loan Party, as such name appears in its certificate of organization and (ii) each other legal name such Loan Party has had in the past five years, including the date of the relevant name change.
Legal Names
(b) Except as set forth on Schedule 1, no Loan Party has changed its identity or corporate structure in any manner within the past five years. Changes in identity or corporate structure include mergers, consolidations and acquisitions, as well as any change in form or jurisdiction of organization. With respect to any such change that has occurred within the past five years, Schedules 1, 2A and 2B set forth the information required by Sections 1 and 2 of this Perfection Certificate as to each acquiree or constituent party to such merger, consolidation or acquisition.
 
SECTION 2. . (a) Set forth on Schedule 2A is (i) the jurisdiction of organization and the form of organization of each Loan Party, (ii) the organizational identification number, if any, assigned to such Loan Party by such jurisdiction and, if such Loan Party is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction that requires such information to be set forth on the face of a Uniform Commercial Code financing statement, the federal taxpayer identification number, if any, of such Loan Party and (iii) the address (including the county) of the chief executive office of such Loan Party.
Jurisdictions and Locations
(b) Set forth on Schedule 2B are, with respect to each Loan Party, (i) all locations in the United States where such Loan Party maintains any books or records relating to any Accounts, (ii) all locations in the United States where such Loan Party maintains a place of business or any Collateral not otherwise identified on Schedule 2A or 2B, other than (A) any retail store operating location, (B) any Inventory in transit with a common carrier, (C) any Inventory maintained at a third party warehouse location where such Collateral is held for not more than 60 days pending delivery to a retail store upon the initial opening thereof (including the initial opening after the renovation or remodeling of a store) and (D) any location if the aggregate fair value of the Collateral maintained at such location does not exceed $1,000,000, in each case indicating whether each such location is owned or leased by such Loan Party, and (iii) the name and address of any Person in the United States other than a Loan Party that has possession of any Collateral, other than (A) any Inventory in transit with a common carrier, (B) any Inventory maintained at a third party warehouse location where such Collateral is held for not more than 60 days pending delivery to a retail store upon the initial opening thereof (including the initial opening after the renovation or remodeling of a store) and (C) any Inventory in possession of any such Person if the aggregate fair value of all such Inventory in possession of such Person does not exceed $1,000,000.
SECTION 3. . All Accounts have been originated by the Loan Parties and all Inventory has been either acquired by the Loan Parties in the ordinary course of business or manufactured by the Loan Parties.
Unusual Transactions
SECTION 4. . File search reports have been obtained from (a) the Uniform Commercial Code ("") filing office relating to the location of organization of each Loan Party identified on Schedule 2A and (b) the county recorder's office relating to the county where each Mortgaged Property is located. The file search reports obtained pursuant to this Section 4 reflect no Liens on any of the Collateral or any Mortgaged Property other than those permitted under the Credit Agreements.
File Search Reports
UCC
SECTION 5. . UCC financing statements have been prepared for filing in the proper UCC filing office in the jurisdiction in which each Loan Party is located (as provided in 9-307 of the UCC) and, to the extent any of the Collateral is comprised of fixtures, in the proper local jurisdiction, in each case as set forth with respect to such Loan Party in Section 2 above. Set forth on Schedule 5 is a true and complete list of each such filing and the UCC filing office or county recorder's office in which such filing is to be made.
UCC Filings
 
SECTION 6. . Set forth on Schedule 6 is a true and complete list, for each Loan Party, of all the stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membership interests or other Equity Interests owned by such Loan Party, specifying the issuer and certificate number of, and the number and percentage of ownership represented by, such Equity Interests.
Equity Interests
SECTION 7. . Set forth on Schedule 7 is a true and complete list, for each Loan Party, of all promissory notes and other evidence of Indebtedness evidencing (a) Indebtedness of the Company, the Acquired Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries owing to such Loan Party and (b) Indebtedness of any other Person in the principal amount of $5,000,000 or more held by such Loan Party, specifying the creditor and debtor thereunder and the type and outstanding principal amount thereof.
Debt Instruments
SECTION 8. . Set forth on Schedule 8 is a true and complete list, with respect to each Mortgaged Property, of (a) the exact name of the Person that owns such property, as such name appears in its certificate of organization, (b) if different from the name identified pursuant to clause (a) above, the name of the current record owner of such property, as such name appears in the records of the county recorder's office for such property identified pursuant to clause (c) below, and (c) the county recorder's office in which a Mortgage with respect to such property must be filed or recorded in order for the Administrative Agent to provide constructive notice to third parties of its mortgage lien. Copies of any deeds, title insurance policies, or surveys in the possession of the Borrower relating to each Mortgaged Property have been delivered to the Administrative Agent.
Mortgaged Property
SECTION 9. . Set forth on Schedule 9, in proper form for filing with the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, is a true and complete list of each Loan Party's (a) Copyrights, Copyright Applications and exclusive Copyright Licenses (where a Loan party is a licensee), (b) Patents and Patent Applications and (c) Trademarks and Trademark Applications, in each case specifying the name of the registered owner, title, type or mark, registration or application number, expiration date (if already registered) or filing date, a brief description thereof and, if applicable, the licensee and licensor.
Intellectual Property
SECTION 10. . Set forth on Schedule 10 is a true and complete list of commercial tort claims in excess of $1,000,000 held by any Loan Party, including a brief description thereof.
Commercial Tort Claims
SECTION 11. . Set forth on Schedule 11 is a true and complete list of all Deposit Accounts maintained by each Loan Party, other than (a) any Deposit Account that is an operating account maintained by any Loan Party solely for the use of one of its retail stores (or a group of 80 or fewer retail stores) in which payments received from customers are deposited and which is not an account to which amounts held in other deposit accounts of the Loan Parties are swept, (b) any Deposit Accounts that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for the payment of salaries and wages and (c) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance
Deposit Accounts
 
disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for payment of medical or insurance reimbursement, workers' compensation and similar expenses, in each case specifying the name and address of the depositary institution, the type of account (including whether such Deposit Account is a Concentration Account) and the account number.
SECTION 12. . Set forth on Schedule 12 is a true and complete list of all securities accounts maintained by each Loan Party, specifying the name and address of the financial institution holding the securities account (including a securities intermediary or commodities intermediary), the type of account and the account number.
Securities Accounts
SECTION 13. . Set forth on Schedule 13 is a true and complete list of all letters of credit issued in favor of any Loan Party as the beneficiary thereunder, other than any such letters of credit that constitute "Supporting Obligations" within the meaning of the UCC.
Letter of Credit Rights
SECTION 14. . Set forth on Schedule 14 is a true and complete list, for each Loan Party, of all chattel paper (whether tangible or electronic), specifying the Loan Party and obligor thereunder, the type, the due date and outstanding principal amount thereof.
Chattel Paper
SECTION 15. . Set forth on Schedule 15 is a true and complete list of each Credit Card Agreement to which any Loan Party is a party.
Credit Card Agreements
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have duly executed this certificate on this [14th] day of [June], 2012.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT G
Reference is made to the (a) Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent and (b) Term Credit Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as it may be amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, the "" and, together with the ABL Credit Agreement, the ""), among the Company, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (in such capacity under each Credit Agreement, the ""). Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings specified in the Credit Agreements, Restated Security Agreement and Collateral Agreement referred to therein, as applicable.
ABL Credit Agreement
Company
Term Credit Agreement
Credit Agreements
Administrative Agent
This Certificate is dated as of [    ], 20[    ] and is delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(f) of the ABL Credit Agreement and Section 5.01(e) of the Term Credit Agreement (this Certificate and each other Certificate heretofore delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(f) of the ABL Credit Agreement and Section 5.01(e) of the Term Credit Agreement being referred to as a ""), and supplements the information set forth in the Perfection Certificate delivered on the Second Restatement Effective Date (as supplemented from time to time by the Supplemental Perfection Certificates delivered after the Second Restatement Effective Date and prior to the date hereof, the ""); that Sections 2 and 15 (and the Schedules related thereto) shall be deemed a part of the Supplemental Perfection Certificate solely with respect to the ABL Credit Agreement.
Supplemental Perfection Certificate
Prior Perfection Certificate
provided
The undersigned, an executive officer or a Financial Officer of the Company, solely in his capacity as an officer, and not individually, hereby certifies to the Administrative Agent and each other Lender Party and Secured Party with respect to the Company and the Subsidiaries, as follows:
SECTION 1. Reserved.
SECTION 2. Except as set forth on Schedule 2 hereto,
1
Schedule 2 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth, with respect to each Loan Party, the name and address of any Person in the United States other than a Loan Party that has possession of any Collateral, other than (a) any Inventory in transit with a common carrier, (b) any Inventory maintained at a third party warehouse location where such Collateral is held for not more than 60 days pending delivery to a retail store upon the initial opening thereof
 
(including the initial opening after the renovation or remodeling of a store) and (c) any Inventory in possession of any such Person if the aggregate fair value of all such Inventory in possession of such Person does not exceed $1,000,000.
SECTION 3. Reserved.
SECTION 4. Reserved.
SECTION 5. Reserved.
SECTION 6. . Except as set forth on Schedule 6 hereto,
Equity Interests
2
Schedule 6 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list, for each Loan Party, of all the stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membership interests or other Equity Interests owned by such Loan Party, specifying the issuer and certificate number of, and the number and percentage of ownership represented by, such Equity Interests.
SECTION 7. . Except as set forth on Schedule 7 hereto,
Debt Instruments
3
Schedule 7 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list, for each Loan Party, of all promissory notes and other evidence of Indebtedness evidencing (a) Indebtedness of the Company, the Acquired Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries owing to such Loan Party and (b) Indebtedness of any other Person in the principal amount of $5,000,000 or more held by such Loan Party, specifying the creditor and debtor thereunder and the type and outstanding principal amount thereof.
SECTION 8. . Except as set forth on Schedule 8 hereto,
Mortgaged Property
4
Schedule 8 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list, with respect to each Mortgaged Property, of (a) the exact name of the Person that owns such property, as such name appears in its certificate of organization, (b) if different from the name identified pursuant to clause (a) above, the name of the current record owner of such property, as such name appears in the records of the county recorder's office for such property identified pursuant to clause (c) below, and (c) the county recorder's office in which a Mortgage with respect to such property must be filed or recorded in order for the Administrative Agent to provide constructive notice to third parties of its mortgage lien.
 
 
SECTION 9. . Except as set forth on Schedule 9 hereto,
Intellectual Property
5
Schedule 9 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth, in proper form for filing with the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, a true and complete list of each Loan Party's (a) Copyrights, Copyright Applications and exclusive Copyright Licenses (where a Loan party is a licensee), (b) Patents and Patent Applications and (c) Trademarks and Trademark Applications, in each case specifying the name of the registered owner, title, type or mark, registration or application number, expiration date (if already registered) or filing date, a brief description thereof and, if applicable, the licensee and licensor.
SECTION 10. . Except as set forth on Schedule 10 hereto,
Commercial Tort Claims
6
Schedule 10 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list of commercial tort claims in excess of $1,000,000 held by any Loan Party, including a brief description thereof.
SECTION 11. . Except as set forth on Schedule 11 hereto,
Deposit Accounts
7
Schedule 11 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list of all Deposit Accounts maintained by each Loan Party, other than (a) any Deposit Account that is an operating account maintained by any Loan Party solely for the use of one of its retail stores (or a group of 80 or fewer retail stores) in which payments received from customers are deposited and which is not an account to which amounts held in other deposit accounts of the Loan Parties are swept, (b) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for the payment of salaries and wages and (c) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for payment of medical or insurance reimbursement, workers' compensation and similar expenses, in each case specifying the name and address of the depositary institution, the type of account (including whether such Deposit Account is a Concentration Account) and the account number.
SECTION 12. . Except as set forth on Schedule 12 hereto,
Securities Accounts
8
Schedule 12 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list of all securities accounts maintained by each Loan Party, specifying the name and address of the financial institution holding the securities account (including a securities intermediary or commodities intermediary), the type of account and the account number.
 
 
SECTION 13. . Except as set forth on Schedule 13 hereto,
Letter of Credit Rights
9
Schedule 13 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list of all letters of credit issued in favor of any Loan Party as the beneficiary thereunder, other than any such letters of credit that constitute "Supporting Obligations" within the meaning of the UCC.
SECTION 14. . Except as set forth on Schedule 14 hereto,
Chattel Paper
10
Schedule 14 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list, for each Loan Party, of all chattel paper (whether tangible or electronic), specifying the Loan Party and obligor thereunder, the type, the due date and outstanding principal amount thereof.
SECTION 15. . Except as set forth on Schedule 15 hereto,
Credit Card Agreements
11
Schedule 15 to the Prior Perfection Certificate sets forth a true and complete list of each Credit Card Agreement to which any Loan Party is a party.
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have duly executed this certificate on this [    ] day of [            ], 20[    ].
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT H-1
Reference is hereby made to the Term Credit Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
Term Credit Agreement
Pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.15 of the Term Credit Agreement, the undersigned hereby certifies that (i) it is the sole record and beneficial owner of the Loan(s) (as well as any note(s) evidencing such Loan(s)) in respect of which it is providing this certificate, (ii) it is not a bank within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (iii) it is not a ten percent shareholder of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code and (iv) it is not a controlled foreign corporation related to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code.
The undersigned has furnished the Administrative Agent and the Company with a certificate of its non-U.S. Person status on IRS Form W-8BEN. By executing this certificate, the undersigned agrees that (1) if the information provided on this certificate changes, the undersigned shall promptly so inform the Company and the Administrative Agent, and (2) the undersigned shall have at all times furnished the Company and the Administrative Agent with a properly completed and currently effective certificate in either the calendar year in which each payment is to be made to the undersigned, or in either of the two calendar years preceding such payments.
Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Term Credit Agreement and used herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Term Credit Agreement.
 
Date: , 20[    ]
            
    
EXHIBIT H-2
Reference is hereby made to the Term Credit Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
Term Credit Agreement
Pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.15 of the Term Credit Agreement, the undersigned hereby certifies that (i) it is the sole record and beneficial owner of the participation in respect of which it is providing this certificate, (ii) it is not a bank within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (iii) it is not a ten percent shareholder of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, and (iv) it is not a controlled foreign corporation related to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code.
The undersigned has furnished its participating Lender with a certificate of its non-U.S. Person status on IRS Form W-8BEN. By executing this certificate, the undersigned agrees that (1) if the information provided on this certificate changes, the undersigned shall promptly so inform such Lender in writing, and (2) the undersigned shall have at all times furnished such Lender with a properly completed and currently effective certificate in either the calendar year in which each payment is to be made to the undersigned, or in either of the two calendar years preceding such payments.
Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Term Credit Agreement and used herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Term Credit Agreement.
 
Date: , 20[    ]
            
    
EXHIBIT H-3
Reference is hereby made to the Term Credit Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
Term Credit Agreement
Pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.15 of the Term Credit Agreement, the undersigned hereby certifies that (i) it is the sole record owner of the participation in respect of which it is providing this certificate, (ii) its direct or indirect partners/members are the sole beneficial owners of such participation, (iii) with respect such participation, neither the undersigned nor any of its direct or indirect partners/members is a bank extending credit pursuant to a loan agreement entered into in the ordinary course of its trade or business within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (iv) none of its direct or indirect partners/members is a ten percent shareholder of the Company or any of its Subsidaries within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code and (v) none of its direct or indirect partners/members is a controlled foreign corporation related to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code.
The undersigned has furnished its participating Lender with IRS Form W-8IMY accompanied by one of the following forms from each of its partners/members that is claiming the portfolio interest exemption: (i) an IRS Form W-8BEN or (ii) an IRS Form W-8IMY accompanied by an IRS Form W-8BEN from each of such partner's/member's beneficial owners that is claiming the portfolio interest exemption. By executing this certificate, the undersigned agrees that (1) if the information provided on this certificate changes, the undersigned shall promptly so inform such Lender and (2) the undersigned shall have at all times furnished such Lender with a properly completed and currently effective certificate in either the calendar year in which each payment is to be made to the undersigned, or in either of the two calendar years preceding such payments.
Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Term Credit Agreement and used herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Term Credit Agreement.
 
Date: , 20[    ]
            
    
EXHIBIT H-4
Reference is hereby made to the Term Credit Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Ascena Retail Group, Inc., the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
Term Credit Agreement
Pursuant to the provisions of Section 2.15 of the Term Credit Agreement, the undersigned hereby certifies that (i) it is the sole record owner of the Loan(s) (as well as any note(s) evidencing such Loan(s)) in respect of which it is providing this certificate, (ii) its direct or indirect partners/members are the sole beneficial owners of such Loan(s) (as well as any note(s) evidencing such Loan(s)), (iii) with respect to the extension of credit pursuant to this Term Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, neither the undersigned nor any of its direct or indirect partners/members is a bank extending credit pursuant to a loan agreement entered into in the ordinary course of its trade or business within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (iv) none of its direct or indirect partners/members is a ten percent shareholder of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code and (v) none of its direct or indirect partners/members is a controlled foreign corporation related to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code.
The undersigned has furnished the Administrative Agent and the Company with IRS Form W-8IMY accompanied by one of the following forms from each of its partners/members that is claiming the portfolio interest exemption: (i) an IRS Form W-8BEN or (ii) an IRS Form W-8IMY accompanied by an IRS Form W-8BEN from each of such partner's/member's beneficial owners that is claiming the portfolio interest exemption. By executing this certificate, the undersigned agrees that (1) if the information provided on this certificate changes, the undersigned shall promptly so inform the Company and the Administrative Agent, and (2) the undersigned shall have at all times furnished the Company and the Administrative Agent with a properly completed and currently effective certificate in either the calendar year in which each payment is to be made to the undersigned, or in either of the two calendar years preceding such payments.
Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Term Credit Agreement and used herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Term Credit Agreement.
 
Date: , 20[    ]
            
    
EXHIBIT I
 
 
 
 
[CS&M Ref. No. 6701-814]
 
 
 
 
 
 
INTERCREDITOR AGREEMENT dated as of June 14, 2012 (this ""), between JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative and collateral agent for, and acting on behalf of, the ABL Secured Parties (together with its successors and assigns in such capacity, the ""), and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative and collateral agent for, and acting on behalf of, the Term Secured Parties (together with its successors and assigns in such capacity, the ""). Capitalized terms used in this Agreement have the meanings assigned to them in Article I below.
Agreement
ABL Agent
Term Agent
On the date hereof, (a) Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Term Agent, are entering into the Term Credit Agreement and (b) the Company, the other Grantors, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as ABL Agent, are entering into the ABL Credit Agreement.
Company
The ABL Credit Agreement provides that Term Liens shall be permitted under the covenants contained therein, and the Term Credit Agreement provides that ABL Liens shall be permitted under the covenants contained therein, only if such Liens are subject to the terms of an intercreditor agreement in the form of this Agreement. Accordingly, the ABL Secured Parties and the Term Secured Parties have authorized and directed the ABL Agent and the Term Agent, respectively, to enter into this Agreement to set forth their relative rights and remedies with respect to the Collateral.
In consideration of the foregoing and the mutual covenants and obligations herein set forth and for other good and valuable consideration, the sufficiency and receipt of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto, intending to be legally bound, hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1.01. All capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement and that are defined in the UCC as in effect in the State of New York shall have the meanings specified therein.
New York UCC.
SECTION 1.02. As used in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
Other Defined Terms.
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
ABL Agent
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "ABL Obligations".
ABL Cap Amount
"" means all "Collateral", as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement, and any other assets of any Grantor now or at any time hereafter subject or purported under the terms of any ABL Collateral Document to be made subject to any Lien securing any ABL Obligations.
ABL Collateral
"" means the ABL Security Agreement, the ABL Mortgages and the other "Collateral Documents", as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement, and any other agreement, document or instrument now existing or entered into after the date hereof that grants a Lien on any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary to secure any ABL Obligations, as each may be Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
ABL Collateral Documents
"" means the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of the date hereof, among the Company, the Subsidiaries party thereto, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as ABL Agent, as Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
ABL Credit Agreement
"" means the ABL Credit Agreement, the ABL Collateral Documents and all other "Loan Documents", as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement.
ABL Documents
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "ABL Obligations".
ABL Excess Amounts
"" means "Lenders", as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement.
ABL Lenders
"" means all Liens on the Collateral securing the ABL Obligations, whether created under the ABL Collateral Documents or acquired by possession, statute (including any judgment lien), operation of law, subrogation or otherwise and whether or not created following the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, now or hereafter held by or on behalf of the ABL Agent or any other ABL Secured Party, or any agent or trustee therefor.
ABL Liens
"" means each mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents or other security document that grants a Lien on any real property owned or leased by any Grantor to secure any ABL Obligations.
ABL Mortgage
"" means all "Secured Obligations", as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement (including any such Secured Obligations arising or accruing during the pendency of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding), notwithstanding that any such Secured Obligations or claims therefor shall be disallowed, voided or subordinated in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding or under any Bankruptcy Law or other applicable law. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the sum of the ABL Obligations consisting of, without duplication, (a) principal amount of loans or advances under the ABL Credit Agreement and the other ABL Documents and (b) the aggregate face amount of all outstanding letters of credit issued or deemed issued under, or otherwise secured under, the ABL Credit Agreement and the other ABL Documents (the
ABL Obligations
 
foregoing ABL Obligations being collectively referred to as the ""), exceeds $300,000,000 (the ""), then the portion of the Capped ABL Obligations exceeding the ABL Cap Amount (such portion being referred to as the ""), and all interest, premiums, reimbursement obligations and other amounts in respect of the ABL Excess Amounts, shall be secured by the ABL Collateral Documents but shall not constitute "ABL Obligations" for all purposes of this Agreement (other than Sections 2.02 and 2.04, the definition of the term "Grantors" and the definition of the term "ABL Liens" as such term is used in Sections 2.01 and 2.02).
Capped ABL Obligations
ABL Cap Amount
ABL Excess Amounts
"" means any and all of the following that constitute Collateral: (a) all Accounts (other than Accounts arising under contracts for the sale of Term Priority Collateral); (b) all Chattel Paper (including Electronic Chattel Paper); (c) all tax refunds of any kind; (d) all Deposit Accounts and Securities Accounts (other than any Proceeds Collateral Account), and all cash, cash equivalents, checks and other negotiable Instruments, funds and other evidences of payment and all Financial Assets held on deposit therein or credited thereto, and all Security Entitlements arising therefrom (in each case, subject to Section 3.03, other than any identifiable Proceeds of the Term Priority Collateral); (e) all Inventory; (f) all rights to business interruption insurance; (g) solely to the extent evidencing, governing, securing or otherwise relating to the items referred to in any of the preceding clauses, all Documents, General Intangibles (other than Intellectual Property and Equity Interests), Instruments, Investment Property (other than Equity Interests) and Letter of Credit Rights; (h) except to the extent constituting Term Priority Collateral pursuant to clause (f) of the definition of such term, all Proceeds, including insurance Proceeds, of any of the foregoing and all collateral security and guarantees or other credit support given by any Person with respect to any of the foregoing; and (i) all books and records relating to any of the foregoing. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the term "ABL Priority Collateral" shall not include any assets referred to in clauses (a), (b), (c), (d) and (e) of the definition of the term "Term Priority Collateral".
ABL Priority Collateral
"" means the ABL Agent and the other "Lender Parties" as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement.
ABL Secured Parties
"" means the Amended and Restated Security Agreement dated as of the date hereof, among the Company, the other Grantors and the ABL Agent, as Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
ABL Security Agreement
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly or indirectly Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
"" means the ABL Agent and the Term Agent.
Agents
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Agreement
 
"" means, in respect of any Indebtedness, obligation or agreement, to amend, restate, modify, waive, supplement, restructure, extend, increase or renew such Indebtedness, obligation or agreement, in whole or in part. The terms "" and "" shall have correlative meanings.
Amend
Amended
Amendment
"" has the meaning set forth in the ABL Credit Agreement.
Banking Services
"" has the meaning set forth in the ABL Credit Agreement.
Banking Services Obligations
"" means Title 11 of the United States Code entitled "Bankruptcy," as now and hereafter in effect, or any successor statute.
Bankruptcy Code
"" means the Bankruptcy Code and any other Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law.
Bankruptcy Law
"" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed.
Business Day
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "ABL Obligations".
Capped ABL Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "".
Capped Term Obligations
Term Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.01.
Cash Collateral Usage
"" means any insured event of damage or casualty relating to all or any part of the Collateral.
Casualty
" refers to either (a) the ABL Agent, the ABL Collateral Documents, the ABL Credit Agreement, the ABL Documents, the ABL Obligations or the ABL Secured Parties, on the one hand, as opposed to (b) the Term Agent, the Term Collateral Documents, the Term Credit Agreement, the Term Documents, the Term Obligations or the Term Secured Parties, on the other hand.
Class"
"" means any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary that constitute the ABL Collateral or the Term Collateral.
Collateral
"" means the ABL Collateral Documents and the Term Collateral Documents.
Collateral Documents
"" has the meaning set forth in the recitals to this Agreement.
Company
"" means any taking, exercise of rights of eminent domain, public improvement, inverse condemnation, condemnation or similar action of or proceeding by any Governmental Authority or any other Person relating to any part of the Collateral.
Condemnation
 
"" means all compensation, awards and other payments or relief (including instruments and payments with respect to a deed in lieu of condemnation) to which the Company or any Subsidiary shall be entitled by law or otherwise in respect of any Condemnation.
Condemnation Proceeds
"" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
"" means any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any Person any right under any Copyright now or hereafter owned by any other Person or that such other Person otherwise has the right to license, and all rights of any such Person under any such agreement.
Copyright License
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by such Person: (a) all copyright rights in any work subject to the copyright laws of the United States or any other country, whether as author, assignee, transferee or otherwise, and (b) all registrations and recordings thereof, and all registration and recording applications filed in connection therewith, including registrations, recordings and applications in the United States Copyright Office or any similar office in any other country.
Copyrights
"" means the ABL Credit Agreement and the Term Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreements
"" means the ABL Documents and the Term Documents.
Credit Documents
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.01.
DIP Financing
"" means, with respect to the Obligations of any Class, subject to Sections 5.05 and 6.05:
Discharge
(a) payment in full in cash of the principal of and interest (including any Post-Petition Amounts in the nature of interest) on all Obligations of such Class;
(b) payment in full in cash of all other Obligations of such Class that are due and payable or otherwise accrued and owing at or prior to the time such principal and interest are paid (including any Post-Petition Amounts in the nature of fees, costs, expenses and other amounts);
 
(c) except for purposes of Section 5.02, termination or expiration of all commitments, if any, to extend credit that would give rise to Obligations of such Class; and
(d) termination or cash collateralization of all letters of credit the reimbursement or payment obligations in respect of which constitute Obligations of such Class (any such cash collateralization to be in an amount and manner reasonably satisfactory to the Agent of such Class, but in no event shall such amount be greater than 105% of the aggregate undrawn face amount of such letters of credit).
"" means, with respect to any Collateral, the Discharge of Obligations constituting Senior Obligations with respect to such Collateral. The parties hereto acknowledge that (a) with respect to the ABL Liens on the Term Priority Collateral and the ABL Obligations insofar as they are secured by such Liens, a Discharge of Senior Obligations shall mean a Discharge of the Term Obligations and (b) with respect to the Term Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral and the Term Obligations insofar as they are secured by such Liens, the Discharge of Senior Obligations shall mean a Discharge of the ABL Obligations.
Discharge of Senior Obligations
"" means any sale, lease, exchange, transfer or other disposition.
Disposition
"" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest (other than, prior to the date of such conversion, any Indebtedness that is convertible into any such Equity Interests).
Equity Interests
"" means the government of the United States, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national body exercising such powers or functions, such as the European Union or the European Central Bank).
Governmental Authority
"" means the Company and each Subsidiary that shall have created or purported to create any Lien on all or any part of its assets to secure any ABL Obligation or any Term Obligation.
Grantors
"" means and includes all obligations that constitute "Indebtedness" within the meaning of the ABL Credit Agreement or the Term Credit Agreement, as in effect on the date hereof.
Indebtedness
"" means (a) any voluntary or involuntary case or proceeding under the Bankruptcy Code with respect to any Grantor, (b) any other voluntary or involuntary insolvency, reorganization or bankruptcy case or
Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding
 
proceeding, or any receivership, liquidation, reorganization or other similar case or proceeding with respect to any Grantor or with respect to a material portion of the assets of any Grantor, (c) any liquidation, dissolution, reorganization or winding up of any Grantor, whether voluntary or involuntary and whether or not involving insolvency or bankruptcy, or (d) any assignment for the benefit of creditors or any other marshaling of assets and liabilities of any Grantor.
"" means all intellectual and similar property of every kind and nature now owned or hereafter acquired by any Grantor, including inventions, designs, Patents, Copyrights, Licenses, Trademarks, trade secrets, domain names, confidential or proprietary technical and business information, know-how, show-how or other data or information, software and databases and all embodiments or fixations thereof and related documentation, registrations and franchises, and all additions, improvements and accessions to, and books and records describing or used in connection with, any of the foregoing.
Intellectual Property
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.08(a).
Intellectual Property License
"" means, as to any Collateral, the Agent whose Liens on such Collateral are junior and subordinate to the Liens of the other Agent on such Collateral pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge that, subject to the proviso set forth in Section 2.01(a), the ABL Agent is the Junior Agent with respect to the Term Priority Collateral and the Term Agent is the Junior Agent with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral, and that, accordingly, any reference herein to the "Junior Agent" shall be construed as a reference to the ABL Agent insofar as the Term Priority Collateral is concerned and to the Term Agent insofar as the ABL Priority Collateral is concerned.
Junior Agent
"" means (a) with respect to Junior Obligations that are ABL Obligations or Junior Secured Parties that are ABL Secured Parties, the ABL Documents and (b) with respect to Junior Obligations that are Term Obligations or the Junior Secured Parties that are Term Secured Parties, the Term Documents.
Junior Documents
"" means, subject to the proviso set forth in Section 2.01(a), (a) with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral or the ABL Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral, the Term Liens on such Collateral, and (b) with respect to the Term Priority Collateral or the Term Liens on the Term Priority Collateral, the ABL Liens on such Collateral.
Junior Liens
"" means (a) with respect to any Collateral or any Senior Liens thereon, any Obligations that are secured by Junior Liens on such Collateral and (b) with respect to any Senior Obligations or Senior Secured Parties secured by any Collateral, any Obligations that are secured by Junior Liens on such Collateral.
Junior Obligations
 
"" means (a) with respect to the ABL Agent and any other ABL Secured Party, Term Priority Collateral and (b) with respect to the Term Agent and any other Term Secured Party, ABL Priority Collateral.
Junior Priority Collateral
"" means, as to any Collateral, the Secured Parties whose Liens on such Collateral are junior and subordinate to the Liens of the other Secured Parties on such Collateral pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge that the ABL Secured Parties are the Junior Secured Parties with respect to the Term Priority Collateral and the Term Secured Parties are the Junior Secured Parties with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral, and that, accordingly, any reference herein to the "Junior Secured Parties" shall be construed as a reference to the ABL Secured Parties insofar as the Term Priority Collateral is concerned and to the Term Secured Parties insofar as the ABL Priority Collateral is concerned.
Junior Secured Parties
"" means any Patent License, Trademark License, Copyright License or other license or sublicense agreement with respect to intellectual property to which any Grantor is a party.
License
"" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, charge, security interest or other encumbrance in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.05.
New Agent
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.05.
Notice of New Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.02.
Notification of Proceeds
"" means all ABL Obligations and all Term Obligations.
Obligations
"" means any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any Person any right to make, use or sell any invention on which a Patent now or hereafter owned by any other Person, or that any other Person now or hereafter otherwise has the right to license, is in existence, and all rights of any such Person under any such agreement.
Patent License
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by such Person: (a) all letters patent of the United States or the equivalent thereof in any other country, all registrations and recordings thereof and all applications for letters patent of the United States or the equivalent thereof in any other country, including registrations, recordings and pending applications in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or any similar offices in any other country, and (b) all reissues, continuations, divisions, continuations-in-part, renewals or extensions thereof, and the inventions disclosed or claimed therein, including the right to make, use and/or sell the inventions disclosed or claimed therein.
Patents
 
"" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.04(a).
Pledged or Controlled Collateral
"" means, with respect to any Obligations, all interest (including interest accruing at the default rate specified in the applicable Credit Documents), fees, costs, expenses and other amounts that would accrue and become due after commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding but for commencement of such Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, whether or not such amounts are allowed or allowable, in whole or in part, in any such Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Post-Petition Amounts
"" has the meaning set forth in the Term Credit Agreement.
Proceeds Collateral Account
"" means, with respect to the Obligations of any Class, the occurrence of any of the following: (a) an acceleration of the Obligations of such Class in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement of such Class; (b) a payment default in respect of Obligations under the Credit Agreement of such Class that has not been cured or waived in accordance with the terms thereof within 30 days of the occurrence thereof; or (c) the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Purchase Event
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.05.
Recovery
"" means, in respect of any Indebtedness, to refinance or replace, or to issue other Indebtedness in exchange for or replacement of, such Indebtedness in whole or in part. The terms "" and "" shall have correlative meanings.
Refinance
Refinanced
Refinancing
"" means (a) in the case of the ABL Agent, the ABL Secured Parties and (b) in the case of the Term Agent, the Term Secured Parties.
Related Secured Parties
"" means the ABL Secured Parties and the Term Secured Parties.
Secured Parties
"" means, as to any Collateral, the Agent whose Liens on such Collateral are senior to the Liens of the other Agent on such Collateral pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge that, subject to the proviso set forth in Section 2.01(a), the ABL Agent is the Senior Agent with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral and the Term Agent is the Senior Agent with respect to the Term Priority Collateral, and that, accordingly, any reference herein to the "Senior Agent" shall be construed as a reference to the ABL Agent insofar as the ABL Priority Collateral is concerned and to the Term Agent insofar as the Term Priority Collateral is concerned.
Senior Agent
 
"" means (a) with respect to Senior Obligations that are ABL Obligations, the ABL Documents and (b) with respect to Senior Obligations that are Term Obligations, the Term Documents.
Senior Documents
"" means, subject to the proviso set forth in Section 2.01(a), (a) with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral or the Term Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral, the ABL Liens on such Collateral, and (b) with respect to the Term Priority Collateral or the ABL Liens on the Term Priority Collateral, the Term Liens on such Collateral, and, in each case, any Liens incurred in connection with any Refinancing of Senior Obligations that are deemed to be Senior Liens under Section 5.05.
Senior Liens
"" means (a) with respect to any Collateral or any Junior Liens thereon, any Obligations that are secured by Senior Liens on such Collateral and (b) with respect to any Junior Obligations or Junior Secured Parties secured by any Collateral, any Obligations that are secured by Senior Liens on such Collateral.
Senior Obligations
"" means (a) with respect to the ABL Agent and any other ABL Secured Party, ABL Priority Collateral and (b) with respect to the Term Agent and any other Term Secured Party, Term Priority Collateral.
Senior Priority Collateral
"" means, as to any Collateral, the Secured Parties whose Liens on such Collateral are senior to the Liens of the other Secured Parties on such Collateral pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge that the ABL Secured Parties are the Senior Secured Parties with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral and the Term Secured Parties are the Senior Secured Parties with respect to the Term Priority Collateral, and that, accordingly, any reference herein to the "Senior Secured Parties" shall be construed as a reference to the ABL Secured Parties insofar as the ABL Priority Collateral is concerned and to the Term Secured Parties insofar as the Term Priority Collateral is concerned.
Senior Secured Parties
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.06.
Subject Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.06.
Subject Secured Parties
"" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, (a) any Person the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date and (b) any other Person (i) of which Equity Interests representing more than 50% of the equity value or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (ii) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
"" means any direct or indirect subsidiary of the Company.
Subsidiary
 
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.08(b).
Successor Intellectual Property License
"" means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Company or any Subsidiary shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
"" shall mean, with respect to any Person, the obligations of such Person under any Swap Agreement.
Swap Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
Term Agent
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "Term Obligations".
Term Cap Amount
"" means all "Collateral", as defined in the Term Credit Agreement, and any other assets of any Grantor now or at any time hereafter subject or purported under the terms of any Term Collateral Document to be made subject to any Lien securing any Term Obligations.
Term Collateral
"" means the Term Guarantee and Collateral Agreement, the Term Mortgages and the other "Collateral Documents", as defined in the Term Credit Agreement, and any other agreement, document or instrument now existing or entered into after the date hereof that grants a Lien on any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary to secure any Term Obligations, as each may be Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Term Collateral Documents
"" means the Term Loan Agreement dated as of the date hereof, among the Company, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Term Agent, as Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Term Credit Agreement
"" means the Term Credit Agreement, the Term Collateral Documents and all other "Loan Documents", as defined in the Term Credit Agreement.
Term Documents
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "Term Obligations".
Term Excess Amounts
"" means the Guarantee and Collateral Agreement dated as of the date hereof, among the Company, the Subsidiaries party thereto and the Term Agent, as Amended from time to time, including after the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Term Guarantee and Collateral Agreement
 
"" means all Liens on the Collateral securing the Term Obligations, whether created under the Term Collateral Documents or acquired by possession, statute (including any judgment lien), operation of law, subrogation or otherwise and whether or not created following the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, now or hereafter held by or on behalf of the Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party, or any agent or trustee therefor.
Term Liens
"" means each mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents or other security document that grants a Lien on any real property owned or leased by any Grantor to secure any Term Obligations.
Term Mortgage
"" means all "Secured Obligations", as defined in the Term Guarantee and Collateral Agreement (including any such Secured Obligations arising or accruing during the pendency of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding), notwithstanding that any such Secured Obligations or claims therefor shall be disallowed, voided or subordinated in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding or under any Bankruptcy Law or other applicable law. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the sum of the Term Obligations consisting of, without duplication, (a) principal amount of loans or advances under the Term Credit Agreement and the other Term Documents and (b) the aggregate face amount of all outstanding letters of credit issued or deemed issued under, or otherwise secured under, the Term Credit Agreement and the other Term Documents (the foregoing Term Obligations being collectively referred to as the ""), exceeds $400,000,000 (the ""), then the portion of the Capped Term Obligations exceeding the Term Cap Amount (such portion being referred to as the ""), and all interest, premiums, reimbursement obligations and other amounts in respect of the Term Excess Amounts, shall be secured by the Term Collateral Documents but shall not constitute "Term Obligations" for all purposes of this Agreement (other than Sections 2.02 and 2.04, the definition of the term "Grantors" and the definition of the term "Term Liens" as such term is used in Sections 2.01, 2.02).
Term Obligations
Capped Term Obligations
Term Cap Amount
Term Excess Amounts
"" means any and all of the following that constitute Collateral: (a) all Equipment, all real property and interests therein (including both fee and leasehold interests) and all fixtures; (b) all Intellectual Property; (c) each Proceeds Collateral Account, and all cash, cash equivalents, checks and other negotiable Instruments, funds and other evidences of payment and all Financial Assets held on deposit therein or credited thereto, and all Security Entitlements arising therefrom; (d) all Equity Interests; (e) all Commercial Tort Claims; (f) to the extent not expressly constituting ABL Priority Collateral (disregarding, for purposes of this clause (f), clause (i) of the definition of the term "ABL Priority Collateral"), all Investment Property, all Documents, all General Intangibles, all Instruments and all Letter of Credit Rights; (g) all other Collateral not constituting ABL Priority Collateral; (h) all Proceeds, including insurance Proceeds (other than business interruption insurance proceeds), of any of the foregoing and all collateral security and guarantees or other credit support given by any Person with respect to any of the foregoing; and (i) all books and records relating to any of the foregoing.
Term Priority Collateral
 
"" means the Term Agent and the other "Secured Parties" as defined in the Term Guarantee and Collateral Agreement.
Term Secured Parties
"" means any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any Person any right to use any Trademark now or hereafter owned by any other Person, or that any other Person otherwise has the right to license, and all rights of any such Person under any such agreement.
Trademark License
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by such Person: (a) all trademarks, service marks, trade names, corporate names, company names, business names, fictitious business names, trade styles, trade dress, logos, other source or business identifiers, designs and general intangibles of like nature, now existing or hereafter adopted or acquired, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all registration and recording applications filed in connection therewith, including registrations, recordings and applications in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or any similar offices in any other country or any political subdivision thereof, and all extensions or renewals thereof, (b) all goodwill associated therewith or symbolized thereby and (c) all other assets, rights and interests that uniquely reflect or embody such goodwill.
Trademarks
"" means the Uniform Commercial Code (or any similar or equivalent legislation) as in effect in any applicable jurisdiction.
UCC
SECTION 1.03. The definitions of terms in this Agreement shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". The words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all real and personal, tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights. The word "law" shall be construed as referring to all statutes, rules, regulations, codes and other laws (including official rulings and interpretations thereunder having the force of law or with which affected persons customarily comply) of all Governmental Authorities. Unless the context requires otherwise, (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time Amended (subject to any restrictions on such Amendments set forth herein); (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's permitted successors and assigns, and any reference herein to the Company or any other Grantor shall be construed to include the Company or such other Grantor as debtor and debtor-in-possession and any receiver or trustee for the Company or such other Grantor, as the case may be, in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding; (c) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar
Terms Generally.
 
import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof; and (d) all references herein to Articles and Sections shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of this Agreement.
SECTION 2.01. (a) Notwithstanding (i) the date, time, method, manner or order of grant, attachment or perfection of any ABL Lien or any Term Lien on any Collateral, (ii) any provision of the UCC or any other applicable law or of any ABL Document or any Term Document, (iii) any defect or deficiencies in, or failure to perfect, any ABL Lien or any Term Lien or (iv) any other circumstance whatsoever, each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby agrees that:
Relative Priorities.
(A) any ABL Lien on any ABL Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law, subrogation or otherwise, shall be senior in all respects and prior to any Term Lien on any ABL Priority Collateral;
(B) any Term Lien on any ABL Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law, subrogation or otherwise, shall be junior and subordinate in all respects to any ABL Lien on any ABL Priority Collateral;
(C) any Term Lien on any Term Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law, subrogation or otherwise, shall be senior in all respects and prior to any ABL Lien on any Term Priority Collateral; and
(D) any ABL Lien on any Term Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law, subrogation or otherwise, shall be junior and subordinate in all respects to any Term Lien on any Term Priority Collateral;
that notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement:
provided
(1) any ABL Lien on any ABL Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law, subrogation or otherwise, insofar as such ABL Lien secures ABL Excess Amounts, shall be junior and subordinate in all respects to all Term Liens on any ABL Priority Collateral (other than any Term Lien insofar as such Term Lien secures Term Excess Amounts); and
(2) any Term Lien on any Term Priority Collateral, regardless of how acquired, whether by grant, possession, statute, operation of law,
 
subrogation or otherwise, insofar as such Term Lien secures Term Excess Amounts, shall be junior and subordinate in all respects to all ABL Liens on any Term Priority Collateral (other than any ABL Lien insofar as such ABL Lien secures ABL Excess Amounts).
(b) The relative Lien priorities in respect of any Collateral set forth in this Section are only with respect to the priority of the Liens held by or on behalf of the Agents and their Related Secured Parties and shall not constitute a subordination of any Obligations to any other Obligations.
SECTION 2.02. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them will (and hereby waives any right to) contest or question the validity or enforceability of, or join or otherwise support any other Person in contesting or questioning the validity or enforceability of, in any proceeding, including any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, (a) the existence, perfection, priority, validity or enforceability of any ABL Lien (whether securing ABL Obligations or any ABL Excess Amounts) or any Term Lien (whether securing Term Obligations or any Term Excess Amounts), (b) the validity or enforceability of any ABL Obligations (or any ABL Excess Amounts) or any Term Obligations (or any Term Excess Amounts) or (c) the enforceability of this Agreement; that nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to prevent or impair the right of any Secured Party to enforce this Agreement.
Prohibition on Contests.
provided
SECTION 2.03. (a) Whether or not any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding has been commenced, each Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, that no Secured Party shall accept any additional Lien under any Collateral Document on any asset of any Grantor to secure Obligations of any Class unless such Grantor has granted or concurrently grants a Lien on such asset to secure Obligations of the other Class (all such Liens to have the relative priorities set forth herein based on whether the assets subject to such Liens constitute ABL Priority Collateral or Term Priority Collateral and whether such Liens secure ABL Excess Amounts or Term Excess Amounts); that the foregoing shall not apply to (i) Liens on any asset of any Grantor granted to secure Obligations of any Class if such asset is expressly excluded from the grant of a security interest by such Grantor pursuant to the Collateral Documents of the other Class and (ii) additional Liens on any asset of any Grantor granted to secure Obligations of any Class if, prior to such grant, such Grantor has offered in writing to grant a Lien on such asset to secure Obligations of the other Class and the Agent of such other Class has affirmatively declined in writing to accept such Lien or has failed to respond to such offer within 30 days thereof, in which case such Agent shall be deemed to have declined to accept such Lien. To the extent that the foregoing provisions are not complied with for any reason, without limiting any other rights and remedies available to the other Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties, each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that any amounts received by or distributed to such Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties pursuant to or as a result of Liens granted in contravention of this Section shall be subject to Section 4.02.
No New Liens.
provided
 
(b) Each Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, to cooperate in good faith in order to determine, upon any reasonable request by the other Agent, the specific assets included in the ABL Collateral and the Term Collateral, the steps taken to perfect the ABL Liens and the Term Liens thereon and the identity of the respective parties obligated under the ABL Documents and the Term Documents.
SECTION 2.04. The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, expressly acknowledges and agrees that (a) the ABL Credit Agreement includes a revolving commitment and that in the ordinary course of business the ABL Agent and the ABL Lenders will apply payments and make advances thereunder, (b) the amount of the ABL Obligations that may be outstanding at any time or from time to time may be increased or reduced and subsequently reborrowed, (c) all cash collateral received by the ABL Agent may be applied, reversed, reapplied, credited, or reborrowed, in whole or in part, to the ABL Obligations at any time and from time to time and (d) the advance rates under the ABL Credit Agreement may be reduced, and Reserves (as defined in the ABL Credit Agreement) may be imposed, under the terms of the ABL Credit Agreement, in each case without altering or otherwise affecting the Lien priorities set forth in this Agreement.
Revolving Nature of ABL Obligations.
SECTION 3.01. (a) Until the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to such Collateral has occurred, whether or not any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding has been commenced, each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them will:
Exercise of Remedies.
(i) enforce or exercise, or seek to enforce or exercise, any rights or remedies with respect to any Senior Priority Collateral of any Secured Party of the other Class (including the exercise of any right of set-off or enforcement of any right under any lockbox agreement, control agreement, landlord waiver or bailee's letter or similar agreement or arrangement) or institute any action or proceeding with respect to such rights or remedies (including any action of foreclosure); that the parties hereto acknowledge and agree that this Section shall not in any way prohibit any Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties from (A) commencing, or joining in filing of a petition for commencement of, any involuntary Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding of the type described in clause (a) or (b) of the definition of such term or (B) exercising any of its rights during an Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding to the extent expressly permitted by Article VI;
provided
(ii) subject to the proviso set forth in paragraph (a)(i) of this Section, commence or join with any Person (other than the Senior Secured Parties upon the request thereof) in commencing, or file with any court documents that seek to commence, or petition for or vote in favor of, any action or proceeding with
 
respect to any rights or remedies with respect to any Senior Priority Collateral of any Secured Party of the other Class (including any foreclosure action or seeking or requesting relief from or modification of the automatic stay or any other stay in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding to enable the commencement and pursuit thereof);
(iii) contest, protest or object to any foreclosure proceeding or action brought by any Secured Party of the other Class with respect to, or any other enforcement or exercise by any Secured Party of such other Class of any rights and remedies relating to, any Senior Priority Collateral of such Secured Party, whether under the Credit Documents of such other Class or otherwise and including any Disposition of any such Senior Priority Collateral, whether by foreclosure or otherwise; and
(iv) contest, protest or object to the forbearance by any Secured Party of the other Class from bringing or pursuing any foreclosure proceeding or action with respect to, or any other enforcement or exercise by any Secured Party of such other Class of any rights or remedies relating to, any Senior Priority Collateral of such Secured Party;
that, in each case under this Section, the Junior Liens on such Collateral shall attach to all Proceeds of such Collateral resulting from actions taken by any Senior Secured Party in accordance with this Agreement, subject to the relative Lien priorities set forth in Section 2.01.
provided
(b) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement (including paragraph (a)(i) of this Section), until the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to such Collateral has occurred, whether or not any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding has been commenced, the Senior Secured Parties in respect of such Collateral shall have the exclusive right to enforce and exercise rights and remedies (including the exercise of any right of set-off, any right under any lockbox agreement, control agreement, landlord waiver or bailee's letter or similar agreement or arrangement and the right to credit bid their debt) with respect to any of their Senior Priority Collateral and, in the course of such exercise, make related determinations regarding the release, Disposition or restrictions with respect to any such Collateral, without any consultation with or the consent of any Junior Secured Party; that the Junior Liens on such Collateral shall remain on the Proceeds of such Collateral so released or Disposed of, subject to the relative Lien priorities set forth in Section 2.01. In exercising rights and remedies with respect to any of its Senior Priority Collateral, each Senior Secured Party may enforce the provisions of the applicable Senior Documents and exercise remedies thereunder, all in such order and in such manner as it may determine in its sole discretion. Such exercise and enforcement shall include the right of any agent appointed by any Senior Secured Party to sell or otherwise Dispose of such Collateral upon foreclosure, to incur expenses in connection with such sale or other Disposition and to exercise all the rights and remedies of a secured creditor under the UCC and of a secured creditor under Bankruptcy Laws of any applicable jurisdiction.
provided
 
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Section, the Secured Parties of any Class may:
(i) file a claim or statement of interest with respect to Obligations of such Class in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding;
(ii) take any action in order to create, perfect, preserve, protect or prove (but not enforce) their Junior Liens on any Collateral, that no such action is, or could reasonably be expected to be, (A) adverse to the priority status of any Senior Liens on such Collateral or the rights of any Senior Secured Party to exercise remedies in respect thereof or (B) otherwise inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement, including the automatic release of Junior Liens provided in Section 5.01;
provided
(iii) file any responsive or defensive pleadings in opposition to any motion, claim, adversary proceeding or other pleading made by any Person objecting to or otherwise seeking the disallowance of the claims of any Secured Party of such Class, including any claims secured by Junior Priority Collateral thereof, or the avoidance of any Liens on the Collateral securing Obligations of such Class, in each case, to the extent not inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement;
(iv) exercise their rights and remedies as unsecured creditors to the extent (and only to the extent) provided in paragraph (e) of this Section;
(v) vote on any plan of reorganization (including to accept or reject any plan of partial or complete liquidation, reorganization, arrangement, composition or extension), file any proof of claim with respect to Obligations or Liens of such Class, and make other filings and make any arguments and motions, in each case, to the extent not inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement; and
(vi) join (but not exercise any control with respect to) any judicial foreclosure proceeding or other judicial lien enforcement proceeding with respect to any Collateral initiated by any Senior Secured Party with respect thereto, to the extent that any such action could not reasonably be expected to restrain, hinder, limit, delay for any significant period or otherwise interfere with the exercise of rights or remedies with respect to such Collateral by the Senior Secured Parties (it being understood that no Junior Secured Party shall be entitled to receive any Proceeds thereof unless otherwise expressly permitted hereby).
Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that it will not take or receive any Senior Priority Collateral of any Secured Party of the other Class or any Proceeds of any such Collateral in connection with the enforcement or exercise of any right or remedy (including any right of set-off) with respect to such Collateral in its capacity as a creditor, or in connection with any insurance policy relating to any such Collateral or any Condemnation Proceeds relating to any such Collateral, in each case to the extent such action is inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement. Without limiting
 
the generality of the foregoing, until the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to such Collateral has occurred, except as expressly provided in this paragraphs (a) and (c) of this Section (but subject to Section 4.02) and Sections 5.07, 5.08, 5.09, 6.03(b) and 6.03(c), the sole right of the Secured Parties of any Class with respect to any of the Senior Priority Collateral of the Secured Parties of the other Class is to hold a Junior Lien on such Collateral and to receive a share of the Proceeds thereof, if any, after such Discharge of Senior Obligations has occurred.
(d) Subject to paragraphs (a) and (c) of this Section and Sections 5.07, 5.08, 5.09, 6.03(b) and 6.03(c), each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties:
(i) agrees that neither such Agent nor any of its Related Secured Parties will take any action that (A) could reasonably be expected to restrain, hinder, limit, delay or otherwise interfere with (1) any enforcement or exercise of remedies with respect to any Senior Priority Collateral of any Secured Party of the other Class, including any Disposition of such Senior Priority Collateral, whether by foreclosure or otherwise, or (2) the realization by any Secured Party of the other Class of the full value of any of its Senior Priority Collateral or (B) otherwise would be prohibited hereunder, including any Disposition of any such Collateral, whether by foreclosure or otherwise;
(ii) waives any and all rights such Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties may have as junior lien creditors or otherwise to object to the manner in which any Secured Party of the other Class seeks to enforce or collect any Obligations of such other Class or to enforce or realize on its Senior Liens on any Collateral undertaken in accordance with this Agreement, regardless of whether any action or failure to act by or on behalf of any Secured Party of such other Class is adverse to the interests of such Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties; and
(iii) acknowledges and agrees that no covenant, agreement or restriction contained in any Collateral Document or other Credit Document of any Class shall be deemed to restrict in any way the rights and remedies of any Secured Party of the other Class with respect to any Collateral subject to its Senior Liens as set forth in this Agreement and the Credit Documents of such other Class.
(e) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, the Secured Parties of any Class may, in accordance with the terms of the Documents of such Class and applicable law, enforce rights and exercise remedies against the Company and any other Grantor as unsecured creditors; that no such action is inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement (including the limitations set forth in paragraphs (a) and (d) of this Section and in Article VI); that in the event any Secured Party becomes a judgment Lien creditor in respect of any Collateral as a result of its enforcement of its rights as an unsecured creditor with respect to any of its Obligations, such judgment Lien shall be subject to the terms of this Agreement, including the relative Lien priorities set forth in Section 2.01.
provided
provided
further
 
(f) Nothing in this Agreement shall prohibit the receipt by any Secured Party of any Class of the required or permitted payments of interest, principal and other amounts owed in respect of Obligations of such Class so long as such receipt is not the direct or indirect result of the enforcement or exercise by any Secured Party of such Class of rights or remedies as a secured creditor (including the right of set-off) against, or otherwise holding a Junior Lien on, the Senior Priority Collateral of any Secured Party of the other Class or enforcement in contravention of this Agreement of any Junior Lien on any such Collateral (it being agreed that any such enforcement or exercise permitted by this Agreement shall be subject to Section 4.02). Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to impair or otherwise adversely affect any rights or remedies any Secured Party of any Class may have with respect to any Collateral subject to its Senior Liens.
SECTION 3.02. The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges that, under the terms of the ABL Documents, Grantors are or may be required to ensure that all payments on Accounts constituting ABL Priority Collateral, or on other ABL Priority Collateral, are made to Deposit Accounts or lockboxes related thereto that constitute ABL Priority Collateral, and agrees that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth herein, no ABL Secured Party shall have any duty, responsibility or obligation to any Term Secured Party with respect to such Deposit Accounts or lockboxes, including no obligation to pay over to any Term Secured Party any payments received into any such Deposit Account or lockbox at any time. The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, agrees that to the extent that Proceeds of any Term Priority Collateral are deposited into any Deposit Accounts or lockboxes and are subsequently applied to repay or prepay the ABL Obligations, in the absence of the ABL Agent's willful misconduct or gross negligence (such absence to be presumed unless otherwise determined by a final, non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction), the sole remedy of the Term Secured Parties with regard to such Proceeds shall be to proceed directly against the Grantors unless, prior to the time such proceeds are applied to repay or prepay the ABL Obligations, the ABL Agent has actually received a Notification of Proceeds. For purposes of the foregoing, a "" means a notice in writing from the Term Collateral Agent or any Grantor to the ABL Agent containing the following information: (a) the Term Priority Collateral being sold or otherwise Disposed; (b) the proposed date of the sale or other Disposition; (c) the approximate amount of Proceeds therefrom; and (d) the name and contact information of the buyer or transferee of such Term Priority Collateral or, in the case of an auction, of the auctioneer.
Lockbox System.
Notification of Proceeds
SECTION 4.01. (a) Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby agrees that the ABL Priority Collateral or
Application of Proceeds.
 
Proceeds thereof received in connection with the sale or other Disposition of, or collection on, such ABL Priority Collateral upon the enforcement or exercise or any right or remedy (including any right of set-off) shall be applied:
(i) , to the payment of the ABL Obligations in accordance with the ABL Documents,
first
(ii) , to the payment of the Term Obligations in accordance with the Term Documents,
second
(iii) , to the payment of ABL Excess Amounts in accordance with the ABL Documents,
third
(iv) , to the payment of Term Excess Amounts in accordance with the Term Documents, and
fourth
(v) , the balance, if any, to the Grantors or to whomsoever may be lawfully entitled to receive the same or as a court of competent jurisdiction may direct.
fifth
(b) Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby agrees that the Term Priority Collateral or Proceeds thereof received in connection with the sale or other Disposition of, or collection on, such Term Priority Collateral upon the enforcement or exercise or any right or remedy (including any right of set-off) shall be applied:
(i) , to the payment of the Term Obligations in accordance with the Term Documents,
first
(ii) , to the payment of the ABL Obligations in accordance with the ABL Documents,
second
(iii) , to the payment of Term Excess Amounts in accordance with the Term Documents,
third
(iv) , to the payment of ABL Excess Amounts in accordance with the ABL Documents, and
fourth
(v) , the balance, if any, to the Grantors or to whomsoever may be lawfully entitled to receive the same or as a court of competent jurisdiction may direct.
fifth
SECTION 4.02. So long as the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to any Collateral has not occurred, whether or not any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding has been commenced, if (a) any Junior Secured Party receives any Collateral subject to any Senior Lien or any Proceeds of any such Collateral, or any other payment in connection with or on account of such Collateral, (i) in connection with the enforcement or exercise of any right or remedy (including any
Payments Over.
 
right of set-off) relating to such Collateral, the transfer of such Collateral or Proceeds to any Junior Secured Party by any Person holding a Lien on such Collateral that is subordinate to the Junior Lien on such Collateral, or any insurance policy claim or any Condemnation Proceeds in respect of such Collateral or (ii) as a distribution or recovery in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, (b) any Junior Secured Party receives, in contravention of Section 2.03, any Collateral of the type that would constitute Junior Priority Collateral of such Junior Secured Party, or any Proceeds of any such Collateral, or any other payment in connection with or on account of such Collateral, or (c) any Junior Secured Party receives any additional Collateral referred to in Section 6.03(b)(ii) that pursuant to such Section is subject to the provisions of this Section 4.02, or any Proceeds of such additional Collateral, or any other payment in connection with or on account of such additional Collateral, then, in each case, such Collateral or Proceeds thereof, or such other payment, shall be segregated and held in trust and forthwith transferred or paid over to the Senior Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Senior Secured Parties in the same form as received, with any necessary endorsements, or as a court of competent jurisdiction may otherwise direct. Until the Discharge of Senior Obligations occurs, each Junior Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby appoints the Senior Agent, and any officer or agent of the Senior Agent, with full power of substitution, as its true and lawful attorney-in-fact with full power and authority in the name, place and stead of each such Junior Secured Party or in such Senior Agent's own name, from time to time in such Senior Agent's discretion, for the purpose of carrying out the terms of this Section, to take any and all action or to execute and any all documents and instruments that may be necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this Section, including any endorsements or other instruments of transfer (which appointment is irrevocable and coupled with an interest).
SECTION 4.03. Upon the Discharge of Obligations of any Class, the Agent of such Class shall, except as may otherwise be required by applicable law or any order of any court or other Governmental Authority, deliver, at the expense of the Grantors, to the Agent of the other Class, without representation or recourse, any Collateral (including any Pledged or Controlled Collateral) held by the Agent of such Class at such time in the same form as received, with any necessary endorsements (so as, in respect of any such Pledged or Controlled Collateral, to allow the Agent of such other Class to obtain possession or control thereof), to be applied by the Agent of such other Class to the Obligations of such other Class in the order specified in the Credit Documents of such other Class.
Delivery of Collateral and Proceeds.
SECTION 5.01. (a) The Junior Liens on any Collateral shall be automatically, unconditionally and simultaneously released if:
Releases.
(i) in connection with the enforcement or exercise of its rights or remedies in respect of such Collateral, the Senior Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, releases its Senior Liens on any part of such Collateral; or
 
(ii) in connection with any Disposition permitted under the terms of both the ABL Documents and the Term Documents, the Senior Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, releases any of its Senior Liens on any part of such Collateral, other than following the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to such Collateral; or
that, in each case, the Junior Liens on such Collateral shall attach to all Proceeds of such Collateral in accordance with this Agreement, subject to the relative Lien priorities set forth in Section 2.01.
provided
(b) The Junior Agent with respect to any Collateral, for itself or on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, promptly shall (at the Grantors' expense) execute and deliver to the Senior Agent such documents and instruments as the Senior Agent may reasonably request to accomplish the purposes of this Section, including any endorsements or other instruments of transfer or release.
(c) Until the Discharge of Obligations of the other Class has occurred, each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby irrevocably constitutes and appoints the other Agent and any officer or agent of the other Agent, with full power of substitution, as its true and lawful attorney-in-fact with full power and authority in the name, place and stead of such Agent or its Related Secured Parties or in such other Agent's own name, from time to time in such other Agent's discretion, for the purpose of carrying out the terms of this Section, to take any and all action and to execute any and all documents and instruments that may be necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this Section, including any endorsements or other instruments of transfer or release (which appointment is irrevocable and coupled with an interest).
(d) Until the Discharge of Senior Obligations in respect of such Collateral has occurred, to the extent that the Senior Agent or the Senior Secured Parties released any Senior Lien on any Collateral and any such Lien is later reinstated, then the Junior Agent, for itself and for its Related Secured Parties, shall have a Lien on such Collateral, subject to the relative Lien priorities set forth in Section 2.01.
SECTION 5.02. (a) Until the Discharge of Term Obligations has occurred, and subject to the rights of the Grantors under the Term Documents, the Term Secured Parties shall have the exclusive right to adjust settlement under any insurance policy in respect of any Casualty to, or to approve any Condemnation Proceeds in respect of, any Term Priority Collateral, and all Proceeds on account thereof shall be paid to the Term Agent.
Insurance.
(b) Until the Discharge of ABL Obligations has occurred, and subject to the rights of the Grantors under the ABL Documents, the ABL Secured Parties shall have the exclusive right to adjust settlement under any insurance policy in respect of any Casualty to, or to approve any Condemnation Proceeds in respect of, any ABL Priority Collateral, and all Proceeds on account of ABL Priority Collateral shall be paid to the ABL Agent.
 
(c) Until the Discharge of ABL Obligations has occurred, subject to the rights of the Grantors under the ABL Documents, the ABL Secured Parties shall have the exclusive right to adjust settlement in respect of all business interruption insurance, and all Proceeds on account thereof shall be paid to the ABL Agent.
(d) Any insurance Proceeds and Condemnation Proceeds received by the Agent of any Class in accordance herewith shall, subject to the rights of the Grantors under the Credit Documents of such Class, be held or applied by it in accordance with such Credit Documents; that following the acceleration of the Obligations of such Class under such Credit Documents, all such amounts shall be promptly applied to such Obligations to the extent permitted under applicable law.
provided
(e) Until the Discharge of Obligations of the other Class has occurred, if any Secured Party of any Class shall, at any time, receive any insurance Proceeds (including Proceeds of the business interruption insurance) or Condemnation Proceeds in contravention of this Agreement, it shall segregate and hold in trust and forthwith pay over such insurance Proceeds or Condemnation Proceeds over to the Agent of the other Class in accordance with the terms of Section 4.02.
(f) Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees to cooperate with the Agent and Secured Parties of the other Class in connection with any Condemnation or Casualty for the purpose of carrying out the terms of this Section. In furtherance of the foregoing, each Agent agrees promptly to execute and deliver to the Agent of the other Class such acknowledgements, releases, consents, endorsements and other documents as the Agent of such other Class may reasonably request to accomplish the purposes of this Section (including any such request made at the request of any insurer). In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this Section and any other provision hereof, the provisions of this Section shall control.
SECTION 5.03. (a) The ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that the Term Documents may be Amended, and Indebtedness thereunder may be Refinanced, without the consent of any ABL Secured Party, and the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that the ABL Documents may be Amended, and Indebtedness thereunder may be Refinanced, without the consent of any Term Secured Party. No Amendment of any Credit Document shall affect the lien subordination or other provisions of this Agreement. Nothing in this paragraph shall affect any covenant of any Grantor under the Credit Documents of any Class that restricts the ability of such Grantor to Amend any Credit Document of the other Class or to effect a Refinancing of any Indebtedness thereunder.
Certain Provisions Regarding Credit Documents.
(b) In the event any Indebtedness under the Credit Documents of any Class is Refinanced, the holders of such Refinancing Indebtedness shall bind themselves in a writing addressed to the Agent of the other Class, for the benefit of the Secured Parties of such other Class, to the terms of this Agreement.
 
(c) The Agent of each Class agrees that each Collateral Document of such Class executed by it shall include the following language (or language to similar effect approved by the Agent of the other Class):
"Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the lien and security interest granted pursuant to this Agreement and the exercise of any right or remedy hereunder are subject to the provisions of the Intercreditor Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative and collateral agent for, and acting on behalf of, the ABL Secured Parties identified therein, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative and collateral agent for, and acting on behalf of, the Term Secured Parties identified therein. In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement and this Agreement, the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement shall govern and control."
Intercreditor Agreement
SECTION 5.04. (a) Each Agent agrees to hold that part of the Collateral that is in its possession or control, or in the possession or control of its agents or bailees (such Collateral being called the ""), as collateral agent for its Related Secured Parties and as gratuitous bailee for the Agent of the other Class (such bailment being intended, among other things, to satisfy the requirements of Sections 8-106(d)(3), 8-301(a)(2) and 9-313(c) of the UCC) solely for the purpose of perfecting the security interest granted under the Credit Documents of such other Class, subject to the terms and conditions of this Section.
Bailee for Perfection.
Pledged or Controlled Collateral
(b) No Agent shall have any obligation whatsoever to its Related Secured Parties or to any Secured Party of the other Class to ensure that the Pledged or Controlled Collateral is genuine or owned by any of the Grantors or to preserve rights or benefits of any Person. The duties or responsibilities of any Agent to any Secured Party of the other Class under this Section shall be limited solely to holding the Pledged or Controlled Collateral in its possession or under its control as gratuitous bailee in accordance with this Section and delivering such Pledged or Controlled Collateral upon the Discharge of Obligations of the applicable Class as provided in Section 4.03.
(c) No Agent acting pursuant to this Section shall have by reason of any Credit Document, this Agreement or any other document or agreement a fiduciary relationship in respect any Secured Party or any liability to any Secured Party, absent gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of such Agent (such absence to be presumed unless otherwise determined by a final, non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction).
 
(d) Subject to the terms of this Agreement, so long as the Discharge of Obligations of the applicable Class has not occurred, each Agent shall be entitled to deal with the Pledged or Controlled Collateral in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and the Credit Documents of the applicable Class. Upon the Discharge of such Obligations, such Agent shall, at the expense of the Grantors, take such other actions as are reasonably requested by the other Agent in connection with such other Agent obtaining a first-priority interest in, or possession or control of, such Pledged or Controlled Collateral.
SECTION 5.05. If any Grantor shall enter into any Refinancing of Obligations of any Class that is permitted by the Credit Documents of the other Class, where obligations under such Refinancing are secured by Liens on Collateral subject to Senior Liens securing such Refinanced Obligations, then a Discharge of Obligations of such Class shall be deemed not to have occurred for all purposes of this Agreement and, from and after the date on which the Notice of New Obligations is delivered to the Agent of the other Class in accordance with the next sentence, (a) the obligations under such Refinancing of Obligations of any Class shall automatically be treated as Obligations of such Class (to the same extent as the Refinanced Obligations), (b) the Liens securing such Refinancing of Obligations of any Class shall be treated as Senior Liens (to the same extent as the corresponding Liens securing the Refinanced Obligations) for all purposes of this Agreement, including for purposes of the Lien priorities and rights in respect of Collateral set forth herein, and (c) the collateral agent for such Refinancing of Obligations of any Class (the "") shall be the Agent of such Class (and, where applicable, the Senior Agent) for all purposes of this Agreement (to the same extent as the Agent for the Refinanced Obligations). Upon receipt of a notice (the "") stating that any Grantor has Refinanced any Obligations of any Class as provided above (which notice shall include the identity of the New Agent), the original Agents shall promptly enter into such documents and agreements (including Amendments to this Agreement) as the Company or such New Agent shall reasonably request in order to provide to such New Agent the rights contemplated hereby, in each case consistent in all material respects with the terms of this Agreement. The New Agent shall agree in a writing addressed to the remaining original Agent, for the benefit of its Related Secured Parties, to be bound by the terms of this Agreement. The provisions of this Section are intended to ensure that (i) the Liens on any Collateral securing any Refinancing of any Obligations of any Class will have the same priorities relative to the Liens on such Collateral securing Obligations of the other Class as the Liens that secured such Refinanced Obligations prior to such Refinancing and (ii) the parties benefited by the Liens on any Collateral securing any Refinancing of any Obligations of any Class will have the same rights and obligations relative to the parties holding Liens on such Collateral securing Obligations of the other Class as the parties that were benefited by the Liens that secured such Refinanced Obligations, and such provisions shall be construed accordingly.
When Discharge of Obligations Deemed Not to Have Occurred.
New Agent
Notice of New Obligations
SECTION 5.06. Without prejudice to the enforcement of any remedies of any Secured Party, whether under the Credit Documents or otherwise, the Agent of each Class, on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees
Obligations Purchase Right.
 
that, in the event a Purchase Event shall have occurred with respect to Obligations of such Class (the ""), the Secured Parties of the other Class (or any of them) may, at their sole expense and effort, upon notice to the Company and the Agent of such first Class, require the Secured Parties holding the Subject Obligations (the "") to assign and delegate to the Secured Parties of such other Class, without warranty or representation or recourse, all (but not less than all) of the Subject Obligations (including all, but not less than all, unfunded commitments under the applicable Credit Documents, if any, that are in effect); that (i) such assignment and delegation shall not conflict with any applicable law, and (ii) the Secured Parties of such other Class shall have paid to the Agent of such first Class, for the account of the Subject Secured Parties, in immediately available funds, an amount equal to 100% of the principal of all Indebtedness included in such Subject Obligations plus all accrued and unpaid interest thereon plus all accrued and unpaid fees and all the other Subject Obligations then outstanding (which shall include, with respect to (A) the aggregate face amount of the letters of credit, cash collateral in an amount equal to 105% thereof, (B) any Swap Obligations, 100% of the aggregate amount of such Swap Obligations (giving effect to any netting arrangements) that the Company or a Subsidiary would be required to pay if the relevant Swap Agreements giving rise to such Swap Obligations were terminated at such time, and (C) the Banking Services Obligations, 100% of the aggregate amount of the Banking Services Obligations (giving effect to any netting arrangements) that the Company or Subsidiary would be required to pay if the Banking Services giving rise to the Banking Services Obligations were terminated at such time). In order to effectuate the foregoing, the Agent of such first Class shall calculate, upon the written request of the Agent of such other Class from time to time, the amount in cash (and, with respect to clause (A) above, cash collateral) that would be necessary so to purchase the Subject Obligations. Following exercise of any such purchase right by the Secured Parties of any Class in accordance with the terms of this Section, the Secured Parties shall cooperate in consummating promptly thereafter such assignment and delegation using the applicable assignment forms set forth in the Credit Documents of the applicable Class.
Subject Obligations
Subject Secured Parties
provided
SECTION 5.07. (a) Subject to confidentiality limitations imposed by law, contract or otherwise, each Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, that if any of them obtains actual possession of any books and records of any Grantor (whether such books and records are in the form of a writing or stored in electronic form), then, upon request of the Agent of the other Class and reasonable prior notice, such Agent or such Related Secured Party in possession thereof will permit the requesting Agent, or its designated representatives and agents, to examine such books and records if and to the extent the requesting Agent delivers to such Agent or such Related Secured Party a certificate of its duly authorized officer to the effect that (i) such books and records contain, or are reasonably expected to contain, information that, in the good faith opinion of the requesting Agent, is necessary or useful to the exercise of rights and remedies with respect to the Senior Liens of the requesting Agent and (ii) the requesting Agent is entitled to receive and use such information as against the applicable Grantor or its suppliers, customers and contracts and under applicable law, and, in doing so, will comply, and will cause its Affiliates to comply, with all obligations imposed by law, contract or otherwise in respect of the disclosure or use of such information.
Sharing of Information; Rights of Access and Use.
 
(b) The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, agrees that if the ABL Agent takes any enforcement action with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral, the Term Agent and the other Term Secured Parties (i) shall cooperate with the ABL Agent (at the sole cost and expense of the ABL Agent and the ABL Secured Parties and subject to the condition that the Term Secured Parties shall have no obligation or duty to take any action or refrain from taking any action that, in the judgment of the Term Agent, could reasonably be expected to result in the incurrence of any liability, loss or damage to the Term Agent or the other Term Secured Parties) in its efforts to enforce its security interest in the ABL Priority Collateral and to assemble and sell the ABL Priority Collateral, (ii) shall not take any action designed or intended to hinder or restrict in any respect the ABL Agent from enforcing its security interest in the ABL Priority Collateral or selling or assembling the ABL Priority Collateral and (iii) in the event that the Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party shall acquire control or possession of any of the Term Priority Collateral, shall permit the ABL Agent, or its designated representatives or agents, upon reasonable advance notice, to use the Term Priority Collateral (including (x) equipment, processors, computers and other machinery related to the storage or processing of records, documents or files and (y) Intellectual Property), for a period not to exceed 120 days, for purposes of (A) assembling the ABL Priority Collateral, (B) selling (by public auction, private sale or a "store closing," "going out of business" or similar sale, whether in bulk, in lots or to customers in the ordinary course of business or otherwise and which sale may include augmented Inventory of the same type sold in the Grantors' business) any or all of the ABL Priority Collateral (including any ABL Priority Collateral located on any real property constituting Term Priority Collateral) in the ordinary course of business or otherwise, (C) removing any or all of the ABL Priority Collateral located in or on any real property constituting Term Priority Collateral or (D) taking reasonable actions to protect, secure and otherwise enforce the rights of the ABL Agent and the other ABL Secured Parties in and to the ABL Priority Collateral; that nothing contained in this paragraph shall restrict the rights of the Term Agent or the other Term Secured Parties from selling or otherwise Disposing of any Term Priority Collateral prior to the expiration of such 120-day period if the purchaser, assignee or transferee thereof agrees to be bound by the provisions of this paragraph. If any stay or other order prohibiting the enforcement or exercise of rights or remedies with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral has been entered by a court of competent jurisdiction, such 120-day period shall be tolled during the pendency of any such stay or other order. The rights of the ABL Agent, and its designated representatives and agents, set forth in clause (iii) above as to the Term Priority Collateral shall be irrevocable and royalty and rent free and shall continue at the ABL Agent's option for a period of up to 120 days as to any such Term Priority Collateral, beginning upon the earlier of (1) the date that is five days after the date on which the Term Agent has notified the ABL Agent that the Term Agent has acquired possession or control of such Term Priority Collateral and (2) the date the ABL Agent provides the Term Agent with written notice that it intends to exercise its rights under such clause with respect to such Term Priority Collateral.
provided
 
(c) During the period of actual use or control by the ABL Agent, or its designated representatives or agents, of any Term Priority Collateral, the ABL Secured Parties shall be (i) responsible for the ordinary course third party expenses related thereto, including costs with respect to heat, light, electricity and water with respect to that portion of any premises so used or controlled, or that arise as a result of such use or control, that the ABL Secured Parties shall not be obligated to pay any fee to the Term Secured Parties (or any Person claiming by, through or under the Term Secured Parties, including any purchaser of any Term Priority Collateral) or to any Grantor, for or in respect of the use by the ABL Agent, or its designated representatives or agents, of any Term Priority Collateral, and (ii) be obligated to repair at their expense any physical damage to such Term Priority Collateral resulting from such use or control, and to leave such Term Priority Collateral in substantially the same condition as it was at the commencement of such use or control, ordinary wear and tear excepted. In addition, the ABL Agent shall indemnify and hold harmless the Term Agent, and its officers, directors, employees and agents, from any liability, cost, expense, loss or damages, including reasonable and documented out-of-pocket legal fees and expenses, arising from any claim by a third party against the Term Agent to the extent such liability, cost, expense, loss or damages are found in a final, non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the ABL Agent, or its designated agents or representatives, pursuant to the exercise of its rights of access and use under paragraph (b) of this Section, to the extent not covered by insurance. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event shall the ABL Agent or the other ABL Secured Parties have any liability to the Term Agent or the other Term Secured Parties pursuant to this paragraph as a result of the condition of any Term Priority Collateral existing prior to the date of the exercise by the ABL Agent of its rights under paragraph (b) of this Section, and the ABL Agent and the other ABL Secured Parties shall have no duty or liability to maintain the Term Priority Collateral in a condition or manner better than that in which it was maintained prior to the use or control thereof by the ABL Agent, or its designated representatives or agents, or for any diminution in the value of the Term Priority Collateral that results solely from ordinary wear and tear resulting from the use or control of the Term Priority Collateral by the ABL Agent, or its designated representatives or agents, in the manner and for the time periods specified under this Section. Without limiting the rights granted under this Section, the ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, agrees to cooperate with the Term Agent (at the sole cost and expense of the Term Agent and the other Term Secured Parties and subject to the condition that the ABL Secured Parties shall have no obligation or duty to take any action or refrain from taking any action that, in the judgment of the Term Agent, could reasonably be expected to result in the incurrence of any liability, loss or damage to the ABL Agent or the ABL Secured Parties) in connection with any efforts made by the Term Agent to sell the Term Priority Collateral.
provided
(d) Neither the Agent nor any other Secured Party of any Class shall have any responsibility or liability for the acts or omissions of the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class made or arising in connection with the use or occupancy by the Agent or any other Secured Party of such other Class of any of the Term Priority Collateral.
 
(e) The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges and consents to the ABL Agent recording a memorandum of this Agreement (including the access rights set forth in this Agreement), in form reasonably acceptable to the ABL Agent, in the real property records of each county in which any real property constituting Term Priority Collateral is located. Upon the termination of the applicable access period referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section with respect to any such real property, the ABL Agent shall promptly take any actions reasonably requested by the Term Agent to remove such memoranda from the real property records relating to such real property.
SECTION 5.08. (a) The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, (i) acknowledges and consents to the grant to the ABL Agent by the Grantors of a limited, nonexclusive royalty-free license pursuant to the ABL Security Agreement (an "") and (ii) agrees that the Term Liens on the Intellectual Property constituting Collateral shall be subject to the Intellectual Property License.
Consent to License of Intellectual Property.
Intellectual Property License
(b) The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, agrees that if any Term Secured Party becomes the owner of any Intellectual Property as a result of the exercise of rights or remedies by such Term Secured Party with respect to its Senior Lien thereon, then, upon request of the ABL Agent, such Term Secured Party shall promptly provide written confirmation of the grant to the ABL Agent of, and does hereby irrevocably grant to the ABL Agent, a limited, nonexclusive royalty-free license in the form substantially similar to the Intellectual Property License (a "") to use any such Intellectual Property. Any license so granted by any Term Secured Party shall be binding on its successors and assigns (including any purchaser at a foreclosure sale). No Term Secured Party shall make any sale or transfer of any such Intellectual Property unless the purchaser or transferee thereof agrees in writing to provide a Successor Intellectual Property License to the ABL Agent upon request.
Successor Intellectual Property License
SECTION 5.09. The Term Agent agrees that if the ABL Agent shall require rights available under any permit or license controlled by the Term Agent in order to realize on any ABL Priority Collateral, the Term Agent shall take all such actions as shall be available to it (at the sole cost and expense of the Grantors), consistent with applicable law, and as shall be reasonably requested by the ABL Agent to make such rights available to the ABL Agent, subject to the Term Liens. The ABL Agent agrees that if the Term Agent shall require rights available under any permit or license controlled by the ABL Agent in order to realize on any Term Priority Collateral, the ABL Agent shall take all such actions as shall be available to it (at the sole cost and expense of the Grantors), consistent with applicable law, and as shall be reasonably requested by the Term Agent to make such rights available to the Term Agent, subject to the ABL Liens.
Permits and Licenses.
 
SECTION 6.01. Until the Discharge of ABL Obligations has occurred, if any Grantor shall be subject to any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding and the ABL Agent shall desire to permit the use of "Cash Collateral" (as such term is defined in Section 363(a) of the Bankruptcy Code) that constitutes ABL Priority Collateral (any such use being referred to as "") or to permit any Grantor to obtain financing from the ABL Secured Parties, or any of them, under Section 364 of the Bankruptcy Code or any similar Bankruptcy Law (any such financing being referred to as a ""), then the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, agrees that none of them will raise any objection to such Cash Collateral Usage or such DIP Financing, insofar as its rights with respect to the ABL Priority Collateral are affected. To the extent the ABL Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral are subordinate to or pari passu with any such DIP Financing meeting the foregoing requirements, the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, shall subordinate, and hereby subordinates, to the same extent the Term Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral to the Liens securing such DIP Financing (and all obligations relating thereto) and agrees, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, that neither the Term Agent nor any other Term Secured Party will request adequate protection or any other relief in connection with its rights as a holder of Liens on the ABL Priority Collateral (except as expressly agreed by the ABL Agent or to the extent permitted by Section 6.03(b)).
Cash Collateral and DIP Financing.
Cash Collateral Usage
DIP Financing
SECTION 6.02. Until the Discharge of Senior Obligations with respect to any Collateral has occurred, no Junior Secured Party with respect to such Collateral shall seek, or join or otherwise support any other Person in seeking, relief from or modification of the automatic stay or any other stay in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding in respect of such Collateral without the prior written consent of the Senior Agent with respect to such Collateral. No Junior Secured Party shall oppose, or join or otherwise support any other Person opposing, any motion of any Senior Secured Party seeking relief from the automatic stay or any other stay in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding in respect of such Senior Secured Party's Senior Priority Collateral.
Relief from the Automatic Stay.
SECTION 6.03. (a) Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them shall contest, or join or otherwise support any other Person contesting, (i) any request by the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class for adequate protection with respect to its Senior Liens on any Collateral or (ii) any objection by the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class to any motion, relief, action or proceeding based on the Agent or such other Secured Party of the other Class claiming a lack of adequate protection with respect to its Senior Liens on any Collateral.
Adequate Protection.
 
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this Section, in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding:
(i) if the Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class is granted adequate protection in the form of an additional Lien on Collateral of a type that would constitute Senior Priority Collateral of the Agent and other Secured Parties of such Class, then (A) the Agent of the other Class, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, may seek or request adequate protection in the form of a Lien on such Collateral, which Lien will be junior and subordinate to the Liens securing the Senior Obligations (and, in the case of any such Lien on additional collateral that would constitute ABL Priority Collateral, to any Cash Collateral Usage and/or DIP Financing (and all obligations related thereto) permitted by the ABL Credit Agreement) on the same basis as the other Liens on Collateral securing the Junior Obligations are so junior and subordinate to the Liens on such Collateral securing the Senior Obligations under this Agreement and (B) subject to clause (ii) below, the Agent of such first Class, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them shall contest, or join or otherwise support any other Person contesting, (1) any request by the Agent of such other Class, for itself or on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, for adequate protection pursuant to the preceding clause (A) or (2) any motion, relief, action or proceeding in support of a request for adequate protection pursuant to the preceding clause (A); and
(ii) if any Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class is granted adequate protection in the form of additional collateral of a type that would constitute Junior Priority Collateral of the Agent and other Secured Parties of such Class, then the Agent of such Class, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that the Agent of the other Class shall be entitled to be granted adequate protection in the form of a Lien on such additional collateral as security for the Obligations of such other Class (and, in the case of any additional collateral that would constitute ABL Priority Collateral, for any DIP Financing (and all obligations related thereto) provided by the ABL Secured Parties) and that any Lien on such additional collateral securing the Junior Obligations shall be junior and subordinate to the Lien on such collateral securing the Senior Obligations (and any such DIP Financing and related obligations) and to any other Liens granted to the Senior Secured Parties as adequate protection on the same basis as the other Liens on Collateral securing the Junior Obligations are so junior and subordinate to the Liens on such Collateral securing the Senior Obligations under this Agreement; that, to the extent the Agent of such other Class is not granted such adequate protection in the applicable form, any such additional collateral and any amounts recovered by or distributed to the Agent or any other Secured Party of such first Class pursuant to or as a result of any Lien on such additional collateral granted to or for the benefit of the Agent or any Secured Party of such first Class shall be subject to Section 4.02.
provided
(c) Except as expressly set forth in Sections 6.01 and 6.07 and in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section, nothing herein shall limit (i) the rights of the Agent of any Class, or any of its Related Secured Parties, to seek adequate protection with respect to its or their rights in the Collateral in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding (including adequate protection in the form of a cash payment, periodic cash payments or otherwise) or (ii) the right of the Agent of the other Class, or any of its Related Secured Parties, to object to such request for adequate protection.
 
SECTION 6.04. Subject to Sections 3.01(c) and 3.01(e), nothing contained herein shall prohibit or in any way limit the Senior Agent or any other Senior Secured Party from objecting in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding or otherwise to any action taken by the Junior Agent or any other Junior Secured Party, including the seeking by any such Junior Agent or any other Junior Secured Party of adequate protection or the asserting by any such Junior Agent or any other Junior Secured Party of any of its rights and remedies under the applicable Junior Credit Documents or otherwise, in each case to the extent affecting the Senior Agent's or such Senior Secured Parties' rights in its Senior Priority Collateral.
No Waiver.
SECTION 6.05. If any Secured Party is required in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding or otherwise to turn over or otherwise pay to the estate of any Grantor any amount paid in respect of its Senior Obligations (a "", then such Secured Party shall be entitled to a reinstatement of the applicable Senior Obligations with respect to all such recovered amounts. If this Agreement shall have been terminated prior to such Recovery, this Agreement shall be reinstated in full force and effect, and such prior termination shall not diminish, release, discharge, impair or otherwise affect the obligations of the parties hereto from such date of reinstatement.
Avoidance Issues.
Recovery
)
SECTION 6.06. (a)The Term Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, that none of them shall oppose or seek to challenge any claim by the ABL Agent or any other ABL Secured Party for allowance in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding of ABL Obligations consisting or alleged to consist of Post-Petition Amounts to the extent of the value of the Senior Priority Collateral of the ABL Agent and the other ABL Secured Parties, without regard to the existence of the Term Liens of the Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party on such Collateral.
Post-Petition Amounts.
(b) The ABL Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, that none of them shall oppose or seek to challenge any claim by the Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party for allowance in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding of Term Obligations consisting or alleged to consist of Post-Petition Amounts to the extent of the value of the Senior Priority Collateral of the Term Agent and the other Term Secured Parties, without regard to the existence of the ABL Liens of the ABL Agent or any other ABL Secured Party on such Collateral.
SECTION 6.07. Each Junior Agent, on behalf of itself and its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them will, in an Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, oppose or object to, or join or otherwise support any other Person in opposing or objecting to, any Disposition of any Senior Priority Collateral of any Grantor that is supported by the Senior Agent (and will not so oppose or object to any related bidding procedures and other related matters supported by the Senior Agent), and each Junior Agent and its Related Secured Parties will be deemed to have consented
Asset Dispositions.
 
under Section 363 of the Bankruptcy Code (or any comparable provisions of any other Bankruptcy Law) to any such Disposition of Senior Priority Collateral (and any such related bidding procedures and other related matters) supported by the Senior Agent.
SECTION 6.08. (a) Until the Discharge of the ABL Obligations has occurred, the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them (i) will assert or enforce any claim under Section 506(c) of the Bankruptcy Code (or any successor provision) senior to or on a parity with the ABL Liens on any ABL Priority Collateral for costs or expenses of preserving or disposing of any ABL Collateral and (ii) waives any claim it may now or hereafter have arising out of the election by any ABL Secured Party of the application of Section 1111(b)(2) of the Bankruptcy Code (or any successor provision) with respect to any ABL Priority Collateral.
Waiver.
(b) Until the Discharge of the Term Obligations has occurred, the ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that none of them (i) will assert or enforce any claim under Section 506(c) of the Bankruptcy Code (or any successor provision) senior to or on a parity with the Term Liens on any Term Priority Collateral for costs or expenses of preserving or disposing of any Term Collateral and (ii) waives any claim it may now or hereafter have arising out of the election by any Term Secured Party of the application of Section 1111(b)(2) of the Bankruptcy Code (or any successor provision) with respect to any Term Priority Collateral.
SECTION 6.09. Each of the ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, and the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that (a) the grants of Liens pursuant to the ABL Collateral Documents and the Term Collateral Documents constitute separate and distinct grants of Liens and (b) because of, among other things, their differing rights in the ABL Priority Collateral and the Term Priority Collateral, the ABL Obligations and the Term Obligations are fundamentally different from one another and must be separately classified in any plan of reorganization proposed or adopted in an Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding (other than any such plan of reorganization that provides for the payment in full and in cash of the aggregate amount of (and accrued interest, fees and expenses under) the ABL Obligations and the Term Obligations). To further effectuate the intent of the parties as provided in the immediately preceding sentence, if it is held that the claims of the ABL Secured Parties and the Term Secured Parties in respect of the Collateral constitute only one secured claim (rather than separate classes of senior and junior secured claims as contemplated hereunder), then each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that, subject to the provisions hereof (including Sections 2.01 and 4.01), all distributions shall be made as if there were separate classes of senior and junior secured claims against the Grantors in respect of the Collateral, with the effect being that, to the extent that the aggregate value of the Senior Priority Collateral of any Class is sufficient to satisfy the Senior Obligations of such Class, the Senior Secured Parties of such Class shall be entitled to receive, in addition to amounts distributed to them in respect of principal, pre-petition interest and other claims constituting the Senior
Separate Grants of Security and Separate Classification.
 
Obligations of such Class, all Post-Petition Amounts included in the Senior Obligations of such Class before any distribution is made in respect of the Junior Obligations in respect of such Collateral, with the Junior Secured Parties in respect of such Collateral being required to (and hereby agreeing to) turn over to the Senior Agent in respect of such Collateral amounts otherwise received or receivable by them to the extent necessary to effectuate the intent of this sentence, even if such turnover has the effect of reducing the aggregate recoveries.
SECTION 6.10. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that no Agent or other Secured Party shall be required to vote to approve any plan of reorganization with respect to any Grantor for any reason or to agree that any provision of any Credit Document shall survive the effectiveness of a plan of reorganization with respect to any Grantor in an Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Voting.
SECTION 6.11. If, in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, debt obligations of any reorganized Grantor secured by Liens upon any assets of such reorganized Grantor are distributed pursuant to a plan of reorganization, on account of both the ABL Obligations and the Term Obligations, then, to the extent the debt obligations distributed on account of the ABL Obligations and the Term Obligations are secured by Liens upon the same assets, the provisions of this Agreement will survive the distribution of such debt obligations pursuant to such plan and will apply with like effect to the Liens securing such debt obligations.
Reorganization Securities.
SECTION 7.01. (a) Other than any reliance on the terms of this Agreement, the ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, acknowledges that it and the other ABL Secured Parties have, independently and without reliance on the Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party, and based on documents and information deemed by them appropriate, made their own credit analysis and decision to enter into the ABL Documents and be bound by the terms of this Agreement and agrees, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, that it and the other ABL Secured Parties will continue to make their own credit decision in taking or not taking any action under the ABL Documents or this Agreement.
Reliance; Information.
(b) Other than any reliance on the terms of this Agreement, the Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges that it and the other Term Secured Parties have, independently and without reliance on the ABL Agent or any other ABL Secured Party, and based on documents and information deemed by them appropriate, made their own credit analysis and decision to enter into the Term Documents and be bound by the terms of this Agreement and agrees, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, that it and the other Term Secured Parties will continue to make their own credit decision in taking or not taking any action under the Term Documents or this Agreement.
 
SECTION 7.02. (a) The ABL Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other ABL Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that, except as set forth in Section 8.16, the Term Agent and the other Term Secured Parties have made no express or implied representation or warranty, including with respect to the execution, validity, legality, completeness, collectibility or enforceability of any Term Document, the ownership of any Collateral or the perfection or priority of any Liens thereon. Except as otherwise provided herein, the Term Secured Parties will be entitled to manage and supervise their respective loans and extensions of credit under the Term Documents in accordance with law and as they may otherwise, in their sole discretion, deem appropriate.
No Warranties or Liability.
(b) The Term Agent, for itself and on behalf of the other Term Secured Parties, acknowledges and agrees that, except as set forth in Section 8.16, the ABL Agent and the other ABL Secured Parties have made no express or implied representation or warranty, including with respect to the execution, validity, legality, completeness, collectibility or enforceability of any ABL Document, the ownership of any Collateral or the perfection or priority of any Liens thereon. Except as otherwise provided herein, the ABL Secured Parties will be entitled to manage and supervise their respective loans and extensions of credit under the applicable ABL Documents in accordance with law and as they may otherwise, in their sole discretion, deem appropriate.
(c) None of the Term Agent or the other Term Secured Parties shall have any express or implied duty to the ABL Agent or any other ABL Secured Party, and none of the ABL Agent or the other ABL Secured Parties shall have any express or implied duty to any Term Agent or any other Term Secured Party, to act or refrain from acting in a manner that allows, or results in, the occurrence or continuance of an event of default or default under any agreements with any Grantor (including any ABL Documents or any Term Documents), regardless of any knowledge thereof that they may have or be charged with.
SECTION 7.03. No right of the Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class to enforce any provision of this Agreement or any Credit Document of such Class shall at any time in any way be prejudiced or impaired by any act or failure to act on the part of any Grantor or by any act or failure to act by any Agent or any other Secured Party, or by any noncompliance by any Person with the terms, provisions and covenants of this Agreement or any Credit Document, regardless of any knowledge thereof that any Agent or any other Secured Party may have or be otherwise charged with.
No Waiver of Lien Priorities.
SECTION 7.04. Until the Discharge of Obligations of such other Class, each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees not to assert and hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any right to demand, request, plead or otherwise assert or otherwise claim the benefit of any marshaling, appraisal, valuation or other similar right that may otherwise be available under applicable law with respect to any Collateral subject to any Senior Lien of the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class or any other similar rights a junior secured creditor may have under applicable law.
No Marshalling.
 
SECTION 7.05. All rights, interests, agreements and obligations of each Agent and its Related Secured Parties hereunder shall remain in full force and effect irrespective of:
Obligations Unconditional.
(a) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Credit Document;
(b) except as otherwise expressly set forth in this Agreement, any change in the time, manner or place of payment of, or in any other terms of, all or any Obligations of any Class, or any Amendment, including any increase in the amount of the obligations thereunder, whether in writing or by course of conduct or otherwise, of the terms of any Credit Document;
(c) except as otherwise expressly set forth in this Agreement, any exchange of any security interest in any Collateral or any other collateral, or any Amendment, whether in writing or by course of conduct or otherwise, of all or any Obligations of any Class or any guarantee thereof;
(d) the commencement of any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding; or
(e) any other circumstances that otherwise might constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Grantor in respect of any Obligations or this Agreement or any Agent or any Secured Party in respect of this Agreement.
SECTION 8.01. Notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by fax, as follows:
Notices.
(a) if to the ABL Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 270 Park Avenue, 44th Floor, Mail Code: NY1-K855, New York, NY 10017, Attention: Donna DiForio (Fax No. (646) 534-2274); and
(b) if to the Term Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 South Dearborn, Chicago, Illinois 60603, Attention of Margaret Seweryn (Fax No. (888) 292-9533).
All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received; notices sent by fax shall be deemed to have been given when sent (except that, if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, shall be deemed to have
 
been given at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient). As agreed to between the Agents from time to time, notices and other communications may also be delivered by e-mail to the e-mail address of a representative of the applicable Person provided from time to time by such Person. Any Agent may change its address or facsimile number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other Agent.
SECTION 8.02. In the event of any express conflict between the provisions of this Agreement and the provisions of any Credit Document, the provisions of this Agreement shall govern and control.
Conflicts.
SECTION 8.03. This Agreement shall become effective when executed and delivered by the parties hereto. This is a continuing agreement of Lien subordination, and the Secured Parties of any Class may continue, at any time and without notice to the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class, to extend credit and other financial accommodations and lend monies to or for the benefit of any Grantor constituting their Obligations in reliance hereon. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby waives any right it may have under applicable law to revoke this Agreement or any of the provisions of this Agreement. The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that this Agreement is a "subordination agreement" within the meaning of, and is enforceable under, Section 510(a) of the Bankruptcy Code, and the terms hereof shall survive, and shall continue in full force and effect, in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding. All references to any Grantor shall include such Grantor as debtor and debtor-in-possession and any receiver or trustee for such Grantor, as the case may be, in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding.
Effectiveness; Continuing Nature of this Agreement.
SECTION 8.04. In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Agreement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).
Severability.
SECTION 8.05. (a) No failure or delay on the part of any party hereto in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the parties hereto are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of this Agreement or consent to any departure by any party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.
Amendments; Waivers.
 
(b) Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the ABL Agent and the Term Agent.
SECTION 8.06. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, acknowledges that no Agent or any other Secured Party shall be responsible for keeping the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class informed of (a) the financial condition of any Grantor or (b) any other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of the Obligations of any Class. No Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class shall have any duty to advise the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class of information known to it regarding such condition or any such circumstances or otherwise. In the event the Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class, in its sole discretion, undertakes at any time or from time to time to provide any such information to the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class, it shall be under no obligation (i) to make, and neither the Agent nor any other Secured Party of such Class shall make, any express or implied representation or warranty, including with respect to the accuracy, completeness, truthfulness or validity of any such information so provided, (ii) to provide any additional information or to provide any such information on any subsequent occasion, (iii) to undertake any investigation or (iv) to disclose any information, which pursuant to accepted or reasonable commercial finance practices, such party wishes to maintain confidential or is otherwise required to maintain confidential.
Information Concerning Financial Condition of Grantors.
SECTION 8.07. With respect to the value of any payments or distributions in cash, property or other assets that any Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class pays over to the Agent or any other Secured Party of the other Class under the terms of this Agreement, the Agent or Secured Party making such payment shall be subrogated to the rights of the Agent and Secured Party receiving such payment; that the Agent making such payment, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby agrees that none of them shall assert or enforce any such rights of subrogation they may acquire as a result of any such payment until the Discharge of Obligations of the other Class has occurred.
Subrogation.
provided
SECTION 8.08. All payments received by any Agent or any other Secured Party of any Class may be applied, reversed and reapplied, in whole or in part, to such part of the Obligations of such Class as shall be provided in the applicable Credit Documents of such Class.
Application of Payments.
SECTION 8.09. THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AND GOVERNED BY THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
Applicable Law.
SECTION 8.10. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT. EACH PARTY
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
 
HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
SECTION 8.11. (a) Each Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, that each of them hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims arising out of or relating to this Agreement brought by any of them shall be brought, and shall be heard and determined, exclusively in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each Agent agrees, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.
Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
(b) Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any objection that any of them may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any New York State or federal court. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
(c) Each Agent irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 8.01. Nothing in this Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
SECTION 8.12. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, agrees that each of them will take such further action and will execute and deliver such additional documents and instruments (in recordable form, if requested) as the other Agent may reasonably request to effectuate the terms of and the relative Lien priorities contemplated by this Agreement.
Further Assurances.
SECTION 8.13. Each Agent may demand specific performance of this Agreement. Each Agent, for itself and on behalf of its Related Secured Parties, hereby irrevocably waives any defense based on the adequacy of a remedy at law and any other defense that might be asserted to bar the remedy of specific performance in any action that may be brought by any other Agent or any of its Related Secured Parties.
Specific Performance.
 
SECTION 8.14. Article and Section headings in this Agreement are included herein for convenience of reference only and shall not constitute a part of this Agreement for any other purpose or be given any substantive effect.
Headings.
SECTION 8.15. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto in different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement or any document or instrument delivered in connection herewith by facsimile or other electronic transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement or such other document or instrument, as applicable.
Counterparts.
SECTION 8.16. By its signature, each Agent represents and warrants to the other Agent that it is duly authorized to execute and deliver this Agreement.
Authorization.
SECTION 8.17. This Agreement shall be binding upon, and shall inure to the benefit of, each Agent and its successors and assigns, as well as each other Secured Party, all of whom are intended to be bound by, and to be third party beneficiaries of, this Agreement. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) any Person to whom any Lender assigns or otherwise transfers all or any portion of any Obligation in accordance with the applicable Credit Documents shall become vested with all the rights and obligations in respect thereof granted to such Lender, without any further consent or action of the other Secured Parties, and (b) any counterparty to a Swap Agreement or an agreement relating to Banking Services Obligations that accepts the benefit of any Collateral in accordance with the ABL Collateral Documents or the Term Collateral Documents, as applicable, shall be deemed to have agreed to be bound by the terms of this Agreement. No other Person, including any Grantor, any debtor-in-possession or any receiver or trustee in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding, shall have or be entitled to assert any rights or benefits hereunder.
Parties in Interest.
SECTION 8.18. The provisions of this Agreement are and are intended solely for the purpose of defining the relative rights of (a) the ABL Agent and the other ABL Secured Parties and (b) the Term Agent and the other Term Secured Parties. Nothing in this Agreement is intended to or shall impair the obligations of any Grantor, which are absolute and unconditional, to pay the ABL Obligations and the Term Obligations as and when the same shall become due and payable in accordance with their terms.
Provisions Solely to Define Relative Rights.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Agreement as of the date first above written.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120830162651.txt.gz
TIME:20120830162651
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 15, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. ("Ascena") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Original Report") reporting, among other things, the completion of its acquisition of Charming Shoppes, Inc. ("Charming"). Under parts (a) and (b) of Item 9.01 therein, Ascena stated that it would file the required historical financial statements and pro forma information by amendment no later than 71 days following the date that the Original Report was required to be filed. This Current Report on Form 8-K/A amends the Original Report in order to provide the required historical financial statements and pro forma information. Except for filing of the historical financial statements and pro forma financial information, the Original Report is not being amended or updated in any other manner.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
This Form 8-K/A incorporates by reference the historical audited consolidated balance sheets of Charming as of January 28, 2012 and January 29, 2011, and the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, stockholders' equity and cash flows for the fiscal years ended January 28, 2012, January 29, 2011 and January 30, 2010 included in "Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data" from Charming's Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 28, 2012, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") on March 27, 2012.
This Form 8-K/A incorporates by reference the historical unaudited condensed consolidated balance sheets of Charming as of April 28, 2012 and January 28, 2012, and the related unaudited condensed consolidated statements of operations and cash flows for the thirteen weeks ended April 28, 2012 and April 30, 2011 included in "Item 1. Financial Statements" from Charming's Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended April 28, 2012 filed with the SEC on June 1, 2012.
 
Unaudited pro forma consolidated condensed financial statements as of and for the nine-month period ended April 28, 2012, and for the year ended July 30, 2011, is included as Exhibit 99.3 to this Form 8-K/A and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 23.1
We consent to the incorporation by reference in the Registration Statements No. 333-175693, 33-60196-99, 333-18135-99, 333-136061-99, and 333-138506-99 on Form S-8 of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., of our reports dated March 27, 2012, with respect to the consolidated financial statements and schedule of Charming Shoppes, Inc. and subsidiaries and the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting of Charming Shoppes, Inc. and subsidiaries which appear in the Annual Report (Form 10-K) of Charming Shoppes, Inc. for the year ended January 28, 2012, and is incorporated by reference in this Current Report on Form 8-K/A of Ascena Retail Group, Inc. dated August 30, 2012, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 

Exhibit 99.3
The following unaudited pro forma consolidated condensed balance sheet as of April 28, 2012 gives effect to (i) the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, Inc. ("Charming") on June 14, 2012 (the "Charming Acquisition") and (ii) the redemption of substantially all of Charming's 1.125% Senior Convertible Notes Due 2014 on July 27, 2012 (the "Convertible Debt Redemption"), as if they each occurred as of April 28, 2012. The following unaudited pro forma consolidated condensed statements of operations for the nine-month period ended April 28, 2012 and the year ended July 30, 2011 similarly give effect to the Charming Acquisition and the Convertible Debt Redemption as if they each occurred at the beginning of the period on August 1, 2010.
The pro forma consolidated condensed financial statements have been derived from, and should be read in conjunction with, each of Ascena Retail Group, Inc.'s (the "Company's") and Charming's historical audited and interim unaudited financial statements, including the notes thereto. For Charming, those financial statements are included in Charming's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for each of the quarters ended October 30, 2010 through April 28, 2012 and its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 28, 2012. For the Company, those financial statements are included in the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 28, 2012 and its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended July 30, 2011.
The pro forma consolidated condensed financial statements are presented for informational purposes only and are not necessarily indicative of the Company's financial position or results of operations that would have occurred had the events been consummated as of the dates indicated. In addition, the pro forma consolidated condensed financial statements are not necessarily indicative of the Company's future financial condition or operating results.
The Charming Acquisition
Pro forma adjustments for the Charming Acquisition reflect the purchase of all of Charming's outstanding shares of common stock, and all outstanding, unexercised employee equity awards, in an all cash transaction at $7.35 per share. The aggregate purchase price was $882.1 million (excluding the assumption of debt).
The Charming Acquisition was partially funded with $325 million from new borrowings including (a) $300 million of borrowings under a six-year term loan (the "Term Loan"), as described more fully below, and (b) $25 million of availability under our existing revolving credit agreement, which was amended in connection with the transaction. The remainder was funded with available cash and cash equivalents.
The $300 million Term Loan matures on June 14, 2018, and has mandatory quarterly repayments of 0.25%, or approximately $0.75 million, with a remaining balloon payment required at maturity. The Term Loan is recorded net of an original issue discount of $3 million, which is being amortized to interest expense over the contractual life of the Term Loan. The Company has the right to prepay the Term Loan in any amount and at any time. Interest rates
 
under the Term Loan are variable and are calculated using a base rate of the greater of (i) prime rate, (ii) federal funds rate, or (iii) LIBO rate (subject to a 1% floor); plus an applicable margin ranging from 225 basis points to 375 basis points based on a combination of the type of borrowing (prime or LIBOR) and the Company's total leverage ratio existing at the end of the previous fiscal quarter. The Term Loan contains customary representations, warranties, and affirmative and negative covenants.
In connection with the Charming Acquisition, the Company also amended its existing revolving credit facility (the "Revolver") in June 2012, to expand its maximum borrowing availability from $200 million to $250 million, with an optional additional increase of up to $50 million, among other changes in terms. The Revolver expires on June 14, 2017. Interest rates under the terms of the Revolver are variable and are calculated using a base rate of the greater of (i) prime rate, (ii) federal funds rate, or (iii) LIBO rate; plus an applicable margin ranging from 50 basis points to 200 basis points based a combination of the type of borrowing (prime or LIBOR) and the Company's average borrowing availability during the previous fiscal quarter. The Revolver contains customary representations, warranties, and affirmative and negative covenants.
In connection with the Term Loan and the amendment of the Revolver, the Company incurred $7.4 million of financing fees. The Company has deferred these fees and will amortize them to interest expense over the contractual life of the borrowing arrangements.
Lastly, in conjunction with the Charming Acquisition, Charming's $200 million senior secured revolving credit facility was terminated.
Purchase Price Allocation
The Charming Acquisition will be accounted for under the purchase method of accounting for business combinations. Accordingly, the cost to acquire such assets will be allocated to the underlying net assets in proportion to their respective fair values. Any excess of the purchase price over the estimated fair value of the net assets acquired will be recorded as goodwill. As more fully described in the notes to the pro forma consolidated condensed financial statements, a preliminary allocation of the excess of cost over the fair value of net tangible assets acquired has been made to identifiable intangible assets in the amounts of approximately $0.5 million to customer lists, $270.2 million to brands and trademarks, and $347.5 million to goodwill. The allocation of purchase price is preliminary at this time, and will remain as such until the Company finalizes the valuation of Charming's net assets acquired, which is not expected to be essentially completed until the Fall of 2012.
Transaction costs are expensed as incurred and generally include costs for legal, consulting and other costs that are direct, incremental costs of the acquisition. The Company estimates transaction costs to be approximately $27.2 million. Approximately $6.8 million of these transaction costs were included in the Company's historical financial statements for the nine-month period ended April 28, 2012. The balance of those costs will be recorded in the subsequent, three-month period ended July 28, 2012 when the closing of the Charming Acquisition occurred. As those costs are not expected to have a continuing impact on the
 
combined entity, the Company eliminated those costs from the pro forma consolidated condensed statement of operations for the nine-month period ended April 28, 2012. However, pro forma effect has been given to the incurrence of all transaction costs incurred in the pro forma consolidated condensed balance sheet as of April 28, 2012.
The Convertible Debt Redemption
Pro forma adjustments for the Convertible Debt Redemption reflect the effects relating to the extinguishment of substantially all of the Company's 1.125% Senior Convertible Notes Due 2014 (the "Convertible Notes") assumed in the Charming Acquisition, as triggered by the underlying indenture of the Convertible Notes in conjunction with the change-in-control of Charming.
In particular, in connection with the change-in-control event, each security holder had the right to require Charming to repurchase all of its outstanding notes for the principal amount of the notes, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the repurchase date of July 27, 2012. 99.2% of the Convertible Notes were redeemed and total disbursements were $140.4 million, consisting of $139.2 million of principal and $1.2 million of interest thereon. The Convertible Debt Redemption was funded through available cash on hand. $1.2 million aggregate principal amount of Convertible Notes remain outstanding after the Convertible Debt Redemption, and such notes are no longer convertible into Charming common stock.
In connection with the Charming Acquisition, the Company also settled related common stock warrants, which were historically entered into by Charming as a hedge against the potential dilution related to the Convertible Notes, for an aggregate cost of $5.3 million. The settlement of the warrants was funded through available cash on hand.
Discontinued Operations
Based on the results of its strategic review of Charming's operations, the Company announced contemporaneously with the closing of the Charming Acquisition its intent to cease operating and close down Charming's FASHION BUG business early in calendar-year 2013 in an orderly liquidation of the related net assets.
In addition, at the same time, the Company announced its intent to sell Charming's Figi's business, which markets food and specialty gift products. The sale of the Figi's business is expected to be completed by the one-year anniversary date of the closing of the Charming Acquisition.
Given the Company's intent to exit both the FASHION BUG and Figi's businesses by the one-year anniversary date of the closing of the Charming Acquisition, pro forma adjustments have been made to reclassify the historical financial position and operating results of both of these businesses to discontinued operations in the accompanying pro forma consolidated condensed financial statements.
 
Acquisition-Related Integration Plan
The Company is currently performing an operational and strategic assessment of Charming's businesses and existing cost structure for integration purposes. Among other areas, the Company is evaluating how best to integrate the respective companies' technology platforms, sourcing operations and supply chain operations. As a result of this assessment, the Company expects to identify a number of cost-reduction opportunities in connection with anticipated operational efficiencies and the streamlining of corporate overhead. Due to the preliminary stage of these integration efforts, no pro forma effect has been made for any cost savings or incremental one-time costs that have not already been reflected in the respective historical financial statements of the Company and Charming. The Company expects to complete its assessment and formalize its integration plans in the Fall of 2012.
Interest Rate Sensitivity
As of April 28, 2012, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to the Charming Acquisition and Convertible Debt Redemption, the Company had $325 million of variable-rate indebtedness. As such, the Company's financing costs are sensitive to changes in interest rates. For each 0.125% increase or decrease in interest rates, the Company's interest expense would increase or decrease by approximately $0.4 million, and net income would decrease or increase, respectively, by approximately $0.3 million.
 
Ascena Retail Group Inc.
Pro Forma Consolidated Condensed Balance Sheet (Unaudited)
As of April 28, 2012
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Sources and Uses of Funds
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group Inc.
Pro Forma Consolidated Condensed Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
For the Nine Months Ended April 28, 2012
 
 
Ascena Retail Group Inc.
Pro Forma Consolidated Condensed Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
For the Year Ended July 30, 2011
 
 
In addition, outstanding share and per share information for the Company have been restated to reflect the two-for-one common stock split which occurred in March 2012.
 
Charming Shoppes, Inc.
For the Nine Months Ended April 28, 2012
 
 
Charming Shoppes, Inc.
For the Year Ended July 30, 2011
 
Conforming Reclassifications
 
 
 
 
 
For the nine-month period ended April 28, 2012:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
For the year ended July 30, 2011:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
For the nine-month period ended April 28, 2012:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
For the year ended July 30, 2011:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
For the nine-month period ended April 28, 2012:
 
 
 
For the year ended July 30, 2011:
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120920172225.txt.gz
TIME:20120920172225
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 _________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
September 19, 2012 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On September 19, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release disclosing material non-public information regarding its results of operations for its fiscal fourth quarter and fiscal year ended July 28, 2012. The Company also announced its earnings per diluted share guidance for its full fiscal year ending July 27, 2013. A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
 
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
Date: September 20, 2012
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
ascena retail group, Inc. reports
FOURTH quarter AND FISCAL YEAR 2012 results
 
 consolidated comparable store sales increase 3% FOR
THE QUARTER AND 5% FULL YEAR
 company PROVIDES fiscal 2013 earnings guidance 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reported financial results for its fiscal fourth quarter and full year ended July 28, 2012.
SUFFERN, NY 
September
19, 2012 
(NASDAQ  ASNA)
 
Ascenas financial results for its fiscal fourth quarter and full year ended July 28, 2012 reflect its acquisition of Charming Shoppes, Inc. (Charming) on June 14, 2012 (the Charming Acquisition). Accordingly, operating results for those periods are not comparable to the prior year. In order to enhance comparability, adjusted results that exclude the effect of the Charming Acquisition have been presented to supplement the reported results for all periods of Fiscal 2012. Fiscal 2011 is presented on a GAAP basis. Reference should be made to Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this release for a reconciliation of adjusted, non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures.
 
Fiscal Fourth Quarter Results
 
On a reported basis, income from continuing operations for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012 , representing a decrease to the year-ago quarters income from continuing operations of $28.2 million. Earnings per share from continuing operations for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012 share, compared to $0.18 of earnings per diluted share from continuing operations for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2011. Including the discontinued operations of the newly acquired and businesses, which are intended to be disposed of,
was $11.2 million
decreased to $0.07 per diluted
Fashion Bug
Figis
net income for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012 was $1.6 million and earnings per diluted share was $0.01.
 
On an adjusted basis, income from continuing operations for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012 was $49.0 million, representing an increase to the year-ago quarters net income of $28.2 million. Adjusted earnings per share from continuing operations for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012 increased to $0.31 per diluted share, compared to $0.18 of earnings per diluted share on a reported basis for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2011.
 
years fourth quarter on a reported basis. On an adjusted basis, net sales for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012 increased 8%. Such increase was largely driven by strong growth in sales from new stores and e-commerce, as well as an overall comparable store sales increase of 2%, led by at5%.Consolidated include e-commerce sales results. The Company was pleased to note that e-commerce sales on an adjusted basis, which excludes Charming results, increased 49% to $39 million versus last years comparable period. The Companys comparable store sales and net sales by brand for the fiscal fourth quarter were as follows:
Net sales for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012 increased 29% to $939.7 million, compared to $725.8 million for last
Justice
comparable store sales include stores open for at least one year and do not
 
 
 
 
*Comparable store sales and net sales for and include sales from the acquisition date of June 14, 2012 through the end of the fiscal period for all stores that were open in both that period and the comparative period in the prior year.
Lane Bryant
Catherines
 
Gross margin for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012 increased to sales, compared to $400.2 million, or 55.1% of sales last year on a reported basisof sales. Gross margin improvement of 30 basis points on an adjusted basis was primarily due to stronger margin performance at and , offset in part by lower margins at .
$501.6
million, or 53.4% of
. On an adjusted basis, gross margin for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012 was $433.7 million, or 55.4%
Justice
maurices
dressbarn
 
separately in the consolidated financial statements, were $156.9 million, or 16.7% of sales, compared to $121.4 million, or 16.7. The 60 basis point improvement on an adjusted basis was primarily due to increased leverage on the higher sales volume.
Occupancy, distribution and buying costs (B&O) expenses for the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012, which are now presented
% of sales last year on a reported basis. On an adjusted basis, B&O was $126.3 million, or 16.1% of sales
 
quarter of Fiscal 2012 were $281.7 million, or 30.0% of sales, compared to $200.4 million, or 27.6% of sales last year on a reported basis.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the fourth
On an adjusted basis, SG&A increased 5% to $210.7 million, or 26.9% of sales.
 
2012 decreased to sales, compared to $54.2 million, or 7.5% of sales last year on a reported basis
Operating income for the fourth quarter of Fiscal
$30.8
million, or 3.3% of
. On an adjusted basis, operating income increased to $70.4 million, or 9.0% of sales. The increase in operating income as a percent of sales on an adjusted basis was due largely to the increase in gross margin.
 
Fiscal Full Year Results
 
On a reported basis, income from continuing operations for Fiscal 2012 was $171.8 million, representing an increase to last years income from continuing operations of $170.5 million. Earnings per share from continuing reased to $1.08 per compared to $1.05 of earnings per diluted share from continuing operations for
operations for Fiscal 2012 inc
diluted share,
Fiscal 2011. Including the discontinued operations of the newly acquired and businesses, net income for Fiscal 2012 was $162.2 million and earnings per diluted share was $1.02.  
Fashion Bug
Figis
 
 
On an adjusted basis, income from continuing operations for Fiscal 2012 was $213.8 million, representing an increase versus last years amount of $170.5 million on a reported basis. Adjusted earnings per share from continuing operations for Fiscal 2012 increased to $1.34 per diluted share, compared to $1.05 of earnings per diluted share on a reported basis for Fiscal 2011.
 
On an adjusted basis, net sales for Fiscal 2012 increased 10%. Such increase was due to a 5% comparable store sales increase, led by at 8%, and strong growth in sales from new stores and e-commerceE-commerce sales on an adjusted basis increased 54% to $160 million versus last year. The Companys comparable store sales and net sales by brand for the full year were as follows
Net sales for the full year Fiscal 2012 increased 15% to $3.4 billion, compared to $2.9 billion last year on a reported basis.
Justice
.
:
 
 
*Comparable store sales and net sales for and include sales from the acquisition date of June 14, 2012 through the end of the fiscal period for all stores that were open in both that period and the comparative period in the prior year.
Lane Bryant
Catherines
 
Gross margin for Fiscal 2012 increased to $1.9 billion, or 56.0% of sales, compared to $1.7 billion, or 56.7% of sales last year on a reported basis. On an adjusted basis, gross margin for Fiscal 2012 was $1.8 billion, or 56.6% of sales. Gross margin as a percent of sales on an adjusted basis declined slightly due largely to lower margins at and .
dressbarn
maurices
 
B&O expenses for Fiscal 2012 were $542.3 million, or 16.2% of sales, compared to $483.4 million, or 16.6% of sales last year on a reported basis. On an adjusted basis, B&O was $511.7 million, or 16.0% of sales. The 60 basis point improvement on an adjusted basis was primarily due to increased leverage on the higher sales volume.
 
SG&A expenses for Fiscal 2012 were $936.3 million, or 27.9% of sales, compared to $790.2 million, or 27.1% of sales last year on a reported basis. On an adjusted basis, SG&A increased 10% to $865.3 million, or 27.1% of sales. SG&A as a percent of sales on an adjusted basis was flat year-over-year as leverage on sales was offset by stock-based compensation expense.
 
Operating income for Fiscal 2012 increased slightly to $292.6 million, or 8.7% of sales, compared to $289.8 million, or 9.9% of sales last year on a reported basis. On an adjusted basis, operating income increased to $332.2 million, or 10.4% of sales. The improvement in operating margin on an adjusted basis was largely due to the increase in gross margin, as well as the improved combined leverage in B&O and SG&A expenses described above.
 
 
Fiscal Fourth Quarter Balance Sheet Highlights
 
The Company funded the purchase of the Charming Acquisition with approximately $600 million of available cash and investments, and approximately $325 million of new borrowings. As of the end of Fiscal 2012, the Company had cash and investments of $168.9 million and total debt of $326.6 million. This compares to $436.1 million of cash and investments and no debt at the end of Fiscal 2011.
 
The Company repurchased approximately 2.7 million shares at an aggregate cost of $37.2 million during Fiscal 2012.
 
Commentary
 
David Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented, We are pleased to have completed a landmark year in the history of our company. In addition to executing well at each of our businesses and maintaining a solid pace of quarterly results, we completed yet another transformative acquisition. We are developing detailed, thoughtful plans to fully integrate and , eliminating redundancy and capturing meaningful cost savings. We are confident that these moves will drive significant accretion to our future results.
Lane Bryant
Catherines
 
Fiscal July 2013 Earnings Guidance
 
The Companys guidance for adjusted earnings per diluted share from continuing operations for the fiscal year ending July 2013 is in the range of $1.45 to $1.55, excluding one-time, acquisition-related integration and restructuring costs that may be incurred related to the Charming Acquisition. This estimate is based upon various assumptions, including a mid-single digit increase in consolidated comparable store sales. The Company plans to open approximately 180 to 200 stores and close 100 to 120 stores, ending the fiscal year with approximately 3,900 and stores in operation and achieving approximately $5 billion in net sales.
Justice, Lane Bryant, maurices, dressbarn
Catherines
 
Conference Call Information
 
The Company will conduct a conference call today, September 19, 2012, at 9:00 AM Eastern Time to review its fourth quarter fiscal 2012 results followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (617) 847-8706 prior to the start time, the passcode is 38996220. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at
www.ascenaretail.com
. A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until October 20, 2012 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 29318776.
 
 
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: ASNA) is a leading specialty retailer offering clothing, shoes, and accessories for missy and plus-size women and tween girls, under the , , , and brands. Ascena Retail Group, Inc. operates through its subsidiaries approximately 3,800 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada. 
Justice
Lane Bryant
maurices
dressbarn
Catherines
 
For more information about Ascena Retail Group, Inc. and its brands, visit
www.ascenaretail.com
,
www.charmingshoppes.com
,
www.shopjustice.com
,
www.lanebryant.com
,
www.maurices.com
,
www.dressbarn.com
,
www.catherines.com
,
www.cacique.com
,
www.figis.com
and
www.figisgallery.com
. 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available in the Companys most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended July 30, 2011 and in its last filed Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 30, 2012.
 
Investor Relations
(845) 369-4600
 
ICR, Inc.
James Palczynski
Senior Managing Director
(203) 682-8229
jp@icrinc.com
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data) 
  
See accompanying notes.
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
 
(millions, except per share data)
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets (Unaudited)
(millions)
  
See accompanying notes.
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Segment Information (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
  
  
See accompanying notes.
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
 
Note 1. Basis of Presentation
 
Discontinued Operations
 
In connection with the Charming Acquisition, certain acquired businesses have been classified as a component of discontinued operations within the consolidated financial statements.
 
In particular, the Company announced, contemporaneously with the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, its intent to cease operating the acquired business. The business, consisting of approximately 600 retail stores, is expected to be closed down by early in calendar-year 2013 through an orderly liquidation of the related net assets.
Fashion Bug
Fashion Bug
 
In addition, the Company also announced, contemporaneously with the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, its intent to sell the acquired business. The business, which markets food and specialty gift products, is expected to be sold by the one-year anniversary date of the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes.
Figis
Figis
 
Given the Companys intent to exit both of those businesses, they have been appropriately classified as discontinued operations within the consolidated financial statements. As such, assets and liabilities relating to discontinued operations have been segregated and separately disclosed in the balance sheet as of the end of Fiscal 2012. In turn, operating results for those businesses have also been segregated and reported separately in the statement of operations for Fiscal 2012.
 
Segment Information
 
In January 2011, the Company completed an internal corporate reorganization and established a new holding company named Ascena Retail Group, Inc., to own the interests of each of the and brands through wholly owned subsidiaries. In connection therewith, beginning in Fiscal 2012, the Company implemented a new methodology to allocate corporate overhead costs to each of its operating segments on a reasonable basis.
Justice, maurices
dressbarn
 
As previously disclosed in the Companys Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 16, 2011, in order to conform to this new cost allocation methodology, the Company has recasted historically reported segment operating results in order to enhance the comparability of its segmental operating performance. There have been no changes in total net sales or total operating income as a result of this change.
 
A reconciliation of the Companys operating income for each segment under the historical and recasted basis of reporting for the three months and fiscal year ended July 30, 2011 is as follows:
 
  
 
 
 
Common Stock Split
 
On April 3, 2012, the Company issued a two-for-one common stock split, effected in the form of a 100% stock dividend. All common share and earnings per share data presented in the attached unaudited consolidated financial statements has been adjusted to reflect the stock split.
 
Occupancy, Distribution and Buying Costs Reclassification
 
Historically, the Company included occupancy, distribution and buying costs within cost of goods sold on the face of its statements of operations. However, in the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012, in connection with conforming the financial presentation of Charming Shoppes, the Company decided to present each of the aggregate of occupancy, distribution and buying costs and gross margin separately on the face of its statements of operations. In addition, certain costs, such as store utility costs, were reclassified from selling, general and administrative expenses to occupancy, distribution and buying costs. Financial information for all prior periods has been reclassified in order to conform to the current periods presentation. There have been no changes in historical operating income or historical net income for any period as a result of these changes.
 
Other
Reclassifications
 
Certain other immaterial reclassifications also have been made to the prior periods financial information in order to conform to the current periods presentation.
 
Note 2. Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
To provide investors information to assist them in assessing the Companys ongoing operations on a comparable basis, the Company has provided Fiscal 2012 financial measures in this press release that exclude the effect of the Charming Acquisition that closed effective June 14, 2012. Throughout this release, the term reported refers to information prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States (GAAP), while the term adjusted refers to non-GAAP financial information adjusted to exclude the impact of the Charming Acquisition. Management believes that the Charming Acquisition makes comparisons to Fiscal 2011 difficult because the acquisition is included for a partial period in Fiscal 2012, but is not included at all in Fiscal 2011. All information below is presented for the Companys continuing operations.
 
 
 
Net sales:
 
Gross margin:
 
Occupancy, distribution and buying expenses:
 
Selling, general and administrative expenses:
 
Operating income:
  


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20120921154552.txt.gz
TIME:20120921154552
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
September 19, 2012
Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
 
(845) 369-4500
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On September 19, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an investor conference call to discuss the Companys results of operations for its fourth quarter and fiscal year ended July 28, 2012 and certain other information, including the contents of the Companys press release dated September 19, 2012 which was furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 8-K on September 20, 2012. The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference. A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS
EDITED TRANSCRIPT
ASNA - Q4 2012 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings
Conference Call
 
EVENT DATE/TIME: SEPTEMBER 19, 2012 / 01:00PM GMT
 
OVERVIEW:
ASNA reported FY12 reported sales of $3.4b and adjusted net income of $214m or $1.34 per diluted share. 4Q12 reported net sales was $940m and reported net income from continuing operations including certain items was $11.2m or $0.07 per diluted share. Expects FY ending July 2013 sales to be $5b and adjusted EPS to be $1.45-1.55.
 
 
 
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
Allison Townsend
ICR - IR
David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
Armand Correia
Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
Anna Andreeva
FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
Scott Krasik
BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
Brian Tunick
JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
Jane Thorn Leeson
KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
Oliver Chen
Citigroup - Analyst
Neely Tamminga
Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
Janine Stichter
Telsey Advisory - Analyst
Wayne Archambo
Monarch Partners - Analyst
 
PRESENTATION
 
Operator
 
Good afternoon. My name is Jeff, and I'll be your conference operator today. At this time, I would like to welcome everyone to the Ascena Retail Group's fourth-quarter earnings conference call. I would now like to introduce Allison Townsend of ICR. Ms. Townsend, please begin.
 
Allison Townsend
- ICR - IR
 
Thank you, Jeff. Today's call is being recorded, and will be available for replay later today. Information on accessing this replay is available on today's press release.
 
As a matter of formality, I need to remind participants that remarks made by management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause the actual results and implementation of the Company's plans to vary materially. These risks are referenced in today's press release, as well as in the Company's most recently filed Forms 10-K and 10-Q.
 
I would now like to turn the conference call over to your host, Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO. David?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Allison. Good morning, and thank you for joining us to discuss the results of our fiscal fourth quarter, full year, and outlook for the future. Armand will go over the financial details in a few moments, but first I would like to give you some of the key highlights. We reported a sales increase of 29% to $940 million including the results of a partial quarter for Charming Shoppes. Excluding their contribution, adjusted revenues increased 8% on a consolidated low single-digit comp increase and new store growth. Our adjusted operating income increased 11% to $70 million with an adjusted operating margin of 9%, up slightly. Adjusted net income for the fourth quarter grew to $49 million or $0.31 per share. Including acquisition costs, we reported net income from continuing operations of $11.2 million.
 
The performance at each of our legacy businesses  Justice, maurices, and dressbarn, has been good, and in each case we believe our positioning for the Fall is right for the market. Across-the-board we are focused on continuing to provide an excellent value proposition for our customers. While each of our brands individually focuses on a different niche customer, the common thread through their strategies is a strong combination of fashion, quality, price, and a high level of customer service, all of which support good conversion rates. Their shared philosophy has driven our business effectively even in a very competitive market.
 
 
 
 
With regard to the market, we're clearly watching the macroeconomic picture. We view the consumer is hesitant. There are obviously many economic factors at play that are impacting our customers, in particular, the soft employment picture. Additionally, as you can appreciate, we are in the midst of an election cycle, and we think consumers are somewhat distracted and may prove more willing to spend when the uncertainty about the future is resolved by the election. While it's obviously hard to quantify these factors, they certainly are forming the backdrop for the retail environment in some ways. Although we would prefer to see a strong environment, it is of some consolation that our value proposition resonates well when consumers are under pressure.
 
Relative to many other retailers, we are in a good position to communicate and deliver on a value message, and though we are seeing softness in traffic levels, our conversion rates have been solid and we are achieving our plan. In the Spring, we took our AURs up across-the-board. Given that we also saw an increase in ASP, the customer accepted these price increases. With some moderation in cotton pricing beginning in the first quarter, our margins should show some improvement, and I'd say that, in general, our ability to increase price demonstrates an on-target assortment. This is also true of our e-commerce business, which has grown dramatically without cannibalizing our stores, which is a good indication that some customers are pressured for time and we are offering an effective solution for them as well.
 
Newness in our assortments has helped make sure this is the case. As you know, we push for efficiency and shared services in the behind-the-scenes functions like finance, IT, and supply chain management. At the same time, we've been careful to support fully independent marketing, merchandising, and field functions at each of our brands. This model allows each brand to focus more intensely on their front end, and on getting to know and respond to their customers. They are each very effective at building the right merchandise mix, and the right marketing and promotional strategies.
 
With respect to real estate, this good performance has enabled us to continue to see success and good returns from both new store openings and remodels. Across our legacy concepts for the full year, we opened 145 new stores, remodeled 71, and grew our net square footage by 3.2%. I'd also like to note that we opened 16 new stores in Canada, including the first six maurices, all of which have opened well above average. The total CapEx for new stores and remodels this year was over $100 million, and we're confident that the ROIC these investments earn is attractive.
 
With respect to our marketing and promotional activities, in the fourth quarter our average level of promotion was down slightly versus last year's. This speaks generally to evolving and improved assortments. We increased our total marketing budget for the year, but it actually decreased slightly as a percent of total sales. We continue to focus on mailings to our core customer list, targeted promotions, and compelling in-store events. We are also enhancing our focus on loyalty programs including blushPERKS at dressbarn and our Take 10 program at maurices. Building awareness and participation in these programs is being facilitated by our online strategy. With the growth in our e-commerce business, we have further developed the online experience of our brands including social media networking and building a strong direct e-mail marketing list that we can use in a variety of ways.
 
With regard to merchandise, our teams have been able to capture some good trends in the marketplace to drive business. In particular, colored bottoms have been a good business throughout the season, and should continue to perform well into the holidays. Additionally, for Justice, we have been pleased with a good test for the Brothers concept. The addition of this section has carried a level of incremental sales and an ROIC that supports an expanded test. We expect to have 20 more locations up and running prior to Christmas. I'll look forward to providing you an update as we go forward.
 
Initiatives like Brothers also inject a degree of newness into our concepts, which drives the larger business forward. We're also looking forward to a fresh perspective from several key new management hires, both recently made and soon to be made. We're hiring new talent in operations, marketing, and merchandising for a few of our brands. This is a healthy process, and we continue to be pleased with the strong candidates that we're able to attract to the Company and our brands.
 
Charming Shoppes, a transformative deal which we closed in our fourth quarter, is a big part of our growth and development. We're excited by the talent they bring, as well as the opportunity to learn their best practices. As you know, we're working through detailed plans for integration, and we expect to provide that to you, along with specifics on the expected synergies, at our analyst meeting in October. While the plan is still a bit fluid, we expect to streamline infrastructure, eliminate redundancy, and create synergies. The strategic fit with Charming, as expected, is very good, and this transaction both illustrates and reinforces our strategy to serve as a diversified group of growing brands in specialty retailing. Our structure enables our teams to do what they do best in terms of merchandising, marketing, and service, while leveraging the shared functions for back office support.
 
Although eliminating the duplicative overhead between our organizations will take time, we are confident that the negative financial impact will be relatively short lived, and we continue to expect modest accretion for the upcoming fiscal year. It is to our advantage that Charming Shoppes, as well as Ascena, currently operate under a holding company structure. This enables us to quickly and relatively smoothly address putting these shared services together, function by function, without disruption to the front end of our business.
 
 
 
 
As you know, we decided to wind down Fashion Bug. This project is on schedule and on budget, and should be completed by the end of January. We're also proceeding with plans to put Figi's on the market after the new year. We think the ability to continue to evolve, diversify, and create leverage are some of the essential features of the retail holding company model that we've adopted. We have assembled a great collection of niche brands that each have a unique position. It is essential that they maintain their own culture and become part of a larger whole at the same time. Our model enables our brands to develop best practices and leverage shared services, thereby improving both contribution and consolidated operating profitability.
 
The improvements we expect to make in our business are reflected in our guidance for the fiscal year ending July 2013. We believe we can reach a new milestone of $5 billion in sales in the coming year. This will largely be due to the revenue growth that results from the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, but also from the expectation of a mid single-digit comp sales increase, strong e-commerce growth, and new store sales. This will put us around 3,900 total stores by the end of next year. We believe that we can drive adjusted earnings per share in the range of $1.45 to $1.55. I'll note that the expected accretion from the acquisition of about $0.05 won't begin to occur until the second half when we get some of the early integration work behind us.
 
As we look forward into next year, we will clearly be working hard to drive growth in each concept through new stores, comp growth, and e-commerce. We will also be paying careful attention to executing a smooth and effective integration process. We believe Lane Bryant and Catherines will prove to be powerful additions to our family of brands.
 
Thank you for your interest. We're confident that we have an ongoing opportunity to grow the business, make it more efficient, and drive market-leading returns.
 
Now I'd like to turn it over to Armand.
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Thank you, David, and good morning, everyone. Our overall reported fourth-quarter results reflect a lot of noise in the numbers as a result of the Charming Shoppes acquisition that I'll attempt to clarify for you. We believe it's appropriate to exclude the impact of those items on our operating results, and focus on the results of our legacy brands  Justice, maurices, and dressbarn. As a result, my comments will primarily be on a non-GAAP basis, using the term adjusted. It is also appropriate to reference last year's fourth-quarter press release, both quarterly and full-year adjusted results. Please note, our GAAP reported financial results include Charming Shoppes results for a partial fourth quarter since the closing of the deal on June 14, and include certain one-time acquisition related integration and restructuring expenses, along with expenses for discontinued operations.
 
As you know, we previously announced our decision to close down Fashion Bug in an orderly liquidation process to be completed by the end of January of 2013. In addition, as David said, Figi's, our food and specialty gift-giving business, is expected to be offered for sale after the holidays, and as such, these two businesses are presented as discontinued operations.
 
Reviewing our results. Total net sales as reported increased 29% to $940 million. Of this amount, Lane Bryant and Catherines accounted for $156 million, reflecting a partial quarter's contribution. Sales at our legacy brands  Justice, maurices, and dressbarn, increased 8% to $784 million, which were primarily driven by new stores, growth in e-commerce, and a consolidated comp sales increase of 2% led by Justice increasing 5%, maurices 1%, and dressbarn 1%. This compares to last year's 7% comp increase, with Justice increasing 14%, maurices 3%, and dressbarn 4%. Comp sales increased for the 14th consecutive quarter.
 
For information purposes, comp sales at Lane Bryant and Catherines for the full fiscal quarter each increased 1%. We were pleased with the sales trends during the quarter from our legacy brands' e-commerce businesses, which increased 49% year-over-year to $39 million. I'd also note that e-commerce at Lane Bryant and Catherines for the full quarter increased 36% to $41 million.
 
Moving down the income statement. Please note, we've changed our presentation format for gross profit to provide more visibility to its components of gross margin, buying and occupancy, and distribution center cost. For TYLY comparison purposes, we have recasted last year's numbers accordingly. Gross margin dollars on an adjusted basis grew to $434 million. The rate increased 30 basis points year-over-year to 55.4%. The increase was primarily due to the stronger margin performance at Justice and maurices, which more than offset a decrease at dressbarn.
 
From a brand perspective, the gross margin rate at Justice increased 240 basis points to 58.1%, primarily from higher initial markup. maurices gross margin increased to 53.5%, increasing 120 basis points from both higher initial markup and lower markdowns. At dressbarn, gross margin was 53.9%, decreasing 260 basis points to last year due to higher markdowns. Total buying and occupancy, and distribution costs, on an adjusted basis were $126 million or 16.1% of sales, reflecting a 50 basis points decrease due to some favorable productivity efficiencies, and compares to last year's rate of 16.6%.
 
 
 
 
Now turning to SG&A. On an adjusted basis, SG&A increased 9% to $211 million or 26.9% of sales, reflecting a 30 basis points increase over the same period last year. We were generally pleased with our overall management of expenses, reflecting good leverage at our brands. We achieved selling cost leverage while spending more in marketing as we continue to reach out to our customers. We expect SG&A expenses to be under some pressure within the next year, as we build up our shared services infrastructure to support our brands, as well as integrating corporate overhead from the Charming Shoppes acquisition. In addition, the lack of sales leverage below our 3.5% comp sales tipping point impacted SG&A as a percent to sales.
 
Operating income on an adjusted basis was $70 million or 9% of sales, compared to last year's adjusted $63 million or 8.6% of sales. The year-over-year increase of 40 basis points was primarily from increases at our Justice brand. Adjusted operating income by brand includes Justice quarterly operating income was $24 million or 8.3% of sales, nearly doubling last year's $13 million or 5.1% of sales. maurices operating income came in at $15 million or 7.3% of sales, flattish to last year's $16 million or 8.5% of sales. dressbarn's operating income came in at $31 million or 10.8% of sales, compared to last year's strong $34 million or 12% of sales.
 
The adjusted tax rate for the quarter was 30.2% from the legacy brands. This compares to last year's 39.1%. This year's adjusted rate was lower than expected due to the successful resolution of discrete items that favorably impacted quarterly earnings per share by $0.03. We believe a 37.5% rate is more appropriate going forward.
 
Reported net income from continuing operations was $11.2 million or $0.07 per diluted share, which included $37.6 million of after tax costs related to the acquisition, and a partial quarter of Charming Shoppes results. Net income on an adjusted basis from our legacy brands was $49 million or $0.31 per diluted share. This compares to last year's adjusted net income of $38.5 million or $0.24 per diluted share.
 
Let me attempt to bring you  at least bridge you from the reported to the adjusted net income. The breakdown of the components between the reported net income of $11 million and adjusted net income of $49 million were as follows. We had pre-tax costs for acquisition, integration, and restructuring costs of approximately $25 million. Lane Bryant had an operating loss for the partial quarter of $10 million. Catherines had an operating loss of $4 million. I think it's appropriate to note that both the Lane Bryant and Catherines operating loss were entirely due to purchase accounting adjustments.
 
In addition to that, we had deal costs of a little over $7 million, and then interest expense of approximately $1.5 million. So, that takes the total part here in aggregate of pre-tax costs of nearly $50 million, giving it the tax rate  the after tax effect came in at $37.6 million. I hope this helps you at least bridge the reported net income and adjusted net income basis.
 
Turning now to a quick review of our full-year results. Reported sales for fiscal 2012 ending July 28, 2012 increased 15% to $3.4 billion with comp sales increasing 5%. Excluding Lane Bryant and Catherines for the partial quarter, total sales were $3.2 billion, increasing 10% year-over-year. Adjusted operating income for the year was $332 million or 10.4% of sales. This compares to last year's adjusted $311 million or 10.7% of sales. Adjusted net income for the fiscal-2012 year increased 13% to $214 million or $1.34 per diluted share. This compares to last year's adjusted net income of $189 million or $1.17 a diluted share. And again, the $1.17 is after the stock split.
 
Moving on to the balance sheet. We ended the year with $169 million of cash and cash equivalents. Of this amount, approximately $115 million is offshore. The Company used approximately $6 million of its previous cash and investments to fund the Charming Shoppes acquisition. We ended the year with long-term debt of $325 million  $300 million under our term loan and $25 million under our revolver. Currently, there are no borrowings outstanding under our revolver. In the near term, we will be using our excess cash to pay down debt rather than on share buyback.
 
Our inventory levels reflect continued strong inventory management and in good shape across all brands heading into the new season. At quarter-end, total inventories were $533 million, a decrease of 1% over last year's $540 million, including Lane Bryant and Catherines, and decreased 4% in units.
 
Moving on to CapEx for the quarter. CapEx for the quarter came in at $47 million for new store additions, store remodels, and technology projects, with full year fiscal-2012 CapEx coming in at $150 million. We are currently planning for some significant projects which will require meaningful CapEx. These projects will be discussed in more detail at our October 18 investor meeting. We are estimating total CapEx to be in the range of $300 million to $350 million for fiscal 2013.
 
Weighted average shares outstanding for the fourth quarter were 159.7 million shares, a decline from last year's 160.6 million shares. The decline was primarily related to the 2.7 million shares repurchased during the first half of the fiscal year.
 
Thank you. This concludes our prepared remarks. We will now accept your questions.
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
 
 
 
Operator
 
(Operator Instructions)
 
Anna Andreeva, FBR Capital Markets.
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
 
I had a couple of questions. First off, if you could comment about quarter to date trends? You usually give us some color on the call how the business is proceeding. My second question, looking at gross margins up 80 basis points, maybe if you could talk a little bit about the merchandise margin improvement, pretty significant at Justice and maurices? And also 50 basis points of occupancy leverage. I think that's the biggest actually leverage we've seen from you guys on this type of a comp and what kind of a comp do you need going forward to get occupancy leverage?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
All right. Thanks, Anna. I'll start off with the quarter to date trends and turn it over to Armand talk about some of the margin issues. While of course it varies by brand, I would tell you that quarter to date has been inconsistent. The results out there had been choppy. I'm not exactly sure why. People say it's the weather, it's the primaries, it's the Olympics, and there's a lot of excuses going on out there. I really can't put my finger on it, but overall, I think we're still on track to hit our fall comp plan. It's just not coming in consistently. So as I said earlier in my comments, it seems like the consumer is a bit hesitant and we haven't seen that strong consistent sales and traffic levels that we'd like to. Armand?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Let me take the first one, Anna. Our gross margin improvements of 30 BPS, yes we were certainly pleased with that. And that was primarily driven by the Justice increase of 240 basis points during the quarter, and that came from higher initial markup. And in addition to that, maurices also had a very good gross margin improvement during the quarter, increasing 120 basis points. So the 30 primarily is driven by those two increases that more than offset declines at dressbarn. As far as the new categories that we're breaking out, total buying, occupancy, and distribution cost, the leverage that we see, I'd like to think it was leverage from sales, but it was  we're starting to realize productivity efficiencies as a result of combining dressbarn and Justice distribution systems out of Ohio. So hopefully those are favorable trends that will continue into the future.
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
 
That's great. And just a quick follow-up to David. Should we think about by the division, kind of a similar performance at Justice outperforming the other two brands thus far in Q1?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes, it's a little early to tell, but the initial trends out of the box, with Justice being so strong with back-to-school would be that consistent, yes.
 
Operator
 
Scott Krasik, BB&T Capital Markets.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Maybe talk  you mentioned a comment about replacing some management on the merchandising side. I guess maurices has been a little bit inconsistent for the last few quarters. Maybe talk about what you're doing there?
 
 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Sure. At maurices, our CMO has left the Company and we have a woman that's been internal for about 10 years, Mary Bradley, that we promoted to GMM and we think the world of her. And we are looking to bring in a CMO to support Mary and mentor her and at the same time help lead some efforts we're developing in sourcing, product development, as well as focus on a couple of areas like accessories that we've been dissatisfied with.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
So it's not a total disaster, at least from the reported comps. So with the change based on what you see coming for Christmas and next spring or what's going on there?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, I think we saw an opportunity to take a rising star and move her up. And when we looked at the needs we had for our CMO, we have an opportunity we think to bring in someone that can better support us at maurices as we develop some strength in product developments and direct sourcing and some of the trend areas that we haven't been as strong in recently as we think we should be.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
But it's not necessarily going to get worse before it gets better?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We don't believe so, Scott.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. And then just in the comment about the $0.05 of accretion from Charming Shoppes, I know you want to save the big synergy talk, but what's your expectations for margin expansion right now from those businesses?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Those businesses are going through transition on the front end as well as the back end, so we haven't really focused on that, certainly on this call it's too detailed. But we will have discussion about each brand including Lane Bryant and Catherines, and they'll talk about their transition and some of their initiatives which we think will lead to improved margins, although I'm not exactly sure that it's going to happen in the next season or two, maybe longer-term.
 
Operator
 
Brian Tunick, JPMorgan.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Good morning guys and congrats on getting the acquisition done. I guess a couple of questions. First one, on the current quarter or the back half, just maybe your expectations for Justice in particular on the cotton recovery story and what you're seeing out there as far as how much you're able to keep and pass on to the consumer? So just wondering how much gross margin expectation seems realistic for you guys, particularly at Justice for the back half? Second question, really on this capital allocation, I mean it seems like you guys now have more debt than cash which is something I haven't seen in a long time. The CapEx going up a lot next year. So just wondering, as you think about longer-term, what is a more normal CapEx number after some of these projects as you look to pay down debt? And then the third question, just on the SG&A build up, are there anymore specific things you can comment on regarding what's happening there, regarding the back half?
 
 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Sure, let me take a first stab, and, Armand, after I'm done feel free to jump in. The comp prices as I said are dropping for all of our brands, we don't foresee dropping our prices. We're going to hold on to the increases that we've got. And if you recall last year, we gave up some margins so we think we'll get that margin back. The other thing it does is it gives us a little more flexibility if we need to do additional promotions or more aggressive promotions. It's nice to have that flexibility in our pocket.
 
On the debt side, the capital allocation obviously is a little bit distorted right now simply because of the $300 million in debt. We foresee paying that back in the next two to three years, and the CapEx that Armand mentioned is a little bit of a blip for this year and it will roll into fiscal '14 probably at a somewhat lower level. And then without trying to give you any specific guidance, I'd say if you look at a go-forward CapEx in the $200 million range, you're probably reasonably close. And then on the SG&A, I think your question really referred to how are we going to rationalize the SG&A given the combination of the two shared services, is that correct?
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Yes, absolutely, David.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
So Brian, what we're doing as I mentioned is we're going function by function and putting the teams together, and they've been working basically since we merged to figure out what is the right way to combine our shared service organizations. So we're working through that. We think we'll have the vast majority of it done by spring. So we're really going to force the issue by spring. We'll no longer have a budget for Charming Shoppes. It will either be a budget for the brand, Lane Bryant or Catherines, or the shared service will be rolled into the Ascena shared services. We'll have one organization now that will be responsible for whatever the function is for all the Ascena brands.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Very helpful. We'll see you in a couple of weeks.
 
Operator
 
Edward Yruma, KeyBanc Capital Markets.
 
Jane Thorn Leeson
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Hello? Can you hear me?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes, we can.
 
Jane Thorn Leeson
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay, thanks. Congratulations on a good quarter. This is Jane in for Ed. I was wondering if you could talk a little bit about what happened at the core dressbarn division during the quarter, and particularly the decline in gross margins? Just trends that happened in that division.
 
 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I think dressbarn under performed a bit, and as a result, we had to clear some inventory a bit more than we expected. We were slightly under plan as you saw from the comp results. And that pressure impacted our margins. So not a great quarter. We think that there had been a lot of changes made and I've talked about those in past calls that we think we're going to continue to see improvement in the fall and particularly in the spring.
 
Jane Thorn Leeson
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay, great. And then just back on maurices, what timeframe do you see in bringing on the new roles that you were talking about, the CMO and sourcing products?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
The roles that I mentioned in my prepared comments were at several divisions as well as at Ascena. And we have searches underway for all of the key roles, and it is our expectation that the majority of these roles will be in place  will be filled by the end of the year, if not very soon after.
 
Jane Thorn Leeson
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
By the end of 2012 or fiscal '13?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Calendar 2012, so in the next, say, three or four months.
 
Operator
 
Oliver Chen, Citigroup.
 
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Regarding the guidance for next year and the EPS guidance of $1.45 to $1.55, could you give us parameters from which we should think about how the operating margin should look in terms of the potential negative mix impact from the acquisition? And also regarding your comp expectations for mid single digit, if you could let us help dimensionalize how that may evolve regarding AUR versus traffic versus units? Thank you.
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
So Oliver, this is Armand. I'll take the first one. Relative to breaking down operating margin, relative to the guidance by brands, I think what we'd like to do is hold that one off to the side and give that at least present that at our October 18 investor call in more detail to give you as well as some additional background. So I want to defer that one to our upcoming meeting.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
On the other one, the mid digit comps is really going to be a combination of all factors. I don't know if we're going to be able to expect an increase in traffic. So even if we can just get traffic to hold flat, that would be great. If not, as we've seen, we've been able to improve our conversion slightly. We mentioned about our improved average selling price, AUR and ASP. And then finally, if we're able to leverage some of those cotton decreases into higher margins, I think all of that will go to driving our operating improvements.
 
 
 
 
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Okay, thanks. And as a follow-up regarding the year over year inventory trends going forward, do you continue to expect it to be down versus last year and how are you thinking about planning that?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
As far as the trends going forward, I would suspect that right now when we look at inventory by brand, again a lot of them are down, some of them up slightly. I would expect that going into the first quarter, ending the first quarter that inventories will be up in terms of dollars, low single digits.
 
Operator
 
Neely Tamminga, Piper Jaffrey.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
It's Neely Tamminga, Piper Jaffray. Hi, congratulations David and to the team for completing this transaction.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thank you, Neely.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
So I just have a couple follow-ups if I may and obviously tabling a lot of our dialogue for this upcoming analyst event to discuss your transaction, but one on the follow-up, David. So your quarter to date trends, traffic is choppy, conversion obviously sounds fantastic for the things that you can control. Are you finding broadly speaking that the conversion is being driven by the product assortments or by promotion induced type activity? Just trying to get a gauge of that.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I think it's certainly both, but I want to make sure everybody understands we are not doing dramatic increases in our promos versus last year. So to use an example, everybody is familiar with the Justice 40% off sale and that continues to work well, the consumer continues to respond well to that. And the reason she responds well either to Justice or to other brands is when we have the right product. So just to use an example I think everybody is aware of, colored bottoms have been terrific at all our brands. So that's a fashion trend that the customer is coming in for, and we've done a pretty good job in being able to deliver that to her. So I think it's important to offer her value and that's where the promotion comes in. Again, we haven't really stepped up our promotions and I'd like to think that we're pretty much on trend which is what's getting the customer to get excited about shopping again.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
Yes, you bet. Absolutely. We see it at the store level so it seems to be more product lead from our perspective too.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes, good.
 
 
 
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
The other question I wanted to follow up was on related to traffic as well as just the early stages of the integration. Can you remind us, do you have  is Charming and Catherines  or I'm sorry, Catherines and Lane Bryant, do they have traffic counters? Do you have full visibility of their traffic and conversion patterns? And then have you started to bring those entities into your consumer insighting process at this point?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
First, they have their own consumer insighting or customer knowledge or what have you processes which are terrific and we're learning a lot. We're putting our teams together to exchange ideas and different types of research, focus groups, what have you, that surveys that both groups do. So that I think is a very good place. On the traffic counters, we're actually moving traffic counters out of Fashion Bug into Lane Bryant and Catherines. So by  I would  not exactly sure of the timing, but I would certainly say by the end of fall, we will have traffic counters in all of the Lane Bryant and Catherines stores I believe.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
That's smart. And then just one more from me. Are you guys planning or intending to restate last year's quarters in advance of each quarter being reported so that we can have some view of the combined Company on a go-forward prior year basis?
 
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Neely, this is Armand. There was no plans to restate last year.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
Okay, thanks. Looking forward to seeing you guys soon.
 
Operator
 
Janine Stichter, Telsey Advisory.
 
Janine Stichter
- Telsey Advisory - Analyst
 
Hi, just a couple of questions. Just digging into the traffic a little bit more, I was wondering if you could talk a little bit about what you saw in the malls more so at Justice versus on the strip centers, was there a difference? And then any color on cadence throughout the quarter? I don't know if you saw anymore weakness in July maybe relative to some of the other months just because of the warmer weather?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
You're drilling down probably a level below I can go to on this call. So I ask you to give Armand a call back and we'll get that. We do have that information. It's not complete though at Justice. They don't have traffic counters in all of the stores. So it will be more directional and I don't know right off the top of my head, but we can be happy to get that for you. In terms of July, that's our prior year and so the traffic trends, again, we'd have to look at a month by month and I'll ask Armand to pull those numbers for you. But in general, I think it's, as I said earlier, been a little sporadic or choppy, whatever you want to call it, where we've seen some very good weeks and then seen some other weeks that haven't been so strong in traffic and sales as well. And it's not always clear to us why that's the case.
 
Janine Stichter
- Telsey Advisory - Analyst
 
Okay. And then just also, any color, I know you did some repositioning efforts at Lane Bryant. I know it's still early on, but any color you can give us on those rebranding efforts?
 
 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well it is early on, and I say that while I think we're all very pleased with the way the marketing and the new logo and some of the new ads have come out look great, it's going to take a while I think to get some traction on that. And I think in August, we probably converted a little too early or converted with some product that wasn't well received by the customer. And I don't think that's a fair test of the marketing when the product isn't fully where we want it to be. So as I said earlier, they're going through transition and I see only upside and good things happening there, but we don't have expectations that this is going to turn around on a dime here and it's going to be a huge growth in the next quarter. So we're going to work with them and continue to grow and transition and build that business.
 
Operator
 
Wayne Archambo, Monarch Partners.
 
Wayne Archambo
- Monarch Partners - Analyst
 
My question's been answered. Thank you.
 
Operator
 
Ladies and gentlemen, that concludes the Q&A portion of our event. Now, I'd like to turn the presentation back over to David Jaffe for closing remarks.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well thank you very much everyone for your interest and your attendance, and we look forward to seeing you on our Analyst Day on October 18. If you have any questions about that feel free to call Armand. Have a good day.
 
Operator
 
Ladies and gentlemen, that concludes today's conference. Thank you for your participation. You may now disconnect. Have a great day.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20121019164621.txt.gz
TIME:20121019164621
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
October 18, 2012 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
 
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
  
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
  
  
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On October 18, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an Investor Day and conference call.
The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference. A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 which is incorporated by reference herein.
 
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
Date: October 19, 2012
 
  

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS
EDITED TRANSCRIPT
ASNA - Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Investor Day
 
EVENT DATE/TIME: OCTOBER 18, 2012 / 02:00PM GMT
 
 
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
 Alison Townsend
ICR - Senior Associate
 David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 Michael Rayden
Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CEO - Tween Brands
 Scott Bracale
Tween Brands Inc. - President - Agency
 Anthony Romano
Charming Shoppes, Inc. - President, CEO
 George Goldfarb
Maurices Inc. - President
 Jeff Gerstel
Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President - Dressbarn Division
 John Sullivan
Ascena Retail Group Inc. - COO
 Armand Correia
Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CFO
 Ronald Robinson
Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP - Sourcing
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
 Neely Tamminga
Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 Nancy Hilliker
Citigroup - Analyst
 Tom Filandro
Susquehanna Financial Group - Analyst
 Brian Tunick
JPMorgan - Analyst
 John Wayland
Net Return Investments - Analyst
 Edward Yruma
KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 Scott Krasik
BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 Anna Andreeva
FBR - Analyst
 Gary Kaplan
Fireline - Analyst
 
 PRESENTATION
 
 
 Alison Townsend
- ICR - Senior Associate
 
 Hello, everyone. I'm Alison Townsend of ICR and I'm honored to welcome you all to the 2012 Ascena Retail Group Investor Day. I'd like to begin the presentation by going over our Safe Harbor statement.
 
This presentation contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the private securities litigation reform act of 1995. Forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties which may cause our actual results in future periods to differ materially from our forecasted results. Detailed information concerning those risks and uncertainties are readily available in our most recently reported annual report on form 10K and quarterly report on form 10Q, which have been filed with the US Securities and Exchange Commissions.
 
Where indicated, certain financial information herein has been presented on a non GAAP basis. This basis adjusts for items that management believes are not indicative of the Company's underlying operating performance. Reference should be made to the Company's annual earnings releases for all periods for the natures of such adjustments and for reconciliation of such non GAAP measures by the Company's financial results prepared in accordance with GAAP.
 
Our historical segment operating results for the fiscal years 2011 and 2010 have been re-casted to conform to our corporate overhead costs allocations methodology effective at the beginning of fiscal 2012. Reference should be made to our current report on form 8K dated December 16th, 2011.
 
I would also like to ask that everyone hold their questions until the designated Q&A session after the presentation.
 
 
At this time, it is my pleasure to introduce Ascena Retail Group's President and Chief Executive Officer, David Jaffe.
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
 It's a great job, Alison. Thank you. Let me also welcome you and thank you all for joining us this morning. I think it's going to be a great day, great opportunity for you to learn about Ascena Retail and our brands.
 
First, I'd like to introduce up on the dais with me are brand presidents, Mike Rayden of Justice, Tony Romano of Charming for both Lane Bryant and Catherines, George Goldfarb of Maurices, Jeff Gerstel from Dress Barn, our COO John Sullivan and our CFO Armand Correia.
 
So, each of them are going to be talking about their business throughout the morning. And as Alison said, we'll be following with a Q&A and if you wouldn't mind holding your questions until then.
 
So, what I'd like to first do is go to a 40,000 feet and talk about the Ascena vision. So  there it goes. To serve our shareholders and create value by becoming a family of leading retail concepts with $10 billion in sales and top tier profitability. So, what we're doing now is developing the infrastructure that's going to enable our brands to grow, and once in place, potentially allow us to plug and play any future acquisitions that we may come along.
 
This year, we're projecting $5 billion in sales. So, on the top line we're halfway to our goal and we're going to see continued growth through comps, through new stores, including international as you hear about. And of course, through ecommerce.
 
Finally, on our profitability, we think all brands have the opportunity to enhance their profitability, and I'll let each one talk about that. It's one of the primary goals at all of our brands and our shared service model is going to support this effort.
 
Again, staying at the high level. Let me talk about our mission of making people feel good about themselves, this refers to our customers, our associates, our vendors, and yes, even our investors. You'll hear more about this theme from each of the brands, but this is the Ascena mission and I wanted to put it out there to let the brands tie into.
 
So now, let's step back and talk about the acquisition of Charming Shoppes. As many of you know, both companies, Ascena and Charming were set up as holding companies. So, this is a merger of two business  of two holding companies so that each had their own businesses and their own structure that enabled them to support their brands, the shared service structure or Maurices  I'm sorry, as Charming would call it the BSC, business service center or CSI.
 
So, what we did, after a lot of soul searching and hard decisions and analysis, we made some tough decisions. So, first, we decided to shut down Fashion Bug. That liquidation is in process now and we expected to have that completely wound up by the end of January. Cigi's is a nice little specialty food order business  mail order business. And we will be selling that in the spring. Nice little business, not really as complementary to our core business. So we thought the better avenue there was just to divest it.
 
We took Lane Bryant Outlet and Lane Bryant, which were being run as two separate businesses and we merged them. We've got greater productivity, greater efficiency by having those brands work together. And then, finally, the challenge that you'll be hearing more about throughout the morning is the integration of the Ascena shared service groups and Charming's business service center and CSI.
 
So, at the end of the day, we end up with a structure that looks like this. Our five brands, as well as our internal brand, our sixth brand, the shared service group. So, each brand is continuing to operate independently, and that's going to continue. They're going to continue to do their own thing, as you'll hear about. And, at the same time, we're working on the integration of shared services and BSC, which is in process. John will be talking more about that, but that's where a lot of the savings are going to come and that's going to be the infrastructure development, as you'll hear, that's going to allow us to leverage our earnings and also position us for future growth.
 
So, staying with the transaction. Let's do a quick overview of it. We thought it was a reasonable valuation. We financed it very conservatively, $600 million of cash, $300 million of term loan B and about $25 million out of $250 million ABL, which as you'll hear has already been paid down. We have a specific plan for each division. You've heard about the ones we're divesting or closing down and you'll hear more about Lane Bryant and Catherines in a minute.
 
 
In addition, there were some interesting hidden assets. So, I mentioned the sale of Cigi's. We also have an extra DC that you'll be hearing about that now is dedicated solely to Fashion Bug. So, we'll sell that and those two sales, we think, will generate about $50 million in cash. In addition we're going to take one of the existing facilities, DCs and we're going to convert that into an ecommerce fulfillment center and John will be talking more about that.
 
And then, finally, we have an NOL that's got a cash value of about $50 million. So, the transaction, actually when you drill it down a little bit, looks even better than on the surface.
 
Some of the benefits I'd like to go through. We've acquired two terrific niche brands. So, Lane Bryant has this iconic name. It's been around for 100 years. It is a leader in its position, in its niche in the marketplace. We feel it's got significant growth potential. Not just through new stores, but through ecommerce as well as internationally. As you'll see, we think the operating margin is at a low and is certainly lots of upside opportunity there. So, we're excited to help the team drive that.
 
At Catherines, it is the leader in the extended large sizes. It's a small niche, but they are certainly number one, and while the business is not performing at the level that anyone's satisfied with, just a few years ago, pre the recession, it was operating at very satisfactory levels and it's making great strides. It's moving back in that direction and we're very optimistic that it can regain the former levels of performance that they had before.
 
With the shutdown of Fashion Bug, one thing that people may not be aware of, two thirds of that business was in the large sizes. So we're working diligently to come up with creative ways to transfer those sales to our other four brands. Not just Lane Bryant and Catherines, but as you know Dress Barn has Dress Barn Woman and Maurices has its plus division that focused on this customer. We've got a lot of creative things we're doing and we expect  we set a goal out of 10% of the sales transfer of the existing sales and we think that that's very, very achievable. And if that's the case, the flow through on those sales to the bottom line is very, very high because it's truly just incremental sales.
 
In addition. There's several dozen stores that we'll be transferring over to the  some of the other name plates.
 
We'll be talking more about overhead reduction. So, when we're talking about overhead, it's shared service groups and BSC. So rough numbers, as Armand will go through, is about $70 million last year for Ascena and about $80 million. So that $150 million, we believe can be brought down by about $50 million and we've got about 20 teams  integration teams by functional area, that have been working together for at least the last four months since the closing and we've identified specifically the steps that we need to take to achieve that. And even though it's not going to happen over the next six or 18 months, we think these are very achievable and as I say, Armand will be going into that in more detail.
 
The key here though, is that to go back to that slide, the org chart, we are basically dismantling the Charming structure and as tough it is, I know, at Charming for them to hear that, because we're taking away something that took many, many years to build up, what we're basically going to end up, as you saw on the graph is Lane Bryant, Catherines and then an enhances shared service group.
 
So, the budget for spring, which we're going to start putting together in another month or so, is going to have everybody from BSC/CSI transferred either down to the brand, the Lane Bryant or Catherines brand, or incorporated into their shared service groups. So, we're not going to have this entity anymore and that's going to force some tough conversations and that's what we're spending a fair amount of time on as we go forward.
 
So, at the end of the day, that overhead reduction we think is significant and then, in addition to that, we have synergies. So, the overhead we've talked about, synergies are something different. That's something that really benefits the brand, not the overhead. And John will be talking about a number of those, but the concept is something that we can do through say maybe a shared resource, better negotiations, a new infrastructure that will enable us to drive down costs at the brand level.
 
Finally, as we saw with our acquisition with Tween Brands and with Maurices, there's a lot of collaboration there's a lot of sharing of best practices, which benefits on all the brands. And now, with a lot of folks that are looking for new opportunities because of the shutdown of Lane Bryant Outlet as well as Fashion Bug. We've been able to move some of our best people around and we're developing a way to move people from one brand to the other as the circumstances change.
 
So we think that with our five brands and our shared service group, we have the ability not just to retain really, really top talent but also as we're out there, searching for talent to acquire very, very good talent because we now are one of the largest retailers. We were just chatting last night and I think in specialty retails  retailers, there's [GAP], there's Limited Brands and then there's Ascena. So we're moving  we're growing very rapidly. Probably more rapidly than I think almost any other leading retailer, and what it does is provides great opportunity, not just for the people in the Company but for people attracted to a growth situation.
 
So, what this all leads to is a unique business model. So conceptually, what we've done is enable the brands to continue to focus on their target customer. So, they're out there driving sales, driving their growth in all three cases what we've done is leave the brands in place. So George still lives in Duluth, I'm not sure why, but he still lives in Duluth. And Tony's in Bensalem and Mike's in Columbus. So we keep the management teams in place. We keep them focused on what they do best and allow them to take their eye off the ball on all the stuff that we can do to support them.
 
 
The example I like to use is, they know when they pick up the phone, they're going to get a dial tone. They don't even have to think twice about that. So, as we continue to develop the infrastructure of our shared service group, all those little issues that in the old days they would have to be responsible for, our shared service team is going to give them as good, if not better levels of service at better costs than they could do themselves. And what this enables us to do is to drive their operating margins up.
 
So, when we look at Justice and Maurices, since we've worked together and been able to develop some of these shared services, they have operated higher operating margins than any other time in their history, and I think it's because of this model and I think now with Charming, that extends it even further and gives it even more clout in our ability to drive down our SG&A.
 
So, our structure looks like an inverted pyramid. Our customers are number one, they're supported by the brands, and the brands then are supported by our shared services group.
 
So, at a high level, when you think about Ascena, we represent a really interesting story. We have a diversified portfolio. We have five, five strong niche brands, and they're all very well positioned in that moderate price point for the economic cycles that we've been going through. And they've all done well. So, you think about it from a different perspective. As investors, I think all of you would agree, that having a diversified portfolio reduces the risk. So it's five brands with very different positioning, I think we have a much risk less investment opportunity than you might find with a pure play.
 
As you'll hear later, we think all of our brands have significant growth opportunities and we're excited to tell you about them.
 
As I just mentioned, our shared services will leverage both the overhead and the synergies for the brands. We have a very strong balance sheet that I'll let Armand get into and cash flow, which allows us to not only take on these high ROIC projects, as you'll hear about, but also enables us to pay down our debt quickly and then start building up our cash balance again for potential stock buy backs in the future and those of you that followed us over the years know that we're aggressive buyers of our stock sand also possibly to build up our war chest again for potential future acquisitions.
 
So, with that, I'd like to introduce Mike Rayden from Justice who's going to introduce his team.
 
 
 Michael Rayden
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CEO - Tween Brands
 
 I guess when you get as old as I am the only thing you really  you get away without doing the presentation. I'm really here to introduce my team. I think it's important to understand that after all these years at Justice and now Brothers, that it's not a one man sport. And I brought four people with me here today. I'd like each one of them to stand up and show you what the breadth of the team is, and the reason I'm not presenting today is because I'd also like to let you hear directly from one of them about what we're doing and where we're going.
 
So, I'd like to introduce Rolando. Rolando is our CFO. I'd like to introduce Lece. Lece is our Head of Merchandising, Design, Creative, Visual a few other things. I'd like to introduce Ronnie. We talk about synergies, Ronnie has been with me for 14 years and he helped us build our entire direct sourcing business and team. And he's just been moved to the head of Ascena Global Sourcing and will be working on the synergies of sourcing for all of the Ascena brands.
 
Rolando, by the way, has been with me since before the transition, I think something like five years. Lece has been with me for 10 years.
 
And last, but not least is Scott, who will share  and talk to you today, and Scott's been my partner for almost 15 years and Scott's role is President of our Agency. And that means that he runs our ecommerce business, he runs our international business and he's been my partner on building this brand through the marketing and the analytical side.
 
I wanted to share a few other things. Everybody in our leadership team, except for one person, has been with us since the transition of Limited Two to Justice. So, we have been through this entire journey in the last four years together. We know what it took, we know where we are, and we know our customers very well. It's the best management team in my 42 years in retail that I've ever had. I've been CEO of four different companies, and that's a big statement and I think that our results show when you have strength of leadership and strength of a strong management team and players that you get great performance.
 
So, with that, I'm going to turn it over to Scott to tell you our story.
 
 
 
 Scott Bracale
- Tween Brands Inc. - President - Agency
 
 Well, thank you Mike and David. And thank you all for being here. The first thing I wanted to share with you is the Justice mission statement, and it reads, our mission is to enhance the self esteem of tween girls by delivering the hottest fashion and lifestyle products in a fun, unique, interactive environment and all at a value for mom.
 
This mission statement we take very, very seriously. In fact, the first line of it we refer to as our noble purpose. The self esteem of tween girls. So, some of you who may have once been a tween girl, will understand this. And for those of you who weren't, I'll refer back two decades to the Journal of Adolescence Studies, who concluded and then later was affirmed by world class child researchers and psychologists that the most important factor in the development of self esteem for a Tween girl is in fact, what she looks like. The thing that affects that beyond anything else, by a wide margin, is literally the clothes that she wears.
 
So, we have a big responsibility and we take it seriously. We find it inspiring that by doing what we do when we do it well, it can have such a profound impact on her.
 
We know what matters to girl. What matters to her is to have fun, to be affiliated in ascensions, sight, sound, touch and so forth. Those senses give humans ability to experience things subjectively and we know what she likes to experience most.
 
For mom, it's all about her daughter being happy, healthy, and to develop. And if you travel across the world and you ask a mom to define what that sounds like, it comes back to our noble purpose, self esteem, that's really what she wants.
 
When we do and deliver upon our mission statement, it has a compelling impact on mom and girl. And this past weekend, running in syndication the Pajama Diaries cartoon got that. The first panel reads as follows, the background is mom shaking the daughter in bed. They have to be dragged out of bed, whining, kicking and screaming and mom is saying, Amy, come on, you'll be late. But the daughter isn't moving.
 
In the second panel, the background is, until Saturday, and now you have two girls rattling their mother out of bed and it says, mom, wake up, you promised to take us to Justice this morning, remember. I didn't write it. So that's what we call the nag factor. And in the market, with $7 billion, nine out of every 10 transactions is driven by mom. But not with Justice. The research shows that in fact, seven out of every 10 transactions is driven by the girl. Again, the nag factor at play.
 
Behind me, you have our demographics, those are our numbers. Now, I think it's interesting to compare them to the United States census information where there is a household and a child present. So seniors and new graduates and so forth are not included. In that instance, the average household income is $67,000. They're about 51% married. They about have 57% some college or higher. And they own homes at the rate of 67%. So at a glance, you would conclude that we have an aspirational household, but I'll come back to that in a few minutes.
 
When you ask the households that comprise the $7 billion market to evaluate us and our competitors against price and fashion, here's what they say. Thanks to the good work of Lece and her team, we are differentiated by far, as fashionable, the hottest fashion, and we'll go into some description about that later. Nobody else is even close. But now, with the value proposition we'll also talk about in a few minutes, we're no longer on the price perception island. In fact, the market says, or experiences us to be about the same price as Aero, Gap, Macy's and even Penney's, interestingly.
 
Moving forward, our product mix is basically 70% apparel, and 30% what we call specialty. It's all the fun lifestyle stuff that she likes to complete her avocation. From a fashion perspective, 65% is what we call hottest and it's defined as right on the fashion curve, the right product bought at the right time in quantity. 20% is core, that's her wardrobe must haves, day in, day out, every day. And then 15% is fast fashion. And fast fashion would be trendier, ahead of the curve. Not bought as deep, at hottest, but based on trends and the customer's evolution, the fast fashion can become hottest.
 
The store environment, it's influenced entirely by girl. She loves bright colors. She loves the fixtures to be at her eyesight line, not the adults. She loves blaring music. She loves the tween monitor, the videos where we play current artists like One Direction and Justin Bieber. She loves bright lights. It's sensory overload, just the way she likes it.
 
We deliver fresh fashion all the time, but we do formal floor sets about monthly and they always have a story associated with them. Inspired by Lece and the designers, the current one is called spellbound. And you'll know I didn't write this as I read it, slip into sparkling styles, swirled with sugary pastels and sweetly iced with glitter and sequins. Our newest and most magical collection will leave you feeling absolutely spellbound. That's intoxicating to a girl.
 
We merchandise our product on tables, highlighters, and in the walls according to color and fashion story.
 
 
The mannequins are dressed and accessorized with the latest looks from the tables and the highlighter, and basically, they're meant to educate the mom and the girls about what goes together, give them confidence and make it easy for them to shop. Remember the word easy, we'll come back to it.
 
We offer everything for her to complete her look, footwear, jewelry, hair accessories and intimates, all from specialty. The one stop shop of everything cool to round out her lifestyle needs. Stuff for sleepovers, gifts for her friends, stuffed animals, diaries, room decor and toys. This makes it fun for her.
 
When you combine the hottest fashion in this fun environment, and in concert with our prolific 40% off couponing and point of sales strategy, what we've done is created a theme park for her and value for mom. It delivers upon our mission's promise.
 
Moving on, we have a 942 stores at the moment and we're opening over the next three years 70 new stores annually, 50 net of closures. Most of the US growth will be in small markets. These markets have proven to not be cannibalistic to our existing fleet. Most often, they're 45 minutes or further from the nearest store. And they'll primarily be mall based stores as they have the greatest draw.
 
When we do go off mall, we expect it to be primarily in the outlet strategy or segment, because that's been very strong for us. And we're converting some of our best stores to the new Justice and Brothers concept, which we will also talk about in greater depth in a minute.
 
Four years ago, had I stood here, I would have said Justice is fifth in the market with 6.1% share. And thanks to Mike and the leadership team, he and we saw value evolving before others did. So, based on that, in August of '08, we introduced strategies that we thought would take advantage of the anticipated market move.
 
The first was the biggest and boldest, converting our limited two fleets to our value priced Justice proposition, which allowed us to decrease overhead by consolidating things like merchandise, planning, field operations and others. The second strategy, thanks to Ronnie, was to move deeply penetrate direct sourcing in order to raise our IMUs, and then, with those greater IMUs, we took some of the money into our newly evolving strategy of deep couponing, 40% off.
 
At that same time, we introduced our BHAG-er, big, hairy, audacious goals, stealing from Jim Collins, which was to be number one in the market. We didn't artificially say by when, but we had a constance in purpose. Mike likes to call it pushing the fly wheel.
 
So, at that time, I know there were many doubters. And if you were among them, and you happened to be here today, I'd like to thank you for sticking with us, we do appreciate it. But more importantly, I'd like to share the most recent NPD information, which shows that that BHAG has been achieved. We are now number one in the market for apparel and accessories for tween girls with 11.4% share. And the interesting thing is, back to the mission statement, value for mom, we have growth share at every segment level from an economic basis, but the greatest growth has come from households with under $75,000 of income.
 
Our fiscal '12 highlights, the third consecutive year of record sales and profits. In fact, we have an 8% comp last year, the prior year was an 8%, and the one prior to that was an 11%. Marketing sales increased by 22%, that increase was a result of extending more and more couponing, more and more couponing, more and more 40% point of sale events and extending our bounce back program redemption cycles for fun cards and J bucks. You see, the more we make the value available to mom, the more she rewards us with greater sales.
 
Our active customer file grew by 6.6%. It is now the world's largest tween database with 5.8 million households and currently, we are experiencing record retention, they're shopping longer and a reactivation. Lapsed customers are coming back into the brand. The Canadian market has been strong, we've opened  we've opened more than 15 stores, but they're doing 1.5 times the average US store.
 
And then, there's ecommerce, growth has been very strong. This past year, we completed a comp of 31%. That's on a 49% to prior year and 42% the year prior to that. As far as the 12 highlights are concerned from a financial perspective, a record $1.3 billion in sales which is 13.7% greater than LY. Gross margin hit a record $775 million and operating income was a record from a dollar and a percent perspective as well.
 
So, what are our strategic initiatives for '13? The first thing we want to do is to enhance and broaden our ownership or dominance in what we call the hottest, biggest and easiest, and I need to pause and bring everybody up to speed on what that means. There were a couple of consultants from a firm in Chicago called McMillan and Doolittle, and their names were Stern and Anders. And they had been consulting with retailers for decades and they found some common themes over all their work. What they found was to win in your segment, be the dominant player, you had to be best or est at one of five things  or more than one of five things. And I'm going to describe each of those ests.
 
The first one is hottest, and that's associated with fashion. Now, this definition has been modified for my space, its slightly different for George, Jeff and Tony. Hottest is defined as having the largest assortment of the latest clothing fashions for girls age seven to 12 in stock when she wants it. Biggest is having the greatest edited selection of clothing choices for girls seven to 12 that they would want to wear. Easiest is knowing what a girl, seven to 12, wants and making it easy for her to find available sizes and information through associates, signage and now the internet.
 
 
Quickest is having convenient store locations, accessible parking, enough fitting room and cash wraps so that she doesn't have to wait long. And cheapest is consistently having the rock bottom lowest price out the door, net of all coupons and discounts.
 
Well, three years ago, with our arms around that concept, we decided to get some benchmarks in place and we consulted with NPD and also another firm called [Fi Site] to understand, do we own an est? The results have been amazing, and today, I will tell you, as far as hottest concern, we are by a 5 to 1 margin, greater than the number two competitor against hottest. Biggest, we are by a 4 to 1 margin, greater than the next closest competitor. Easiest, we are by almost a 4 to 1 margin, greater than the next biggest competitor. Quickest, which even surprises us, we are almost number one, slightly behind a competitor. And then Wal-Mart owns cheapest, as they will most categories because of their IT, logistics and other virtues.
 
So, not only did we own one est, we actually owned three in our closest  close on a fourth. We continue to monitor and work to widen that gap daily.
 
The next strategy is to drive MMU dollars. We intend to do that for unit growth we will also slightly increase our ticket prices. We will take advantage of decreasing cotton prices. And then, ecommerce. We expect to continue the trend there through greater investments and infrastructure. We'll be investing even more organizationally in human capital and we will be migrating to a very scalable platform to accommodate our peak.
 
Then, there's new store growth. We've talked a little bit about it already. We plan on opening 15 Canadian stores annually for the next three years. We'll do more if the real estate is available to us.
 
And Brothers, which we are ready to talk about now. So, Brothers, and it's really Justice and Brothers. In July, we opened 10 stores. What we're testing at the moment is multiple concepts. One would be on a mall. And the other would be in a strip. And in one instance they have two storefronts and a common rack. In the other, there's one storefront and we call it a drop in, Brothers is literally dropped in, but Justice sort of as a capsule onto itself. In every build out, we have preserved the, it's a girl only world space for Justice.
 
The product learning so far is that graphic tees are the key shirt. During back to school, 25% of our sales and 40% of our units came from this category. And sports graphics were a half of all graphic sales. Active shorts, sold deep into back to school with a 98% sell through and it made up 15% of our overall sales. Lece and team believes we have a year round category there.
 
We were able to validate that mom is the principle consumer for Brothers and in fact, we found that when we display and what we found that when we display and show her outfits, she'll buy outfits. Which is exactly what she does in Justice.
 
So, what are our growth drivers? It's all about sales and the first one is comps. We believe we can continue to grow comps through even more marketing. We don't think the runway has run out on us.
 
More new stores. We've touched on that already, domestic and small markets in Canada. Ecommerce, we're going to take that infrastructure, we're going to take that platform and we're going to invest in more digital marketing, which will drive even more traffic. We are going to do AB testing and other site testing to enhance the site to drive conversion rate which will continue to drive double digit comps.
 
As far as Brothers is concerned, we expect to open 30 of them by holiday and 50 by Easter. And as we look out past al this explosive growth and we're in a mature state, we believe that we can drive top line sales growth in the mid single digit range and continue operating income growth in the low teen range.
 
Thank you for your time, and at this point, I'd like to introduce Tony Romano.
 
 
 Anthony Romano
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - President, CEO
 
 Good morning. Thank you, Scott. I think first of all, congratulations to Mike and his team for incredible vision and certainly exhibiting a tough act to follow, right? So, great execution, there's lots you should be proud of and it's really great to be associated with you.
 
 
So, I'm here today. I'd like to first start talking about our Lane Bryant  Lane Bryant team. With me today, I've brought a couple of our executives. Like to introduce Lou Ann Bett. Lou Ann is our Chief Merchandising Officer. She's been with us a little less than two years, and just recently, we expanded her role to include oversight of the design and trend team. So, we're really excited about her role and her contribution.
 
Also with us, we have Liz Crystal. Liz is our Chief Marketing Officer. Liz joined us in January and has hit the ground running, as we'll talk about a little bit later. In August we rebranded and relaunched a number of things about our brand. And, as any of you know who've been in the marketing arena, eight months is not a long time to make that happen.
 
We also have our VP of Human Resources, Theresa Sullivan. Theresa, also just a little less than two years. Although it's not officially in her title, she's our Chief Talent Officer and we're quite proud of the Lane Bryant leadership team that we've built and she's been absolutely instrumental in getting us there.
 
Another strong business partner of mine and not pictured here because so many of you already know him, is Eric Specter. Eric is Charming Shoppes Chief Financial Officer for the Charming brands and Eric has been in the Charming family for 30 plus years. So, Eric, thanks for joining us today as well.
 
So, like the Justice team, really want to start with our mission statement here. And at Lane Bryant, we really pride ourselves on being a fashion retailer, serving plus sized guests. We design sportswear and intimate apparel specifically for our target guests, women wearing sizes 14 to 28, unlike much of the competition who merely size up their missy designs.
 
It's a fact that the plus sized customer wants to wear many of the same fashions as her skinny trends. But she wants to be trend right with a fit that is both comfortable and flattering. Our mission evolves from this as we seek to make her look stylish and feel sexy, confident and happy. Pictured here is one of our strip centers, located in Madison, Mississippi.
 
We also have stores in the mall. Pictured here is Pembroke Pines location in the Pembroke Lakes Mall, right outside of Miami. It also depicts one of our side by side locations where we have both a Cacique and a Lane Bryant entrance. Many years ago, we rolled out about 140 of these stores nationwide that are both in strips and mall locations, in the balance of our chain, our Cacique is a separate department that is in the back of the store, typically by our wardrobe room. We'll talk a little bit more about that later.
 
Regarding the customer demographics. So, in addition to the facts that you see on the slide here, we have performed extensive studies into her psychographics, her attitudes and her tastes. We've identified five major groups of customers and at Lane Bryant, we're seeing to serve two of those target segments. We call them stylishly savvy and attention seekers. These two groups represent 33% of the population, but 49% of the spend in the plus market.
 
Stylish savvy customer finds shopping fun, is always on the lookout for the latest fashion trends and seeks comfort in her fit. She is confident and willing to experiment with her fashion apparel choices. The attention seeker is brand conscious and yes, specialty apparel are brands for her. She prefers and enjoys guidance from sales associates and likes to create outfits that help her stand out when she enters a room. Within those groups are dynamic, energetic passionate woman with a complete lifestyle. She enjoys shopping and seeks fashion that makes her look and feel her best. And even though she wants fashion and style, she also requires a great value.
 
I'll share a bit more about the other psychographic groups when I speak about Catherines later.
 
Our primary competition on the chart here, comes not from other specialty retailers, but instead from the department stores, Kohl's, JC Penney's and Macys are the stores most appealing to her.
 
What is important to note on the graph is where we sit on the fashion spectrum, much more like a Chico's than the discounters. We sit squarely with the other brands that re known for fashion forward quality merchandise. We are positioned well, offering fashion and fit solutions, both inside and out, and from head to toe at affordable prices.
 
Our customers profession is what we refer to as pink collar, with nearly one third in teaching and medical professions. When you think medical you can think doctor's office, x-ray technicians, those sort of things. And whether at work, lunch with a friend, or a fancy dinner party, our guest wants to look appropriate and fashionable. Because of her lifestyle, she prefers casual clothing choices a majority of the time and she seeks flexibility in her wardrobe, allowing her to easily transition from desk to dinner.
 
54% of our assortment is considered core or basic, however this can be a bit misleading, as even core products, as unique styling features that make them more than the traditional basic tops still prevalent today found at most discounters. Our novelty and fashion components comprise the other 50% of our assortment and swing between 20% and 30% for each, depending on the season and the fashion trends.
 
 
Our merchandise values include providing trend right, the best fit and fit solutions, incorporating great quality along with great color and value for her dynamic lifestyle.
 
Additionally, intimates comprise a third of our sales. We provide fit solution for all elements of our lifestyle and provide constant innovation, offering minimum of five new bra launches every year. She loves color and print and our intimate goals is to build her confidence while fitting comfortably, connecting emotionally, making her feel pretty, sexy, happy. She loves to feel pretty on the inside too. Our intimate shoppers visit us frequently, as much as five to six times per year.
 
Our store environment is built with neutral colors. It sets the stage for our merchandising, allowing the product to be the hero. The fixtures are feminine and simple and we know that within our demographic, that she places a premium on the in store experience and values our customer service model.
 
Our style savvy service model is designed to insure all associates consistently create an environment where the guest feels valued. The environment is all about her. She is welcomed as she enters with a genuine and warm greeting and we seek to connect emotionally while providing authoritative guidance on fit, fashion and value.
 
Our Cacique offering as part of the in store experience, typically approximately 1,200 to 1,500 feet is dedicated to intimates and as mentioned earlier, usually around the wardrobe rooms, so it's easy and natural for her to grab some pieces to fit to try on as she works her way back to the changing room. Each of our stores has at least one specifically trained bra fit expert.
 
In the wardrobe area, our wardrobes  rooms are slightly larger than most competitors and we seek to make the experience comfortable and relaxing almost like she's in her bedroom.
 
And in February 2013, Lane Bryant takes the pleasure in unveiling our new flagship store on 34th Street at 7th Avenue, just a few short blocks away. Our newest prototype will bring freshness and sophistication and the new store design is a celebration of elegant curves, stylish lines and sensual shapes on two levels on 7,000 square feet. The store atmosphere will show our focus on the target customer. Recognizing the emotions that she has. She's confident, happy, feminine and aspirational. We plan to use the elements in the 34th street design in our new and relocated stores that we roll out in the future.
 
Regarding real estate locations, we believe Lane Bryant has the potential to grow to 1,000 stores nationwide. In addition to the 30 new stores that we will build in fiscal 13, we will close 25 for a net opening of five. But we will also relocated 35 to 40 stores, migrating Lane Bryant mall stores to more convenient power strip and lifestyle centers.
 
It's important to define the term power strip and lifestyle centers. In our case, we mean three things. Number one, that there's at least 250,000 gross leasable square footage. Second, that it's anchored by a major big box player. We prefer our competition, Kohl's, but others like Target work well too. And third, we seek female friendly co-tenants such as Michaels, [Alta] and even Barnes and Noble.
 
Over time, nearly 80% of the Lane Bryant stores will be in the power strip and lifestyle and outlet shopping centers. Additionally, as we relocate and open new stores, we plan to shrink the store from the current average of 5,800 square feet to a box of about 5,000.
 
Regarding market share, Lane Bryant is the largest women's specialty plus sized apparel retailer in the nation and we are uniquely positioned to serve the market. More than half of all America women wear a size 14 or larger, making this segment the majority of the market, and not a niche.
 
NPD defines the plus sized market two says. The first way is by women who self identify and when measuring the market in this way, the market is believed to be $16.5 billion. But the second way in which they measure is by women wearing 14 and larger. When the market measured this way, the market is $32 billion in its size, which is really identifying that women wearing size 14, 16 and 18 do not frequently identify themselves as plus sized customers.
 
While our modest comp store growth, offset by lost revenue associated with 27 store closures was insufficient to maintain market share over the last year, we remain the leader in this attractive space with solid plans to regain that share in the future.
 
As we look to 2012 highlights, beyond becoming obviously part of the Ascena family of retail brands, our highlights for 2012 improve improving our operating results as we leveraged expenses on modest comparable store sales increases and high double digit ecommerce growth. Fueling our ecommerce growth is strong traffic, driven by optimization of natural and paid search and targeted email campaigns, coupled with the success of our universal cart, which links our plus sized brands all on one site, with a simplified easy fast check out.
 
Social media continues to influence and grow and in our mobile and digital world, we have almost 700,000 Facebook fans and nearly 500,000 mobile phone opt ins.
 
 
Expense leverage was delivered by lower occupancy costs relating to migrating mall locations to the strips, as well as strong expense management, principally store payroll and other store related expenses. We also began the integration of our Lane Bryant outlet business into our Lane Bryant full line business and have currently consolidated the two teams into Columbus.
 
For our fiscal '12 financials, for your convenience, years '11 and '12 are restarted her with a full allocation of overhead. On the Ascena reporting calendar for the 52 weeks ended in July. So I continue to be confused every day, because the second quarter is now the fourth quarter, I don't know what the hell  so we're going to skip right over this page and go to the next one.
 
Regarding our fiscal '13 strategic initiatives. As we started the year, and I was sharing earlier through Liz's really hard work with the team, we launched a fresh and modern brand logo and color palette with updated in store visuals, web and social media sites.
 
Our rebranding effort is an attempt to modernize the brand, eliminating the stigma as a plus sized women store for your mother, by speaking to the latest on trend Lane Bryant and [conceived] fashions while creating emotional connection through the imagery.
 
We will aggressively begin our fleet repositioning this year. Stores relocated out of malls and into strips typically see sales increase 10% to 20% on lower occupancy expenses. We will drive multichannel growth through continual site launches to remain at the front of innovative shopping technologies, including a compelling iPad experience coming this holiday season.
 
Finally, but not least, we will increase our fashion relevance and assortment productivity. We plan to gain market share in the tops category by expanding assortment of fashion in knits, woven and sweaters, insuring outfit ensembles that have three top choices for every bottom. We plan to grow active wear as a major category, and our product flow will improve in seasonal apparel with weekly delivers of new fashion throughout the season, keeping merchandise fresh and compelling while generating faster inventory returns,
 
As we switch to growth drivers here, our new store growth and store relocation plan is the most significant contributor to improved operating results over the long term. In fact, over the next three years, we will open 125 new stores, relocate an additional 125 stores and remodel over 100 stores at lease renewal.
 
Ecommerce will continue to grow rapidly with increased levels of penetration and we expect modest comp store sales increases in bricks and mortar, driven by the merchandise assortment refinement. Merchandise assortments will turn faster, have a greater percentage of seasonal product with improved penetration in tops, as I previously mentioned and growth in the category of active. Plus, better alignment of the accessories and jewelries with the sportswear assortment.
 
Over time, the result of these drivers will lead us to mid single digit sales growth resulting in operating margins in the high single digits. Thank you for the chance to share the Lane Bryant story. And I'd like to turn it over now to George Goldfarb, President of Maurices. Thank you.
 
 
 George Goldfarb
- Maurices Inc. - President
 
 Good morning, everybody. I'm George Goldfarb, President of Maurices. I'm not really sure about that Duluth reference earlier. When I left there yesterday it was 30 degrees, I mean what's wrong with that, and there's not a lot of snow on the ground yet.
 
But anyways, it's a pleasure to be here and to have the opportunity to share the exciting Maurices story with all of you. I have two members of our great executive team here with me. I have Mary Bradley, our General Merchandise Manager in the back of the room there. If you get a chance, say hello to Mary. Tenure is with Maurices a seasoned merchant. Had a great background prior to Maurices. Ran our casual and our dressy pieces of the business and recently promoted to GMM, and it's great to have her on the team and a great partner.
 
Also have Brian Thun, who is our Chief Financial Officer, 20 year veteran with Maurices. Strategic with a great financial background, promoted this last year, a great addition to our mature executive team, which has a great breadth and great longevity. So proud of the team and it certainly is validated by our results.
 
So, moving into our mission. Really the foundation for our success over the years has always been tied to the small to the middle markets. We've earned the reputation as fashion authority and valued hometown community member through really the connections that we foster with our customers and our communities.
 
To that end, we continue to focus and position our brand to be simply the best hometown specialty store. Just an example, one of our strip center stores. The azure color is unique to our brand as are the awnings and the light box of the storefront to really showcase our products and our promotions.
 
 
Here's an example of one of our mall stores, our recent expansion has really centered around roughly 50/50 malls to strips. Here's a mall. The malls have worked really well in gaining  one of the things that we've done to really gain traction faster in malls, especially in the newer non core markets is what we call a hub and spoke strategy, position ourselves near our competition, and again, you can see the azure color is here, and the awnings coupled with our light boxes really setting us off and differentiating us at the mall line.
 
Maurices targets a woman with 20 something attitude, offering product that meets her needs for casual wear, the club scene, or work. Our target customer ranges from 17 to 34 with really that sweet spot being really that young 20 something customer. This is our unique niche, offers multiple lifestyles across casual, dressy and accessories for both our core and our plus sized girl.
 
As the chart illustrates, Maurices offers more fashionable merchandise at a moderate price. So, if you look at the scale, the fashion level on a comparable scale to an American eagle or to a buckle, yet at a much more affordable or moderately priced. Then you can also see we're very well positioned with our small market orientation and our high fashion to value offering. Providing us a unique niche again, in the marketplace. Our focus on value has played out very, very well, as validated through the recent economic cycles.
 
As mentioned previously, Maurices offers product that meets all of our customer's lifestyle needs. It's really a great opportunity to outfit this girl from head to toe. We're very fashion focused with denim being a significant driver of the business. Our plus business continues to see strong growth as our fashion level has resonated well with this customer. And in regards to opportunity, when you think about plus, it represents only 16% of our business today and takes  consumes roughly 20% of the real estate. So, great opportunity in accessories, especially jewelry has been soft for us for some time and we've recently taken some specific steps, including leadership and staffing changes to turn that business around.
 
We focus on making the store environment feminine, fun, bright and inviting. Our fitting rooms are a  our fitting rooms are a key differentiator and are loved by our customer. Each room is unique. We write her name on the door, so it's really a chance to connect with her personally. Just one of the many ways that we provide her a fabulous level of customer service as a well as a great experience.
 
We provide a place for her friends to sit and be comfortable and engage in the fun shopping experience with her. There's the shopping experience, a nice comfortable area.
 
I've included a shot of denim, which is a great every day value at $29, representing a significant portion of our business.
 
We've got a very strong presence in the small to mid markets with roughly 70% of the stores and trade areas with less than 150,000 people. These small markets have no regional malls or competition and Maurices is the fashion destination. We have significant growth potential as we see the prospect for over 1,250 stores, including Canada. We see at least 1,100 stores domestically with another 150 stores in Canada. We recently opened in Canada and are doing very well. We'll open 60 new stores this year, netting out 50 or so with up to 10 projected closings, roughly 15 of the 60 will be slated for Canada  or are slated for Canada.
 
Highlights from 2012 included the continuation of strong EBITDA performance, delivering $129 million with our quality of earnings exceeding 15% of sales. We continued our strong new store program with 50 domestic openings in our first six stores in Canada. We've initially knocked the cover off the ball in Canada, filling a void with our unique niche. The void of the 20 something offering, multi lifestyles and plus merchandise, those are voids in Canada.
 
Ecommerce maturation continued as we've achieved a 5% penetration in just over two years with growth over 80% last year. We also set the stage for increased direct sourcing by starting to ramp up the needed organizational infrastructure and processes.
 
Looking back over the past fiscal year, our strong new store and ecommerce growth coupled with our 2% comp drove a 10% sales increase. The two year comp was a healthy 12%. Merchant margins were challenged as we faced a competitive promotional environment during the fall season that resulted in some additional mark downs to drive the business and also, we missed a few trends and have made changes in leadership to address.
 
Despite the margin pressures, we were able to achieve $129 million in EBITDA at 15%.
 
Now, let's look at our 2013 initiatives. We'll remain focused on continuing our strong new store and ecommerce growth. We're currently working with an outside consulting firm to create a roadmap to support our ecommerce growth objectives and making necessary investments in infrastructure.
 
 
Our merchandise team will be focused on improving execution, insuring greater consistency of a strong merchandise offering. We've had some missteps in 2012, in a reference to capitalizing on trends, which we feel have now been addressed. We elevated Mary Bradley, who's here today, as mentioned earlier to GMM and are currently recruiting a CMO to drive the product development transition and trend.
 
We're also focused on more disciplined markdown management that will result in improved margin rates with our new sourcing infrastructure in place, we're looking to grow the direct source business by 50% that will result in improved margins as well as a unique product on trend and focused on our target customer.
 
Lastly, we'll be enhancing marketing efforts that focus on customer acquisition and retention, customer data base growth, our new direct mail order strategy and social media.
 
Beyond 2013, we see extensive runway ahead, with significant strong growth domestically and we've only scratched the surface in Canada. Again, I'll be very disappointed if not over 1,100 stores in the US and well over 100 in Canada. We see ecommerce growth potential in excess of a 10% penetration from today's 5%. We also believe as we look out, three to five years, that we can continue to drive mid single digit sales increases.
 
As previously mentioned, our plus and accessory businesses are underpenetrated with great growth potential.
 
To summarize, we anticipate continued improvement in operating margins, leveraging our shared services initiatives, sales growth, including  or resulting in mid teen operating margins.
 
Thanks for your time, I'll now turn it over to Jeff Gerstel, and thanks for your interest and look forward to fielding any questions.
 
 
 Jeff Gerstel
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President - Dressbarn Division
 
 Good morning, everybody. It's really exciting to be here and share the store of Dress Barn with all of you. I've been in my position as President of Dress Barn since December and it's been a really exciting 10, 11 months, and excited to share a lot of that with you today.
 
So, like my colleagues, I have some of my wonderful team with me today. Keith Fulsher is our Chief Merchant. Keith has been with Dress Barn for 18 years, before that Macy's and has been the rock on our team in terms of taking a fabulous knowledge of our customer and also an aspirational view of what the brand can become.
 
Also, John Pershing, our Head of Human Resources. John joined us about a year and a half ago, after a 20 something year career at Best Buy where he started in college. At Best Buy, John was in charge of executive vice president of global human capital or something like that. So, it's exciting for us to be able to attract really amazing talent to our team. Someone who had led the human capital role for a Fortune 50 business coming down to us out in Suffern. So it's just a  sort of an illustration of my philosophy, which is if we build a team of incredible people, we're going to create incredible results.
 
And then also our newer addition, Raana Zia. Raana's our CFO. Raana joined in May, before that, she had spent about 10 or so years with Banana Republic and a little bit of time with sears. So Raana's been wonderful, bringing a lot of passion, excitement and brains to help elevate the operation.
 
Now, since I'm the home team here today, I have a lot more members of our network. Over there, Elise Jaffe has been our Head of Real Estate. Stand up too.
 
And I also have the unique privilege, in the building where I work, not only do I have my wonderful predecessor, I have his wonderful predecessor, our Founder Elliot Jaffe and our Founder, Mrs. Roslyn Jaffe.
 
So, one thing I'm not short of is advice, believe me. And  but it's wonderful, the 50 years experience with a customer that Mrs. Jaffe started with 50 years ago in Stanford Connecticut is what grounds us and guides us as we move forward to the future. And it's also  no one's mentioned it, one of the great synergies of Ascena is the team that we've assembled. And for someone new in this role, David's obviously a wonderful help. Mike's been an incredible help to me and working together with George and the shared services team has really been a big plus and now I've got Tony. So, it's all good.
 
So, anyway, let's get into the Dress Barn story. Let's start with mission. We all go to work every day, we get up in the morning and what gets us excited? At Dress Barn, every day, we want to make a difference in the lives of our customers. Tony mentioned some of the similar points. What we bring to the customer is helping her feel confident about herself. When you look good, you feel good and you can go out in the world to make a difference. And how do we do that? Specialty fashion catered to her needs in an environment that she enjoys shopping, and at a price point that she can afford.
 
 
So, think about when you go shopping. What do you like? You like nice service, you like a nice setting, you like the merchandise, you want to feel good and look good in what you're buying. The same thing for our customer, but oftentimes it's at a price point much lower where that type of experience tends not to be available. For our customer, shopping at a Chico's or an Ann Taylor is aspirational and we try and take an experience she can't get elsewhere and bring it home for her.
 
So, our purpose is simply inspiring women to look and feel beautiful.
 
For us, when I took over last year, we started with a purpose. Why are we here, what are we doing? Why are we coming to work each day? And last month, we completed our quarterly survey and 98% of our associates, both in the stores and in the office, said they're familiar with our mission, it anchors them to why their jobs important and they're confident in our direction.
 
So, that was really exciting to me, someday it'll be 100%, but it's some  it's exciting to see being ahead of our expectations in terms of getting the whole team aligned.
 
Now, let's talk a little bit more about our customer.
 
Again, with 50 years of experience, we know her really, really well. Right now she's 46 years old. Household income in the low 70s and when we talk about our target customer, we're looking for someone who thinks she just turned 40. Maybe not quite chronologically, but how do you feel, how do you think? And how do you want to show up in the world?
 
Teachers, administrative assistants, office workers. Again, it's that pink collar. Today she's 46 years old. If we were here two years ago, I would be saying she was 50 years old. And it's not that we've walked away in any way from our current customer, what we've been succeeding is bringing new people into the fold. So getting a bigger balance and a broader assortment, which is exciting to see.
 
Form a competitive point of view, you can see we're sort of off in our own in that we've got a lot of white space. We're in $1 billion market. There's a lot of people in this industry, so why pick Dress Barn. Why do customers come to us? And if she's not coming to us, where's she going?
 
Well, overwhelmingly, when they don't come to Dress  when they're going to Kohl's, Penney's, and Macys. That's the lion's share of whom we compete against. So, why is she picking us? We're here to create a special place for her. Where she can come and feel special in a boutique, service oriented, relationship oriented experience as opposed to a mass market experience.
 
I like to shop and fortunately I have a very cooperative wife, and for me, I often get inspiration going and shopping some of the higher end stores. Whether in Madison Avenue, SoHo or once in a while in Europe and I get excited by seeing what these stores do. They create a feeling, they create a place where some people can go and some people can afford to be pampered, feel special and to me, what gets me excited, what gets our company excited is trying to translate an experience like that to a customer again in a price point that that's not typical.
 
Think about Julia Roberts in Pretty Woman  not the prostitute side, but the shopping on Rodeo Drive, when she goes into a store that can be a very intimidating experience and when the story continues she felt special and feels like a pretty woman. So, we view that as our mission with our customers and it's pretty exciting. And that's what sets us apart.
 
Okay, product overview. You've got this slide, I don't want to go into too much detail here. We  basically we offer merchandise that fits the lifestyle needs of our customer. A customer wants trend right, but not trendy. She wants to look good, she wants to feel confident. But she's not wearing what's coming off the runway by any means. It's up to us to edit that and interpret that for her in a way that she'll react to.
 
Two thirds of our business approximately is missy sized with one third of our business plus sized. So I guess we're a little competitive with Tony, but we overlap nicely.
 
When we talk about store environment. We're looking to create an environment that's welcoming, comfortable, we've got attractive fitting rooms. Maybe this isn't the best picture of them, but take my word for it and it's really creating attractive displays, comfortable experience, welcoming but the more important thing to us than the environment is the experience and the relationship. Our differentiating factor is in service and the relationship we create with our customers. And that's what sets us apart. So the relationship is the difference.
 
In terms of locations, right now we're up to 835. The 827 was at year end. 40 of  we've got 40 new stores scheduled for this current fiscal year, which will be the most we've opened in over five years. Strip centers continue to be the majority, but we've got a new phenomenon, this year  this past year, 25% of our openings were in malls. And these are B malls. But they're solid for us, it's where our customers shopping and we've done  we've done well, exceeding our expectation. So, continuing on this path, 25% of our openings this year of the 40 will be in malls as well.
 
 
Malls make up 4% of our fleet today. So they represent a nice growth opportunity for us. Also, looking at the success of Justice and Maurices, we're starting to look north as well to Canada. Guess its a little closer from Duluth than from New York.
 
Highlights of last year, as I mentioned, we turned 50, we still feel good. It's a very youthful 50 and we broke $1 billion in sales for the first time in our history. We opened 27 new store projects, including some relocation, which again is the most we had done in three years.
 
Ecommerce was our first full year. So we hit 2% penetration and on $1 billion, you can do the math, 20  a little over $20 million and obviously we see that as a huge opportunity of growth with an opportunity to each or exceed 10% of our business over time.
 
Our blush perks program, which is our loyalty program, kicked off in December. And this was huge for us and exceeded anything we expected. At the time we launched the program, we were capturing about 52% of our customer data. So you come in to buy something 52% of the time we could identify who you were. Today, that 50% has gone up to over 80%. So, as a result, we've grown our database of marketable customers by over 15% was the biggest growth we've ever achieved.
 
So, obviously more information equals more effective marketing and it's also  it's also helped us increasing the frequency. We're now up to that 80% of our customers shopping us 11.9 times a year. So, basically once a month she's coming into check out what we have to offer. Which is fabulous.
 
The year also had a tremendous amount of changes. For those of you who've been following Dress Barn for a long time. We're modeled as a solid business, consistent, reliable, and a reasonable economic model. But maybe you didn't have growth in that sentence and we're here to talk about growth and how we're going to get his business growing. Again, it's $1 billion market. We've got about 1% of it, so that looks like a lot of upside.
 
So, what do we do? We've implemented a whole series of changes and I wanted to give you a few of the highlights today.
 
First of all, talent, I mentioned our executive team. We've got nine people on the team, many new faces, but also continuity. Ron is our new CFO I mentioned, we have a new head of stores, a new creative director and in November, we're welcoming a new head of marketing to our organization. And in fact, of the nine people on the leadership team, seven of us are either new to the Company or new in our position over the past year or so.
 
We're aggressively building our talent, looking to bring in world class talent to our organization. John and Raana being one example.
 
Again, with the belief that if we have the right people in place, drive the vision, and we execute well, we'll be sitting here next time talking about a lot of growth.
 
Beyond that, as I mentioned, we brought in a creative director. This is big for us. So, for the first time, we're now building and investing in an internal design capability. Under Keith's leaderships, this is something we never had before and it's something that's going to improve the style direction, the consistency of the offerings in the store, but also create a margin opportunities through Ronnie and his direct sourcing team. So, again, another synergy that's helping us build our business. It also creates a much more unique offering to our customer, which helps us stand out.
 
With our sales per square foot of around $165 a foot  yes $165 a foot, there's a lot of opportunity and this is key, elevating our merchandising, the key way for us to get that up.
 
Talking about merchandising, we've restructured our entire merchant organization. Last year, our plus size and our missy's sized business had 30% overlap in styles. What we found is that plus sized customer wanted the similar styles, with some modification, but they wanted more consistency. Today we're up to 90%. So we went from 30% a year ago to 90% today and so far, the results are exceeding our expectations and our woman's business is growing very nicely.
 
The other nice thing, from the financial point of view, is if you now have one buying team buying both size ranges instead of two, there's an opportunity. So, we were able to reduce our number of buying positions by about a quarter, and move that to continuing to build our planning and other infrastructure in our building.
 
We've reduced SKU count and the other important thing you might have noticed if you've been in our stores is we've introduced a new label called [Rosen Alley]. Might recognize the name Ros from Ros Jaffe, but any coincidence notwithstanding. So what we found is it's doing pretty well. We're very encouraged by the results and it's opening up a new possibility for us to look at what are the barriers to entry for customers to our brand and we're asking a lot of questions and studying the branding questions as we go forward.
 
 
So again, talent, merchandise, branding, loyalty program, this head of marketing has a lot of work and a big job to do and we've got the  a heavy hitter coming in that really excited about. Also on the field side, we've eliminated 10% of the supervisory positions, the district and regional leaders. Again, taking that payroll and redeploying it into other growth pieces of the business like ecommerce and this design function.
 
We  it's interesting that despite these changes in the field, again, we're achieving the highest engagement scores we've ever seen, and that's a function of connecting what people do in the tore every day to this purpose and focusing them on what they love to do, which is exciting and taking care of the customer.
 
One last interesting thing we introduced this year was something called mydressbarn.com. This is a way for us to communicate with everyone in our company and solicit opinions, ideas, and points of view from everywhere. And with 8,000 associates in our company, in August we surpassed 1 million page views. So this thing  I guess the expression is gone viral, and it's interesting because sometimes be careful what you ask for. But it's a wonderful exchange of information and ideas and just a great feedback mechanism, we've been really thrilled with that.
 
So, again, lots of changes and while we're maintaining and managing the short term performance, we're really building for the long term direction of growth and prosperity for Dress Bar.
 
Okay, financial, this I'd call the opportunity slide and coming after Mike and George with  it shows there's a lot of room for growth. So, we've been a mature, stable business that reliably generated cash flow year after year with these 50 years we really know our customer well, but at the same time, this knowledge and experience guides what we're building for the future.
 
How do we take that customer, how do we work with what we have and continue to add and build on. Like we've seen the average age come down by two years. We're seeing new people come into the fold and they're liking what they see. Which makes me very excited about the future.
 
From an initiatives point of view, as I said, there's been a lot of learning among the brands. Scott talked about hottest and easiest and that really resonated with me and as we've gone forward with setting our priorities, it starts with fashion. We've talked about hottest, meaning having what our customer wants in quantity when she wants to buy it. So how do we improve our fashion authority, whether it's through the creative direction, aligning our merchant teams, or what have you, that's one of our main focuses.
 
We took our first survey in March, we were pleasantly surprised with the results and how she thinks of this, but yet there's obviously opportunity. And this isn't something that's going to be solved in six months or a year, the long term objective for the business in that front.
 
I talked a fair bit about store experience. Similar to what Scott described, we think in terms of easiest. Essentially knowing what our customer wants and being there to solve her needs and solve her issues. So again, we perform better than we might have expected, but yet we also see tremendous opportunity going forward.
 
On the marketing side, building our brand is huge opportunity for us. I mentioned the new head of marketing starting next month. Looking at our promotions, our cadence, our vehicles, and our overall brand strategy and how we go from there.
 
In terms of growth, getting Dress Barn growing again. 40 new stores this year, more than we've done in over five years. Malls, a whole new world for us, and now starting to look at Canada and other places for additional future expansion opportunities. Ecommerce continues to be huge. Picked up over $15 million of sales in ecommerce next year and it's on track to have another wonderful year this year.
 
And finally talent. Maybe it's not as exciting to talk about, but the true driver in our business is bringing the right people. Mike talked about his team as the key to driving that business and I 100% agree with him, and that's been my main focus this year, getting the right people in the right place on the team to bring about the future that we're trying to create. And that's going to continue to be the case in terms of development.
 
So, lastly, drivers of growth. For us, obviously sales. At Dress Barn, we need to get the top line growing. We've  basically I've been through our comp stores, how do we get the productivity of our stores up through our merchandise and our experience and our marketing. Continuing to grow ecom and investing in this business. So far, wonderful results and very encouraging.
 
And thirdly, accelerating our new store growth portfolio. A lot of potential for us. We see at least 1,000 stores domestically, plus Canada, ecommerce and others. So, a lot of excitement there.
 
On the margin side, the design effort we're building is oriented toward distinctive design to help the fashion offering, but obviously the collateral benefit is the enhanced margin. We're doing greater depth per sky in consolidating our sku count to increase quantities, which again helps our margin.
 
 
And finally, that service differentiator as a way to get rewarded for the service that we deliver.
 
So, as we go forward and continue to grow, we're expecting growth in the high single digits on the revenue line and looking to grow our operating margin also up to that high single digit level.
 
So, so far 11 months into the mission here, very excited about where we are, further along than I ever expected at this point. Thrilled with the team and the opportunities we're seeing and just very excited and poised with the future. So that's where we are in Dress Barn. So, thank you very much.
 
And here's Tony again. Tony.
 
 
 Anthony Romano
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - President, CEO
 
 So, I heard that groan, because you were going down the table, you go only two more guys, then it bounced all the way back. Don't panic. In all sincerity, it's been a little while so if anybody wants to stand up and stretch or give me a big yawn, go ahead and feel  please do.
 
All right, so excited to talk about our Catherines brand and a big thing that I'm going to try to do is also kind of differentiate between Lane Bryant because we do think there's an important interplay that makes a difference.
 
Like all the brands, we have some other of our leadership talent with us. So, Joan Munnelly. Joan is our Chief Merchant Officer for the Catherines team. Joan's been with us almost two years and has some extensive experience from Macy's and Claire's and Justice, right? So we got a lot of experience and skills that Mike trained her with over the years as well.
 
We have our  Brett. Brett is a  what a 15 plus year veteran at Charming Shoppes and he's our Senior Vice President of Finance and Operations. Together, Brett and Joan co-lead the Catherines and they just recently assumed that additional responsibility and we're very excited and encouraged about their continued leadership in that role.
 
Also with us, we have Brad Orloff. Brad is  leads our marketing function in the Catherines brand. Brad's been in the group a little over a year. Right? About 18 months at this point in time. So the team is relatively new, but beginning to gel and we're really excited about the leadership team we have there.
 
So, just briefly about Catherines, I'm sure by now you're starting to see the theme about making people feel good about themselves, really resonating within each of the Ascena Retail Brands. And really, at Catherines, it's no different. It's all about inspiriting women to look, feel and be their best.
 
In Catherines case, they've taken it one step further with a brand promise, and that brand promise is we fit you beautifully. There's actually a good point to just stop and think about this now, because there's been a big stigma in the plus sized market and that is that a plus sized woman just wants clothes that fit, she wants the clothes to be black or dark, so they're slimming and she doesn't want or need fashion.
 
Well, we add the tag line, we fit you beautifully, so that it's a call to action for our associates to recognize she wants to feel and be just like her skinny friends, I think Jeff called it out as well. She reads People Magazine and she watches movies like Pretty Woman, she wants that same experience and she does want to be like her skinny friends.
 
Catherines is a destination with a strong loyal customer base and effectively entirely strip center base. This is a strip center in Mesa Arizona  in Mesa Review outdoor mall.
 
The customer demographics  so what you'll see here is you'll see the 45 plus and if you recall, the Lane Bryant was 30 to 45, Catherines sizes serve 18 to 34 and offer some more generous fit with its garments and while both brands serve the plus customers, Catherines is serving a different psychographic. If you recall, I talked about the five types of segments. Catherines also targets two segments, those additional segments are the positively confident and blend in basic customer.
 
The positively confident customer is bold and optimistic. She's mature, comfortable with her size, and delights in expressing herself together apparel choices. She is less likely to have children and she's to a trend setter but does seek updated classics and will adopt trends later in their lifecycle.
 
 
The blend in basics woman is inspired by ease, convenience and simplicity in shopping. She prefers casual comfort and multiple colors in her favorite styles. She skus towards the higher end of the age range and the size range and has the lowest average income of all the customer segments.
 
She spends a bit less than the positively confident woman, but is a loyal, predictable core customer.
 
The fifth and final psychographic segment are what we would call the bargain lovers and it's just as the name implies. She loves the thrill of the hunt and seeks fashion at a price. This segment is the least loyal and is captured by both Lane Bryant and Catherines in a normal course of promotional markdown cadence we do not actively market to her.
 
As we think about the competition and the competitive position, Catherines sits almost on the axis, slightly fashionable, but moderate in its price point. And as we think about the fashion adoption curve, Catherines customers are patient followers and will wait until the trends are mainstream before adopting. The bottom line is when she sees it in People, when she sees it in US Weekly, she's ready.
 
Catherines primary competition, like Lane Bryant comes from the department stores, namely Kohl's and Penney's, but also Wal-Mart resonates strongly and resonates strongly with the customer in these segments.
 
I'd like to point out now is more than 50% of sales at Catherines are in a unique niche. The niche called the extended plus size. For us, we tag that as size 26 or larger. In this group, her options are limited as the vast majority f retailers offering plus sizes stop at size 24.
 
At first glance, positively confident and blended basic customers would seem to have nothing in common. However, as we looked more closely, we discovered that our blend in basic customer identifies well with core products developed with simple but elegant styling features, enjoys those selections, while the positively confident customer uses them as layering pieces.
 
The bottom line is the blend in basic woman will buy one in every color, the positively confident woman will buy one to complete her outfit.
 
Casual remains the strongest category as the easy and relaxed features are important to her. And novelty is a big part of the assortment as our positively confident girl is looking for choices.
 
As we move into the store environment, the store layout is meant to be spacious with ease of mobility between fixtures, seating is provided for our guest's comfort. We aim to provide exceptional customer service including assisting our customers in the dressing rooms and through our customer surveys we track how we are doing. Our store managers get high marks for being attentive, authoritative, and friendly. Put simply, our customer trusts her.
 
Recently, we relaunched our denim program, just in September, and this store shot is an example of how we seek to make an authoritative statement that is easy to shop for her.
 
Regarding locations, we are nationwide brand with a concentration of stores in the Midwest, southeast, and south central. We are mostly located in strips and then the features of an A location are convenient parking, easy access and high visibility in main trade areas.
 
Sales, as David mentioned  sales per average store are down 20% from their peak prior to 2008, and we're in the process of reclaiming our heritage and rebuilding that volume.
 
While we work toward increasing that volume, we are not planning to invest any significant capital into the fleet and don't expect store growth until we approached increased volume levels. At that time, we will evaluate that store unit potential of Catherines, but realistically, we do not expect it to have the same store unit potential as Lane Bryant.
 
We look to  and we think about market share for Catherines, we think in two parts. First, the leadership position in the extended plus sizes. Again, 26 and larger. That market is about $2.2 billion and we expect to be a leader in this category and to continue to grow our share.
 
Second, the overall plus market positioning provides Catherines a complimentary and niche player to Lane Bryant. And while we're a leader in this attractive space, we did experience a slight loss in market share, this is result of Catherines closing 30 underperforming stores or about 6.6% of its chain in 2012. The majority f the sales were offset by 3% comp sales increase and the remaining change and strong double digit ecommerce growth. Although he clothes store volume lost short term market share, the closings were strategic in nature and improved overall EBITDA performance for the brands. However, the level of EBITDA performance is still unacceptable and we believe we have significant upside potential in the future.
 
 
Quickly, glancing through the 2012 highlights, during 2012 Catherines performed with improved operating metrics in all areas and we continue to experience very respectable growth online and expect to continue for the foreseeable future.
 
Expenses decreased related to the closing of the underperforming stores and savings in payroll labor and store related expenses.
 
Catherines also launched a cohesive rebranding effort under the tagline we fit you beautifully, and again, so much credit belongs to Brad and his team who did all that work internally and was meant to integrate a fresh customer focused approach at every touch point across all the business.
 
We saw improved operating metrics across the board with modest comp increases, strong ecommerce growth, now representing nearly 10% of sales. Catherines froze sales with reallocation of inventory investment n out of year round bottoms and into seasonal tops. Accelerating the tops inventory turn and sales volumes. Decreases in costs were a key contributor to the improvement of our overall EBITDA for the year. Same problem.
 
So, for your convenience, we've restated fiscal '11 and '12 for the fiscal year, 52 weeks ended in July and again, these also include fully burdened from a corporate allocations standpoint.
 
Switching into fiscal '13 strategic initiatives. Strategic initiatives for the year include multichannel growth, merchandising initiatives and marketing. Ecommerce growth will continue to be a key sales driver as we make sure to engage her in all channels in which she chooses to shop. W e will improve our inventory productivity by assuring our assortments are current, appropriate, and relevant. Evolving, not aging.
 
Examples of key merchandise strategies include a petite strategy, a hot zone strategy, category growth in sweaters, knits, denims and wovens, and continued reinvestment of year round intimates into seasonal and fashion choices. We plan to increase the amount of products we direct source, supporting our inventory productivity and adding to profits.
 
On the marketing front, we are streamlining events and expect to drive more in sales with less circulation. We are expanding planned events and great deals around key holidays such as labor day and Columbus day, and we'll be marketing to the Fashion Bug customer, as David had mentioned, that sales transfer program and seeking to migrate as much of the sales as possible. And we are specifically target marketing size 20 and larger for the Catherines brand.
 
As we look to the growth drivers, Catherines success will be driven by sales growth per average store, through a number of the aforementioned merchandising initiatives and traffic drivers. Our plans for modest comp store increase driven by merchandise assortment refinement and continued ecommerce growth are highly leveraged as incremental sales will require minimal additional store labor investment.
 
We are supporting our plans for increased level of direct source product by building the direct sourcing team and design teams, and streamlining processes.
 
Catherines leading market position of extended plus sized women's apparel provides incremental operating income with very little additional fixed corporate overhead. Our long term economic model will see mid single digit comp  mid single digit sales growth again resulting in high single digit operating margins.
 
Thanks for your attention, I'll now turn it over to our Chief Operating Officer, John Sullivan.
 
 
 John Sullivan
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - COO
 
 
Thank you and good morning. We're going to shift a little bit now from great encouraging stories from five terrific brands, talk a little bit about the back end of our business and I share along with several other peers the supervisory responsibility for our shared services growth. That's my focus this morning. I'll offer some insight into exciting strategies that have been designed to shirk corporate overhead and drive synergies across our brands.
 
There are two themes in this first slide that I'd like to call out for you, they're meaningful in our first or inaugural offsite with the shared services team we spent a heck of a lot of time on this. The first theme is that the brands are the primary focus. Noticing the positioning of shared services in that inverted pyramid, it's important as to the shared services team that we're all about supporting and riving these objectives of the brands first.
 
Secondly, in the words  there's three or four of them that really resonate with me. First is quality and then the next couple, cost efficient service. And those are the hallmarks in the expected outcomes of well defined shared services group and we're on our way to that goal.
 
 
This slide here represents what I would suggest are the traditional functions of a specialty retailer of shared services group. We've harvested these from the brands purposefully for a couple of reasons. First, we want to allow the brands to invest more of their focus, more of their intellectual capital on these great strategies driving growth. All of those back end functions and services under this common shared services umbrella. We expect that that will drive cost efficiencies, ring out corporate overhead and drive synergies into the brands.
 
For example, we recently embarked on the integration of Charming's payroll system, pulling that out of the front of the brand, bringing it back into the shared services, that activity alone will drive a 10% cost reduction that will be enjoyed by the brands. And I'll share many examples like that with you this morning.
 
What's perhaps unique about this particular shared service model is its geography. It's not centrally located. We have round special complementary activities and capabilities in every one of these brands. So, if you ask where our shared services team sits, sits in Duluth, sits in Suffern, sits in Columbus, sits in Bensalem. We're very unique model.
 
This morning I'm going to focus on very strategic activities that the shared services group is pursuing and later Armand will give you a little bit of insight into the financials of these six strategies.
 
So, let me just briefly touch on each of them. The first strategy is to optimize our distribution and our logistics network. Those push pins you see there, they represent our existing DC properties across the nation. There are four of them, the comprise about 1.5 million square feet of distribution space excluding Baltimore Maryland which you know that we are divesting as part of the Fashion Bug sale. Each of these facilities, they vary. They vary in size and they vary in sophistication. Earlier this year, we launched an extensive analysis of our distribution network. By that, I mean we studied the concentration of our existing store base, we spent a great deal of tine with these gentlemen to understand their forecast for sales volume through a design year of 2019.
 
Like many of the shared services functions, and I think that you'll hear this multiple times this morning from me, like many of the shared services functions, this business become more efficient, more cost effective, with more volume. And that's what Charming brought to us, more volume.
 
For this reason, and for some others, we recently introduced a strategy to consolidate all of these retail distribution centers under one single roof. And that roof  that home will be Columbus Ohio. A little bit about that, our plan is to expand our Columbus Ohio facility. We're going to invest in information technology, high speed sortation equipment and robotic storage and retrieval systems that really take labor right out of the model. The facility is planned to open in Q1 [2004]. This, I think, is a fantastic investment and it will have meaningful impact on these brands. Let me give you an example.
 
Some of these brands, they've going to enjoy upwards of a 25% reduction in the cost of processing a single unit with this strategy. Investment has a quick payback period and I think that you'll find an attractive return on invested capital.
 
Strategy two, a little story. I recently visited my daughter in North Carolina, and like most dads, first thing that we did was we went shopping and we went to the mall, one of these power malls that the team was talking about in Afton Ridge North Carolina. And the first thing I saw was a beautiful Lane Bryant store and I hadn't seen many and I was anxious and as you would expect, went right in to meet the team. Tony, it was a terrific team, and what I noticed, was sharing a wall with that Lane Bryant store was a Maurices, another terrific site. And 100 yards down, there was a third Ascena brand, was a Dress Barn store.
 
Now, our real estate team has schooled me a little bit. They've told me that there are about 360 trading areas, meaningful trading areas in America. 90% of those areas, we don't profit in, we have a label in 90% of them. 80% of those, they have multiple brands. Now, as a supervisor of distribution function, I know that those stores in Afton Ridge, that produce was picked and packed by three different teams in three different distribution centers, who have three different P&Ls with three different sets of fixed costs and disappointingly, when the product left that DC, it left in three different trucks.
 
I also know that 60% to 70% of our distribution and our logistics budget is invested in transportation. It's the biggest nut in the P&L. This new strategy will allow us to pick and pack all of that product that went to Afton from one team, from one distribution center, and most importantly, remember the 60% to 70% will leave that facility in one truck. This I think is a super powerful strategy.
 
Talk about strategy three, I'm encouraged, I've heard every one of these brands this morning, they talked about the growth drivers in the future and I think, from each of them, you head about ecommerce as a power driver of our business.
 
All of them are growing. We are challenged today with our current business model because all of these brands are serviced by three outsourced providers who fill, and pick, pack, ship, service our website, handle our calls. All those functions are outsourced. And while that is a brilliant way to start a business, we're at a point in time now where we need to bring that home. Why do we want to do that, it's more cost effective, and frankly, this is a business where you have to be nimble, you have to be quick, you have to have high velocity innovation. You can't sit in line behind five other customers of those third party venders and ask for a change. So, that you will hear is an announcement that we've made recently for a new project to bring all of that fulfillment service under one roof.
 
 
We find ourself as part of the acquisition with Charming with a marvelous facility in Indiana, Green Castle Indiana. It's about 845,000 square feet I would suggest to you that it is one of those big boxes. We've commenced to refurbishing program. We'll transform it into a state of the art ecommerce facility, complete with new systems, high speed technology, high speed sortation equipment.
 
This facility is scheduled to open early in 2014, and as the physical construction nears completion sometime in 2013 we'll the n start thinking about platform services, web development, call center support, as part of the acquisition also, we've acquired highly scalable computer software that allows you to build websites. We own that today. This is exciting to me because I think that it will deliver on this vision that you've heard the gentlemen speak of, this omni channel concept to integrate our ecommerce facility and our stores so that the experience is seamless. It's a very big idea, it'll significantly reduce our processing costs and give us the ability to really innovate in a rapid manner.
 
Fourth, and prominent, I think this is a core competency of the Company. Is expanding our direct sourcing capability. We heard a bit about this from each of the brands. We anticipate to expand this deeper into categories that we don't currently do business and broader into some of the businesses that today are on an agency or a marketing  a market model.
 
By way of acquisition, we find ourself with two capable sourcing teams. Here's another opportunity for consolidation which will have  which will be done domestically as well as internationally.
 
And lastly, this is another area that we are attempting to supercharge with technology. We own that technology today, we're in process of growing it out to our partners domestically as well as to these overseas offices, potentially on into the vendor community. More to come on this strategic initiative.
 
Fifth initiatives, consolidating our technology platforms. I've talked about technology, it's important it's driving many of these strategic initiatives, but it also has consolidation opportunities. Let me give you an example. Today, we have five data centers around the country. Some on my team would argue perhaps maybe even a sixth, we have one that is cloud computing that's outsourced. Six data centers is terrifically expensive, multiple maintenance streams, multiple labor pools. This strategy will consolidate down to one primary data center supporting all brands with a robust, capable, reliable back up. So, at the conclusion here, we will have two data centers from our current five or six and try and ring out the costs associated with technology while at the same time  the same time, super charging these initiatives that you've heard.
 
Secondly, as part of our technology platform strategy, we're introducing common systems across all of the brands, and I've listed a couple there for you.
 
Point of sale, merchandising, warehouse management as examples, financial systems. Case in point, we're in the midst of rolling out very powerful full scale robust financial systems across the entity starting with the legacy Ascena brands, which will go up onto this new investment at the end of this month. And we'll move into these other areas.
 
Why are we doing that? It truly does ring out the cost of managing information technology. We don't believe that one size fits all across our brands. We are going at this with an opportunity to customize and tailor by brand, but keeping the fundamentals the same so that the cost model is much, much different than it is today.
 
And lastly, in our technology function, we've got some duplicity there. And so we're focused on unifying our technology teams and, as you would anticipate, there's opportunity to ring out corporate overhead from this strategy.
 
We touch on the final strategy, the sixth strategy, and that's to optimize our business services. Today in our corporation, we have about 19 work streams focused on these areas. Each one of them is led by a business executive reporting in to David. So they're getting high focus in our company. Many of these will reap opportunities early, early from strategies such as best pricing, volume discounts and elimination of duplicate functions, as I think you would expect. Most however, will require some process reengineering and months to complete.
 
So, there are shared services  these are the shared services six strategies. I will tell you that the leadership team is very encouraged about what this brings our business and what it can do to the P&L. and for that, I'll introduce Armand, who will walk us through some of the numbers. Thank you.
 
 
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CFO
 
 
Thanks, John. Before I begin my presentation, I'd like to thank you all for being here today. Old friends, supporters, it's really gratifying to see the kind of turn out that we've received and your interest in our story and in our company. So thank you very much to all of you, I appreciate it.
 
We've covered a lot of ground this morning in our presentation. My objective is to review our recent financial accomplishments and provide you with a summary of how all the pieces come together, which lays the foundation for future earnings potential for Ascena.
 
Our financial results, as you've heard from the brands, put it all together and we had record fiscal year performance, both top line and bottom line for the year just ended.
 
First, I'd like to highlight our sales growth. We've grown from $2.4 billion in fiscal 2010 to $3.4 billion for the year just ended with plans of reaching $5 billion for fiscal 2013. The increases over this three year period have been driven by Justice merger, consistency in our comp sales performance, which have increased 14 consecutive quarters, as well as new store growth and increased store sales productivity.
 
And last, but not least, our fastest growing segment, ecommerce. Which you're already heard the brands talk about.
 
Our fiscal 2013 sales estimate also includes our newest brands, Lane Bryant and Catherines for the full year, compared to only a partial of the year price.
 
Our combined store growth for 2013 includes approximately 200 new stores and 100 closings for a net increase of approximately 3%, ending the year with 3,920 stores.
 
Our fastest growing segment, ecommerce sales across all our brands exceeded expectations and continue to outpace brick and mortar. We see this business as a long term vehicle to increasing operating margins. Overall, ecommerce sales for fiscal 2013 are estimated to increase at $390 million, which includes Lane Bryant and Catherines for the full year. As a percent of sales, this business represents 7.5% of sales and we think it's got a lot of penetration remaining.
 
Ascena's adjusted operating income of $332 million for 2012 grew approximately 50% in three years and is expected to grow further to $405 million for 2013. This growth has been fueled by increased sales, margin expansion and expense leverage. Brand results are shown with corporate overhead fully allocated. As previously mentioned, I think its noteworthy to mention it again, the outstanding operating results at our Justice brand, which nearly tripled during this three year period from $64 million in 2010 to $173 million for 2012, as well as the outstanding performance of our Maurice brand.
 
As you know, we've recently changed our financial presentation for gross profit to provide more visibility to gross margin, buying distribution and occupancy costs. We have recently received positive feedback from all of you on the viability of this change, however, we recognize that some of you need additional assistance when comparing it to last year on our pro forma basis.
 
Obviously, after this meeting I would be happy to asset you in this process, just call my office in the weeks to come and I'll be happy to work with all of you. Thank you.
 
As far as our Ascena operating income rate, the grey line, of approximately 10% over the past three years, it's plan to decrease to 8% in 2013 the decrease is primarily due to the impact of the combined Ascena and Charming Shoppes corporate overhead costs, $150 million that is expected to take a few years to work down.
 
In addition, fiscal 2013 is being planned as a transition year for Lane Bryant and Catherines businesses as they begin to implement previously discussed initiatives to help drive sales and profit.
 
Our profit growth has generated strong cash flows which have been invested back into our business. Our philosophy under uses of our cash, first are to invest and grow our businesses. Second, to either selectively make strategic acquisitions or buy back shares. We believe this approach delivers the best returns to our shareholders. During the past three years, we've invested $317 million in capital spending primarily for stores and information systems. Over the long term, we expect over a half our capital to be invested in stores as stores represent one of our highest returns. The fiscal 2013, we are planning to spend $325 million, as well as planning to make a $50 million payment against our outstanding $300 million term loan.
 
Capital spending has increased over the past three years as we've grown our company. The increased capital spending estimate of $325 million for fiscal 2013 includes three major projects, some of which were just previously discussed by John. The first one, $80 million for the expansion of our Columbus Ohio DC facility to handle merchandise shipments to our stores of all five brands. $40 million to retrofit our Green Castle Indiana facility to bring in ecommerce fulfillment. Both these projects have a healthy ROIC which is expected to favorably impact earnings after completion.
 
 
And last, $50 million for a new combined headquarters facility for Dress Barn and Ascena in Mahwah, New Jersey, which was offset by $40 million in proceeds realized in 2012 from the sale of our existing Suffern, New York facility. These projects represent a onetime increase in capital spending and we expect capital spending on the remainder of these projects in the future. We expect capital spending to revert back to more normalized levels of $200 million for a year.
 
Some comments on our balance sheet. These comments are selected information as of July 28, 2012. As far as cash and investments, we showed $169 million. Little background behind that $160 million, approximately $115 million of that is overseas, difficult to get our hands on. And $40 million of that number was store cash in transit. My point here is we are trying to maximize as much cash as we can to obviously pay down our debt and run our company.
 
As far as inventory, as previously reported, ending the year, inventories were in great shape, both levels and quantity and we expect that to continue, ending the upcoming first quarter.
 
And last, as far as debt, as you know, we have a term loan, a six year term loan, a $300 million term loan and obviously our intentions are to make a payment this year of approximately $50 million. We also have a revolving credit facility of $250 million that as of yearend showed $20 million outstanding and has been paid down to zero. We also have the ability to upsize the $250 million revolver to $300 million, should we elect.
 
Other debt includes $10 million of mortgage debt that is in the process of being paid off. And the remaining amount are approximately $600,000 from the successful redemption of our $140 million Charming Shoppe convertible debt that we paid off just before the fiscal year end.
 
Adjusted earnings per share have grown 52% from $0.88 in fiscal 2010, to $1.34 for fiscal 2012. With respects to our fiscal 2013 earnings per share guidance, we remain comfortable with our previous issued range of $1.45 to $1.55 for this year. We are confident that we can continue to merchandise well and capture the efficiencies associated with mid single digit comp increases for the year.
 
As you know, we don't report monthly comps or give quarterly earnings guidance. With regards to what we're seeing in our business right now, I can tell you that September sales was off than we would have expected. However, with the break in weather, October has been stronger and we're back on track where we want to be. With good rates of comp growth. W e will be announcing our first quarter sales and earnings results on December 5th, shortly after market closes.
 
To give you more color on corporate overhead costs from the Charming Shoppe acquisition, we've broken down our expected synergies into two buckets. First bucket corporate overhead reductions  our new combined corporate overhead expense of approximately $150 million, with $70 million from Ascena and $80 million from Charming Shoppes. This level of corporate overhead is obviously more than is needed to support our five brands. We are working thoughtfully to reduce these costs as soon as possible.
 
We've already identified a number of areas and initiatives that are expected to reduce this amount by an estimated $50 million and favorably impact earnings per share by $0.20 over the next three year period. With $0.04 of that amount expected in 2013, $0.08 in 2014, and $0.08 in 2015.
 
This reduction includes right sizing the corporate structure from the closure of Fashion Bug, as well as consolidating back office functions into our shared service group. In addition, we expect to leverage increased buying power of our new combined companies by renegotiating national contracts and combining common systems.
 
The second bucket we've identified are potential brand synergies are estimated at $37 million to $45 million at this time. These include the DC consolidation which John has already given you a little background, both the retail distribution, ecommerce fulfillment as well as transportation. In this bucket  this bucket  obviously these particular opportunities include the vast majority of this and we anticipate that this particular amount will favorably impact EPS by 15  $0.18 in addition to the corporate overhead cost reduction previously mentioned of $0.20.
 
These estimated savings are expected to be realized as these projects and initiatives are completed. Most of which, again, relate to the DC consolidation estimated for completion in fiscal 2014 to 2015.
 
You've heard it from our brand leaders and their strategic initiatives to drive further sales and earnings growth. You've seen two slides that identify reductions to reducing corporate overhead and certain projects and actions that will delivery synergies to our brands. Together, these are expected to favorably impact future earnings per share by approximately $0.35.
 
As a result, we are confident that we can deliver an annual sales growth rate of 8% to 10%, increase operating income as a percent of sales to 12% plus, an increase earnings per share annually by 10%. In summary, you've heard David summarize our investment highlights, that I believe is still worth repeating.
 
 
We have a diversified portfolio of niche brands, we have minimum competition and we are well positioned to certainly take advantage of an upward cycle in the economy and to minimize the risk should it go down.
 
We have significant growth opportunities at all our brands. You've heard from our brand leaders, their initiatives to get top line and bottom line growth.
 
We have a shared service model that is able to leverage and drive down SG&A costs. We have a strong balance sheet and continued strong cash flows that will enable us to reduce our borrowing costs and enough cash flow to still continue to support projects that have healthy ROIC. New stores as well as DC.
 
And lastly, as far as future opportunities, we will still continue to look at stock buyback, but at this point, our focus is on paying down our debt and lastly another acquisition, which I hope doesn't happen any time soon. I think it's going to take a little time to digest this one.
 
This concludes our presentations and again, I thank you all for being here.
 
Before we open it up to Q&A, I'd like to just make a couple of comments. Please before you ask your questions, just raise your hand, we'll get the mic to you. Introduce yourself and your question and we'll go from there. Thank you again, for all being here today.
  
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
 
 
Neely?
 
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
 
Great. All right, Neely Tamminga from Piper Jaffray. Thank you so much, David, for pulling this together and for the team really investing a lot of time, this has been immensely helpful. Ecommerce is clearly a theme we're hearing. Each one of your brands has cited this as a key initiative. Thank you, John, for explaining what's going on in the back end.
 
I am curious, from a merchant level, maybe Mike and Tony, you can comment about this relative to your businesses. As businesses go from 5% to 20% of sales for ecom and higher, you need more people more team, et cetera, to do more products online. Can you speak to how your businesses are positioned to really take that momentum higher?
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
 
 
You want to start Mike? Say how you're building the infrastructure.
 
 
 Michael Rayden
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CEO - Tween Brands
 
 
First of all, we have a centralized design function. So product is not the issue, it's really selecting the right product. Over the last two or three years, as Scott mentioned, we have built our infrastructure and at this point in time, I think we have a full cadre of separate merchants, planners, cite analytics people already in place. So I think we're reasonably well developed infrastructure, and infrastructure is not an issue within our business at the moment.
 
 
 
 Anthony Romano
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - President, CEO
 
 
I would echo the similar things for Charming, at Lane Bryant and Catherines, the big thing we may need to add is a little bit more investment in the online merchant team. But the analytics and the web design and those things are in good infrastructure shape.
 
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
 
Thank you so much. Good luck.
 
 
 Jeff Gerstel
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President - Dressbarn Division
 
 
This on? We're obviously at a very different place at 2%. So, we're actively building our infrastructure. We'll probably double our team this year and it'll still be a fraction of what Mike or Tony would have. In our plans, we've projected building the team, investing the team. We've worked with an outside consulting firm to help us design the organization and chart it out, growing toward $100 million business.
 
 
 George Goldfarb
- Maurices Inc. - President
 
 
And really, the same from Maurices perspective to get from the 5% to 10%, we're in the process of making infrastructure modifications and have used a third party consultant also.
 
 
 Nancy Hilliker
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
 
Hi, Nancy Hilliker from Citigroup. I work with Oliver Chen. Our question is more around the real estate portfolio. I know that you talked about Dress Barn having a balance between mall locations and strip mall locations, where do you think maybe that's going in the future?
 
Also a little bit more flavor on the same brands moving into Canada. And if there's been any more talk about using some of the Fashion Bug locations closing in January towards new locations [this spring]. Thanks.
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
 
 I'll start off with Fashion Bug. I think as I mentioned earlier, there are couple dozen stores that we're going to take over with one of the other brands. And then, maybe the easiest thing is just to kind of let each brand talk about their own issues. Jeff, you want to start that?
 
 
 Jeff Gerstel
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President - Dressbarn Division
 
 Sure, as I said, for us, we see the malls as a new opportunity. It's 4% of the portfolio today and it's 25% of the stores we're opening now. So there's a couple of hundred stores in this B mall world that we can grow into. So we're pretty excited about that and the results again so far have proved pretty compelling.
 
 
 George Goldfarb
- Maurices Inc. - President
 
 
And from Maurices perspective, we'll probably pick up about a dozen Fashion Bug stores thanks to Tony, and as I mentioned earlier, we're doing about 50/50 malls in strips and very, very successful getting back into the mall game with this hub and spoke strategy. And Canada's off to a great start and looking forward to that.
 
 
 
 Anthony Romano
- Charming Shoppes, Inc. - President, CEO
 
 
I think from a Lane Bryant  Lane Bryant standpoint as we mentioned in the discussion, we'll wind up with about 80% of our stress in strip and outlet and lifestyle, which again, with a 1,000 store chain, 20% is still 200 malls. Principally the B plus malls are the ones that work best for us, and I think again are important t help us make our fashion statement, if you will.
 
Catherines will remain completely strip center based. Yet  the convenience of that shopping  parking is so important that you got to park right out front, get right in the door.
 
Canada's extreme interest for us and we believe that we'll be able to accelerate our entrance because we can learn from what the other brands have done and Ascena brings that to the table, so we'll certainly be studying that during 2013 to figure out when to make it come into play.
 
And certainly for  in Lane Bryant's case, just quickly, we do ship internationally. We actually using a company called 51 ship to 89 countries. It's not a lot of sales, it's about 1.5% of ecommerce sales in total, but half of those sales are in Canada.
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
 
 And just as with our mix of fashion and price, obliviously has the good fortune of our malls and our strips and our power centers and our outlets all work well. So we have very few real estate limitations. The small markets for a  what has been a singular gender small market brand has been well exceeding our expectations, which is why we believe we have such a huge opportunity continuing in the states.
 
We are today, well over 950 stores, people had said that was impossible in a tween business a number of years ago. We have 18 stores open in Canada, they are open spectacular without marketing, as Scott mentioned. They're performing 50% to 60% better than the stores average mature store in the state without marketing and we believe that market is at least 125 stores and then the third prong for us is we do franchise stores already in the mid east, we do them in Russia, we're in Australia. So, we have an opportunity, really to do international  it's a reality, it's not just a thought for us. So very fortunate to have all those opportunities of growth. Fashion Bug locations are not our normal cup of tea though.
 
 
 Unidentified Audience Member
 
 (Inaudible - microphone inaccessible) [JJK Research]. Two questions, the first is on the direct sourcing opportunity. I was wondering if that encompassed shared sourcing opportunity between Dress Barn, and Lane Bryant and Catherines or if that was specific to the direct sourcing opportunities that each of the presidents talked about in their businesses.
 
And secondly for Armand, I'm just trying to roll up the EPS opportunity and I know you have 15% to 18% of the synergies, $0.18 from the synergies and I guess $1.20 from the corporate overhead reduction. But then, that doesn't eliminate the 10% annual operating income flow that would lead to 10% EPS, is that correct? So we have in 2014 corporate overhead reduction and brand synergy potential in addition to a roughly 10% EPS projection from operations?
 
Okay and then, in '15, is it the same level of overhead reduction and synergy potential?
 
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CFO
 
 
Right now that's why [really] take the brand synergy bucket and try to break that into years, because at this time, we need to get our hands around how all these are going to shake out over the next three to four years. I think as we get longer in this processes we'll have more clarity on how we can break that so called, $0.15 to $0.18 and by the way, it could be more, but at this stage, this is what we've identified. This is what we're comfortable sharing with you. And then, we'll be able to be in a better place of breaking that out on when we expect those synergies to come in in this particular bucket.
 
 
 
 Unidentified Audience Member
  
 
(Inaudible - microphone inaccessible)
 
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CFO
 
 
I would say that based on what we're seeing here, since most of these in the so called brand synergy potential bucket are DC related, I would say they'd be skewed more towards 2014 to 2015.
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
  
 
[Janet], I wasn't really quite sure what you asked on the direct sourcing.
 
 
 Unidentified Audience Member
  
 
Well my question on direct sourcing was more about Dress Barn and Lane Bryant in that  I know each company is  each brand is working on developing their own direct sourcing opportunities. Maybe some private labels for the Dress Barn brand. But I was wondering, as you bring Lane Bryant and Catherines on line  I mean into the Company  integrate it, are there some sourcing opportunities as perhaps there's some vendor overlap, or there could be vendor overlap that would provide more synergies?
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
 
 
I think at this moment  first of all, Justice is an incredibly well developed direct sourcing model. We do 430 million, almost 500 million of FOB, which is 90% of our apparel and somewhere around 30% of our non apparel goods.
 
Lane Bryant is also actually well developed in sourcing direct on the apparel side. I think it's about 80% and where they're not well developed and they go through agents is on the Cacique side, which is 30% of their business. So, that's a very big opportunity for Lane Bryant, which we're going to star to work on, and that is done with the old mast that's spun off from the Limited.
 
So Lane Bryant also is a vertical operation with a design team, and that basically provides the ingredients to be able to do direct sourcing.
 
Catherines does as well. The two basic brands or the earlier brands, Dress Barn is really just starting to do design. So, at this point is not going to do any direct sourcing most likely this coming year and Maurcies has started down the path doing a small amount, and as George mentioned, growing about 50%. And they are really just starting to build the internal design team, which will allow them then, in order to do direct sourcing.
 
So, I think down the road, there's huge opportunity, especially in Dress Barn and in Maurices and in the Cacique portion of the Lane Bryant business. And in Lane Bryant, I do think with that corporate overhead came probably a larger infrastructure than required for today's business, especially with our offices as well.
 
So, there are two offices in Hong Kong. One is the Justice office and there's a Lane Bryant, Charming Catherines office there, much bigger. There's another office in Korea, which is only Justice, and there's' a small office in Shanghai which his only Justice. So, as I mentioned, Ronnie has been our sourcing lead for many years, came from Mass before that and come spring, he's making that his sole responsibility is this synergies and efficiency improvement. So, I hope that answers it.
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
 
 
Just to add for Dress Barn, and I know you're familiar, we currently  about 27% of our purchases are imported directly. So the change for us and the shift is taking potentially some of that volume that goes through a third party agent, bringing some of that internal so we capture the profit. And secondly, building a design capability to increase that.
 
 
Right now, that 27%, 28% of our purchases at a direct source can go up significantly. There's two benefits. The cost is nice, but more important right now for us is differentiating the assortment and having that consistency throughout. There's potential synergies in terms of fabrics and factories with the Lane Bryant and Catherines, however I don't think  you won't ever see the same styles in both.
 
 
 Unidentified Audience Member
 
 
(Inaudible - microphone inaccessible)
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
  
 
Yes, absolutely. And gain, that's the Ascena global sourcing model help when we work together because we can source as well from a factory George might be using or Mike, but we all sell a lot of denim.
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
 
 Janet, currently there's not a lot of overlap with factories between Lane Bryant and Justice. And that synergy and that opportunity to look at that will happened down the road. I think the 
 
 
 Unidentified Audience Member
 
 
(Inaudible - microphone inaccessible)
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
  
 
There is very little. There's one factory, I think, actually in the woven area that we have an overlap and there's not a lot of overlap beyond that. I have to say that Lane Bryant's quantities have been a little small for some of the factories that we're in, but I think with the strength of our buying power together, they'll probably  and we will probably do some consolidation of the factories, but we haven't had a chance yet to investigate the strength of the Lane Bryant factories which may give us opportunity on the other side as well.
 
 
 Tom Filandro
- Susquehanna Financial Group - Analyst
 
 
Tom Filandro, Susquehanna. Thank you for the comprehensive presentation. Two questions. If the divisional heads could give us  or leaders could give us some understanding of what a typical transaction looks like, maybe some of the metrics each transaction. And then David, could you speak a little bit more to exactly how you're attaching transferring the Fashion Bug sales and you're also looking to capture that one third I guess that's the missy business or you're just going to let that go away? Thanks
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
 
I'll start while you u guys can get your numbers together. The process with the sales transfer is kind of multi level. So, we've got a marketing executive from Charming that's kind of heading it up. And he's working with all the marketing teams at all the brands. So, they're looking at adjacencies. In some centers we have another brand next door. So, that's one type of opportunity. It may be in the same market. So we're looking at direct mail and something like that we can  you can bring the customer over.
 
 
We're also looking at doing things in the store. One of the efforts that we've undertaken is to allow the Fashion Bug credit card to be used at Maurices or a Dress Barn. It's already able to be used at Lane Bryant and Catherines. So, you can imagine you do a bag stuffer that says, hey, bring your card in and get a 10% discount off your first purchase at Maurices. Or what have you. And because this one's family, where we have relatively local stores we're actually training them and developing them to go into these stores and stat connecting and start transferring over some of those sales logs, hiring some of those sales people and there's no kind of end to the creativity that they're going to use at the local level.
 
But at the corporate level, think CRM, whether its direct mail or email, because we've got those lists, we know who those customers are and in many cases, they are already cross shopping. So, it just gives us a chance to further enhance that and reach out to the ones that aren't. Because we know what size they are. We know what type of product they like, and are they a better Maurices customer or Catherines or Dress Barn. So, that's well under way. So we're pretty excited about that.
 
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CFO
 
 
Tom, regarding your question about transaction metrics, why don't you give me a call and I'll be happy to discuss it with you, probably after this conference?
 
 
 Tom Filandro
- Susquehanna Financial Group - Analyst
 
 
Okay.
 
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CFO
 
 
Thank you.
 
 
 Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan - Analyst
 
 
Great. Brian Tunick, JPMorgan. I guess Armand or Mike, not to nitpick, but it looks like the Justice operating margins look like they were showing that they were ticking down in your 2013 guidance, so just curious if you guys think there is any peak, or anything going on with your Justice operating margins here or you being conservative?
 
And then, maybe Tony can talk about Lane Bryant, historical four wall margins for people that aren't as familiar, you talk about a high single digit operating margin, maybe just putting context  what is Lane Bryant's high been throughout the cycle. Obviously there's been a bunch of plus sized retailers that have gone bankrupt in the last couple years and have you guys seen share from those players? Or has there been something else going on in the cycle?
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
 
 Okay, so I couldn't find where you were sitting, Brian, I just heard the voice going. So, in Lane Bryant's case historically, if you're talking about four wall profitability, it was typically in that 16%, 17%.
 
And then, in the Charming Shoppes model, which his where it gets different and how you allocate overhead and what have you. I'd say we  the brand overhead itself was about another 4%, 4.5% and then we were charging at about a 4% corporate overhead on top of that. So historically, they were running about 9% EBITDA numbers. Many are the tax effected down from there.
 
And, regarding market share from other folks, we have been sputtering along. We have not hit our assortments right, and it's been difficult, over like the last three or four years. So, I'd say we've been stuck at the current level and we expect now to be gaining market share and winning more of those battles.
 
 
 
 Michael Rayden
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CEO - Tween Brands
 
 
I think I need to leave that answer to Armand. I didn't know that my goals were lower than the previous year, but if they are, we'll take them.
 
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CFO
 
 
I'll be happy to assist Mike in that answer. Brian, yes, certainly we believe that Justice's operating margin is at 12%, 13% now as they've been last year. I think, what you're seeing here is a nice increase certainly in terms of dollars. But I would tell you at this point, looking at the tone of bad business, I would like to think they have some opportunity here to beat that number.
 
 
 John Wayland
- Net Return Investments - Analyst
 
 
Good morning, [John Wayland, Net Return Investments]. My investment thesis for Ascena is very simple. I brought my two daughters into a Justice store and within 30 seconds I'd dropped about $300. Thank you.
 
My question today, I'm here as an investor, but also as a customer of Justice, is with  it's a sourcing question. I've read reports that some of the ingredients in the products contain chemicals which are in California's Prop 65 list, things that are linked to cancer and reproductive harm. So, I'm just thinking ahead, instead of being reactive when we wake up in the morning and on Twitter we see that leading tween retailer has undisclosed chemicals linked to cancer and reproductive harm. If we get in front of that now and disclose that the chemicals are in the product or eliminate them totally.
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
  
 
I don't know whether Ronnie can speak loud enough, but Ronnie, why don't you answer that question since it's your life is compliance.
 
 
 Ronald Robinson
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - EVP - Sourcing
 
 
I'd be happy to. We do a number of tests on all of our products prior to coming in compliance with all the laws and regulations, whether they're federal laws or Prop 65 in California, specifically, California has unique requirements and we don't put anything into those stores that would fail. Had one issue in the past, and we got rid of it and going forward we don't anticipate there to be any problems.
 
 
 John Wayland
- Net Return Investments - Analyst
 
 
Thank you.
 
 
 Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 
Hi, thanks. Ed Yruma from KeyBanc. Two quick questions I guess. First, you're pointing toward and '13 kind of an inflection point with Dress Barn's margin, are there any kind of key initiatives that you have that'll help drive that margin improvement?
 
And then, I guess second, how much of a longer term margin lift should Lane Bryant see from this move up mall? Thank you.
 
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
  
 
I didn't  just to clarify, again, we see an increase in margins over the next couple of years. I didn't specifically say in '13. So, it's more a case of growing them. We see that through increasing the direct sourcing element through the proprietary design. So, on the gross margin. And obviously, as the sales grow, we'll continue to leverage overhead.
 
 
 Unidentified Company Representative
 
 In Lane Bryant's case, there's 125 stores that we've targeted for relocation. Their four wall contribution is about in the 6% to 8% and as we move off mall we'll see those go to 16% to 18%.
 
 
 Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 
Hi, thank you. Scott Krasik form BB&T. Two questions, David, I guess, mostly for you. What are the components of the remaining corporate overhead? You laid out $50 million of savings by 2015, is there just an ongoing piece of Charming Shoppes corporate you need to maintain? And then, also I think  I don't know if it was at the Justice meeting or when you did it, but you laid out  you expected to be able to grow operating income by about 10% and you r net income by about  pretax by about 10% a year and then another 5% through share buyback. You're laying out a little bit more conservative. Would it have been wiser to go the other route?
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
 
First, the corporate overhead, you saw the slide from Armand with the 70 and the 80 and the  what we're trying to think about is not that we're cutting back the BSC, as I mentioned earlier. Try and think of it as taking the existing overhead that we have to support the brands in shared service group and scaling it up a little bit to support the growth of Ascena.
 
So we've got two new brands, we've got roughly 12,000, 15,000 new associates, another $1.3 billion in volume. So, as we grow and as we take on more of these corporate services though shared services, that's got to scale. So, even though we're showing it as a reduction, which h it is, think of it as taking what we have and growing it to support the additional brand.
 
This second point, I'm not quite sure, you're saying should we have done more share buy backs and not done the acquisition of Charming?
 
 
 Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 
Well, just Armand laid out that your long term goal, I guess is EPS annual growth of 10% plus and you had previously laid out 15% which incorporated share buyback.
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
 
Right, we certainly would love to be back in the position of buying back stock, I think it would be imprudent to do it until we pay down our debt. So, if - when I said that was probably a year ago, pre Charming, pre debt, and we had all this cash and we said here's a great way to leverage our earnings growth, our EPS growth. So that's certainly a strategy we've used in the past and we'll continue to look at, but for the timing, as Armand said, we're going to use our cash flow to support our CapEx and to pay down debt.
 
 
 Anna Andreeva
- FBR - Analyst
 
 
Thanks so much, Anna Andreeva of FBR. Thanks guys for all the great detail today.
 
 
So, first, I was hoping to follow up on the recapture rates from [sashi bought] division, the 10% that you guys talked about. Is that imbedded in the current guidance? David, you talked about significant margins, incremental margin from these sales. Could you perhaps quantify that? And I suppose to Armand, great to hear that trends have improved thus far in October, if you could perhaps quantify that, I'm not sure if I missed that. And just any color by divisions, that would be great.
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
 Well, I'll throw up the easy one. The recapture rate or the transfer rate we're looking for is 10%. So that's the goal I set out for the team. As we look at the investments in incremental marketing, that's the metric that we're using. We're able to kind of watch it with each additional mailing we do. So it's not all or nothing. I think it's a reasonable goal, depending on which marketing person I speak to, they'll give me a higher number.
 
So I'm just  I'm holding 10%. And because it's a incremental sale, in generally because of our tipping point and all the fixed costs to store and all of that, generally you get about $0.40 on the dollar dropping through. So, if we're successful, whether it's through the sales transfer or just through good business, if we can get that incremental sales above our tipping point and for each brand it's a little different and we're making some investments in infrastructure, as you've heard. But in general, it's around 3%. So anything above that 3% comp flows through about that 40%.
 
Armand, you want to talk about the comps now?
 
 
 Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - CFO
 
 So, if I understand your question correctly, does our guidance have build in what we expect the margins from certainly Lane Bryant and Catherines? Yes, it does. I think as we go on through the year, I think as we get our arms around this we'll certainly update that guidance as needed. But at this time, as I said and I'll repeat myself, we are comfortable with $1.45 to $1.50 per year.
 
 
 Gary Kaplan
- Fireline - Analyst
 
[Gary Kaplan] from [Fireline]. Again, thanks for the informative presentation. Could you talk about your plans, overseas expansion? I'm leaving this open ended, whether franchise acquisition, et cetera.
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc. - President, CEO
 
 
Canada really isn't overseas, but it's international, so I want to count that. Get credit for that. So, first and foremost is Canada. We see that s a natural expansion. You've heard about Justice, Maurices, we're considering Dress Barn for next spring, '14  not '13. To be determined, and Lane Bryant we think is a tremendous opportunity as well.
 
Beyond that, you've heard Mike talk about that things he's done internationally, which is a great start. There's been a lot of learning and grab Scott Bracale, who's head of international Justice to learn more about some of his ideas for potential expansion internationally for Justice.
 
Beyond what we've laid out for the short term, it's unclear what the opportunities might be. So, we're putting it kind of on the back burner for other international expansion into Europe or into Asia, but that's certainly something we think about. We all travel, so we see the competition in these markets and we're interested, but we're not going to be acting on it anytime soon.
 
All right, I think everybody's getting hungry. What I'd like to do  I was listening to everyone chat and I kind of jotted down some themes that I thought would be helpful to talk about or think about that are common to all five brands, we are a unique model in retail and you've heard all about it today, but I want to pull together some of the common themes that we've talked about.
 
 
One is, we're all about helping women feel good about themselves. So whether that's about the products or environment and underlying customer service. That is, I think unique to all of our brands. We're really focused on that and we do tremendous training, et cetera to drive that. Although it is training, it is not incentive. We do not work on any type of commission or [split] system and that is very different than some of our fellow retailers.
 
Next, these are five growth businesses. Even while Catherines  you heard Tony's comments about it, we think there's tremendous potential at all five of our businesses to get top line and bottom line to higher levels, for all the reasons you've heard about.
 
Ecommerce at 7.5% sounds pretty good. However, we've got brands that are at much lower levels, and even the brands that are higher levels, we think can go higher for many reasons. We think the curve is still pretty steep on ecommerce and we are investing heavily in ecommerce. Not just through the things you heard John Sullivan talk about in terms of the infrastructure, but also in terms of the people, the teams that we have in play  you heard George and Jeff talk about using a consulting group to help us think through the different phases of growing an ecommerce business.
 
Product sourcing, product development, the idea here is not just to save money, but it's also to create unique on trend product that is focused for our customer.
 
So, now taking control of that, since we know our customer best in developing that product ends up being a win, win.
 
In that regard, we are value priced moderate businesses. We are not high end and we are not low end. We are in that sweet spot in the middle that I think serves us well in boom times, the Wal-Mart customer will trade up and in tough times, we'll get some of those specialty stores or department store customers trading down. And hopefully you've heard not just our brand leaders, you've heard a few of the other folks maybe in the hallway or whatever, we have, I believe, very very strong executive leadership teams at all of our brands as well as at  in our shared services.
 
We all have little tags on with the colors, you've seen most of them, I would invite you to join us for lunch out in the foyer, but also, please grab whoever it is that you're interested in talking to and no tough questions, but please make yourself available to everyone and thank you very much for your interest and your attendance today.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20121205161434.txt.gz
TIME:20121205161434
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
December 5, 2012
Date of Report (date of earliest event reported) 
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
 
(845) 369-4500
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On December 5, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release disclosing material non-public information regarding its results of operations for its fiscal first quarter ended October 27, 2012. The Company also reaffirmed its earnings per diluted share guidance for its full fiscal year ending July 27, 2013. A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
 
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
Date: December 5, 2012
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
ascena retail group, Inc. reports
FIRST quarter 2013 results
 
 GAAP EPS $0.27; ADJUSTED EPS INCREASES 18% TO $0.39 
 COMPANY REAFFIRMS FISCAL 2013 EARNINGS GUIDANCE 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reported financial results for its fiscal first quarter ended October 27, 2012.
SUFFERN, NY  D
ecember
5, 2012 
(NASDAQ  ASNA)
 
Ascenas financial results for its fiscal first quarter ended October 27, 2012 reflect its acquisition of Charming Shoppes, Inc. (Charming) on June 14, 2012 (the Charming Acquisition). In connection with the Charming Acquisition, the Company has incurred certain non-recurring purchase accounting costs and certain other acquisition-related integration and restructuring costs during its first quarter of Fiscal 2013. In addition, the first quarter of Fiscal 2012 also included certain non-recurring costs. Management believes that all of such costs are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance. As such, adjusted results for the first quarter of Fiscal 2013, which exclude the effect of such acquisition-related costs and Fiscal 2012, have been presented to supplement the reported results for each period. Reference should be made to Note 2 to the unaudited consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this release for a reconciliation of adjusted, non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures.
 
Fiscal First Quarter Results
 
On a reported basis, income from continuing operations for the first quarter of Fiscal 2013 , representing a decrease to the year-ago quarters income from continuing operations of $47.5 million. Earnings per share from continuing operations for the first quarter of Fiscal 2013 share, compared to $0.30 of earnings per diluted share from continuing operations for the first quarter of Fiscal 2012. Including the discontinued operations of the newly acquired and businesses, which are intended to be disposed of,
was $46.2 million
decreased to $0.29 per diluted
Fashion Bug
Figis
net income for the first quarter of Fiscal 2013 was $43.1 million and earnings per diluted share were $0.27.
 
On an adjusted basis, income from continuing operations for the first quarter of Fiscal 2013 was $62.8 million, representing an increase to the year-ago quarters income from continuing operations of $51.7 million. Adjusted earnings per share from continuing operations for the first quarter of Fiscal 2013 increased to $0.39 per diluted share, compared to $0.33 of earnings per diluted share for the first quarter of Fiscal 2012.
 
years first quarter on a reported basis. Such increase was largely driven by the inclusion of sales from the newly acquired and businesses, along with a 9% increase in sales from the Companys legacy family of brands. Consolidated include e-commerce sales results, increased by 1% for the period, led by and each at 4%. E-commerce sales increased by 156% to $83 million on a consolidated basis, and 42% on a comparable basis. On a combined basis, comparable store and e-commerce sales increased by 4%. The Companys comparable store and e-commerce sales data for the first fiscal quarter is summarized below:
Net sales for the first quarter of Fiscal 2013 increased 48% to $1.138 billion, compared to $768 million for last
Lane Bryant
Catherines
comparable store sales, which include stores open for at least one year but do not
Justice
Catherines
 
 
 
 
*Comparable store sales for and include sales for all stores that were open in both that period and the comparative period in the prior year.
Lane Bryant
Catherines
 
On a reported basis, gross margin for the first quarter of Fiscal 2013 increased to sales, compared to $439.8 million, or 57.2% of sales last yearof sales. The gross margin improvement of 220 basis points on an adjusted basis was primarily due to stronger margin performance at , , and , whereas reported lower margins due to increased promotional activity.
$655.6
million, or 57.6% of
. Gross margin on a reported basis for Fiscal 2013 includes an approximate $20 million non-recurring purchase accounting cost resulting from adjusting the acquired inventory of Charming to fair value as of the date of the acquisition. On an adjusted basis, excluding such cost, gross margin for the first quarter of Fiscal 2013 was $675.5 million, or 59.4%
maurices
Lane Bryant
dressbarn
Catherines
Justice
 
were $205.8 million, or 18.1% of sales, compared to $126.3 million, or 16.4The 170 basis point increase was primarily due to a change in store location mix, as higher mall-based mix of stores has higher store occupancy costs as a percentage of sales.
On a reported basis, buying, distribution and occupancy (BD&O) costs for the first quarter of Fiscal 2013
% of sales last year.
Lane Bryants
 
quarter of Fiscal 2013 were $339.3 million, or 29.8% of sales, compared to $212.9 million, or 27.7% of sales last year.
On a reported basis, selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the first
The 210 basis point increase is largely due to the current, overlapping corporate overhead structure relating to the Charming Acquisition, which is expected to be significantly scaled back over the next couple of years.
 
2013 decreased to sales, compared to $76.5 million, or 10.0% of sales last year
On a reported basis, operating income for the first quarter of Fiscal
$72.9
million, or 6.4% of
. However, on an adjusted basis, operating income for Fiscal 2013 increased to $99.2 million, or 8.7% of sales. The decrease in operating income as a percent of sales on an adjusted basis was due largely to the initial increase in SG&A associated with the Charming Acquisition.
 
Fiscal First Quarter Balance Sheet Highlights
 
The Company ended the first quarter of Fiscal 2013 with cash and investments of $136.9 million and total debt of $304.7 million, compared to $168.9 million of cash and investments and $326.6 million of debt at the end of Fiscal 2012.
 
 
 
Commentary
 
David Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented, We are pleased to have begun the fiscal year with a strong quarter. We exceeded our financial and operational plan and made good progress with respect to the integration of our most recent strategic acquisition. We remain confident that the and brands will become important value drivers for our shareholders over the long-term.
Lane Bryant
Catherines
 
Mr. Jaffe continued, While we remain generally optimistic, the bulk of the Holiday retail season remains in front of us. Also during the upcoming weeks, we look forward to additional clarity regarding the current fiscal and macroeconomic uncertainty that could affect consumers in the coming year. At present, we remain comfortable with our previously issued guidance for the full year and look forward to updating our view of the business following the holiday season.
 
Mr. Jaffe concluded, We are confident that we have positioned our business well and that our unique combination of fashion and value will continue to resonate with a wide range of consumers. Over the coming quarters, we are excited to make steady progress on a variety of initiatives to fully integrate our brands, streamline their common infrastructure, and develop operational and financial synergies.
 
Reaffirms Fiscal July 2013 Earnings Guidance
 
The Company reaffirms guidance for adjusted earnings per diluted share from continuing operations for the fiscal year ending July 2013 in the range of $1.45 to $1.55, excluding one-time, acquisition-related integration, restructuring and purchase accounting costs that may be incurred related to the Charming Acquisition. This estimate is based upon various assumptions, including a mid-single digit increase in consolidated comparable store sales. The Company plans to open approximately 180 to 200 stores and close 100 to 120 stores, ending the fiscal year with approximately 3,900 and stores in operation and achieving approximately $5 billion in net sales.
Justice, Lane Bryant, maurices, dressbarn
Catherines
 
Conference Call Information
 
The Company will conduct a conference call today, December 5, 2012, at 4:30 PM Eastern Time to review its first quarter Fiscal 2013 results, followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (617) 786-2960 prior to the start time, the passcode is 56524226. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at . A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until January 5, 2013 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 92576667.
www.ascenaretail.com
 
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: ASNA) is a leading specialty retailer offering clothing, shoes, and accessories for missy and plus-size women and tween girls, under the , , , and brands. Ascena Retail Group, Inc. operates through its subsidiaries approximately 3,800 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada. 
Justice
Lane Bryant
maurices
dressbarn
Catherines
 
For more information about Ascena Retail Group, Inc. and its brands, visit , , , , , , , , and . 
www.ascenaretail.com
www.charmingshoppes.com
www.shopjustice.com
www.lanebryant.com
www.maurices.com
www.dressbarn.com
www.catherines.com
www.cacique.com
www.figis.com
www.figisgallery.com
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available in the Companys most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended July 28, 2012.
 
        Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
CONTACT:
Investor Relations
(845) 369-4600
 
ICR, Inc.
James Palczynski
Senior Managing Director
(203) 682-8229
jp@icrinc.com
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
See accompanying notes.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Segment Information (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
  
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (Unaudited)
 
Note 1. Basis of Presentation
 
Discontinued Operations
 
In connection with the Charming Acquisition, certain acquired businesses have been classified as a component of discontinued operations within the consolidated financial statements.
 
In particular, the Company announced, contemporaneously with the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, its intent to cease operating the acquired business. The business, consisting of approximately 600 retail stores, is expected to be closed down by early in calendar-year 2013 through an orderly liquidation of the related net assets.
Fashion Bug
Fashion Bug
 
In addition, the Company also announced, contemporaneously with the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, its intent to sell the acquired business. The business, which markets food and specialty gift products, is expected to be sold by the one-year anniversary date of the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes.
Figis
Figis
 
Given the Companys intent to exit both of those businesses, they have been appropriately classified as discontinued operations within the unaudited consolidated financial statements. As such, assets and liabilities relating to discontinued operations have been segregated and separately disclosed in the balance sheet as of the end of each period. In turn, operating results for those businesses have also been segregated and reported separately in the statement of operations for Fiscal 2013.
 
Buying, Distribution and Occupancy Costs Reclassification
 
Historically, the Company included buying, distribution and occupancy costs within cost of goods sold on the face of its statements of operations. However, in the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012, in connection with conforming the financial presentation of Charming Shoppes, the Company decided to present each of the aggregate of buying, distribution and occupancy costs and gross margin separately on the face of its statements of operations. In addition, certain costs, such as store utility costs, were reclassified from selling, general and administrative expenses to buying, distribution and occupancy costs. Financial information for all prior periods has been reclassified in order to conform to the current periods presentation. There have been no changes in historical operating income or historical net income for any period as a result of these changes.
 
Common Stock Split
 
On April 3, 2012, the Company issued a two-for-one common stock split, effected in the form of a 100% stock dividend. All common share and earnings per share data presented in the attached unaudited consolidated financial statements has been adjusted to reflect the stock split.
 
Other
Reclassifications
 
Certain other immaterial reclassifications also have been made to the prior periods financial information in order to conform to the current periods presentation.
 
 
 
Note 2. Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
To provide investors information to assist them in assessing the Companys ongoing operations on a comparable basis, the Company has provided Fiscal 2013 financial measures in this press release that exclude the effects of certain non-recurring purchase accounting costs and certain other acquisition-related, integration and restructuring costs relating to the Charming Acquisition. In addition, Fiscal 2012 also included certain non-recurring costs. Management believes that all of such costs are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance. Throughout this release, the term reported refers to information prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States (GAAP), while the term adjusted refers to non-GAAP financial information adjusted to exclude such costs. All information below is presented for the Companys continuing operations.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Gross margin:
 
Operating income:
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20121206164329.txt.gz
TIME:20121206164329
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
December 5, 2012 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
  
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On December 5, 2012, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an investor conference call to discuss the Companys results of operations for its fiscal first quarter ended October 27, 2012 and certain other information, including the contents of the Companys press release dated December 5, 2012 which was furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 8-K on December 5, 2012. The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference. A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
Date: December 6, 2012
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS
EDITED TRANSCRIPT
ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
EVENT DATE/TIME: DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT
 
OVERVIEW:
Co. reported 1Q13 total net sales of $1.1b and adjusted net income from continuing operations of $63m or $0.39 per diluted share. Expects FY13 adjusted EPS excluding one-time acquisition and integration cost along with purchase accounting adjustments to be $1.45-1.55.
 
 
 
  
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
  
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
Allison Townsend
ICR - IR
David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
Armand Correia
Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
Anna Andreeva
FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
Brian Tunick
JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
Mark Montagna
Avondale Partners - Analyst
Oliver Chen
Citigroup - Analyst
Scott Krasik
BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
Alex Fuhrman
Piper Jaffray - Analyst
Janine Stichter
Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst
Edward Yruma
KeyBanc Capital Markets  Analyst
  
PRESENTATION
 
 
Good afternoon my name is Keith, and I'll be your conference operator today. At this time, I would like to welcome everyone to be Ascena Retail Group's first-quarter earnings conference call. And I would now like to introduce Allison Townsend of ICR. Ms. Townsend, please begin.
 
 
Thank you, Keith, and good afternoon, everyone. Today's call is being recorded, and will be available for replay later today. Information on accessing this replay is available in today's press release.
 
As a matter of formality, we would like to remind participants that remarks made by management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause the actual results and implementation of the Company's plans to vary materially. These risks and uncertainties are referenced in today's press release, as well as in the Company's most recently filed Forms 10-K and 10 Q. Finally, in these remarks, we refer to adjusted earnings, which is a non-GAAP financial measure. A reconciliation of the non-GAAP measures we discuss today to GAAP measures are included in today's press release. I would now like to turn the conference call over to your host, Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO. David?
 
 
Thanks, Allison. Good afternoon, and thank you for joining us to discuss the results of our fiscal first quarter. With me today is Armand Correia, our CFO.
 
We are pleased to have begun the year with a strong first quarter. Our adjusted EPS grew 18% to $0.39, compared to adjusted EPS of $0.33 per share in the prior-year quarter. First-quarter sales increased 48% to $1.1 billion, driven by the acquisition of our Lane Bryant and Catherine's brands, with consolidated comp sales increasing 1%. We are very pleased with our operating and financial results in the first quarter, and we are coming into the second quarter with good momentum. While the environment has been a little soft, we are well-positioned for the holiday season. As we move through the fiscal year, we expect to deliver results that show continued organic growth and benefits from the Charming Shoppes acquisition. We are also focused on integration. While the major projects are longer-term, we've gotten those underway, and there are smaller projects that will happen sooner.
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
Now, I'd like to walk you through each of our brands in a little detail. We are very pleased with Justice, which is performing well. Sales in the first quarter were up 12%, with comps up 4%. We continue to deliver trend-right merchandise assortments at compelling values. Transactions were up 3%, and we saw 1% increase in dollars per transaction. I'm also pleased to note that e-commerce grew 30%. From a regional perspective, all regions delivered positive comps with the Southeast and Southwest delivering the strongest growth. We are also pleased to see how our new Canadian store is continuing to perform above plan. With regards to specific categories, active tops and casual bottoms continues to be standouts. Our marketing strategy at Justice reinforces our value proposition, with the right balance of 40% discounts offered to our customers through direct mail, e-mail, customer loyalty programs, and also storewide point-of-sale events. Comps in the first quarter were driven by a very successful back-to-school season. Additionally, the introduction of a new promo, take an additional 20% off, was very successful in driving business during Columbus Day. We were very pleased with the customers' response to the promotion and the sales lift, and the inventory unit velocity that generated.
 
Justice executed for four 40%-off entire store POS events, the same as last year, with 33 additional POS days during the quarter. These events were supplemented by an 8% increase in circulation of direct mail catazines, which included three catazine mailings, similar to last year, and one incremental postcard mailing. For the second quarter, we've added 16 POS days compared to last year's second quarter, which will include three POS events similar to last year, four catazines, which is one less than last year, and two postcards, the same as last year. During the first quarter, we opened 20 Justice stores, including three in Canada, and closed one store, ending the quarter with 961 stores versus 917 last year. In the second quarter, we plan to open approximately 14 stores, including two stores in Canada, and to close 19. We typically close the most stores after the holidays.
 
I would also like to note that we've added Brothers to 15 of our stores as of the end of the first quarter, and to an additional 15 stores in the month of November. The results from these stores have been encouraging, and we are planning to roll Brothers out to an additional 30 stores in the spring. Justice's positive trend continued in the second quarter, and we ran a three-day take an additional 20% off event over the Veterans Day weekend, to great success. We also used this promotion on Black Friday, and had the biggest date in our history, providing a great start to the holiday season. Similar promotions used in the e-commerce channel were also very successful. We have several promotions slated for the remainder of December to draw in customers, and a new floor set to entice them, once they're in the store. In general, we are very pleased with the continued strengthening of the Justice brand and future growth opportunities.
 
Lane Bryant ended the first quarter with sales up 1%. The increase was driven by new store growth and a 41% growth in e-commerce sales. This was offset by a comp decrease of 4%, primarily due to soft traffic. While the comp was down in each region, we saw relative strength outside of the Midwest and mid-Atlantic. With regard to specific categories, our selection of active, separates, woven tops, and denim separates performed well for the quarter, with sweaters, jewelry, and premium denim down versus last year.
 
First-quarter marketing initiatives involved a variety of strategies. We had four mailers, one less than last year, with overall mailing quantities down 22%. For the second quarter, we will have eight mailers, one incremental versus last year, with a 5% planned increase in quantities and one gift with purchase, which is new this year. I would also like to note that the penetration on our private label credit card has increased to 42%, the strongest number for any of our concepts. The Lane Bryant store count is 815 locations at the end of the quarter, versus 821 stores last year. During the quarter, we opened 19 new stores and closed nine stores. Two new store openings and 17 store closings are planned for the second quarter. Sales trends have been soft in November, as a result of decreases in traffic each of the weeks. We continue to manage our business conservatively, with inventories well-controlled and down on a comparable basis. We will be carefully monitoring the holiday sales by looking towards one of our new promotions that starts today, the 12 Days of Christmas, with different offers daily to help drive both traffic and transactions. While we are certainly in certainly in the learning mode, the opportunities we are seeing with Lane Bryant continue to be very encouraging. We are continuing our search for a new President, and are hopeful that we will have someone in place early in the new year.
 
Turning now to Maurice's, we had a strong first quarter. Sales grew 11%, with a 3% comp gain. A 4% increase in conversion, coupled with a 4% increase in average dollar sales was partially offset by a 5% decrease in traffic. This gives us confidence that we have the merchandise assortment our customers want. Comp store sales increased in most regions, led by a 4% increase in the Midwest. New stores and 61% growth in e-commerce sales helped drive the total sales increase in the quarter. With respect to categories, many of our women's apparel departments posted increases.
 
Our first-quarter marketing initiatives involve a variety of strategies. We had three mailers, one incremental versus last year, which was specifically targeted to the plus customer, with overall mailing quantities down 3%. For the second quarter, we will have two mailers, similar to last year, with a 13% planned decrease in quantities. I'd also like to note that our Take 10 loyalty program, now a year old, has helped to substantially increase the size of our e-mail database to 2.2 million. Additionally, the penetration of our private label credit card has increased to approximately 38%. Our store base is now 840 locations at the end of the quarter, versus 797 stores last year. During the first quarter, we opened nine new stores, including one in Canada, and closed one store. 13 new store openings, including an additional four Canadian stores and four store closings, are planned for the second quarter. Maurice's had a solid November and Black Friday weekend, and we are optimistic that we have the right fashion and a competitive promotional plan for the balance of the holiday season.
 
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 Our dressbarn brand had a solid quarter. Sales were up 3%, including a 1% increase in comps, which was driven by a 3% increase in transactions, partially offset by a decrease in average dollars per transaction. Comp store sales increased in most regions, with strength in the Southwest and West Coast offsetting softness in the Northwest and Midwest. We were pleased to see e-commerce continue its impressive growth, with an increase of 88% for the quarter. We saw strength in career knits, dresses, and casual bottoms.
 
We continued to use a variety of marketing tools for the first quarter, which helped to drive sales. Dressbarn continues to refine its customer targeting, which allowed us to decrease total mail quantities by 6% versus last year, while maintaining sales and traffic. We had three mailings and two gift with purchase promos, the same as last year. Our electronic BlushPERKS loyalty program continues to grow, and has enrolled approximately 2.8 million customers in the first 10 months of the program. We increased the frequency of e-mails sent by 35%, and our e-mail database of 3.1 million is 43% larger than last year. For the second quarter, we're anniversarying three direct mail pieces with a slight decrease in planned quantities, as we further refine our customer targeting, and maintain two gift with purchase promotions, consistent with last year. Finally, our private label credit card market share is now at 32% of sales. At dressbarn, our store base is 840 locations as of the end of the quarter, versus 836 last year. During the first quarter, we opened 16 and closed three. For the second quarter, we plan to open one and close 10 stores. November was a challenging month due the impact of severe weather in the Northeast during the first two weeks of the month, in addition to product misses in our key sweater category. Sweaters is having a difficult season, and we've added additional promos and markdowns to clear through the fall inventory, and we continue to evaluate our promotional opportunities for the remainder of the holiday selling season.
 
At Catherine's, sales grew 2% in the first quarter with comp sales up 4%. Comp store sales increased in all regions except for the Southeast, which was flat, but was led by strong business in the Northwest. We also benefited from a 24% growth in e-commerce sales. Merchandise categories that performed well for the quarter include knits, sweaters, and casual wovens. First-quarter marketing initiatives include nine mailers, the same as last year, with mailing quantities up 2%. For the second quarter, we will have 8 mailers, in line with last year, with a 4% planned decrease in quantities. The penetration of our private label credit card has increased to 41%. The Catherine's store count is at 417 locations at the end of the quarter versus 444 stores last year. During the first quarter, we closed five stores. 16 store closings are planned for the second quarter. We are pleased with our continued positive sales trends, and are optimistic that these will be maintained through the holiday season. Customers continue to respond positively to Catherine's merchandise offerings, particularly improvements in the fashion assortments, and tops and bottoms.
 
In summary, after a solid first quarter, our brands have positioned their inventories conservatively for the holiday season, due to concerns about the strength of consumer spending, while also having contingencies in place to maximize business. At the same time, our shared service group has been diligent in reducing our duplicative overhead structure, and continues to work to realize synergies. We are on track with these efforts, and will update you on our progress on future calls. Thank you, now I would like to turn the call over to Armand.
 
 
Thank you, David, and good afternoon, everyone. Before we review our first-quarter results, it is important to note that this year's quarterly earnings include certain costs related to the acquisition of Charming Shoppes. The Company believes these costs are not indicative of ongoing operations for period-to-period comparisons. This year's results, discussed on this call, are adjusted to exclude these items. In addition, our comments on last year's quarterly financial results have been adjusted to include Lane Bryant, Catherine's, and Charming Shoppes' corporate overhead cost, for pro forma comparison purposes.
 
Total quarterly net sales increased to $1.1 billion. Adjusted last year's reported sales to include Lane Bryant and Catherine's, year-over-year sales increased 7%. Comp store sales increased 1%, coming in below expectations and primarily traffic-related. This represents the 15th consecutive quarter of comp sales increases. Average dollar sale was up 2.5%, with selling AUR up 5%, while UPTs were down 2.5%. On the other hand, our e-commerce business continues to be strong and well ahead of expectations, increasing 42% year-over-year to $83 million.
 
Moving down the income statement, adjusted gross margin dollars, excluding the impact of purchase accounting of approximately $20 million, grew to $676 million, and a rate of 59.4% of sales. This compares to last year's adjusted quarterly of $612 million or 57.7%, including Lane Bryant and Catherine's. The dollar increase of 10%, and a 170 basis points rate improvement year-over-year was primarily due to higher realized markup from the tailwinds of lower product costs, in addition to a $6 million favorable markdown reserve carried into the quarter. As to buying, occupancy and distribution costs, they came in at $206 million or 18.1% of sales, pretty much in line with last year as a percentage of sales, with Lane Bryant and Catherine's included.
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
 
 
Adjusted SG&A was $333 million, or 29.3% of sales. This excludes approximately $6 million in acquisition and integration costs, and compares to last year's adjusted $300 million, or 28.3% of sales, to include Lane Bryant, Catherine's, and Charming Shoppes' corporate overhead costs. The rate increase of 100 basis points was due to deleverage below our comp sales tipping point of approximately 3.5%, along with the added corporate overhead costs from combining both shared service groups. We remain confident that we can drive down our tipping point over the next few years, as we complete a number of ongoing strategic projects, as well as reducing the combined corporate overhead costs through a number of integration initiatives already underway.
 
Operating income from continuing operations on an adjusted basis increased 18% to $99 million, or 8.7% of sales. This again excludes the effect of purchase accounting adjustments and the acquisition costs related, and compares to an adjusted $84 million or 7.9% of sales last year. Let's now review our brands' operating income performance, which is net of fully allocated corporate overhead, and excludes the impact of the one-time items previously mentioned. Justice led the way, with operating income increasing to $56 million or 15.7% of sales. This compares to $54 million or 16.8% of sales last year. Lane Bryant had an operating loss of $2 million, compared to an operating income of $1 million last year. This year's results were also impacted by increased allocation of combined corporate overhead costs, and excludes the $15 million in purchase accounting adjustments.
 
Maurice's operating income increased 23% to $30 million or 13.2% of sales, compared to $24 million or 11.9% of sales last year. This was driven by gross margin increases. Dressbarn's operating income increased to $9 million or 3.6% of sales, compared to $5 million or 2% of sales last year. The increase was also driven primarily by gross margin. Catherine's operating income increased to $6 million or 8.3% of sales, compared to last year's $1 million operating loss. This increase was due to the $6 million favorable markdown reserve carried into the quarter.
 
Moving on, the Company's effective income tax rate for the first quarter was 32.5%, and compares to 38.5% last year. This year's rate was favorably impacted from the resolution of various income tax matters that added approximately $0.04 to earnings per share. For modeling purposes, a 37.5% rate is more appropriate going forward. Adjusted net income from continuing operations increased 21% to $63 million, or $0.39 per diluted share. This compares to last year's adjusted net income of $52 million or $0.33 per diluted share.
 
Now, turning to the balance sheet, we ended the quarter with $137 million in cash and cash equivalents. Of this amount, approximately $115 million is overseas. Long-term debt ending the quarter was $305 million, which included approximately $300 million outstanding under our term loan, which is currently at $285 million, following a $15 million prepayment, and no outstanding debt currently under our $250 million revolver. During the beginning of the second quarter, we have further reduced our long-term debt by paying off an $8 million mortgage on our Greencastle, Indiana distribution facility. In the near-term, we will be using excess cash to pay down debt.
 
Our inventory levels ending the quarter reflected continued strong inventory management, and we are pleased and well-positioned beginning our second quarter. Total inventories at cost was $604 million, down 4% versus a year ago's $628 million, which includes Lane Bryant and Catherine's. Inventory per average store was down a similar percentage year-over-year. CapEx for the quarter was approximately $16 million for new store additions, store remodels, and technology projects. The fiscal 2013 CapEx spend is planned at $325 million. That includes approximately $130 million for the following two major projects  the expansion of our Columbus, Ohio distribution facility, to process merchandise shipments to all our stores; and last, the retrofit of our Greencastle, Indiana distribution facility to bring e-commerce fulfillment in-house to handle all brands. All in all, we were pleased with our above-planned earnings results for the quarter, that were driven by increased gross margins.
 
Looking ahead to our second-quarter holiday season, we remain cautiously optimistic that we can deliver to our plan, despite some impact on our business in the Northeast regions from Hurricane Sandy during the first two weeks of November. This primarily impacted our dressbarn brand, due to its concentration of stores, and has required more aggressive promotions to clear excess inventory from lost sales. We estimate Sandy's impact on lost sales for November to be approximately $12 million or 3% on our monthly comp sales, with most of this impacting our dressbarn brand.
 
At this time, we are reaffirming our fiscal 2013 adjusted earnings-per-share guidance, in the range of $1.45 to $1.55, excluding one-time acquisition and integration costs, along with purchase accounting adjustments. This estimate is based upon various assumptions, including achieving mid single-digit increases in comp sales and store openings of approximately 200, with store closings of approximately 100. We will reevaluate this guidance following the upcoming holiday season and plan to issue holiday sales results in the beginning of January. Thank you. Operator, we will now accept questions.
 
 
 
Exhibit 99.1
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
 
(Operator Instructions)
 
Your first question is from the line of Anna Andreeva with FBR Capital Markets. Please go ahead.
 
 
I was hoping you could perhaps talk about the quarter-to-date trends and thanks for quantifying the impact from Sandy, but have you seen improvements in the business I guess post-Sandy into December? And it sounded like, by division, you are very pleased with Justice and Catherine's, a little bit less so and Maurice's, a little bit less so obviously with dressbarn, if you can maybe talk about that? My second question was about Lane Bryant, just maybe a little bit more color, what happened during the quarter with the negative 4% comps? I think you talked about the difficult traffic trends out there. Is this something that is self-inflicted with some of the fashion misses? Maybe just a little bit more color, there.
 
 
Sure, Anna, let me start off by saying the holiday season has got a lot of green in front of us. Hopefully, it will be a very strong holiday season for us and for the industry. I think there is a lot of noise in the numbers. So, we're not really going to provide any color on just the timing of this call, being just the first week or so after Cyber Monday.
 
It is just, as I think I said on my last call, it's a little choppy out there, and given whether it's the severe weather in early November, some of the uncertainty going on now with the fiscal cliff, the sales that may have been brought forward by Black Friday and Cyber Monday, the fact that we have an extra weekend for Christmas. I don't think it is indicative to throw numbers out. So, we will just hold off giving any more color on this limited time period, and try and wrap it all together after the holidays. Down at the ICR conference, we will be able to give a lot more color after the fact, rather than trying give a data point now that may not really be indicative of how the season is going to play out. I'm sure you understand.
 
 
Okay. Okay, great. And on Lane Bryant?
 
 
Lane Bryant is, first and foremost, struggling with sales or with traffic, which is impacting sales directly just because, all things being equal, you're just getting less footsteps in there. So, certainly, we have opportunities in our marketing campaigns, and I touched on some of that. And we have a new woman that has come in less than a year ago, that's rethinking all of our marketing approaches, and the rebranding you may have seen with the new Lane Bryant logo is just the start. So, while there were certainly some misses in certain product categories, no question, sweaters also here were pretty tough. Knits weren't great. It seems to me that there were a couple of issues, not just the traffic and the merchandise together, led to disappointing results, and as I mentioned, we are watching that very carefully, and making sure that we don't get backed up on inventory and this new promo, the 12 days of Christmas, we're pretty excited about, and we will be watching that carefully.
 
 
Okay, great. Thanks so much, good luck.
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
Operator
 
Your next question is from the line of Brian Tunick with JPMorgan. Please go ahead.
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Thanks, congrats. Two questions, I guess, first as we try to think about the current quarter, and we try to think about maybe the gross margin puts and takes, any thoughts on A, do you have another markdown reserve that you're carrying into this quarter? And what are your views of how much you think the sourcing benefits will help you? And if you could give us maybe last year's gross margin rate from Q2, to try to think that through? And then secondarily, just trying to think through that Justice, the segment margin pressure here. Was there anything you were seeing from Target or Walmart or JCPenney as we moved through Black Friday? I mean, what caused you to think about adding the additional 20% off, and I've seen more pressure from pricing from those big competitors?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, let me start and Armand can jump in. I'll start first with justice. No, as you may know, Bryan, we've continued to take market share. Justice is now the number-one player in this 7 to 12-year-old girls' market. So, we feel really, really good about how this brand is performing. They are really doing a great job down there, and very impressed with how they continue to build the brand, and, they are operating as they see fit, not in response to any the other retailers, whether it is big box, small box, what have you.
 
So the whole idea of the incremental 20% off internally, we're calling it a flash sale, is just a way to create a little bit more excitement, maybe get a little bit more action and maybe some new customers, perhaps, that said oh my gosh, look at this, it's an extra 20% off today only, let's try it, and it really drove volume. So, while the gross margin was down because of the incremental markdowns, the gross margin dollars was way up. So, as you heard me say, we did it a few times in the fall and very pleased with the results. We will see, as we digest the results for the rest of the season, if we have pulled any business forward, and also as we do it on e-commerce, we will be able to understand it a lot better. But, right now, I would say that the initial results were extremely favorable, very pleased with how it drove volume, and therefore further market share gains, we believe. So, we will wait and see when the dust settles.
 
Secondly, going back to your first question, we really haven't seen the sourcing benefit, yet. So, while we have the vast majority of our stores seeing at Justice and Lane Bryant and Catherine's being done through our own vertical model, not the case with dressbarn and Maurice's. And although we are building that capability, dressbarn is still very, very small, kind of a rounding error, and Maurice's is a little further ahead, but not much. So, I don't think we would credit any sourcing benefit to margin. There's probably a little bit of carryover from the high cost of comp last year, that we are still seeing play out in the second quarter. And in general, while we have these contingencies, and we certainly are going to be carefully monitoring our inventory levels over the next three or four weeks, right now, there is no reason to expect, with the exception of Justice, which I just talked about, that our margins would be significantly lower than last year. Armand, do you want to add any color to that?
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Yes, just to add a little color, I think coming into the second quarter, I believe there was margin opportunity from reduced cotton costs. But, again, at this point, given some of the uncertainty going on, I am not as confident at this point in time.
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
And can you give us the gross margin rate from last year's second quarter as a base?
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
On a pro forma basis, Brian, and again this includes Lane Bryant and Catherine's, last year's second quarter gross margin rate was 53.3%.
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Terrific, thanks so much, and good luck for the holiday.
Operator
 
Your next question is from the line Mark Montagna with Avondale Partners. Please go ahead.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Just a question about retail prices. You had mentioned in the past that you had taken retail prices up across-the-board. Is that just the legacy brands, and if so, when was that, and then how much was that increase?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
So, Mark, if I just look at average unit retail, which is what we call our ticket price,.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Yes.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We saw an increase across all our brands in the first quarter. So, it varies from a negligible to maybe 5%, and if you want more detail we can give it to you. The interesting thing is that, when you look at it on an average selling price basis, again, depending on the brand, we were able to maintain, in some cases, even increase that delta. So, the average selling price is the out-the-door price so we were pleased in our markdown control, which in all but the Justice case was pretty much flat or down to last year.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay, because what I'm trying to understand is, I think when you had your investor day in October, you had mentioned across-the-board prices. I'm trying to understand if that was taken last spring? Just so I understand when we start to anniversary stuff like that. And the magnitude was low single digits.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes, it is certainly winding down. I'm not sure you're going to see much of an increase for the second quarter.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay. And then second question, last question.
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
The other part Mark, that you've got to be clear on and what we are reporting is the total AUR for all categories. Really if we want to drill on it, much of this increase in many cases is due to merchandise mix, not due to prices going up. So, I'm giving you the global, and if you want, call Armand back later, and he can really drill on it with you to get you an understanding of how much was price increase and how much was merchandising mix. In general, I would say it's a combination.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay. And then just lastly, just digging into the additional 20% off at Justice. Was that the sole reason for the gross margin going down at Justice?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Not the sole reason, but the majority of the reason. As I mentioned, we did more point-of-sale days. So, if you look at the number of days, or you look at the  maybe a better way to look at it, number of transactions that were done with this 40%-off handle, it went up. So, I think it is now  I don't have it at my fingertips, but I think it was about 96% of our transactions were at the 40% off. So, when you think of it that way, if it were around 90% last year, again, I'm sorry, I don't have the numbers in front of me, but order of magnitude, you're close, that increase would obviously increase your markdown rate. So you've got both that, as well as the flash sales.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay, so do you think the plan going forward is to keep distorting around key traffic periods at that 20%. Because to me, I view that as a potential slippery slope, and I would hate to see you see Justice becoming the Joseph Bank of kids' retail.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, it's always a good call out and I think that we are going to study this very carefully. The numbers were very impressive, and while I don't want to say that we're going to do this or do that, because right now, it hasn't been formulated for spring, it was a very successful strategy, and while it is a slippery slope, it did create incremental volume.
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay. All right, that sounds good. Thank you.
Operator
 
Your next question is from the line of Oliver Chen with Citibank. Please go ahead.
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Regarding your comments around the environment being soft, and your decision to reaffirm your MSD comp, why  it sounded like traffic came in a little bit lighter than you expected. So, are you expecting other comp levers to offset what happened in Q1? And then secondly, your inventories look quite attractive at that negative 4% on an adjusted basis, what do you think is going to trend going forward? One of your earlier comments was potential over-inventoried on the sweater side. And our final question is, can you elaborate on how you may evaluate promotional opportunities? How should we think about that comment? Thanks a lot.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Sure, so, again, I'll try and go in reverse. The promos are already established for the season, and we have, in our pockets, additional promos if they become necessary. So, depending on the brand, depending on the situation, it may be a very focused promo, or it may be a broader-based promo. I think we feel pretty good about our plan right now, and I think it's just a prudent business to have a backup plan or Plan B in case things stay soft, for competitive reasons or just through economic reasons.
 
So, going back to your first question, we can't let ourselves allow inventory to get out of control. And the issue with the sweaters was really at dressbarn, a little bit at Lane Bryant, and we were very aggressive in doing what we needed to do to hit those very hard, to get the unit velocity, which enabled us to bring the inventories back under control, and those are things that each brand spends a lot of time monitoring, so we don't wake up in January with more inventory or more old prior-season inventory than we want, and that's a key that goes hand-in-hand, I said, with the promos.
 
Your first comment was about other levers that we have to drive the business, and clearly, if I understood the question correctly, it really ties back to your last question about promos. That is really the best lever we have at this time. You can always do some more marketing. Certain types of marketing, like e-mails or mobile text, or what have you, it is much harder once you're in December to do, say, a direct mail piece, because it is too late, just based on the lead time. So, I hope I covered everything, if not, ask a clarifying question for me.
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Just a follow-up, thank you, that is extremely helpful. Regarding sweaters, do you think it was in relation to weather or specific product choices, or the category, in terms of the difficult nature of the season? I know weather has been a little bit mixed.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I really do think, even though we had sweater issues in several of our brands, I think it may have been at best a combination of weather and style, and at worst, it was primarily our own style issues. I think at the end of the day, if you have the right products, even if it is warm, the customer is going to want it. So, I think we've got to take the hit on this, at least to a large extent, that we didn't have the products she wanted. And unfortunately, this is a fashion business, and you're never going to get all of the categories right, and for dressbarn, sweaters happens to be a very important category. So, it was disappointing to have some misses in that area, as I mentioned, also with Lane Bryant. But we learned a lot, and certainly we will be back next year.
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Great, sounds good. Good luck, thanks.
Operator
 
Your next question is from the line of Scott Krasik with BB&T. Please go ahead.
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Just a question on, or a couple, but you look at December, and I think you comped up 12% in December. For the quarter last year was about 8% in the quarter. So, maybe talk about how you're thinking about the business and whether it's realistic to see improvement relative to the trends that you've been on ex-Sandy?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, I think my comment earlier to Anna about the holidays sales is pertinent here as well. We are up against big numbers. We think that it's going to be a challenging holiday season, and I've been at dressbarn for 21 Christmases, and I think I have said the same thing every holiday season. So, let's wait and see. We are optimistic. We feel good about our inventory. We feel good about our marketing, and at this point, as I tell everybody around here, it's nail-biting season, because everything is it done and in place and these last whatever, 2.5 weeks we have left, we just have to hope we have the good weather and the consumer confidence to come in and shop.
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
And then in regards to the 20 flash sales, did you see really a transference of sales to those days? Did you beat your plan meaningfully at Justice? It seems like it was probably in line.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
As I said earlier, we believe, based on the analysis we've done, that we created incremental sales by doing a flash sale. So, there can be a lot more analysis done and we're thinking a lot more about it, and we'll will see how the whole season plays out. But, the excitement of that event for that customer was tremendous. And the numbers that it generated were tremendous. So, it's very exciting for the Justice customer, and the Justice business. Certainly, we've done similar approaches in other brands, and haven't had the same impact, frankly. So, we're going to spend a lot of time studying and learning from it, and seeing where we go from here both for Justice, as well as seeing if there are learnings for the other brands.
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay, thanks, and just two quick on gross margin. One, are you thinking about the 40 basis points of gift card breakage in this Q2 margin last year?
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
That is correct.
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay, so that plus what you said about some of these promotions. Will gross margins see more pressure in Q2 than it did in Q1?
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Well, again, Scott, I'll repeat the answer to the question. I was more optimistic going into the quarter, and because we did have certain opportunities. I'm a little less cautious, and I don't think it's meaningful, that gift card breakage on the overall quarter.
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay, and then just do you have an inventory reserve included in the 59.4% Q1 gross margin? The inventory reserve reversal?
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Yes, we do.
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay, thanks very much.
Operator
 
Your next question is from the line of Alex Fuhrman with Piper Jaffray. Please go ahead.
Alex Fuhrman
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
You want to talk a little bit about the private label credit cards, and thank you for providing those metrics by the individual brand. I'd be curious as two how those rates have trended over the past year, just generally speaking, or if there are any big call-outs by brand. And as we think about the private-label credit card from a marketing perspective, is the new credit card customer, is that primarily a new customer to each of the brands, or is that more likely to be an existing core customer, who you get to cross-over into that credit card? And then as you look at the transaction data, is very substantial difference in either the purchasing frequency or the average ticket size that is done on that private-label credit card?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Okay, well, a lot of questions, there, Alex. First, the trend at all the brands has been up slightly over the last year. So, it continues to grow. Some a point or two, some little less, but it has been up. Armand can get you the specifics if you are interested in it. We are pleased the way this continues to grow, because these are your best customers. In many cases, the new cardholders are new to the brand, and in many cases, they are customers that want the open-to-buy that a private label credit card gives them.
 
So, it's a mix, and as we look out, we really see this as a great marketing opportunity, because these customers do spend more, because they are your best customers, and I forget the exact numbers and it varies by brand, but if you use rough numbers and said that 30% of your customers have private label cards, and they account for, or use your private label cards, and those transactions account for 40% of your business, that is the range that you will see, the pick-up that you get on a private label credit card. So, it's all good, and we've got lots of programs in place at all the brands, with the exception of Justice, which has a private label credit card, but it's not emphasized. It is a very small piece of their business.
Alex Fuhrman
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
Right, that is very helpful, thanks. Wondering if you could just touch very briefly on the sales trends for efforts that you have in place, to try and capture that Fashion Bug lost revenue. Obviously, I would imagine that Lane Bryant and Catherine's have been working on these plans ever since Charming decided to discontinue Fashion Bug, and probably dressbarn and Maurice's may be a little bit later to step up their efforts. Can you give us an update on what the brands are doing to market to the Fashion Bug customer?
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
At a high-level, it falls into a few different buckets. So, the first thing we've been able to do is enable the Fashion Bug private label credit card to be used at dressbarn and Maurice's, in addition to Lane Bryant and Catherine's. So, you can walk in and just use your Fashion Bug card. So when they go out, that Fashion Bug card has still got value. And second, because it's Fashion Bug customer who is getting her statement, with the store closed, we're going to be able to message them, whether it's inserts, whether it's e-mail, whether it's on-statement printing to go to a dressbarn or Maurice's or Catherine's or Lane Bryant.
 
And then, finally, we just put in a bag stuffer that offers them discounts at the four different brands. And we will be doing some other things, a little bit more aggressive as we get further down the road towards their closings, and also in markets where we have stores in the same market, complementary stores in the same market, we are looking at doing more store-level marketing with the other brands. So, it is very early in the game, but we've got a lot of ideas going. Those are a taste of some of them, and we are optimistic that we will be able to pull over about  we believe that we should be able to capture 10% of the sales, of those Fashion Bug sales. And, as you know, if we can pull over 10%, and that is incremental, about 37% or so of that drops to the bottom line.
Alex Fuhrman
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
Well, that's great, that's really helpful. And thanks, and good luck this holiday season.
Operator
 
Your next question is from the line of Janine Stichter with Telsey Advisory. Please go ahead.
Janine Stichter
- Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst
 
I was wondering if you could just talk a little bit about the cadence of sales throughout the quarter. It seems like things got off to a pretty good start in August, maybe slowed a little bit in September, and then, when you spoke at the analyst day, it seemed like they were pretty much in line with where you had wanted them to be, but it seems like maybe slowed in the last two weeks of October. So I was wondering if you could comment on that, and then it just any other commentary on accessories at dressbarn? It seems like for as good of a holiday season as you had last year, that's been the weak link, and could be a big opportunity for this holiday season.
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Sure, I will start again at the end there, accessories with dressbarn are doing okay. They're one of the stronger categories. Actually I'm looking here, it's one of our top three categories for the first quarter. So, we agree that is a great opportunity, and we'd love to see that continue to grow. One of the old adages in retail is that if a woman is feeling economic pressure and she can't afford to go out and buy a complete outfit, she will go out and buy some accessories or jewelry to accent and update the ones she's got. So, we would like to see that strength continue from the first quarter into the holiday season. And so, Armand?
Armand Correia
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
I will take the cadence, for the quarter on as far as sales are concerned. We came into the first quarter with a solid August performance, mid single-digit comp increases. September, obviously, was a challenging month. We believe weather, obviously, had a lot to do with that as well, and as we said on our recent investor call, September was indeed disappointing, and comps were negative low single digits. October came around, got a little bite of cool weather at the beginning of October and the first half of October, our comps have returned back to mid single-digit increases. However, as the month progressed towards the tail end of October, comps once again fell off. So that's giving you the cadence of the quarter.
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
Janine Stichter
- Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst
 
All right, great, thanks. That's really helpful.
Operator
 
Your next question is from the line of Edward Yruma with KeyBanc. Please go ahead.
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
I wanted to drill a little bit in the improvement in Maurice's operating margin. Do you think at this point you've stabilized the business and are on the road to margin improvement going forward, or was this just a quarter where things seemed to be a little bit better than maybe quarters past?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, I certainly would like to think the former than the latter. There is nothing working out there that we have concerns about. I think as we mentioned at the investor day, Maurice's is looking for a CMO, but the team there is doing a yeoman's job of keeping the business on track and on trend. So, we feel pretty good about what is going on there, and we just brought on a new divisional in our accessories area, which had been struggling. So, we are thrilled to have him on board, and we feel this business is performing nicely, and in a good place and no reason for us to think that there is anything that's going to change that.
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Got you, and sorry if I missed it earlier. Did you give an update on Brothers? I know this is one of the first Christmases where you had a reasonable number of stores. Maybe early learnings, and maybe if you would revisit your opening plan for next year?
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Sure, it was in my comments, and basically, I said we've got 30 stores open for holiday, and then we've got plans to open up another 30 stores in the spring. So, what we said is, our results so far have been encouraging, and we are going to continue with the roll-out.
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Got you, thanks so much.
Operator
 
(Operator Instructions)
 
Gentlemen, it looks like you have no other questions.
 
 
 
DECEMBER 05, 2012 / 09:30PM GMT, ASNA - Q1 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Earnings Conference Call
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
All right, well thank you everyone for your participation, appreciate your support. And I'd like to wish everyone a very happy holiday season, and we look forward to seeing you in January at ICR. Goodbye.
Operator
 
Ladies and gentlemen, that will conclude today's conference. Thank you very much for joining us, and you may now disconnect. Have a great day.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20121212203154.txt.gz
TIME:20121212203154
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the "Company") made a presentation at its 2012 Annual Meeting of Stockholders held on Tuesday, December 11, 2012. A copy of the slide presentation is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report.
The information furnished in Item 7.01 of this report on Form 8-K shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific release in such a filing.
Forward Looking Statements
This Current Report on Form 8-K contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available in the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Annual Shareholder Meeting December 11, 2012
 
2 Forward Looking Statements This presentation contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties, which may cause our actual results in future periods to differ materially from our forecasted results. Detailed information concerning those risks and uncertainties are readily available in our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q which have been filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. 2
 
3 Historical Financial Information Non-GAAP Financial Measures Where indicated, certain financial information herein has been presented on a non-GAAP basis. This basis adjusts for items that management believes are not indicative of the Company's underlying operating performance. Reference should be made to the Company's annual earnings releases for all periods for the nature of such adjustments and for a reconciliation of such non-GAAP measures to the Company's financial results prepared in accordance with GAAP. 3
 
4 Historical Financial Information Segment Results Our historical segment operating results for fiscal years 2011 and 2010 have been recasted to conform to our corporate overhead cost allocation methodology, effective at the beginning of Fiscal 2012. Reference should be made to our Current Report on Form 8-K dated December 16, 2011. 4
 
Annual Shareholders Meeting David Jaffe President & Chief Executive Officer
 
6 A Standout Year The acquisition and integration of Charming Another record year of financial results Store growth at our Brands Continued traction in e-commerce Synergies and leverage through our shared services Stock increase of 17%
 
7 Vision "Serve our shareholders and create value by becoming a family of leading retail concepts with $10 billion in sales and top tier profitability."
 
 
9 Current Structure Shared Services Group
 
10 Shared Services Organization Structure
 
Rolando de Aguiar EVP, CFO
 
12 Our Mission To enhance a tween's self-esteem by providing them the "hot-est" fashion and lifestyle products, in a fun environment all at a great value for mom!
 
13 Market Share 2011 1 0.114000000059605 2 0.108999997377396 3 0.101999998092651 4 7.80000016093254E-02 5 6.10000006854534E-02 6 4.89999987185001E-02 7 0.034000001847744 Tween girls 7-12 apparel market, 12 ME May 12, 11 Source  NPD Group Dotted line represents 2011 Market Share 2012 11.4% 10.9% 10.2% 7.8% 6.1% 4.9% 3.4% 2011 10.4% 10.7% 11.0% 7.9% 6.3% 5.0% 3.4% % Var 1.0% 0.2% (0.8%) (0.1%) (0.2%) (0.1%) Flat 100 bps 20 bps (80 bps) (10 bps) (20 bps) (10 bps)
 
14 FY12 Highlights 3rd consecutive year of record sales and operating income Increased marketing sales Active customer file growth Canadian market off to a strong start Strong e-commerce growth
 
15 FY12 Financials $M FY12 FY12 FY11 FY11 Fav/(Unfav)vs. LY Fav/(Unfav)vs. LY Comp Sales 8.2% 8.2% 7.8% 7.8% $ % Net Sales 1,307 1,150 157 13.7% Gross Margin 775 59.3% 672 58.4% 103 15.3% BD&O 204 15.6% 196 17.0% (8) 140 bps SG&A 356 27.2% 297 25.8% (59) (140 bps) EBITDA 215 16.4% 179 15.6% 36 20.1% OperatingIncome 173 13.2% 140 12.2% 33 23.6%
 
16 FY13 Strategic Initiatives Continue market domination in Hot-Est, Big-Est & Easy-Est Drive MMU$ E-commerce sales growth New store growth Expand dual-gender concept: Brothers
 
17 Growth Drivers Comp sales New stores E-commerce Brothers expansion
 
Anthony Romano President, Charming Shoppes
 
19 Our Mission Consistently provide our Guest fashionable outfits that fit her, make her look stylish and feel sexy, confident and happy.
 
20 Market Share 2011 1 0.101000003516674 2 5.29999993741512E-02 3 4.89999987185001E-02 4 4.50000017881393E-02 5 4.50000017881393E-02 6 2.80000008642673E-02 7 2.70000007003546E-02 Untitled 1 2.60000005364418E-02 Untitled 2 2.19999998807907E-02 Untitled 3 2.19999998807907E-02 Untitled 4 1.89999993890524E-02 Untitled 5 1.60000007599592E-02 30 bps Source: The NPD Group/Consumer Panel Track  12 Months Ending July 2012 NPD definition of Plus Size (self reported) Data includes all Women's Apparel categories and Intimate Apparel; does not include Jewelry or Footwear 2012 10.1% 5.3% 4.9% 4.5% 4.5% 2.8% 2.7% 2.6% 2.2% 2.2% 1.9% 1.6% 2011 9.8% 5.0% 5.0% 5.2% 4.8% 2.6% 3.1% 2.2% 2.1% 2.2% 1.8% 1.8% % Var 0.3% 0.3% (0.1%) (0.7%) (0.3%) 0.2% (0.4%) 0.4% 0.1% Flat 0.1% (0.2%) 30 bps (10 bps) (70 bps) (30 bps) 20 bps (40 bps) 40 bps 10 bps Flat 10 bps (20 bps)
 
21 FY12 Highlights Modest comparable store sales increases Significant e-commerce growth Strong expense leverage Improved operating results Joined the ascena family
 
22 FY12 Financials $M FY12 FY12 FY11 FY11 Fav/(Unfav)vs. LY Fav/(Unfav)vs. LY Comp Sales 1.1% 1.1% 6.4% 6.4% $ % Net Sales 1,000 996 4 0.4% Gross Margin 546 54.6% 560 56.2% (14) (2.5%) BD&O 212 21.2% 220 22.1% 8 90 bps SG&A 287 28.7% 294 29.5% 7 80 bps EBITDA 48 4.8% 47 4.7% 1 2.1% OperatingIncome 7 0.7% 3 0.3% 4 133.3% Results are trailing twelve month proforma.
 
23 FY13 Strategic Initiatives Launched comprehensive rebranding Reposition the fleet Drive multi-channel growth Improve inventory productivity
 
24 Growth Drivers Store relocation and expansion E-commerce Merchandise mix refinement Tighter inventory, markdown management
 
George Goldfarb President, maurices
 
"Simply the best hometown specialty store" George Goldfarb President Our Mission
 
27 Peer Group Comp Sales AEO BKE maurices RUE Gap KSS ANF WTSLA ARO JCP Series 1 0.100000001490116 5.99999986588955E-02 1.99999995529652E-02 1.00000004749745E-03 1.00000004749745E-03 -9.99999977648258E-03 -2.99999993294477E-02 -5.99999986588955E-02 -5.99999986588955E-02 -0.109999999403954 10% 6% 2% flat (3%) (6%) (11%) (1%) BKE ANF WTSLA RUE JCP KSS AEO Gap ARO Twelve Months Ended July 2012 flat (6%)
 
28 FY12 Highlights Strong EBITDA 51 new domestic stores Expanded internationally into Canada Strong e-commerce growth Development of sourcing infrastructure
 
29 FY12 Financials $M FY12 FY12 FY11 FY11 Fav/(Unfav)vs. LY Fav/(Unfav)vs. LY Comp Sales 1.6% 1.6% 10.2% 10.2% $ % Net Sales 853 777 76 9.8% Gross Margin 465 54.5% 428 55.1% 37 8.6% BD&O 114 13.4% 101 13.0% (13) (40 bps) SG&A 223 26.1% 197 25.4% (26) (70 bps) EBITDA 129 15.1% 130 16.7% (1) (0.8%) OperatingIncome 103 12.1% 108 13.9% (5) (4.6%)
 
30 FY13 Strategic Initiatives Open new stores Grow e-commerce Consistency in merchandise offering Increase direct sourced product Refine markdown management Customer acquisition and retention
 
31 Growth Drivers Comp sales New stores Domestic Canada E-commerce Develop sourcing
 
Jeff Gerstel President, dressbarn
 
33 Our Mission 71 Inspiring women to look and feel beautiful.
 
34 Peer Group Comp Sales Twelve Months Ended July 2012 CHS TJX ANN dressbarn M KSS CATO NWY CBK CWTR JCP 7.00000002980232E-02 5.99999986588955E-02 5.00000007450581E-02 3.99999991059303E-02 3.99999991059303E-02 -9.99999977648258E-03 -2.99999993294477E-02 -5.00000007450581E-02 -7.99999982118607E-02 -0.100000001490116 -0.109999999403954 7% 6% 5% 4% 4% (5%) (11%) (10%) (8%) (1%) (3%) CHS ANN M TJX JCP NWY KSS CATO CBK CWTR
 
35 FY12 Highlights Surpassed $1 Billion in annual sales 23 new stores & 4 relocations E-commerce first full year 2% penetration blushPERKS' loyalty program Major organizational changes
 
36 FY12 Highlights Talent Creative Director Merchant organization Field Communication
 
37 FY12 Financials $M FY12 FY12 FY11 FY11 Fav/(Unfav)vs. LY Fav/(Unfav)vs. LY Comp Sales 3.4% 3.4% 1.6% 1.6% $ % Net Sales 1,037 987 50 5.1% Gross Margin 570 55.0% 554 56.1% 16 2.9% BD&O 194 18.7% 187 18.9% (7) 20 bps SG&A 286 27.6% 275 27.9% (11) 30 bps EBITDA 89 8.6% 92 9.3% (3) (3.3%) OperatingIncome 57 5.5% 63 6.4% (6) (9.5%)
 
38 FY13 Strategic Initiatives Hot-Est in fashion for our target customer Store experience Marketing strategy Accelerating growth Talent
 
39 Growth Drivers Sales growth Comp stores E-commerce expansion New store openings Margin Expansion Design Greater depth per SKU Merchandise enhancements Differentiating service
 
Anthony Romano President, Charming Shoppes
 
41 Our Mission To serve the lifestyle and fit needs of women size 18+ with up-to-date classic outfits inspiring her to look and feel her best.
 
42 Market Share 2011 1 0.101000003516674 2 5.29999993741512E-02 3 4.89999987185001E-02 4 4.50000017881393E-02 5 4.50000017881393E-02 6 2.80000008642673E-02 7 2.70000007003546E-02 Untitled 1 2.60000005364418E-02 Untitled 2 2.19999998807907E-02 Untitled 3 2.19999998807907E-02 Untitled 4 1.89999993890524E-02 Untitled 5 1.60000007599592E-02 30 bps Source: The NPD Group/Consumer Panel Track  12 Months Ending July 2012 NPD definition of Plus Size (self reported) Data includes all Women's Apparel categories and Intimate Apparel; does not include Jewelry or Footwear 2012 10.1% 5.3% 4.9% 4.5% 4.5% 2.8% 2.7% 2.6% 2.2% 2.2% 1.9% 1.6% 2011 9.8% 5.0% 5.0% 5.2% 4.8% 2.6% 3.1% 2.2% 2.1% 2.2% 1.8% 1.8% % Var 0.3% 0.3% (0.1%) (0.7%) (0.3%) 0.2% (0.4%) 0.4% 0.1% Flat 0.1% (0.2%) 30 bps (10 bps) (70 bps) (30 bps) 20 bps (40 bps) 40 bps 10 bps Flat 10 bps (20 bps)
 
43 FY12 Highlights Healthy comparable store sales increases Significant e-commerce growth Strong expense leverage Improved operating results Launched comprehensive rebranding Joined the ascena family
 
44 FY12 Financials $M FY12 FY12 FY11 FY11 Fav/(Unfav)vs. LY Fav/(Unfav)vs. LY Comp Sales 3.4% 3.4% (1.1%) (1.1%) $ % Net Sales 296 297 (1) (0.3%) Gross Margin 154 52.0% 159 53.5% (5) (3.1%) BD&O 53 17.9% 56 18.9% 3 100 bps SG&A 95 32.1% 102 34.3% 7 220 bps EBITDA 7 2.4% 1 0.3% 6 NM OperatingIncome (1) (0.3%) (9) (3.0%) 8 NM Results are trailing twelve month proforma.
 
45 FY13 Strategic Initiatives Drive multi-channel growth Improve inventory productivity Increase direct-sourced product penetration Optimize marketing mix Streamline marketing events & campaigns Leverage CRM database
 
46 Growth Drivers E-commerce Merchandise mix refinement Greater penetration of direct-sourced product Tighter inventory, markdown management
 
Shared Services John Sullivan Chief Operating Officer
 
48 Our Mission "Support all current and future brand partners to better execute their business plans by providing high quality expertise and cost effective service with passion, integrity and respect." Shared Services
 
49 Finance Accounting Human Resources Business Services Sourcing Distribution & Global Logistics Information Technology Shared Service Capabilities
 
50 FY13 Shared Service Strategies Expand distribution & logistics capability Transform core technology platform Integrate Charming Shoppes
 
51 In-Source and consolidate all e-commerce fulfillment in Greencastle, IN Consolidate all retail shipping into Etna, OH Expand Distribution & Logistics Etna, OH Greencastle, IN
 
54 Consolidate data centers Transform Core Technology Implement new store technology Upgrade merchandising systems Rollout global sourcing systems Develop e-commerce systems Unify financial systems
 
55 Consolidate data centers Transform Core Technology Implement new store technology Upgrade merchandising systems Rollout global sourcing systems Develop e-commerce systems Unify financial systems
 
www.shopjustice.com www.maurices.com www.dressbarn.com www.lanebryant.co m www.catherines.com 56 Consolidate data centers Transform Core Technology Implement new store technology Upgrade merchandising systems Rollout global sourcing systems Develop e-commerce systems Unify financial systems
 
57 Consolidate data centers Transform Core Technology Implement new store technology Upgrade merchandising systems Rollout global sourcing systems Develop e-commerce systems Unify financial systems
 
58 Integrate Charming Shoppes Finance Accounting Tax Treasury Credit Operations Payables Internal Audit Investor Relations Corporate Insurance/Risk Payroll Compensation Benefits HRIS Lease Administration Legal Distribution Information Technology Video Communications
 
Financial Highlights Armand Correia Chief Financial Officer
 
Integrate Charming Shoppes
Finance
Accounting
Tax
Treasury
Credit Operations
Payables
Internal Audit
Investor Relations
Corporate Insurance/Risk
Payroll
Compensation
Benefits
HRIS
Lease Administration
Legal
Distribution
Information Technology
Video Communications
58
 
Financial Highlights
Armand Correia
Chief Financial Officer
Bryant
Catherines
 
60 Catherines dressbarn maurices Lane Bryant Justice FY10 0 982 681 0 712 FY11 0 987 777 0 1150 FY12 36 1037 853 120 1307 FY13E 300 1125 975 1100 1520 Sales Growth ($M ) 2,914 3,353 5,020 2,375 FY13E FY12 FY11 FY10
 
61 Catherines dressbarn maurices Lane Bryant Justice FY10 0 0 9.06400012969971 0 27.0149993896484 FY11 0 10.875 24.5359992980957 0 68.4550018310547 FY12 3 25.3439998626709 44.7220001220703 14.5629997253418 89.5979995727539 FY13E 35 40 65 140 110 E-Commerce Growth 104 178 390 36 ($M) FY13E FY12 FY11 FY10
 
62 Catherines maurices FY10 133 3 FY11 171 18 FY12 172 42 FY13E 229 14 Net Income Growth 189 214 243 136 ($M) 171 172 133 Adjusted EPS $0.88 $1.17 $1.34 $1.45-$1.55 GAAP EPS $0.87 $1.05 $1.08
 
63 Long-term Goals Sales annual growth rate of 8% to 10% Operating income % of sales of 12%+ by Year 3 EPS annual growth rate of 10%+
 
64 Net Income EPS Net Sales Comp Sales Gross Margin 1Q FY13 Highlights* $63M $0.39 $1.138B 1% $676M *Adjusted vs Last Year 1Q +21% +18% +7% 15th consecutive quarter of increases +10%
 
65 Summary Diversified portfolio Significant growth opportunities Shared Services Group leverages overhead & drives synergies Strong Balance Sheet and Cash Flow
 
Annual Shareholder Meeting December 11, 2012


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130108131835.txt.gz
TIME:20130108131835
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Retirement of Armand Correia as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
As previously disclosed in the Current Report on Form 8-K filed by Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the "Company") with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 13, 2012, on March 8, 2012, Armand Correia, the Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company, gave one-year's advance notice to the Board of Directors of his retirement as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Correia's retirement will become effective on March 2, 2013, and he will serve in a transitional role until such date.
Appointment of Dirk A. Montgomery as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
On January 8, 2013, the Company issued a press release announcing the appointment of Dirk A. Montgomery to serve as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company, effective as of January 16, 2013. Mr. Montgomery is assuming the position that was held by Mr. Correia. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Mr. Montgomery, 49, served as the Executive Vice President and Chief Value Chain Officer of Bloomin' Brands, Inc. ("Bloomin' Brands"), a publicly-traded operator of leading restaurant brands in the U.S. and internationally, including Outback Steakhouse, Carrabba's Italian Grill, Bonefish Grill and Fleming's Prime Steakhouse, since May 2012, and as an Executive Vice President of Bloomin' Brands since January 1, 2012. He served as Chief Financial Officer of Bloomin' Brands from November 2005 to May 2012 prior to assuming the role of Chief Value Chain Officer. From 2000 to 2004, Mr. Montgomery served as the Chief Financial Officer of Express, a subsidiary of Limited Brands, Inc.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
December 24, 2012
Dirk A. Montgomery
11824 Shire Wycliffe Court
Tampa, Florida 33626
Dear Dirk;
We are pleased to offer you the position of Chief Financial Officer at Ascena Retail Group, Inc. ("Ascena"). This position will be based in the Ascena Home Office in Suffern, NY. You will report directly to me, David Jaffe, CEO.
This offer is based upon a mutually acceptable start date, to be determined. The compensation and benefits package outlined in this offer assumes a start date prior to January 26
th
, 2013, the last day of our Fiscal Season. The plan design of the company's benefits package is subject to change at any time.
Base salary, Incentive, Stock and Miscellaneous
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Relocation
 
 
Deferred Compensation
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Time Off Awards
 
 
 
Benefits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Severance Benefits
 
Employment with Ascena Retail Group, Inc. is "at will," which means that you or Ascena Retail Group, Inc. may terminate your employment at any time, for any reason or no reason, with or without cause, and with or without prior notice or prior disciplinary action. No representatives of Ascena Retail Group, Inc. may enter into any agreement to alter your at will status or otherwise create any contract between you and Ascena Retail Group, Inc., unless signed in writing by the Chief Executive Officer, President and Director, Ascena Retail Group Inc., or the Executive Vice President, Human Resources. This offer letter is not intended to create and shall not be construed as creating a contract of employment.
Dirk, we believe you will be an outstanding addition to the Ascena team. I am confident that you will find the position challenging and that you will have the opportunity to continue your professional growth.
If you agree with our offer as specified above, please sign both copies, keep one for your records and return one to Vanessa Gilaspy via email or scanned copy and return an original by mail to the address below. We are looking forward to the beginning of a mutually beneficial association!
(Vanessa.Gilaspy@ascenaretail.com)
Sincerely,
 
AGREED AND ACCEPTED:
 

Exhibit 99.1
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP ANNOUNCES NEW CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER
SUFFERN, N.Y.(BUSINESS WIRE)Jan. 8, 2013 Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today announced that Dirk Montgomery has accepted the position of Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, effective January 16, 2013. Montgomery succeeds Armand Correia, who will be retiring after 21 years with the organization.
(NASDAQ: ASNA)
David Jaffe, President and CEO of the Ascena Retail Group, commented, "On behalf of our entire organization, I'd like to personally thank Armand for his 21 years of service to Ascena. His stewardship was instrumental in delivering market-leading rates of growth and return for our shareholders, particularly over the last decade. We are excited to welcome Dirk to our team, and are confident that his leadership, expertise and experience will enable us to continue building upon this record of achievement."
Dirk Montgomery was most recently Executive Vice President and Chief Value Chain Officer of Bloomin' Brands, Inc., a publicly-traded operator of leading global restaurant brands including Outback Steakhouse, Carrabba's Italian Grill, Bonefish Grill, Inc., and Fleming's Prime Steakhouse, generating approximately $4 billion in annual revenues. Prior to that position, he served as Chief Financial Officer of Bloomin' Brands for six years.
Prior to joining Bloomin' Brands in 2005, Mr. Montgomery served in a variety of domestic and international leadership roles in the areas of finance, procurement, strategic planning and operations in the retail and consumer products segments. This included significant experience in financial leadership roles such as Chief Financial Officer of the $9 billion Con Agra Foods Retail Group, as Chief Financial Officer of Express (previously a division of Limited Brands) and in several senior management positions with the Sara Lee Corporation.
Mr. Montgomery began his career at Ernst & Young as an auditor and corporate finance consultant. He has an undergraduate degree in Accountancy from Miami University of Ohio, a CPA from the State of Ohio, and an MBA from the University of Chicago with a concentration in Finance and a specialization in Policy.
Mr. Montgomery commented, "I am very excited to be joining Ascena and share the strong vision the Ascena team has to continue to grow the business and to further extend the Company's leadership position in the specialty retailing industry. I look forward to the work ahead, including completing the integration projects already underway and, more broadly, to sharing my experience and expertise in developing and implementing a thoughtful and strategic approach to growth and value creation in the years ahead."
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: ASNA) is a leading specialty retailer offering clothing, shoes, and accessories for missy and plus-size women and tween girls, under the and brands. Ascena Retail Group, Inc. operates through its subsidiaries approximately 3,800 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada.
Justice, Lane Bryant, maurices, dressbarn
Catherines
For more information about Ascena Retail Group, Inc. and its brands, visit , , , , , , , , and .
www.ascenaretail.com
www.charmingshoppes.com
www.shopjustice.com
www.lanebryant.com
www.maurices.com
www.dressbarn.com
www.catherines.com
www.cacique.com
www.figis.com
www.figisgallery.com
Source: Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Investor Relations
845-369-4600
or
ICR, Inc.
James Palczynski, 203-682-8229
Senior Managing Director
jp@ircinc.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130110150850.txt.gz
TIME:20130110150850
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
January 10, 2013 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On January 10, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release disclosing material non-public information regarding its sales results for the combined November and December Holiday period ended December 29, 2012. The Company is also lowering its earnings per diluted share guidance for its full fiscal year ending July 27, 2013. A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
 
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
Exhibit Number Description
 
 
 
  
SIGNATURES
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
 
Date: January 10, 2013
 
 
By:
/s/ Jay Levine____________________
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
News Release
 
ascena retail group, Inc.
ANNOUNCES HOLIDAY SALES RESULTS AND
LOWERS FISCAL 2013 EARNINGS PER SHARE GUIDANCE
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today announced sales results for the combined November and December Holiday period ended December 29, 2012. The Company also announced that, due to lower than planned Holiday sales, it is lowering earnings per share guidance for its current fiscal year ending July 27, 2013.
SUFFERN, NY  J
anuary
10, 2013 
(NASDAQ  ASNA)
 
The Company noted that combined comparable store and e-commerce sales for the fiscal months of November and December increased 1% on a consolidated basis. The Companys comparable store and e-commerce sales data is summarized below:
 
 
*Comparable store sales for and include sales for all stores that were open in both that period and the comparative period in the prior year.
Lane Bryant
Catherines
 
David Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented, The Holiday selling season proved to be challenging and we increased promotional activity in order to ensure appropriate inventory levels going forward. We are taking the necessary markdowns in the second quarter to effectively transition into the spring season. As a result, we now believe full year adjusted diluted earnings per share guidance in the range of $1.20 to $1.30 is more appropriate, versus our previous guidance of $1.45 to $1.55.
 
The Company noted that its updated guidance for Fiscal 2013 excludes one-time, acquisition-related integration, restructuring and purchase accounting costs that may be incurred related to the Charming Acquisition. The Company further noted that its guidance is based upon various assumptions, including spring season comparable store sales increases in the range of 3% - 5% and e-commerce sales growth of approximately 25%. For the full year, the Company continues to plan to open approximately 200 stores and close approximately 125 stores, ending the fiscal year with approximately 3,900 Justice, Lane Bryant, maurices, dressbarn and Catherines stores in operation.
 
The Company commented that it will be presenting at the 15 Annual ICR XChange Conference to be held at the Fontainebleau in Miami Beach, Florida on Wednesday, January 16, 2013 at 2:50 p.m. ET.
th
 
The Ascena Retail Group investor presentation will be webcast live and can be accessed at
http://www.ascenaretail.com
.
 
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: ASNA) is a leading specialty retailer offering clothing, shoes, and accessories for missy and plus-size women and tween girls, under the , , , and brands. Ascena Retail Group, Inc. operates through its subsidiaries approximately 3,800 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada. 
Justice
Lane Bryant
maurices
dressbarn
Catherines
 
For more information about Ascena Retail Group, Inc. and its brands, visit
www.ascenaretail.com
,
www.charmingshoppes.com
,
www.shopjustice.com
,
www.lanebryant.com
,
www.maurices.com
,
www.dressbarn.com
,
www.catherines.com
,
www.cacique.com
,
www.figis.com
and
www.figisgallery.com
. 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available in the Companys most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended July 28, 2012 and Form 10-Q for the quarter ended October 27, 2012.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
CONTACT:         
Investor Relations
(845) 369-4600
 
ICR, Inc.
James Palczynski
Senior Managing Director
(203) 682-8229
jp@icrinc.com
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130123165331.txt.gz
TIME:20130123165331
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
January 16, 2013 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
  
On January 16, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) participated in the 15 Annual ICR XChange Conference.
th
A transcript of the presentation is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and a copy of the slide presentation is furnished as Exhibit 99.2 which are incorporated by reference herein.
  
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
  
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC. 
(Registrant)
 
 
Date: January 23, 2013
  
 
By:
/s/ Jay Levine                                                   
Jay Levine 
Senior Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer 
and Corporate Controller 
(Principal Accounting Officer)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS 
 
David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS 
 
Edward Yruma
KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 
PRESENTATION 
 
 
Edward Yruma  
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
My name is Edward Yruma. I am KeyBanc's senior softlines and specialty retail analyst.
 
Next up, we are proud to have Ascena Retail Group, one of the leading specialty retailers. The Company recently acquired Charming Shoppes, so a very, very interesting story. The Company is clearly invested in their shared services model, which I think creates a very unique value proposition within specialty retail.
 
From the Company, we have David Jaffe, CEO. We also have Dirk Montgomery, the new CFO. And then, obviously, you are all familiar with Armand Correia, the outgoing CFO. So with that, David.
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
A little video to warm up the audience here.
 
(Video plays)
 
(Video ends)
 
All right. Well, while everybody's reading the forward-looking statement, I just want to take a moment and thank Armand. Armand has been with dressbarn for 22 years. This is his last ICR. And he's transitioning, and Dirk Montgomery has just joined us. This is his first ICR, so it is an interesting transition.
 
Armand has been with dressbarn in the CFO role since 22 years ago, and really has been my partner in developing the Ascena Retail Group as we know it. So eight or nine years ago when I walked into his office and said, hey, I think I've got this idea about an acquisition, we hadn't done any acquisitions, and it was the start of something that has become really bigger than both of us.
 
And clearly without his help, we never would have gotten here. So I'm going to be sorry to see him go and I just want to thank him publicly for all his help over the last 22 years.
 
So let me go high level and I'm going to go really quickly. All these slides are available on our website. But our vision is to serve shareholders and create value by becoming a family of leading retail concepts with $10 billion in sales and top-tier profitability.
 
So five brands, we're certainly on our way to creating a family of brands. We've got -- this year, we're projecting just under $5 billion of sales, so we're certainly on that way, on that direction. And the top-tier profitability, we're working on. Some of it's at the brands, and we'll talk a little bit about that. Certainly in the breakouts, we've talked about that, each brand, the opportunities we see it, but it's also in the integration and creating this what we think is a unique model, and I'll talk more about that as well.
 
So for Ascena, what we present is a diversified portfolio. We've got five niche brands. We don't represent just a certain segment of price point or of consumer, and I think this diversification helps the investors by saying, hey, we may not have all of them hitting perfectly at once, but you can be sure that they're all going to do pretty well over a long period of time. And we have.
 
 
 
 
   
  
We think we've got significant growth opportunities, whether it's e-commerce, which last year grew 30%; whether it's going into Canada; whether it's developing new categories, such as we've done at Justice with our Brothers line or with Lane Bryant with their very strong Cacique intimate apparel line. We think there's a lot of opportunity with shared services to reduce our overhead and drive synergies, and we'll talk a little bit more about that.
 
We've got a strong balance sheet, very strong cash flow, and that creates future opportunities. So as people have heard me say before, the infrastructure that we are building is going to allow us to plug and play future acquisitions, should we be so fortunate to find one. But also with that strong cash flow, it enables us to use that cash not just for an acquisition, but to be an aggressive buyer of our stock, as we have traditionally and historically.
 
I think most of you know that back in June, we closed on our Charming transaction. We think we paid a reasonable price. We didn't steal it, but we didn't pay too much, I don't think. We did about two-thirds cash, one-third debt. So we think the financing is very reasonable and we're very comfortable with the leverage structure.
 
We have a plan for each division. So quickly, Figi's, we have announced the sale of Figi's. Barclays, represented here, has been given the mandate to sell it. That's a very small business, but we think it's the right time after the Christmas holiday to move that out. The Lane Bryant -- I'm sorry, the Fashion Bug division is being liquidated, and we're in the process now of finishing our GOBs and that will be done by the end of the month.
 
The Catherines business has started regaining some of the ground that they lost since the recession, and we'll see. We're not really putting any capital in that business. It is cash flow positive and we think it's on the right track.
 
And clearly, the big kahuna is Lane Bryant. We are searching for a president there. We think we have made some good mid-course corrections, but there still needs to be a lot of refinement to that business and I think it's a two- or three-year project. But I do think that that business is certainly capable of 10%-plus operating margins.
 
Just as an aside, we think there's some unseen assets that have real value to us. Selling Figi's and one of our DCs is probably worth $50 million or so. The NOL is worth about $50 million in cash. And then, we have a DC that we're in the process of repurposing from brick-and-mortar distribution to e-commerce fulfillment. So some good values there that's maybe not as clearly seen.
 
So Charming, again, we're getting two niche brands. We're working on ways to transfer the Fashion Bug sales. So if you went in there today, you would be given a bounceback to go to the other brands, and we're working -- now we can already accept the Fashion Bug credit card at all four of our other brands, as well.
 
Overhead reduction is going to be an ongoing challenge. We'll talk more about that in synergies and the creation of best practices among all our divisions, and at our size now we've been able to attract some terrific talent like Dirk and retain some of our best people.
 
Just quickly, the brands look like -- sorry, the holding companies look like this. So what we did on day one was say, okay, we're going to put the two shared service groups together. We're going to merge Lane Bryant Outlet into Lane Bryant, and eventually we're going to shut down Fashion Bug and sell off Figi's. So go forward, it's a lot simpler. We've got five brands, and shared services becomes our internal brand, servicing the other brands.
 
So what we think we've done is create this unique business model. So the brands are focusing on the front end. They are driving the traffic. They are creating the energy and excitement about their brands.
 
What they're not doing is worrying about the back end. They've given that all off to shared services because the customer doesn't care whether or not one group or another group pays payroll or the rent checks or whatever it might be.
 
So to do this, we've left the teams in place, both physically in Duluth or Columbus or Bensalem, wherever it might be, as well as the management teams, with the exception, as I said, Lane Bryant where Brian retired and now we're trying to fill back that role.
 
So we think this model looks like this -- customers at the top of the pyramid, the brands support the customer, and then shared services supports the brands. A little different than what you might've seen.
 
So now, let me switch quickly to our demographics. We believe that each of the brands operates its own unique niche. There is minimal overlap, the slight exception being Lane Bryant and the DBW, dressbarn woman, part of dressbarn. And in that case, there still are some psychographic differences.
 
 
 
 
 
 
So in general, I would think -- I would say that the Lane Bryant customer is younger, more fashionable, and a little bit more interested in trends. So it's not just the fashion; it's, what's hot now? What's going to make me look sexy? How do I get -- remember, Cacique, what I referred to before, Cacique is 30% of their business. So it's a whole different model than the DBW business. DBW, by the way, is about a third of dressbarn.
 
So quickly turning to Justice, I'm just going to be flipping through these pages quickly, and again, they're online, given the time constraints. So Justice still has some runway left on new stores, primarily by building out Canada, as well as building out some of the smaller markets.
 
One of the things we're excited about is that we finally took over first place in market share, as you can see here. And if you look at that bottom line, you can see that we actually grew 1% market share and everyone else gave up market share, with the exception of Target that took just a little as well. So very proud of that, and we want to keep taking on more market share and we think that all the strategies we have in place will help us to continue to grow.
 
One of the strategic initiatives that we think is going to create significant growth opportunity is Brothers. We've got that in about 30 stores. Another 30 are going to open this spring. This is going into the existing stores. It is a shop within the store. It's in a corner. It's got its own tree house feeling.
 
And it has not, in the 30 stores we have, it is not taken away from the girl sale. So it is plus, it is incremental business, and we think there is significant upside there, both in terms of improving its productivity, as well as rolling it out to more and more stores.
 
Another driver for Justice has been e-commerce, which continues to do extremely well.
 
So switching over to Lane Bryant, this is a business that I think was a little bit confused for a number of years. They had many different presidents, many different holding company presidents at the Charming level. And so, one year they might be high fashion, another year they might be career, another year they might be sexy.
 
So I think it confused the customer. And as we did the research and focus groups last year before we bought it, that's what the customer was telling us.
 
So we're in the process of rethinking our positioning, thinking about merchandise, thinking about our promos, the cadence, and how we're going to talk to our customers. And I think that we're on the right track. It still needs to be fine-tuned. This is a process. I'm sure we're going to stub our toe and make mistakes, but we're going to test new things and we're going to continue to listen to the customer in response to what it is that she's looking for.
 
So we've got over 800 stores now. And as you can see, we still have a fair number of mall stores. We're going to be switching most of those mall stores into strips. And when we've done that, we've seen that we can get a little bit of a pickup in sales and even more of a pickup in profitability.
 
The customer, the large-sized customer, likes the convenience of the strip center where she can drive right up to the store and just walk out. We're also taking the size down a bit from 5,800 prototype to 5,000.
 
And here, you can see the market share. Right after the big boxes is Lane Bryant. It actually gave up a little bit through some store closings and some weakness in the results, but I think as we look out, the big boxes don't do a terrific job of servicing this customer. The only specialty stores that we compete with would be Avenue, which is much smaller, and, of course, dressbarn woman and Catherines.
 
So we think the opportunity is there. We just have to execute on it. So I'm still as bullish as I was six months ago when we announced the transaction.
 
So as we look at some of the growth drivers, clearly e-commerce, refining our mix, and controlling our inventories there is critical.
 
Also, Cacique. I think Cacique is one of those diamonds in the rough. Even though it's already doing 30% of the business in the stores, actually almost 50% online, this is a business that has legs and I think we can do more with it.
 
Switching to maurices, we have significant growth potential still here. We like to go into smaller markets. Two-thirds of our -- I'm sorry, 70% of our stores are in markets with populations less than 150,000, so think Walmart Supercenter and we're on the pad. We become the fashion destination. So between Canada and continuing to build out, probably another 50% more stores.
 
As we look at this business, there is probably two big drivers. Of course, e-commerce. We also think that we can develop sourcing and product development as a strength. Right now, about two-thirds of our goods come from Seventh Avenue, and the stuff that we're sourcing directly, we're doing through agents. So we think that's a big upside, and it allows us at maurices, and dressbarn as well, to tap into the strength that we've developed at Justice and at Charming Shoppes as we merge those sourcing arms together.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
We're calling it Ascena Global Sourcing. And that is going to give us that much more clout with the vendors, and I think we're going to see a win-win there.
 
Switching to dressbarn, this business is primarily strip dominated. Still some growth. We're testing malls with, frankly, mixed success and we're going to continue to try and refine our approach in malls, which I think is going to be a little different than strips.
 
And as we look out, I think the big opportunity here is similar to what we said about maurices, is being able to design our own product to cater to our customer. And this is something that is going to be a slow and gradual transition, but creates a lot more opportunity both for margin and for creating that connection with our customer.
 
So finally on Catherines, this is what I like to call our gift with purchase when we bought Lane Bryant. It's a small business. It is, when we first looked at it, what I would consider to be a dramatic underperformer. The nice thing is -- maybe it's the threat of elimination really focuses the mind and they've really risen to the occasion. They've done a great job. They've had a very good fall.
 
And as we look out, if they continue to grow at this rate, it will be a very solid, but small, business, but certainly a cash flow producer that would just be another nice niche business to hold onto.
 
So in this business, we're really not going to be putting any capital against it. And so, we think the opportunity is just for them to continue to strengthen what they're doing, continue to get back to those numbers that they were doing historically prior to the recession, and we'll wait and see.
 
So switching now to our shared service model, you can see that all the stuff that we've got out there is stuff that's back office, it's behind the scenes that doesn't impact the customer. So at a high level, the idea is to again let the brands focus on the customer, let the brands focus on the front end, and also to consolidate all those functions so you can get faster, better, smarter services. You can reduce your costs, greater efficiency, et cetera, et cetera.
 
So we're getting a lot of this well underway. It's going to take a while, depending on which project. And we've got 19 different teams working on different streams. Some of it is going to finish up next season and some of it is going to take at least two years.
 
So the big projects, we call the blue chips, is our DCs. We're going from five DCs down to one. Our logistics network, so having everything all brick and mortar in one place, is going to enable us to bring trucks to -- long-haul trucks with five brands' worth of merchandise and then distribute it out from there. So it's going to be much, much more efficient.
 
We're going to bring e-commerce in house. Right now, all the brands outsource it. That's what we're using that DC for. We're going to convert it to an e-commerce fulfillment center.
 
We've talked about direct sourcing, our technology, and then, finally, the business processing, the stuff behind the scenes.
 
So if you remember, we talked about Charming having about an $80 million overhead structure and Ascena having about a $70 million, so that $150 million needs to come down, we feel, by about $50 million. So we can't get by on the $70 million that we had, but we certainly don't need the $150 million. And here's our best guess as to how long it's going to take to get the $50 million out and to right-size and consolidate.
 
Some of the other savings that we think we're going to see, apart from the overhead reduction, are these synergies. You can go through -- I mentioned some of them already -- the bottom line one, the direct sourcing, is clearly to be determined. And that alone could be bigger than all the other numbers on this page.
 
So switching to the financials, you can see that our comps, we had a real tough time at dressbarn and Lane Bryant. And that was the primary reason for us taking our guidance down. We don't think it's going to impact spring. Holiday is a different season than spring, and the emphasis where we had problems in sweaters, primarily at dressbarn, obviously we de-emphasized sweaters and dress has become much more important.
 
So zipping through, you can see our sales growth. E-commerce growth is very dramatic. Operating income even in a tough year, it's still growing. That shows you the EPS, which is down because of that overhead, that double overhead structure, and the guidance that we just talked about.
 
Uses of cash, we'll have a little more cash, we think. It's primarily going into CapEx. And the CapEx is for all that infrastructure that I mentioned a few slides ago. And that will go on for about two years at a similar level, and then it should drop back down to more historical levels with Lane Bryant. Maybe the number gets back to about $200 million.
 
 
 
  
 
 
So we should have a nice piece of change, both to pay back our debt and, as I said earlier, possibly to either build a war chest, build up our cash position, or possibly to buy back stock.
 
So long term, our economic model, we think we can continue to grow our top line through comps; through new stores; new categories, like Brothers; e-commerce, which is growing very nicely. We think we can drive our business, once the synergies and overhead reductions are in place, to an operating income percent of about 12% or more. And that should lead us to a consistent 10% EPS growth.
 
So we're back to investor highlights, and I'm out of time. Thank you very much.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
15 th Annual ICR XChange Conference January 16, 2013 David Jaffe President & CEO
 
 
2
 
 
Forward Looking Statements This presentation contains forward - looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 . Forward - looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties, which may cause our actual results in future periods to differ materially from our forecasted results . Detailed information concerning those risks and uncertainties are readily available in our most recent Annual Report on Form 10 - K and Quarterly Report on Form 10 - Q which have been filed with the U . S . Securities and Exchange Commission . Non - GAAP Financial Measures Where indicated, certain financial information herein has been presented on a non - GAAP basis . This basis adjusts for items that management believes are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance . Reference should be made to the Companys annual earnings releases for all periods for the nature of such adjustments and for a reconciliation of such non - GAAP measures to the Companys financial results prepared in accordance with GAAP . 3
 
 
Our Vision Serve our shareholders and create value by becoming a family of leading retail concepts with $10 billion in sales and top tier profitability. Our Mission Making people feel good about themselves. 4
 
 
Investor Highlights 5  Diversified portfolio  Significant growth opportunities  Shared Services leverages overhead & drives synergies  Strong Balance Sheet & Cash Flow  Future opportunities
 
 
CHRS Transaction Overview  Reasonable valuation  Conservative financing  Plan for each division  Valuable assets 6
 
 
CHRS Transaction Benefits  Two niche brands  Transfer Fashion Bug sales  Overhead reduction  Synergies  Best practices  Talent acquisition & retention 7
 
 
Coming Together 8
 
 
Coming Together 9
 
 
Current Structure 10 Shared Services Group
 
 
Unique Business Model  Brands focus on their target customer  Brands remain in existing locations  Brand management remains in place  Centralization of back office functions Model enables brands to drive business and shared services group to drive efficiencies 11
 
 
Shared Services Organization Structure 12
 
 
Justice Lane Bryant maurices dressbarn Catherines HHI $88K $70K $75K $73K $69K Age 7 - 12 yrs old 30 - 45 yrs old 17 - 34 yrs old 35 - 55+ yrs old 45+ yrs old Customer Demographics 13 Youthful Mature Income
 
 
Our Mission 14 To enhance a tween girls self - esteem by providing her the hottest fashion and lifestyle products, in a unique, fun, interactive environment all at a great value for mom!
 
 
Locations 968 Stores in 47 States, Puerto Rico & Canada  1,100 store potential  55 new stores planned in FY13 15
 
 
Market Share 16 Tween girls 7 - 12 apparel market, 12 ME May 12, 11 Source  NPD Group Dotted line represents 2011 Market Share 2012 11.4% 10.9% 10.2% 7.8% 6.1% 4.9% 3.4% 2011 10.4% 10.7% 11.0% 7.9% 6.3% 5.0% 3.4% % Var 1.0% 0.2% (0.8%) (0.1%) (0.2%) (0.1%) Flat 100 bps 20 bps (80 bps) (10 bps) (20 bps) (10 bps) Flat
 
 
FY13 Strategic Initiatives  Continue market domination in Hot - Est, Big - Est & Easy - Est  Drive MMU$  E - commerce sales growth  New store growth  Expand dual - gender concept: Brothers 17
 
 
Growth Drivers  Comp sales  New stores  E - commerce  Brothers expansion 18
 
 
Our Mission 19 Consistently provide our Guest fashionable outfits that fit her, make her look stylish and feel sexy, confident and happy.
 
 
Locations 20 813 Stores in 46 States  Market focus: 100K to 150K population  Continuing migration to strip centers  1,000 store potential  45 new stores planned in FY13
 
 
Market Share Source: The NPD Group/Consumer Panel Track  12 Months Ending July 2012 NPD definition of Plus Size (self reported) Data includes all Womens Apparel categories and Intimate Apparel; does not include Jewelry or Footwear 30 bps 30 bps (10 bps) (70 bps) (30 bps) 20 bps (40 bps) 40 bps 10 bps Flat 10 bps (20 bps) 2012 10.1% 5.3% 4.9% 4.5% 4.5% 2.8% 2.7% 2.6% 2.2% 2.2% 1.9% 1.6% 2011 9.8% 5.0% 5.0% 5.2% 4.8% 2.6% 3.1% 2.2% 2.1% 2.2% 1.8% 1.8% % Var 0.3% 0.3% (0.1%) (0.7%) (0.3%) 0.2% (0.4%) 0.4% 0.1% Flat 0.1% (0.2%) 21
 
 
FY13 Strategic Initiatives  Launched comprehensive rebranding  Reposition the fleet  Drive multi - channel growth  Improve inventory productivity 22
 
 
Growth Drivers  Store relocation and expansion  E - commerce  Merchandise mix refinement  Tighter inventory, markdown management 23
 
 
Simply the best hometown specialty store. 24 Our Mission
 
 
Locations 850 Stores in 45 States & Canada  Small  mid market focus: 25K to 150K population  1,250 store potential  60 new stores planned in FY13 25
 
 
FY13 Strategic Initiatives  Open new stores  Grow e - commerce  Consistency in merchandise offering  Increase direct sourced product  Refine markdown management  Customer acquisition and retention 26
 
 
Growth Drivers  Comp sales  New stores  Domestic  Canada  E - commerce  Develop sourcing 27
 
 
Our Mission 28 28 Inspiring women to look and feel beautiful.
 
 
Locations 832 Stores in 48 States  National presence in medium to large markets  1,000 store potential  35 new stores planned in FY13 29
 
 
FY13 Strategic Initiatives  Hot - Est in fashion for our target customer  Store experience  Marketing strategy  Accelerating growth  Talent 30
 
 
Growth Drivers  Sales growth  Comp stores  E - commerce expansion  New store openings  Margin Expansion  Design  Greater depth per SKU  Merchandise enhancements  Differentiating service 31
 
 
Our Mission 32 To serve the lifestyle and fit needs of women size 18+ with up - to - date classic outfits inspiring her to look and feel her best.
 
 
Locations 414 Stores in 44 States  National presence in major markets 33
 
 
Market Share 34 Source: The NPD Group/Consumer Panel Track  12 Months Ending July 2012 NPD definition of Plus Size (self reported) Data includes all Womens Apparel categories and Intimate Apparel; does not include Jewelry or Footwear 30 bps 30 bps (10 bps) (70 bps) (30 bps) 20 bps (40 bps) 40 bps 10 bps Flat 10 bps (20 bps) 2012 10.1% 5.3% 4.9% 4.5% 4.5% 2.8% 2.7% 2.6% 2.2% 2.2% 1.9% 1.6% 2011 9.8% 5.0% 5.0% 5.2% 4.8% 2.6% 3.1% 2.2% 2.1% 2.2% 1.8% 1.8% % Var 0.3% 0.3% (0.1%) (0.7%) (0.3%) 0.2% (0.4%) 0.4% 0.1% Flat 0.1% (0.2%)
 
 
FY13 Strategic Initiatives  Drive multi - channel growth  Improve inventory productivity  Increase direct - sourced product penetration  Optimize marketing mix  Streamline marketing events & campaigns  Leverage CRM database 35
 
 
Growth Drivers  E - commerce  Merchandise mix refinement  Greater penetration of direct - sourced product  Tighter inventory, markdown management 36
 
 
Finance Accounting Human Resources Business Services Sourcing Distribution & Global Logistics Information Technology Shared Service Capabilities 37
 
 
Integration Strategies  Optimize distribution centers  Transform logistics network  In - source e - commerce platform  Expand direct sourcing  Consolidate technology platforms  Optimize business processing 38
 
 
Corporate Overhead Reduction 39 FY13 FY14 FY15 Estimated Savings Net Savings ($10M) ($20M) ($20M) ($50M) EPS Impact $0.04 $0.08 $0.08 $0.20 2012 Legacy ascena ~$70M 2012 Legacy Charming Shoppes ~$80M Proforma ascena Shared Services Group ~$150M
 
 
Brand Synergies Potential (in millions, except EPS) Estimated Savings  DC consolidation  Retail distribution $12  13  E - commerce fulfillment $9  10  Transportation $5  6  Benefits consolidation $4  5  Common systems $2  3  Renegotiate national contracts $2  3  Corporate Insurance/Risk $2  3  Lease administration $1  2  Direct sourcing opportunity TBD Total $37  45 Estimated EPS impact $0.15  0.18 40
 
 
Financials
 
 
Holiday Sales* 42 Comp Store Sales 2 Year Comp Store Sales Justice 5% 7% Lane Bryant (9%) (3%) maurices (2%) 1% dressbarn (8%) (1%) Catherines 4% 4% ascena (2%) 2% E - commerce 30% 35% Combined Store & E - commerce 1% 5% *Combined November & December FY13
 
 
Sales Growth 43 ($M) 2,914 3,353 4,830 2,375
 
 
E - Commerce Growth 44 ($M) 104 178 390 36
 
 
Operating Income* Growth 45 311 332 350 *Non - GAAP including fully allocated overhead costs ($M) 223
 
 
Annual EPS* Growth 46 *Non - GAAP
 
 
Uses of Cash 47 ($M)
 
 
Long - term Economic Model  Sales annual growth rate of 8% to 10%  Operating income % of sales of 12%+  EPS annual growth rate of 10%+ 48
 
 
Investor Highlights 49  Diversified portfolio  Significant growth opportunities  Shared Services leverages overhead & drives synergies  Strong Balance Sheet & Cash Flow  Future opportunities
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130214164801.txt.gz
TIME:20130214164801
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
February 14, 2013 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On February 14, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing that Linda Heasley has accepted the position of President and CEO of Lane Bryant effective February 18, 2013.
A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 which is incorporated by reference herein.
 
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
 
Date: February 14, 2013
 
 
 
By:
/s/ Jay Levine                                                 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC. ANNOUNCES NEW LANE BRYANT PRESIDENT
 
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today announced that Linda Heasley has accepted the position of President and CEO of Lane Bryant effective February 18, 2013.
SUFFERN, NY - February 14, 2013
(NASDAQ: ASNA)
 
Ms. Heasley joins ascenas Lane Bryant division after six years as President and CEO of The Limited. During her time with The Limited, Ms. Heasley has revamped store product lines; introduced new brand positioning; launched e-commerce; commissioned a new store design; introduced a new plus-size brand, inaugurated a new national advertising campaign and returned The Limited to sustained profitability for the first time in 17 years.
 
In addition to her experience at The Limited, Ms. Heasley has held numerous senior leadership roles at Timberland, Limited Brands, Inc. and CVS. She holds an AB degree from Harvard Radcliffe College and earned her MBA at the John Anderson School of Management, UCLA.
 
David Jaffe, President and CEO of the Ascena Retail Group, commented, A very focused search process was conducted and the organization was able to attract a number of highly qualified candidates. Linda is the ideal person to lead Lane Bryant. She has a track record of impressive business results, an engaging and collaborative style, and a passion for the customer. Ms. Heasley added, Im extremely excited about this opportunity. Lane Bryant is an iconic brand and Im looking forward to being part of its revitalization.
 
 
 
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: ASNA) is a leading specialty retailer offering clothing, shoes, and accessories for missy and plus-size women and tween girls, under the , , , and brands. Ascena Retail Group, Inc. operates through its subsidiaries approximately 3,800 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada.
Justice
Lane Bryant
maurices
dressbarn
Catherines
 
For more information about Ascena Retail Group, Inc. and its brands, visit
www.ascenaretail.com
,
www.charmingshoppes.com
,
www.shopjustice.com
,
www.lanebryant.com
,
www.maurices.com
,
www.dressbarn.com
,
www.catherines.com
,
www.cacique.com.
 
 
Source: Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Investor Relations
845-369-4600
or
ICR, Inc.
 
Alecia Pulman, 203-682-8224 (
alecia.pulman@icrinc.com)
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130301170014.txt.gz
TIME:20130301170014
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
February 28, 2013 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On February 28, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing that David Johns has accepted the position of Senior Vice President and Chief Information Officer effective March 11, 2013.
A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 which is incorporated by reference herein.
 
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
  
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
 
Date: March 1, 2013
 
 
 
By:
/s/ Jay Levine                              
 
 

  Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Suffern, NY (Business Wire) Feb 28, 2013 - Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today announced that David Johns has accepted the position of Senior Vice President and Chief Information Officer effective March 11, 2013.
(NASDAQ: ASNA)
 
 
Mr. Johns joins ascena with extensive experience, including the past nine years at Owens Corning where he held the position of Senior Vice President, Chief Information Officer & Chief Global Shared Services Officer. In this role, Mr. Johns had oversight for all Owens Corning business shared service centers, manufacturing technology, project portfolio management, sourcing and information systems. Mr. Johns held several senior leadership roles at Owens Corning including Senior Vice President, Chief Information Officer and Chief Supply Chain Officer.
 
Prior to his experience at Owens Corning, Mr. Johns held technology positions with Honeywell, Inc. and Time Warner. In both of these roles, he orchestrated major computer systems development and management activities at both the division and corporate levels.
 
David joins ascena with years of experience and has an impressive record as a leader and innovator,  said ascenas COO John Sullivan. I am pleased to welcome him to ascenas team and look forward to the energy, creativity and vision he will bring to this role.
David holds a Bachelor of Science in Computer Science Engineering from The Ohio State University and a Master of Business Administration from the University of Dayton. He was inducted into the CIO Hall of Fame in 2009 and was named one of Computerworlds Premier 100 information technology leaders for 2012.
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: ASNA) is a leading specialty retailer offering clothing, shoes, and accessories for missy and plus-size women and tween girls, under the , , , and brands. Ascena Retail Group, Inc. operates through its subsidiaries approximately 3,800 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada.
Justice
Lane Bryant
maurices
dressbarn
Catherines
 
For more information about Ascena Retail Group, Inc. and its brands, visit , , , , , , ,
www.ascenaretail.com
www.charmingshoppes.com
www.shopjustice.com
www.lanebryant.com
www.maurices.com
www.dressbarn.com
www.catherines.com
www.cacique.com.
 
Source: Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. 
Investor Relations 
845-369-4600 
or 
ICR, Inc.
 
alecia.pulman@icrinc.com
Alecia Pulman, 203-682-8224 (
)
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130304162135.txt.gz
TIME:20130304162135
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
March 4, 2013 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
  
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On March 4, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release disclosing material non-public information regarding its results of operations for its fiscal second quarter ended January 26, 2013. The Company also reaffirmed its earnings per diluted share guidance for its full fiscal year ending July 27, 2013. A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
 
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
 
Date: March 4, 2013
 
 
 
By:
/s/ Jay Levine                                                      
 
 

Exhibit 99.1 
             
  
ascena retail group, Inc. reports
SECOND quarter 2013 results
 
 ADJUSTED EPS OF $0.26 
 GAAP EPS FROM CONTINUING OPERATIONS OF $0.23 
 Total Comparable sales increased 2% 
 Reiterates 2013 GUIDANCE OF $1.20 to $1.30 Per share 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. today reported financial results for its fiscal second quarter and six months ended January 26, 2013.
SUFFERN, NY 
March
4, 2013 
(NASDAQ  ASNA)
 
For the second quarter of 2013, earnings per diluted share from continuing operations share, while earnings from discontinued operations were $0.06 per share. This compares to diluted earnings per share from continuing operations of $0.40 per share in Fiscal 2012. Adjusted earnings per share from continuing operations on this basis was $0.26 per diluted share for the second quarter (see Non-GAAP Financial Results section of this release for additional comments on adjustments).
decreased to $0.23 per
In connection with the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, Inc. (Charming and the Charming Acquisition), the Company incurred in Fiscal 2013 certain non-recurring purchase accounting costs, other acquisition-related integration and restructuring costs, and also incurred certain losses on the extinguishment of debt. Management believes that such costs are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance and have adjusted Fiscal 2013 results to exclude the effect of such costs.
 
 
The Companys combined total comparable sales increased 2% for the quarter versus the prior year, with store comp. sales of -1% and e-commerce comp. sales of 27%. second quarter, driven by the inclusion of the recently acquired Lane Bryant and Catherines businesses.
Net sales for the second quarter of Fiscal 2013 increased 44% to $1.238 billion, compared to $862 million in the prior years
 
 
David Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented,
Our second quarter performance reflects a difficult holiday season during which we utilized promotion and markdown strategies to manage inventory for an effective transition to Spring assortments.   We expect the challenging environment to continue and have adjusted our sales, promotion, and inventory plans accordingly.  These actions, combined with strong expense controls and our acceleration of productivity programs, give us confidence in our ability to achieve our full-year 2013 earnings expectations despite the market condition.
 
Mr. Jaffe concluded, We made solid progress positioning the business for long term growth during the first half of the year by continuing to build our talent base and investing in infrastructure to drive ongoing margin improvement and new store growth. We continue to be excited by the growth and efficiency opportunities created by the integration of our acquisition and strategies to fully leverage our portfolio.
 
 
 
 
 
Fiscal Second Quarter Results
 
Consolidated excluding e-commerce decreased by 1% for the period, with continued positive comps at and , up 4% and 6%, respectively. E-commerce sales increased by 123% to $115 million on a consolidated basis, and 27% on a comparable basis. Combined, comparable store and e-commerce sales increased by 2%.
comparable store sales
Justice
Catherines
 
Soft holiday sales and a challenging external environment drove negative comparable store sales at , and . Second quarter sales also were negatively impacted by Hurricane Sandy in the Northeast and the Company believes that middle income consumers were impacted by a weak economic outlook driven, in part, by tax increases.
Lane Bryant
maurices
dressbarn
 
years second quarter, largely driven by the inclusion of sales from the newly acquired and businesses, along with a 5% increase in sales from the Companys legacy family of brands.
Net sales for the second quarter of Fiscal 2013 increased 44% to $1.238 billion, compared to $862 million for last
Lane Bryant
Catherines
 
The Companys comparable store and e-commerce sales data for the second fiscal quarter is summarized below:
 
 
*Comparable store sales include stores open for at least one year. Comparable store sales for Lane Bryant and Catherines include sales for all stores that were open in both that period and the comparative period in the prior year.
 
 
Gross margin for the second quarter of Fiscal 2013 increased to sales, compared to $477.3 million, or 55.4% of second quarter sales last yearThe gross margin rate decline of 190 basis points was primarily due to lower margins associated with increased markdowns and promotional activity, particularly at .
$662.1
million, or 53.5% of
.
dressbarn
 
were $198.1 million, or 16.0% of sales, compared to $129.4 million, or 15.0The 100 basis point increase was primarily due to the inclusion of andwhich have a higher BD&O expense as a percent of sales compared to the ascena legacy brands.
Buying, distribution and occupancy (BD&O) costs for the second quarter of Fiscal 2013
% of second quarter sales last year.
Lane Bryant
Catherines,
 
quarter of Fiscal 2013 were $348.6 million, or 28.2% of sales, compared to $222.4 million, or 25.8% of second quarter sales last year.  
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the second
The 240 basis point increase is largely due to a duplicative overhead structure relating to the Charming Acquisition, which is expected to be reduced as integration work progresses.
 
 
 
2013 decreased to sales, compared to $100.0 million, or 11.6% of sales last yearHowever, on an adjusted basis, operating income for Fiscal 2013 was $75.1 million, or 6.1% of sales.
Operating income for the second quarter of Fiscal
$68.3
million, or 5.5% of
.
The decrease in operating income as a percent of sales on an adjusted basis was primarily due to increased promotions and markdowns associated with the need to clear slow-moving holiday inventory and duplicative overhead expenses from the Charming Acquisition.
 
Income from continuing operations for the second quarter of Fiscal 2013 , representing a decrease to the year-ago quarters income from continuing operations of $63.7 million.
was $37.8 million
Excluding certain acquisition-related and financing-related expenses, adjusted income from continuing operations for the second quarter of Fiscal 2013 was $42.9 million, as compared to the year-ago quarters income from continuing operations of $63.7 million.
 
Earnings per share from continuing operations for the second quarter of Fiscal 2013 share, compared to $0.40 of earnings per diluted share from continuing operations for the second quarter of Fiscal 2012.  
was $0.23 per diluted
Adjusted earnings per share from continuing operations for the second quarter of Fiscal 2013 was $0.26 per diluted share, compared to $0.40 of earnings per diluted share for the second quarter of Fiscal 2012.
 
Fiscal Second Quarter Balance Sheet Highlights
 
The Company ended the second quarter of Fiscal 2013 with cash and investments of $325.7 million and total debt of $277.4 million, compared to $168.9 million of cash and investments and $326.6 million of debt at the end of Fiscal 2012. During the quarter, we prepaid approximately $20 million of the outstanding principal balance of our term loan.
 
 
Reaffirms Fiscal July 2013 Earnings Guidance
 
The Company reaffirms its latest guidance for adjusted earnings per diluted share from continuing operations for the fiscal year ending July 2013 in the range of $1.20 to $1.30, excluding one-time, financing-related and acquisition-related integration, restructuring and purchase accounting costs that may be incurred resulting from the Charming Acquisition. approximately 25%. Spring Season store openings are expected to be in the range of 100  120 and closings are expected to be in the range of 40  60.
The guidance is based upon various assumptions, including spring season comparable store sales increases in the range of 0% to 3% and comparable e-commerce sales growth of
 
Conference Call Information
 
www.ascenaretail.com
The Company will conduct a conference call today, March 4, 2013, at 4:30 PM Eastern Time to review its second quarter of Fiscal 2013 results, followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (617) 213-8896 prior to the start time, the passcode is 63056313. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at
. A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until April 4, 2013 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 76785292.
 
 
 
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: ASNA) is a leading specialty retailer offering clothing, shoes, and accessories for missy and plus-size women and tween girls, under the , , , and brands. Ascena Retail Group, Inc. operates through its subsidiaries approximately 3,800 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada. 
Justice
Lane Bryant
maurices
dressbarn
Catherines
 
www.ascenaretail.comwww.charmingshoppes.comwww.shopjustice.comwww.lanebryant.comwww.maurices.comwww.dressbarn.comwww.catherines.comwww.cacique.comwww.figis.comwww.figisgallery.com
For more information about Ascena Retail Group, Inc. and its brands, visit
,
,
,
,
,
,
,
,
and
. 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available in the Companys most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended July 28, 2012 and in its last filed Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended October 27, 2012.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Results
 
Ascenas financial results for its fiscal second quarter and six months ended January 26, 2013 reflect the Charming Acquisition. In connection with the Charming Acquisition, the Company has incurred certain non-recurring purchase accounting costs, certain other acquisition-related integration and restructuring costs, and certain losses on the extinguishment of debt during its first six months of Fiscal 2013. Management believes that all of such costs are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance. As such, adjusted results for the second quarter and first six months of Fiscal 2013, which exclude the effect of such costs, have been presented to supplement the reported results for each period. Reference should be made to Note 2 to the unaudited consolidated financial information included elsewhere in this release for a reconciliation of adjusted, non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures.
 
 
  
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
See accompanying notes.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
 
See accompanying notes.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
See accompanying notes.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Segment Information (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
 
 
 
See accompanying notes.
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Information (Unaudited)
 
Note 1. Basis of Presentation
 
Discontinued Operations
 
In connection with the Charming Acquisition, certain acquired businesses have been classified as a component of discontinued operations within the consolidated financial statements.
 
In particular, the Company announced, contemporaneously with the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, its intent to cease operating the acquired business. The business, consisting of approximately 600 retail stores, ceased operations at the end of the second quarter of Fiscal 2013.
Fashion Bug
Fashion Bug
 
In addition, the Company also announced, contemporaneously with the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, its intent to sell the acquired business. The business, which markets food and specialty gift products, is expected to be sold by the one-year anniversary date of the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes.
Figis
Figis
 
Those businesses have been classified as discontinued operations within the unaudited consolidated financial statements. As such, assets and liabilities relating to discontinued operations have been segregated and separately disclosed in the balance sheet as of the end of each period. In turn, operating results for those businesses have also been segregated and reported separately in the statement of operations for Fiscal 2013.
 
Buying, Distribution and Occupancy Costs Reclassification
 
Historically, the Company included buying, distribution and occupancy costs within cost of goods sold on the face of its statements of operations. However, in the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012, in connection with conforming the financial presentation of Charming Shoppes, the Company decided to present each of the aggregate of buying, distribution and occupancy costs and gross margin separately on the face of its statements of operations. In addition, certain costs, such as store utility costs, were reclassified from selling, general and administrative expenses to buying, distribution and occupancy costs. Financial information for all prior periods has been reclassified in order to conform to the current periods presentation. There have been no changes in historical operating income or historical net income for any period as a result of these changes.
 
Common Stock Split
 
On April 3, 2012, the Company issued a two-for-one common stock split, effected in the form of a 100% stock dividend. All common share and earnings per share data presented in the attached unaudited consolidated financial statements has been adjusted to reflect the stock split.
 
Other
Reclassifications
 
Certain other immaterial reclassifications also have been made to the prior periods financial information in order to conform to the current periods presentation.
 
 
Note 2. Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
To provide investors information to assist them in assessing the Companys ongoing operations on a comparable basis, the Company has provided Fiscal 2013 financial measures in this press release that exclude the effects of certain non-recurring purchase accounting costs, certain other acquisition-related, integration and restructuring costs resulting from the Charming Acquisition, and certain losses on the extinguishment of debt. Management believes that all of such costs are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance. Throughout this release, the term reported refers to information prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States (GAAP), while the term adjusted refers to non-GAAP financial information adjusted to exclude such costs. All information below is presented for the Companys continuing operations.
 
 
Operating income:
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130305161356.txt.gz
TIME:20130305161356
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
March 4, 2013
Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On March 4, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an investor conference call to discuss the Companys results of operations for its fiscal second quarter ended January 26, 2013 and certain other information, including the contents of the Companys press release dated March 4, 2013 which was furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 8-K on March 4, 2013. The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference. A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
  
Date: March 5, 2013
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
 
Allison Townsend
ICR - IR
David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
Dirk Montgomery
Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
  
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
 
Janet Kloppenburg
JJK Research - Analyst
Scott Krasik
BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
Anna Andreeva
FBR Capital Markets - Analyst
Neely Tamminga
Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
Brian Tunick
JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
Oliver Chen
Citigroup - Analyst
Luke Whorton
KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
Mark Montagna
Avondale Partners - Analyst
Janine Stichter
Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst
Steve Marotta
CL King & Associates - Analyst
Mitch Van Zelfden
SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
PRESENTATION
 
Operator 
 
Good afternoon. My name is Regina and I'll be your conference operator for today. At this time I would like to welcome everyone to the Ascena Retail Group second-quarter earnings conference call. I would now like to introduce Allison Townsend of ICR. Miss Townsend, please begin.
 
 
Allison Townsend
- ICR - IR
 
Thank you Regina and good afternoon, everyone. Today's call is being recorded and will be available for replay later today. Information on accessing this replay is available in today's press release.
 
As a matter of formality, we would like to remind participants that remarks made by Management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties and could cause the actual results and implementation of the Company's plans to vary materially. These risks and uncertainties are referenced in today's press release as well as in the Company's most recently filed Forms 10-K and 10-Q.
 
Finally, in these remarks, we refer to adjusted earnings, which is a non-GAAP financial measure. A reconciliation of the non-GAAP measures we discuss today to GAAP measures are included in today's press release. I would now like to turn the conference call over to your host, Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO. David?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thank you. Good afternoon and thank you for joining us to discuss our fiscal second quarter. I'd like to welcome Dirk Montgomery, our new CFO, to his first Ascena earnings call. We're pleased to have the benefit of his leadership and experience in retail. On today's call I'll recap our second-quarter highlights, Dirk will give you a detailed financial review including guidance, and then I'll update you on our strategic objectives.
 
 
The backdrop for the second quarter was a tough one for specialty retail in general. As you know, traffic especially in the Northeast was hurt by significant weather events including Hurricane Sandy. Economic concerns including budget policy issues and tax increases took a toll on middle income consumers, impacting their behavior. We expect those concerns to continue into spring. The holiday selling season was generally soft.
 
So with that in mind, let's look at the overall financials. Ascena had softer than expected holiday sales with total comp sales of plus 2%. A consolidated decline of 1% in our store comps reflected the external backdrop I just described, with sales plan misses at dressbarn, Lane Bryant, and maurices, partially offset by a strong 27% increase in e-commerce, which continues to become a more important part of our business. Our sales growth of 44% to $1.2 billion in the quarter was driven largely by the inclusion of Lane Bryant and Catherines.
 
Adjusted earnings per share for the second quarter were $0.26, compared to $0.40 per share in the same quarter last year. Some of this year-over-year decline will be addressed as we eliminate redundancy and integrate Lane Bryant and Catherines over the next few years. Our biggest profit miss across the brands was in dressbarn, which had merchandising issues, which have been addressed.
 
I'd like to walk you through each of our five brands in a little detail. First, Justice, which has remained trend right and performed well for holiday. Sales in the second quarter were up 9% with store comps up 4%, e-commerce up 24%. Transactions were up 5% and we saw a 1% increase in dollars per transaction. With regard to specific categories, denim, woven tops, and lifestyle pieces were standout performers. We took the cadence of promotion up versus last year at Justice with a marketing strategy that continues to focus on communicating value through both targeted loyalty programs and store-wide point of sale events. Justice executed additional POS events during the quarter, including flash sales, in which an additional 20% off was offered for short period of time on top of the 40% off the entire store promotion. The three flash sale events during the quarter generated incremental sales and margin dollars. Combined with increased circulation of direct mail catazines, these marketing strategies were very successful in driving business during the quarter.
 
We opened 7 Justice stores, including one in Canada, and closed 10, ending the quarter with 958 stores versus 917 last year. New store performance for Justice is in line with our expectations and generating attractive returns. We would also like to note that we added Brothers to 15 stores in November, bringing the total dual gender store count to 30. The results from these stores continue to be encouraging and we are planning to roll Brothers out to an additional 50 stores in the spring. We're very pleased with the continued strengthening of the Justice brand and its future growth opportunities.
 
Turning to Lane Bryant. As we announced we are very fortunate that Linda Heasley has joined Lane Bryant as President and CEO. We couldn't be more excited to have such a talented and experienced leader for this brand. Linda brings with her a strong track record of performance from her time as President and CEO of Limited Stores, as well as previous senior leadership roles at Timberland, Limited Brands, and CVS. I look forward to working with her as she and her team revitalize the Lane Bryant brand. In the quarter, Lane Bryant felt the traffic decline from the soft retail environment and ended the second quarter with sales down 2%. Accounts were down 5%, offset by new store growth and 17% growth in e-commerce sales. With regard to specific categories, our selection of active, separates, denim, and panties performed well for the quarter with sweaters, bras, and knit separates down versus last year.
 
During Q2 we adopted a more focused promotion strategy and we've reduced the level of overlapping offers that individual customers receive. This strategy, combined with lower seasonal inventory levels and improved initial markups, allowed us to grow Q2 gross margin dollars over last year despite the lower comp. We'll continue to refine those improvements and promotion strategy in the spring. I would also like to note that the penetration of our private label credit card increased to 40%. The Lane Bryant store count is 789 locations at the end of the quarter, versus 802 last year. During the second quarter we opened 2 new stores and closed 28. We're very excited about our new flagship that opened last week on 34th Street in Manhattan. Initial customer feedback has been very positive and we encourage you to visit the store.
 
Turning now to maurices, a traffic decline of 6% affected the business, while total sales growth was 7% due to new stores, and strong e-commerce growth of 51%, store comps were down 1% in the quarter. With respect to categories, our plus size woven tops, branded denim, and dresses performed well. With respect to marketing, we replaced our post Christmas mailer with a November prospect mailer. Our Take 10 loyalty program continues to grow and we've increased the size of our email database to 2.9 million. Additionally the penetration of our private label credit card increased over last year and is now at approximately 37%. Our store base is now 850 locations at the end of the quarter versus 803 stores last year. During the second quarter we opened 13 new stores, including 4 in Canada, and closed 3 stores. New store performance in the first half was in line with sales and profit targets in aggregate and generating healthy returns.
 
Now to dressbarn, our most challenging business in the quarter. Total sales were down 4%, including a 6% decrease in comps. Even so, e-commerce continued to be a bright spot in the business with an impressive increase of 60% for the quarter. Given its high concentration of stores in the Northeast, this was where Hurricane Sandy had the greatest impact. From a merchandising perspective, the majority of our sales and margin dollar miss was driven by weak sweater performance. Fall sweater assortment had a higher fashion penetration that did not resonate with our consumers. We have adjusted the fashion mix for this spring and next fall and are confident we'll have the right sweater offering. On a positive note, dresses, knits, and casual bottoms performed well in Q2 and are all key departments for the spring season. With regard to marketing, we ran similar programs to last year but we have refined our customer targeting and improved our mailer response rates, despite soft sales. Additionally, enrollment in our blushPERKS loyalty program, now a year old, has increased substantially to 4.6 million customers. I'll note that our private label credit card market share is now at 31% of sales.
 
 
At Catherines, our smallest brand, sales grew 3% in the quarter with store comps up 6% and 19% growth in e-commerce sales, partially offset by fewer stores. Merchandise categories that performed well for the quarter include sweaters, knits, sleepwear, and bras. The Catherines marketing program is focused on driving key items and novelty tops. The direct mail program had one additional event this year with eight in total, and the penetration of our private label credit card has increased to 42%. The Catherines store count is at 409 at the end of the quarter versus 435 last year. During the second quarter, we closed eight stores.
 
Before I turn the call over to Dirk for a deeper dive on the numbers, I'll just say that this was obviously a challenging quarter. We know we have opportunities to improve our merchandising, marketing, and promotion strategies to drive top line, and are aggressively addressing those opportunities. I am pleased that we responded to challenges we faced quickly once we saw the problems and transitioned well to spring assortments. Our brands are well positioned for this economic climate by offering attractive fashion at a value to consumers who will continue to be under pressure. Now Dirk will provide an update on financial highlights.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO 
 
Thank you, David and good afternoon everyone. I'm delighted to be joining the call today as the new Ascena CFO, and looking forward to interacting with all of you and Ascena in the Ascena investment community.
 
Before reviewing our second-quarter results, it's important to note that this year's quarterly earnings include certain acquisition and financing related costs. We believe these costs are not indicative of ongoing operations for period-to-period comparisons. Results discussed on this call are adjusted to exclude those items which are more fully described in the earnings press release we issued today. In addition, my comments on last year's quarterly results have been adjusted to include Lane Bryant, Catherines, and Charming Shoppes' overhead costs for comparison purposes, unless otherwise noted.
 
Total quarterly net sales increased 44% to $1.24 billion. Of this amount, Lane Bryant and Catherines accounted for $333 million, or roughly 90% of the growth versus last year. As David mentioned, soft holiday sales and a challenging external environment resulted in comp store sale trends below our expectations at down 1%. Average selling price was down slightly and UPTs were up slightly versus last year. In terms of sales by region, clearly the Northeast was significantly impacted by weather, including the impact of Hurricane Sandy. There were no other significant regional sales variances for the quarter.
 
Moving down the income statement, gross margin was $662 million or 53.5% of sales. This compares to last year's adjusted Q2 of $664 million, or 53.8% of sales. The 30 basis point decline was primarily due to increased markdowns and promotional activity associated with softer than expected sales results. Total buying, occupancy, and distribution costs were $198 million or 16% of sales, compared to last year's adjusted second quarter of $195 million or 16.3% of sales, reflecting modest leverage on our higher sales volume.
 
Total SG&A was $349 million or 28.2% of sales. This compares to Q2 last year of $329 million or 27.5% of sales on an adjusted basis. The increase of 70 basis points was primarily due to the duplicative overhead structure created by the acquisition, and we expect to significantly reduce our overhead over the next three years.
 
Adjusted operating income from continuing operations decreased 9% to $75 million, or 6.1% of sales. This compares to the prior-year adjusted second quarter of $83 million or 6.9% of sales. Adjusted quarterly operating income results by brand fully loaded for corporate overhead costs were as follows. Justice's operating income increased 18% year over year to $91 million, or 20.6% of sales. This compares to prior-year Q2 operating income of $77 million or 18.9% of sales. The increase was due to comp sales above the tipping point and flow-through from improved gross margin versus last year.
 
Lane Bryant came in with an operating loss of $15 million compared to an operating loss of $14 million in Q2 of last year. Improvements in gross margin were more than offset by increases in SG&A, due to the additional layer of corporate overhead structure driven by the acquisition. maurices operating income increased 5% versus last year to $28 million, or 11.5% of sales compared to prior-year Q2 operating income of $26 million, or 11.8% of sales. This was primarily driven by gross margin dollar increases from sales growth.
 
dressbarn came in with an operating loss of $25 million or 11.4% of sales, compared to a prior-year Q2 loss of $3 million or 1.5% of sales. The incremental loss was driven by a decrease in sales and gross margin rates due to higher markdowns and promotional activity. The dressbarn profit decline was the major driver in our total overall decline in operating income versus last year. As David mentioned, while some of this decline was driven by weather and environment, we've addressed the merchandising issues and feel confident that we are in good shape for spring.
 
 
Catherines operating loss was $3 million or 4% of sales, flat compared to the prior-year operating loss. Catherines grew both gross margin dollars and rate above last year, driven by solid top line growth. Similar to Lane Bryant, the additional layer of allocated overhead from the acquisition offset gross margin dollar growth to result in a flat loss versus last year.
 
The Company's effective income tax rate for the second quarter was 39.4%. This compares to a rate of 36.7% in last year's second quarter. The rate for the period was in line with our expectations. The higher rate compared to last year reflects the absence of higher tax benefits relating to a higher level of the accounting for discrete items last year. Adjusted net income from continuing operations decreased 33% to $43 million, or $0.26 per diluted share. This compares to last year's net income of $64 million or $0.40 per diluted share.
 
Turning to the balance sheet. We ended the quarter with $326 million in cash and cash equivalents. Of this amount, approximately $130 million is overseas. We ended the quarter with long-term debt of $277 million, all under our term loan with no revolver draw down. During the quarter we prepaid approximately $20 million of the outstanding principal balance of the term loan. After the quarter we prepaid an additional $16 million in principal under the term loan, reducing its balance to $260 million currently.
 
Due in part to favorable credit market conditions, in February we launched an initiative to explore alternatives to our existing credit agreements, including a potential increase in the size of our ABL facility from $250 million to $500 million. If we implement this increase we will prepay the term loan using cash on hand and by borrowing under the new facility. If successful, we anticipate that this transaction will lower our combined borrowing costs well in excess of the anticipated fees to complete the transaction, while providing greater flexibility.
 
Our inventory levels ending the quarter reflected responsive inventory management and solid January sales that cleared fall goods to acceptable levels. Our fall goods sell-through rates in February were in line with expectations, and we feel our inventory mix is well positioned as we head into the key spring selling months. Total inventory at cost was $499 million, up 1% versus last year's adjusted balance of $494 million. Total units increased 5% year over year. The increase in inventory dollars in units is largely related to an earlier shift in the timing of receipts for spring inventory, primarily at Justice.
 
CapEx for the quarter was approximately $37 million. Full-year fiscal 2013 CapEx is projected at $350 million, which includes approximately $130 million for the major multiyear projects we noted previously -- the Etna, Ohio distribution facility, our e-commerce fulfillment center in Greencastle, Indiana, and our IT transformation to a common platform across all brands. In terms of unit development, we expect to finish the year with new unit openings in the range of 180 to 200 openings, and expect to close between 100 and 150 stores.
 
I'd now like to provide some thoughts on our outlook for spring and full year 2013. We expect the challenging external environment from middle income consumers that we saw in the second quarter to continue into spring. We agree with industry experts, including a recently published National Retail Federation report that the middle income consumer's behavior has been impacted by the payroll tax increase, uncertainty about the labor market, and the general unease created by federal budget and tax issues.
 
February was softer than we expected, but we're hesitant to put too much importance on this. Traffic was down driven by unseasonably cold weather and some significant winter storms. We were also up against tough comparisons from 2012, when weather was warmer. As a result, our total quarter to date, total comp sales for Q3 were up slightly. March and April make a disproportionately large contribution to spring sales and margin dollars across all our brands, particularly our missy brands due to big Easter and Mother's Day shopping occasions. Although we only have early reads on spring assortment performance, we are encouraged by solid selling results on spring receipts. Given that backdrop, we have reduced our sales plans for spring, and are now expecting comp store sales of flat to 3%, and e-commerce sales of approximately up 25%. In response to our revised sales plans, we have adjusted spring inventories to be well positioned for this sales range, and are implementing tightened expense management and accelerated productivity programs.
 
Based on these assumptions and actions, we are reaffirming our fiscal 2013 earnings guidance of $1.20 to $1.30 per share, which excludes one-time acquisition related integration, restructuring, and purchase accounting costs as a result of the Charming acquisition. That concludes my financial comments and I'll now turn it back over to David.
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Dirk. Beyond the season-to-season management of the business, we're intently focused on moving forward our strategic priorities for driving sustained long-term sales and profit growth. We've already talked a lot about top line trends today and I'd like to close the call with an update on our plans to drive margin improvement on our progress on building talent to drive higher performance.
 
 
As we noted in October at our Investor Day, we have three major strategies for achieving our long-term goal of operating income margins of 12%. First, we continue to see $50 million in overhead reduction opportunities from the Charming acquisition. Based on progress through the second quarter we're confident we will meet or beat our fiscal 2013 goal and are working toward continued savings in 2014. Second, we identified synergy opportunities across the brands of at least $37 million annually in logistics, services, and technology. We have six major initiatives underway to achieve those savings that are progressing well and should begin to generate savings late 2014. Third, we are making progress on the early stages of creating a global sourcing organization to leverage scale across all brands. The first stage of this effort is adding talent and we've been phasing in design resources at both dressbarn and maurices. We also recently announced that Ronnie Robinson will lead our Ascena global sourcing team, and he is in the process of building his team.
 
In summary, we're making very good progress on our efforts to improve margins. None of this gets accomplished without leadership and talent, and we have strengthened our Executive leadership team over the last six months in a number of positions. While we've talked about Dirk and Linda, and I just mentioned Ronnie, our sourcing leader, we've also filled other key roles. We announced a new CIO, David Johns last week, a top talent with great experience. At dressbarn we have also recently recruited a number of highly talented leaders in merchandising, marketing, design, and real estate. I look forward to seeing a very positive contribution from these seasoned leaders to our growth as they transition into their new roles over the coming months.
 
Our leadership team is looking forward to growing the business and driving higher margins. We're very encouraged by the opportunities we have to create superior shareholder returns over the long term. Thank you. And I'd now like to open up the call to your questions.
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
 
Operator
 
(Operator Instructions)
 
Janet Kloppenburg, JJK Research.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
David, I just wanted to ask you and Dirk a little bit about the spring trends. It sounds like you're doing a little bit better. Your comp is up slightly right now. I think maybe you were down 1% for the second quarter. Does that up slightly include the internet or is that just the store? Is that the store and internet combined, or just the store comp?
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks for asking that question, Janet. What we've done is segue over to a view of total comp sales, including brick-and-mortar and e-commerce.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
Right. Okay.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
And on a quarterly basis we do break it out for you. I would just say that the general weighting hasn't changed much in terms of e-commerce's impact. So on a total basis, quarter-to-date, which for us is the four weeks of February and the eight days of fiscal March, we're up slightly.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
Okay. And then have you seen the trend improve as we've started to approach the Easter season, or has it been up and down and no real trend?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
I think we can all acknowledge that the beginning of February was tough across the industry. I think we all read the same articles and --
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Right.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Saw the Walmart leak and all had the same weather issues, et cetera. So I wouldn't say that our trends were any different than I'm sure what you've seen out there.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Okay. Just a couple more. On the synergies that you talked about, the $50 million, I'm sorry, and the $50 million in overhead reductions, you said that you might -- I think that's for this year, is that right?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO  
 
No actually, Janet, it's over a three-year period.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst  
 
Over three-year period.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
Right.
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
But is there an opportunity for better than expected results for your plan this year, David?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
On the overhead reduction?
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
Yes.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
We hope so. It won't be dramatic.
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
Okay.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
But the $10 million is out there. Dirk's kicking me under the table here. But I'd say we're tracking slightly above that number right now.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
Sorry, Dirk. Dirk, this one's for you. On the consideration of a new ABL, when would you make that decision? And would that have impact on your capital costs for the second half of fiscal '13?
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO 
 
Yes, it absolutely would. We're in the process of trying to get the deal done. So we're hopeful that we can get it done as soon as possible. Obviously, it's subject to a lot of market conditions, but we're optimistic and we actually think it's going to generate an accretive interest expense save this year.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
And that's not included in your guidance at this time?
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO 
 
Yes, I would say as part of our confidence in maintaining the $1.20 to $1.30 guidance, frankly we're expecting that we're going to get a benefit from the refinancing.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
Okay. So some of it is -- I wasn't sure if that meant that maybe guidance could improve once the ABL was complete.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO 
 
No, I think we consider that as an offset to -- To the softer sales.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
To the sales change. To the tick-down in the comp estimate. Is that fair?
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO 
 
Yes.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
 
Okay. And then I have one more question. On dressbarn's outlook, it sounds like things are going better there here in the spring season, and I know just how big the Easter season is to that brand. I'm wondering if we should expect or forecast that margins would improve year over year for dressbarn, the operating margin, in this season versus last year.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
I sure hope so, Janet. It was such a disaster in the fall, and while we've talked about that ad nauseam --
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
Right.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I see no reason why we can't have a more normalized spring. It's very early in the season for dresses as we start approaching Easter. We are looking at the tea leaves of the early selling and don't see any warning signs. Obviously, Janet, you and I have been in this game long enough. If there's a blizzard, Easter week, that would not be good for dressbarn's dress sales as wells as the other brands.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst 
 
Okay. Okay. Great. Well, lots of luck to you guys and I'll speak with you later.
 
 
Operator
 
Scott Krasik, BB&T Capital Markets.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
So you didn't call out Justice as a negative on the gross margins, so is this -- were you able to leverage even in your merchandise margin rate the flash sales, and is that something that we can expect going forward, if you continue them?
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO 
 
Well, why don't I speak to the margins and David can speak to the flash sales and how it works into their overall marketing strategy. Justice did see a slight improvement in gross margin rate. Obviously, they had improvement in gross margin dollars for the quarter. And I think we were happy that those promotions, specifically, drove incremental sales and gross margin dollars.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
So, Scott, to the second part, we are planning more flash sales very surgically for spring, and we believe that we'll see the same results that we saw this fall this spring. And we're being very thoughtful about how many days or when to position it and watching our gross margin carefully to see the impact both in dollars and rate. But so far, we've been very pleased. And if rate were to shrink just a touch as you would expect with the additional 20% off, we feel we're going to more than make up for it in terms of total dollars.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 
Okay. That's helpful. And then I think you were shutting down Fashion Bug at the end of January or early February. Shouldn't there have been -- wasn't there supposed to be a big benefit to SG&A just from that and taking down their mainframe and a lot of that? Have we seen that play out yet in the P&L?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
Scott, that's discontinued operations.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. Even from the corporate standpoint? Wasn't there a corporate overhead associated with Fashion Bug still?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
There is. And there was. And if it's not in discontinued, you'll see it as part of our overhead reduction and that's all baked into our numbers.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. And then just last, Dirk, you mentioned the re-fi contributing to the guidance. What were some of the other programs that you accelerated to be able to achieve the same guidance?
 
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Sure. Really three key items. One, we actually did a little bit better than we had thought at the close of the second quarter. January sales were a little bit stronger than we thought and we were able to actually clear fall goods at higher rates than we had originally anticipated. As David mentioned, we're anticipating some, although we need to determine how much, upside on the overhead reduction and synergies from the acquisition and some of the other programs we have going in place. And then thirdly, really just ongoing productivity improvement and expense management. And that would be in addition, then, to the ABL saves.
 
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. All right. Thanks and good luck.
 
 
Operator
 
Anna Andreeva, FBR.
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst 
 
Congrats on building out the leadership team. I had a few questions. So 2Q comps coming in better than expected. Could you guys talk about what you saw in January? I think you did say you were able to clear through some of the product at better rates, but just talk about acceleration by division. Second, I was hoping you could talk about a new sales target for 2013, given that you reined in expectations for 3Q. I'm not sure if you did quantify what is the refinancing contributing to EPS, and a little bit of color about the new initiatives to drive productivity and expense control. Thanks.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
Well, that's a lot.
 
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO 
 
We just wrote all those down.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
I'll take the first one. January, as Dirk said, it turned out to be a pretty good month for us for all our brands, for the industry too. Maybe that was before reality set in with the payroll tax. There was maybe a little bit of good weather in there. Can't really tell you why, but we were able to clear a little more inventory than we expected at better rates than we had budgeted. So that was all good news, and that's why the guidance that we gave you back at just before ICR, was improved by the $0.03 that we just reported today. So that's why we feel comfortable as Dirk said. We're holding on to the $1.20, $1.30 because we're coming in with $0.03 right there. I'll let him go talk further about that. In terms of the new initiatives, and then I'm going to turn it over to Dirk on the two other issues, I wasn't quite sure which ones you were referring to, Anna. So help me there.
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst 
 
You were talking about additional expense controls as well as new productivity improvements.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
Yes. I don't think I would say they're new. I think what we said was that we're just accelerating some of them, they're coming in a little bit faster than we had originally anticipated. That's giving us a little bit of wind at our back to help us achieve that $1.20, $1.30. It's another one of those factors. But I wouldn't say there's anything new that we're doing or that we're putting into place.
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst 
 
Okay.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
And then Dirk, do you want to talk about -- I think the first question was about your -- the sales for the year. Anna, do you want to go back and say it again?
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst 
 
Right. Just curious about the new sales goals that you guys have for the year. You had talked about $5 billion previously.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO 
 
Yes, $5 billion -- well, in terms of the spring, the revised spring guidance range of 0% to 3%, if you just roll that to full year, the total would be in the range of low 2%'s to close to 4% in terms of the total comp including e-commerce.
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst 
 
Okay. And just curious if you guys have quantified what is the refinancing contribution to EPS in that guidance range? Thanks.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
 
So what we think for the guidance for spring or for the balance of the year, the spring impact, assuming that things go as we project, it will probably be about $0.01.
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst 
 
Okay.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
So that's another $0.01 to the good on that $1.20, $1.30 goal that we've got set.
 
Anna Andreeva
- FBR Capital Markets - Analyst 
 
Okay. Got you. Well, best of luck and congrats on seeing improvement in the business.
 
Operator
 
Neely Tamminga, Piper Jaffray.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
David, you've been making some great acquisitions and talent, not just brands and companies here of late. Wondering if you could remind us if there's some other major holes within your organization that we need to be on the look out for in terms of the team. Or do you think you're there at this point?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO 
 
Almost, almost. At our maurices brand, we've been working with an interim Chief Merchandising Officer, and we would really like to get that figured out and get a permanent solution there, and we've got some irons in the fire there and hope to have an announcement sooner than later. But these things, you're never sure. That's really the one other major hole that I'd say we have right now. Maybe one or two at the VP level that we're working on but nothing that I think will be a game-changer the way a CMO at maurices could be.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
We certainly want to give Linda Heasley the leeway that she's going to need to turn Lane Bryant around. I think you've indicated there's just been legacy issues of changing the overall direction of that brand year after year. But I am wondering to what extent you think that she can actually road map a little bit more of a turnaround in that business? Can she affect some of the fall receipts at this point in time? Are we looking into early spring before her real ability to impact the business is on deck? Some guidance there would be helpful.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I think that there will be some impact on the fall business, even if it's just to think through product distortions or fine-tuning colors or what have you. I'm sure that she will have some impact. But I think it's going to be at least spring until she's really able to start putting her stamp on the business and maybe after, so it's an evolution. I think she's got to study the business and learn it, and many of the members of her team are relatively new, within the last year or two. So I think they've got to come together and work at the repositioning of the brand. So we're being very careful and thoughtful as we project out that business. We're just as anxious, of course, as everyone is to see that business start performing better. But at the same time, we don't want to rush it and make a rash move. So I think we want to give Linda a little more freedom to study it and determine the best course of action and do a lot of testing along the way.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
 
That's helpful. And I have one final question on dressbarn. As we think about their road map, I think you were indicating at the ICR exchange, very appropriately talking about the volume of the business shifting from sweaters into dresses as we think about the spring season. Sounds like you're talking about some positive indications here on some of those early reads for dresses. Of course, weather can always be a wrench in anyone's plan in retail land. I guess what I'm trying to understand is are the comparisons actually eased as we look into March and April relative to what we saw in the difficult comparison in February? Could dressbarn's comps actually overall end up being in that overall Company comp average range of flat, up 3%? Just trying to figure out the plausibility of that.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Last year dressbarn's March comps were up 11%. Certainly we're going to appreciate having that early Easter to help drive against that March business from last year as you may recall, was a warm March. I don't really know, Neely. We're certainly not going out there and projecting any big numbers. You saw that we took our comps down for the spring from 3% to 5%, to 0% to 3%; we think that's very realistic, and we think dressbarn is well positioned like all the other brands for spring. We don't see any of the challenges that we had in the fall season at dressbarn carrying over to spring.
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray & Co. - Analyst
 
Great. Thanks and good luck you guys.
 
Operator
 
Brian Tunick, JPMorgan.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
I guess we were looking at the analyst marketing materials you guys had at your big day a couple of months ago, and it looked like Lane Bryant at about 55% of sales from a gross margin basis, looked pretty in line with other apparel retailers out there. To us, it looked like your buying, distribution, and occupancy line at I think 21% of sales, that actually looked pretty high. So I guess first question we were wondering if it's Lane Bryant's more of a productivity or expense story than we originally thought, and it's less about a full price selling opportunity. If you could maybe comment, do you see significant merchandise margin opportunity, even though there they're apparently already at the mid-50%s?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I do think it's a little of both, Brian. The other thing that you may not be seeing as clearly is we're hitting Lane Bryant and Catherines with two overheads. So they're getting their share of the Ascena overhead and then they're getting their share for Lane Bryant, it's 80% of the Charming overhead. So that factors into it. The gross margin, I think is not unreasonable, but we need to look at that because one of the challenges there is that the sales per square foot productivity is below what we'd like, and one of the ways to deliver that, we believe, is to provide more value to the passerby versus the customer. So the regular customer is getting all these mailings. I talked a little about overlapping offers. We're slowly backing away from that because there was a big spread in the out-the-door price that the customer would pay versus the passerby. And so when we did our surveys we got a lot of feedback saying your prices are too high. So we need to bring those in line and create a little more consistency between the passerby and consumer, the customer, and I think that will help drive up our comps, our productivity. And if we can keep our margins in good order, in the mid-50%s and then work on controlling our expenses through some of the things I mentioned earlier, overhead reduction, synergies, et cetera, there's no reason why this can't be a very solid, strong performing brand in the next few years.
 
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Okay, great. The second question, relative to the consumer out there, how do you rank your brands relative to the payroll tax issue or income taxes or anything like that? How do you think about the brands being most vulnerable to being least vulnerable if this is the consumer tenor as we move through the spring season?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
 
I'd like to say that all our brands are well positioned and I think they are because we're -- all the brands, however they market or promote to it are value brands. So we're not the fancy, high end brands that sell or attempt to sell full price in the mall. And as a result, in many of the cases we'll get tradedown, and we saw this back with Lehman four years ago that customers from the higher end specialty stores or department stores were now shopping at our stores. So that's one thing. The other thing is I think our brands are more niche-oriented than many of the retailers, specialty apparel retailers out there. So if you want large size or -- as in Lane Bryant's case, or pure play or extended large size as in Catherines' case, you don't have a lot of choices. So yes, you can go to the department store. But if you want that specialty store experience, and the service that we provide, I think that we have a little bit of a protected niche. Having said that, if the tide goes out, all the boats are going to drop a little bit. So what we've got to do is market aggressively, make sure that we're doing a good job on fashion and, et cetera, and service, et cetera, to try and continue to take market share as we've done so well at Justice, and maybe have an opportunity to do a better job at our other brands.
 
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Just a final one for Dirk. On the flat to up 3% comp guidance for spring, are you assuming all businesses are flat to positive? Are you assuming any businesses are negative?
 
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
No, we're assuming that they're all in that range. So I mean, you've got obviously we're going to have some variation within the brands, but I think we're all expecting them to be up.
 
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Okay. Thanks very much guys, and good luck for spring.
 
 
Operator
 
Oliver Chen, Citigroup.
 
 
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Just a question regarding what you're seeing in the marketplace with regards to product cost inflation, and if this presents an incremental risk or an opportunity with how you think about your pricing leeway within your banners.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We really haven't seen much pressure. We have cycled through the cotton issue, if you remember from a couple of seasons ago, cotton shot up and then it shot back down again. Chinese labor is going up, there's no question. But the labor as a percent of the product isn't dramatic, and our vendors have been fairly aggressive at either holding the cost or possibly, in some cases, moving locations or what have you. So we haven't seen any dramatic pressure, and what small amounts we see generally balance out, and where we've needed to increase our prices by brand or by category within the brands, we've, for the most part, been able to do it and pass that on to the customers.
 
 
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Okay. Thanks. And regarding your earlier statements and your outlook for an improving or a comp that's flat to up slightly, what's happening with the Lane Bryant and dressbarn comp in terms of the negative 5% to negative 6% currently versus the forecast? Like which are the comp levers that we should expect to see improve in order for you to make your revised algorithm?
 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Oliver, who knows what's going to happen this spring, but what Dirk just said, what we believe is that for spring season all the brands should be up in the low-single digits. Now, obviously as the season plays out, some may outperform others. But we believe all of the brands, including Lane Bryant and dressbarn, that had the most challenging second quarter, should still be able to have a positive comp. And as I mentioned earlier, the challenges we saw at dressbarn in particular are behind us, and going into March with Easter just whatever, four weeks away, we feel pretty good that we are well positioned to do well.
 
 
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Okay. Our final question is just a modeling question. When we think about the SG&A dollars in the third and fourth quarter, should we model sequentially -- a sequential increase off of the 2Q number? It's just a little more challenging give that we don't necessarily have the pro forma year over year.
 
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
On a GAAP basis I think for full year, I think you can expect SG&A percent as a percent of sales to be more or less in line with second quarter.
 
 
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Okay. Great. Very helpful. Thank you. Best regards.
 
Operator 
 
Edward Yruma, KeyBanc Capital.
 
Luke Whorton
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
This is Luke Whorton in for Eddie Yruma. Revisiting on Justice and the opportunity at Brothers, it seems as though things have gone according to plan and you're up to about 30 stores, maybe a slight acceleration up to 50 stores in the spring season. Is that an indication that things are maybe going potentially better than expected? And what learnings have you had there, and what potential headwind -- or tailwind I should say to comps and possibly gross margin expansion?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We're pretty excited about Brothers, and it's not a huge increase from our original plan. But yes, it's an increase. And I think that speaks to the learnings, some of which really aren't quantified. We learned what the boy or the mom buying for the boy is looking for and price points and style, et cetera. But specifically, what was very, very encouraging is that when we did the analysis, we found that the Justice, the girls business was not impacted by the addition of Brothers. So that's huge.
 
So what that means is, even though we took square footage away from girls, it did not hurt the girls business. So the girls comp traded in line with the rest of the chain. So clearly, then, the Brothers business became completely incremental. So we think that's very, very bullish and we think in the future there's no reason why all our stores can't have a Brothers component to it. So we'll get more productivity out of that box, both in terms of your sales per square foot, and obviously from your gross margin perspective as well. So very good news, and it will certainly take many years to roll it out completely. We see that to be incremental business increasing year after year.
 
Luke Whorton
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
And is the comp -- I don't know if you can break this out but the feel you've gotten from Brothers, is it comparable to the comp you have for the rest of the Justice girls business?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
It hasn't comped yet. This is our first year.
 
Luke Whorton
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
I should say the contribution to sales, is it at a productivity level that's comparable to the girls business yet or it's just --
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
No.
 
Luke Whorton
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Simply accretive to -- it's an addition on top of your productivity with girls.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
It's addition on top of that, but it's a brand-new business. Obviously we've been doing Justice for a long time. So not a surprise, and we see lots of opportunity to continue to grow the top line, the productivity of that, as well as to improve the margins.
 
Luke Whorton
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Great. And then one last follow-up question on Justice. With the roll-out of your stores in Canada, are you continuing to see higher productivity levels there than your US stores, as you previously noted?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
On average; that's correct.
 
Luke Whorton
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. Thank you very much.
 
Operator 
 
Mark Montagna, Avondale Partners.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Follow-up on the Brothers topic. David, how come it will take multiple years for Brothers to roll out? Because when you put in plus sizes over at maurices quite a few years ago I think you did that all in one calendar year.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We actually did it as a big bang.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Yes.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
It's very different. Because if you've seen one of our Brothers stores or we call them dual gender stores, you'll notice that we built out a little shop within the store. And that's critical, because you don't want the girls feeling that we've now made it a dual gender store. We don't want to become PS, where they're all mixed together. So we have this little shop depending on the store, either in the back corner, maybe in the front corner, but it's completely isolated, and that way the girl still has this big store and the Brothers is only about 20% of the selling square footage. But we build it out so it looks like a boys tree fort and, therefore, it is isolated. It is unique to boys. And to build those out costs money and takes time. So we can't just snap our fingers and convert the chain.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay. Yes, I've seen a couple up in Columbus and I thought it looked really good.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Good. Thank you.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Yes. So then, expense leverage. What is -- looking at third and fourth quarter, what comp would you need to leverage expenses for, say, BDO, and then also for SG&A in the third and fourth quarter?
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
Yes. Well, certainly it would probably be in the higher end of the revised guidance range, Mark. This is Dirk. I can work with you offline to give you a more refined answer on that after the call.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay. And then lastly, it sounded like -- I think heard this correct, that February comps were a little behind where you wanted to be.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
No.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst  
 
No?
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
 
I mean, sure. Let me -- I didn't mean to cut you off. Finish your question. Then I'll answer it.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst  
 
The weather and Social Security tax, all that.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO  
 
Right.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst  
 
Everybody's behind. So little behind where you want to be but you've adjusted spring inventory, so is it fair to say that you do not have an inventory backup, that you're okay with where you are with inventory?
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Overall, I would say that's absolutely right. Within one or two of the brands there's a pocket or two of category or whatever that they're still working on, frankly. I think we'll be fine. I don't anticipate problems. But it's something that Dirk and I watch and keep an eye on because you just don't know if the business is going to continue on plan or if it hiccups and you don't want to be stuck with extra inventory of course.
 
Mark Montagna  
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay. So you were going to correct me. Did I hear you correct that you were just a little behind or --?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO  
 
I think what we said earlier was quarter to date --
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst  
 
Right.
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We're up slightly. So given the disaster that we all read about in early February, I think we're in good shape and there were some comments oh, my gosh, everybody saw the Walmart e-mail and whatnot. So while certainly we did not make our plan for February, just some feedback, oh, this was a disaster month, and I just want to make sure everybody understands that up slightly isn't up as much as we would like it to be, but it sure wasn't down -- what was it -- 32% as some other people may have been.
 
Mark Montagna  
- Avondale Partners - Analyst
 
Okay. All right. Thanks for that correction. And then when you talked about adjusting the spring inventories, were you able to cancel orders? Because it seems like you typically would own the entire supply chain. How did you adjust spring inventories?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO  
 
 
It varies, Mark, by brand. Some of it is cancelling orders. Some of it is putting out deliveries for later date or transferring orders from a May delivery to a June delivery or not making quite as many and saving those piece goods for another style that will be delivered later. Every merchant, every buyer's got their little tricks to control inventory.
 
Mark Montagna
- Avondale Partners - Analyst  
 
Okay. All right. Great. Thanks.
 
Operator 
 
Janine Stichter, Telsey Advisor.
 
Janine Stichter
- Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst  
 
Just a couple of questions. I know you were hoping to transfer some of the sales from Fashion Bug as you closed it to come of the other brands, particularly dressbarn. Wondering if you saw any of that during the second quarter and if there was still any opportunity there? And also on Lane Bryant just curious what kind of productivity you're seeing from some of the stores that had migrated off-mall compared to those that are on-mall?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO  
 
Sure. With the Fashion Bug transfer, I would tell you that we just closed the stores at the end of the quarter. So we didn't expect to see much until spring. So everybody's in Fashion Bug getting their great deals on the last remnants at crazy prices and getting the bounceback to shop our other brands. So the next big shopping event is Easter. So that's when we'll probably start seeing the coupons coming in, and we're tracking it and I'm sure by the next call I'll have a better sense of how successful that effort was, based on what we were able to track. Right now, it's anecdotal and that's it. On the Lane Bryant, I don't have any new numbers to share with you, although we do track it. The number that is of interest when we transfer a store from -- or relocate a store from a mall to a strip, we typically get a nice pop in our sales, our store is more productive, and we get a nice reduction in our occupancy cost. So together, the two drive a more profitable model for us. Let us dissect things and give Dirk a call in another few weeks and we'll be able to follow up and give you more specific numbers for that, Janine.
 
 
Janine Stichter
- Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst
 
Okay. Great. Thank you very much.
 
Operator
 
 
Steve Marotta, CL King and Associates.
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst  
 
David, in your prepared remarks you mentioned that Lane Bryant gross margin in the fourth quarter benefited from the reduction in overlapping promotions versus a year ago. Can you talk a little about the runway for a similar strategy that may benefit Lane Bryant gross margin dollars over the next quarter or two or three?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO  
 
Sure. What we've done is take a look, as I mentioned earlier, about this disconnect between the great deal that the customers get with these stackable coupons, versus the passerby that didn't get any of those coupons because she's not on the mailing list or the e-com list or what have you. So what we're trying to do is look at all our promos and make sure that they all stand alone as well as provide in-store promos to the passerby. So we're not necessarily looking to reduce our markdown rate. We just want to spread it out a little bit differently. So as we heard earlier, the margin rate's not too bad. We just want to make sure that we're attracting new customers into the store and converting them, as well as giving our existing customers a reason to come back.
 
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst  
 
Great. Can you talk also about proportionate sales breakout by month in the third quarter, again, not on a dollars basis but on a proportionate basis, how much is done in February, March, April?
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I don't know if Dirk's got that at his fingertips. But just let me remind you that March is a five week month, and Easter comes at the end of March and February's still really a clearance month. So Dirk's scrambling. Why don't you give him a call later.
 
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO
 
We've got that. I can get back to you with that. Obviously, Marpril is much more significant. Those two months are much more significant than February. So I'll get back to you offline on that.
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst  
 
No problem. Lastly, I just want to verify that I heard correctly. Assuming a potential re-fi and the timing that you guys are anticipating, that would benefit the current year to the tune of $0.01. Is that accurate?
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - CFO  
 
Yes. Obviously that's pending when we can get it closed and if it's what we think it's going to be. But we think that that's a reasonable expectation.
 
Steve Marotta
- CL King & Associates - Analyst  
 
Great. Thank you.
 
Operator 
 
Mitch Van Zelfden, SunTrust.
 
 
Mitch Van Zelfden
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
On dressbarn, aside from the weather issues in the Northeast, is there anyway you could comment how the division performed in smaller markets versus the larger markets?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO  
 
Good question. I can't answer it for you. We don't slice and dice it that way but we can and so I'd ask you to follow up with Dirk.
 
Mitch Van Zelfden
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst  
 
 
Okay. Second, how are accessories trending at maurices? Do you feel that's an opportunity this spring?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO  
 
Oh, man, you set me up on that one, huh, Mitch? We have a new divisional for accessories at maurices, who is terrific and he's been on board now for I want to say two months or three months. He is going to make a huge change and has really started repositioning the accessory business, and I think you will see the change this spring. I think he's going to have a really positive impact. So I'm very excited to see how that business develops.
 
 
Mitch Van Zelfden
- SunTrust Robinson Humphrey - Analyst
 
Okay. Great. Thank you.
 
Operator
 
 
Ladies and gentlemen, this does conclude the question and answer portion of today's event. I'd like to turn the call back over to Management for any closing remarks they'd like to make.
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thank you everyone for your interest and we'll look forward to speaking to you at the end of our third quarter. Have a good evening.
 
 
Operator
 
Ladies and gentlemen, with that you may now disconnect. Have a good day.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130314135338.txt.gz
TIME:20130314135338
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington
, D.C. 20549
 
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
March 13, 2013
Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
 
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern
, New York 10901
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
 
(845) 369-4500
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
  
  
Item 1.01  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On March 13, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) and certain of its domestic subsidiaries entered into an amendment and restatement agreement (the Amendment and Restatement Agreement) to amend and restate the Companys credit agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as amended and restated as of June14, 2012 (the Existing Credit Agreement) with the lenders thereunder and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
 
The Amendment and Restatement Agreement amended and restated the Existing Credit Agreement by increasing the five-year credit facility by $50 million from $250 million to $300 million. The Company then borrowed $263,500,000 under the Existing Credit Agreement to pay off the entire principal balance outstanding under the Term Credit Agreement, dated as of June 14, 2012, among the Company, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Immediately after paying off the Term Credit Agreement, the Existing Credit Agreement was amended and restated (the Restated Credit Agreement). The Restated Credit Agreement is among the Company and certain of its domestic subsidiaries, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent, Bank of America, N.A., as syndication agent, U.S. Bank National Association and Fifth Third Bank, as co-documentation agents, and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, as joint lead arrangers and joint book runners.  The Restated Credit Agreement provides a senior secured revolving credit facility up to $500 million. The Existing Credit Agreement was scheduled to expire on June14, 2017, but the Restated Credit Agreement will mature on June 14, 2018. The revolving credit facility may be used for the issuance of letters of credit, to fund working capital requirements and capital expenditures, and for general corporate purposes. The Restated Credit Agreement includes a $250 million letter of credit sublimit, of which $60 million can be used for standby letters of credit, and a $25 million swing loan sublimit. The interest rates, pricing and fees under the Restated Credit Agreement fluctuate based on excess availability, as defined in the Restated Credit Agreement.
 
The Restated Credit Agreement contains customary representations, warranties, and affirmative covenants. The Restated Credit Agreement also contains customary negative covenants, subject to negotiated exceptions on (i) liens, (ii) investments, (iii) indebtedness, (iv) significant corporate changes, including mergers and acquisitions, (v) dispositions, (vi) restricted payments and certain other restrictive agreements. The Restated Credit Agreement also contains customary events of default, such as payment defaults, cross-defaults to other material indebtedness, bankruptcy and insolvency, the occurrence of a defined change in control, or the failure to observe the negative covenants and other covenants related to the operation of the Companys business.
 
The Companys obligations under the Restated Credit Agreement are guaranteed by certain of its domestic subsidiaries (the Subsidiary Guarantors). As collateral security under the Restated Credit Agreement and the guarantees thereof, the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors have granted to the administrative agent, for the benefit of the lenders, a lien on substantially all of their tangible and intangible assets, including, without limitation, certain domestic inventory and certain material real estate.
 
The above descriptions of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement and the Restated Credit Agreement are not complete and are qualified in their entirety by the actual terms of the agreements, copies of which are attached to this report as Exhibit 10.1 and Exhibit 10.2.
 
Item 2.03  Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
 
The information required by this Item is included in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 10.1
 
EXECUTION COPY
 
AMENDMENT AND RESTATEMENT AGREEMENT dated as of March 13, 2013 (this ), to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012 (the ), among ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC., a Delaware corporation (the ), the other LOAN PARTIES party hereto, the LENDERS party hereto, the ISSUING BANKS party hereto and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent and Swingline Lender.
Agreement
Existing Credit Agreement
Company
 
The Company has requested certain amendments to and other transactions under the Existing Credit Agreement, and the Lenders party hereto, the Issuing Banks party hereto, the Swingline Lender and the Administrative Agent are willing to agree to such amendments and transactions on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein.
 
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein contained and other good and valuable consideration, the sufficiency and receipt of which are hereby acknowledged, and intending to be legally bound, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1.01.         . As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms
 
 means the Commitment Letter dated February 15, 2013, among JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Bank of America, N.A., Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and the Company.
Commitment Letter
 
 means a Lender under the Existing Credit Agreement as in effect on the date hereof that will not continue as a Lender under the Restated Credit Agreement (as defined below).
Departing Lender
 
 means a Lender whose Applicable Percentage under and as defined in the Restated Credit Agreement will exceed its Applicable Percentage under and as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement as in effect on the Third Restatement Effective Date (as defined below).
Increasing Lender
 
 means a Lender whose Applicable Percentage under and as defined in the Restated Credit Agreement will be less than its Applicable Percentage under and as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement as in effect on the Third Restatement Effective Date.
Reducing Lender
 
Except as expressly specified otherwise, terms defined in the Restated Credit Agreement used but not otherwise defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Restated Credit Agreement.
 
 
SECTION 1.02.         . Subject to the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in Section 1.06 below, on the Third Restatement Effective Date, but prior to the amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement pursuant to Section 1.03, the following transactions shall be carried out in the order set forth below:
Increase in Commitments under Existing Credit Agreement; Borrowing and Repayment of Loans under Term Credit Facility
 
(i)          each financial institution that will be a Lender under the Restated Credit Agreement shall transfer to the Administrative Agent in same day funds an amount equal to its Applicable Percentage (based on its Revolving Commitment under the Restated Credit Agreement) of the Loans to be outstanding under the Restated Credit Agreement after giving effect to the transactions provided for in this Section and Section 1.03.
 
(ii)         the Revolving Commitment of JPMCB under the Existing Credit Agreement will be increased as provided in Section 2.09(e) of such Agreement by $50,000,000, such that the Revolving Commitments under the Existing Credit Agreement will equal $300,000,000 in the aggregate;
 
(iii)         JPMCB will assume the Revolving Commitment of each Departing Lender under the Existing Credit Agreement, and each Departing Lender will be relieved of its obligations as, and will cease to be, a Lender under the Existing Credit Agreement (but the provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 of the Existing Credit Agreement shall survive and remain in full force pursuant to Section 9.05 of such agreement);
 
(iv)        the Company will borrow Revolving Loans under the Existing Credit Agreement in an aggregate principal amount equal to $263,250,000.00 (and JPMCB will advance funds on behalf of each Lender if and in the amount by which such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such borrowing exceeds the amount advanced by it pursuant to the preceding clause (i)); and
 
(v)         the proceeds of the Revolving Loans referred to in the preceding clause (iv) will be applied by the Administrative Agent to prepay the Loans and related amounts outstanding on or accrued to the Third Restatement Effective Date under the Term Credit Agreement pursuant to Section 2.09(a) of such Agreement.
 
SECTION 1.03.         . (a)Subject to the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in Section 1.06 below, on the Third Restatement Effective Date, immediately following the completion of the transactions provided for in Section 1.02, the Existing Credit Agreement (including the Schedules and Exhibits thereto) shall without further action be amended and restated (the ) in the form attached as Exhibit A hereto (the Existing Credit Agreement, as so amended and restated, being called the ).
Amendment and Restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement; Assignments and Purchases of Loans
Restatement
Restated Credit Agreement
 
 
(b)          Immediately upon the effectiveness of the Restated Credit Agreement as provided in the preceding paragraph (a), (i) the aggregate principal amount of the Revolving Loans outstanding thereunder as a result of the borrowing provided for in clause (iv) of Section 1.02 (the ) will be deemed for purposes of the adjustments provided for in this paragraph to be repaid (though such Revolving Loans will not in fact be repaid), (ii) each Increasing Lender that shall have been a Lender prior to the Restatement will pay to the Administrative Agent in same day funds an amount equal to the difference between (A) the product of (1) such Lenders Applicable Percentage (calculated after giving effect to the Restatement), multiplied by (2) the amount of the Subsequent Borrowings (as hereinafter defined) and (B) the product of (1) such Lenders Applicable Percentage (calculated without giving effect to the Restatement), multiplied by (2) the amount of the Initial Loans, (iii) each Increasing Lender that shall not have been a Lender prior to the Restatement will pay to the Administrative Agent in same day funds an amount equal to the product of (1) such Increasing Lenders Applicable Percentage (calculated after giving effect to the Restatement) multiplied by (2) the amount of the Subsequent Borrowings, and (iv) after the Administrative Agent receives the funds specified in clauses (ii) and (iii) above, the Administrative Agent will pay to each Reducing Lender a portion of such funds that is equal to the excess of (A) the product of (1) such Reducing Lenders Applicable Percentage (calculated without giving effect to the Restatement) multiplied by (2) the amount of the Initial Loans, over (B) the product of (1) such Reducing Lenders Applicable Percentage (calculated after giving effect to the Restatement) multiplied by (2) the amount of the Subsequent Borrowings, net of any amount that shall have been funded by JPMCB on behalf of such Lender pursuant to clause (iv) of Section 1.02 (it being agreed that any such amount will be retained by JPMCB for its own account), (v) after the effectiveness of the Restatement, the Company shall be deemed to have made new Borrowings (the ) in an aggregate principal amount equal to the aggregate principal amount of the Initial Loans and of the same types and with the same Interest Periods as the Initial Loans, and (vi) each Lender under the Restated Credit Agreement shall be deemed to hold its Applicable Percentage (calculated after giving effect to the Restatement) of each Subsequent Borrowing. Each Increasing Lender hereby authorizes and instructs the Administrative Agent to effect the payment to be made by such Lender under clause (ii) or (iii) of the preceding sentence by applying the appropriate amount transferred by such Increasing Lender to the Administrative Agent pursuant to clause (i) of Section 1.02. The deemed payments made pursuant to clause (i) above in respect of each Eurocurrency Loan shall not be subject to any breakage indemnification, and all interest accruing on the Revolving Loans on the Third Restatement Effective Date shall be for the accounts of the Lenders holding such Loans after giving effect to the transactions provided for in this Section 1.03.
Initial Loans
Subsequent Borrowings
 
SECTION 1.04.         . At the time the amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement becomes effective as provided in Section 1.03(a), the Restated Security Agreement, as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement, shall without further action be amended as provided below:
Amendment of Restated Security Agreement
 
(i)          The definitions of  Discharge of Term Obligations, Intercreditor Agreement, Term Agent and Term Collateral Documents shall be deleted.
 
 
(ii)         The definition of Perfection Certificate shall be amended by inserting at the end thereof the phrase , as supplemented by the Supplemental Perfection Certificate dated October 26, 2012, delivered to the Administrative Agent and by the certificate delivered pursuant to paragraph (xi) of Section 1.06 of the Third Restatement Agreement.
 
(iii)        The words and the Intercreditor Agreement in Section 4.10(a) shall be deleted.
 
(iv)        The first parenthetical in Section 5.1(e) shall be deleted.
 
(v)         The proviso after the second parenthetical in Section 7.2 shall be deleted.
 
(vi)        Article XI shall be deleted.
 
SECTION 1.05.         . The Loan Parties represent and warrant to each other party hereto that:
Representations and Warranties
 
(i)          this Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each Loan Party and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Loan Party, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors rights generally and to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law;
 
(ii)         the representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in the Existing Credit Agreement, the Restated Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents are true and correct in all material respects on and as of the Third Restatement Effective Date, except for any representation or warranty that, by its terms, speaks as of a prior date, which representation or warranty shall be true and correct as of such prior date; and
 
(iii)        as of the Third Restatement Effective Date, no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing under the Existing Credit Agreement or the Restated Credit Agreement.
 
SECTION 1.06.         . The transactions provided for in Sections 1.02 and 1.03 shall be carried out and become effective, in the order set forth in such Sections, on March 13, 2013 (the ), subject to the satisfaction on such date of the following conditions:
Effectiveness
Third Restatement Effective Date
 
(i)          The Administrative Agent shall have executed a counterpart of this Agreement and shall have received from the Company, each Loan Party under the Existing Credit Agreement, each other Designated Subsidiary, each Lender (including Lenders constituting the Required Lenders under and as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement), each Issuing Bank and the Swingline Lender either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include a facsimile or other electronic transmission) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement.
 
 
(ii)         On the Third Restatement Effective Date, immediately prior to the transactions provided for in Sections 1.02 and 1.03, no borrowings shall be outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement (for the avoidance of doubt, Letters of Credit issued under the Existing Credit Agreement will remain outstanding under the Restated Credit Agreement), and all fees, expenses and other amounts accrued through the day immediately preceding the Third Restatement Effective Date for the accounts of or otherwise owing to the Lenders, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Swingline Lender under the Existing Credit Agreement, whether or not at the time due and payable under the terms of such Agreement, shall have been paid.
 
(iii)        The Administrative Agent and the Arrangers shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable to such parties on or prior to the Third Restatement Effective Date in connection with the transactions provided for in this Agreement, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement of all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses (including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel) required to be reimbursed by the Company under the Commitment Letter, the Existing Credit Agreement, the Restated Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document.
 
(iv)        The Company shall have delivered to JPMCB, as Administrative Agent under the Term Credit Agreement, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the Third Restatement Effective Date, a notice of the prepayment in full of the loans outstanding under the Term Credit Agreement meeting the requirements of Section 2.09(e) of such Agreement. Arrangements reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent shall have been made for the payment, as contemplated by clause (iv) of Section 1.02, of all principal, interest, fees and other amounts outstanding, accrued for the accounts of or otherwise owing to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent under and as defined in the Term Credit Agreement and for the release and discharge of all Guarantees and Liens supporting or securing the obligations under the Term Credit Agreement.
 
(v)         The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks and dated the Third Restatement Effective Date) of each of (i) Proskauer Rose LLP, New York counsel for the Loan Parties, (ii) Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, California and Pennsylvania counsel for certain of the Loan Parties, (iii) Day Pitney LLP, Connecticut counsel for certain of the Loan Parties, (iv) Baker Donelson, Bearman, Caldwell & Berkowitz, PC, Tennessee counsel for certain of the Loan Parties, (v) Harrison & Moberly, LLP, Indiana counsel for certain of the Loan Parties, (vi) Willcox & Savage PC, Virginia counsel for certain of the Loan Parties, (vii) Thompson Hine LLP, Ohio counsel for certain of the Loan Parties and (viii) Greenberg Traurig LLP, Nevada counsel for certain of the Loan Parties, in each case in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
 
 
(vi)        The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as it shall reasonably have requested relating to the organization, existence and good standing of each Loan Party (including good standing certificates for each entity listed on Schedule 1 hereto), the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
 
(vii)       The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, dated the Third Restatement Effective Date and signed by the chief financial officer of the Company, certifying satisfaction of the conditions set forth in paragraph (x) of this Section.
 
(viii)      The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, dated the Third Restatement Effective Date and signed by the chief financial officer of the Company, as to the solvency of the Loan Parties on a consolidated basis after giving effect to the Transactions, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
 
(ix)         The Administrative Agent shall have received a completed Borrowing Base Certificate, which shall be dated the Third Restatement Effective Date and signed by a Financial Officer of the Company and shall set forth information required therein as of February 23, 2013, together with supporting information and any additional reports with respect to the Borrowing Base that the Administrative Agent shall reasonably have requested.
 
(x)          The representations and warranties set forth in Section 1.05 shall be true and correct in all material respects as of the Third Restatement Effective Date.
 
(xi)         The Collateral and Guarantee Requirement shall have been satisfied (subject to the final paragraph of this Section). The Administrative Agent shall have received a completed certificate as to changes in the information set forth in the Perfection Certificate delivered pursuant to the Second Restatement Agreement (other than any such changes that shall have been set forth in the Supplemental Perfection Certificate most recently delivered under the Existing Credit Agreement), in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, dated the Third Restatement Effective Date and signed by an executive officer or a Financial Officer of the Company, together with all attachments contemplated thereby, which attachments shall include the results of a tax lien search with respect to the Loan Parties in the jurisdictions contemplated by the Perfection Certificate (as supplemented by the Supplemental Perfection Certificate most recently delivered under the Existing Credit Agreement and the certificate delivered pursuant to this paragraph) and evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent that any Liens revealed by such search are permitted under Section 6.02 of the Restated Credit Agreement or have been, or substantially contemporaneously with the occurrence of the Third Restatement Effective Date will be, released.
 
 
(xii)        The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence that the insurance required by Section 5.08 of the Restated Credit Agreement is in effect, together with endorsements naming the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lender Parties, as additional insured and loss payee thereunder to the extent required under Section 5.08 of the Restated Credit Agreement and Section 4.10 of the Restated Security Agreement.
 
(xiii)       The Administrative Agent shall have received and approved, with respect to all Mortgaged Properties, flood hazard certificates and flood insurance policies meeting the requirements of the Restated Credit Agreement.
 
(xiv)      Each Lender shall have received all documentation and other information required by bank regulatory authorities under applicable know your customer and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the Patriot Act, to the extent requested by such Lender at least five Business Days prior to the Third Restatement Effective Date.
 
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Company and the Lenders of the Third Restatement Effective Date and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.
Notwithstanding the foregoing conditions, solely with respect to the matters expressly identified in the Post-Closing Letter Agreement, the satisfaction of the foregoing conditions shall not be required on the Third Restatement Effective Date and shall not be a condition to the effectiveness of the transactions contemplated herein, but shall be required to be accomplished in accordance with the Post-Closing Letter Agreement.
 
SECTION 1.07.         . Each of the Loan Parties hereby acknowledges that it expects to receive substantial direct and indirect benefits as a result of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby. Each Loan Party hereby consents to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, and hereby (a) reaffirms and confirms its guarantees, pledges, grants of security interests and other obligations, as applicable, under the Loan Guarantee and each Collateral Document to which it is party, (b) affirms and confirms its obligations to indemnify and other commitments and obligations under the Loan Documents to which it is a party, and (c) agrees that, notwithstanding the effectiveness of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, (i) the Loan Guarantee and each Collateral Document to which it is a party shall continue to be in full force and effect and (ii) all guarantees, pledges, grants and other obligations thereunder shall continue to be in full force and effect and shall accrue to the benefit of the Lender Parties. Each Loan Party hereby confirms and agrees that obligations under the Restated Credit Agreement and the Restated Security Agreement constitute Obligations and Secured Obligations (or words of similar import) under and as used in the Loan Guarantee and each Collateral Document to which it is a party.
Reaffirmation
 
 
SECTION 1.08.         . (a)Except as expressly set forth herein, this Agreement shall not by implication or otherwise limit, impair, constitute a waiver of or otherwise affect the rights and remedies of the Lender Parties under the Existing Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, and shall not alter, modify, amend or in any way affect any of the terms, conditions, obligations, covenants or agreements contained in the Existing Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, all of which shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with the provisions thereof (it being understood and agreed that all interest and fees accruing under the Existing Credit Agreement in respect of periods prior to the Third Restatement Effective Date will accrue at the rates specified in the Existing Credit Agreement prior to its restatement in the form of the Restated Credit Agreement). Nothing herein shall be deemed to entitle any Loan Party to a consent to, or a waiver, amendment, modification or other change of, any of the terms, conditions, obligations, covenants or agreements contained in the Existing Credit Agreement, the Restated Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document in similar or different circumstances.
Effect of Amendment and Restatement; No Novation
 
(b)          On and after the Third Restatement Effective Date, each reference in the Restated Credit Agreement to this Agreement, hereunder, hereof, herein, or words of like import, as used in the Restated Credit Agreement, shall refer to the Existing Credit Agreement as amended and restated in the form of the Restated Credit Agreement, and the term Credit Agreement, as used in any Loan Document, shall mean the Restated Credit Agreement. On and after the Third Restatement Effective Date, each reference in the Restated Security Agreement to this Agreement, hereunder, hereof, herein, or words of like import, as used in the Restated Security Agreement, shall refer to the Restated Security Agreement (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) as amended and restated in the form of the Restated Security Agreement, and the term Restated Security Agreement, as used in any Loan Document, shall mean the Restated Security Agreement.
 
(c)          This Agreement shall constitute a Loan Document for all purposes of the Restated Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
 
(d)          Neither this Agreement nor the effectiveness of the Restated Credit Agreement shall extinguish the obligations for the payment of money outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement or discharge or release any Guarantee thereof. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as a substitution or novation of the Obligations outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement or the Collateral Documents, which shall remain in full force and effect, except as modified hereby. Nothing expressed or implied in this Agreement, the Restated Credit Agreement or any other document contemplated hereby or thereby shall be construed as a release or other discharge of any Loan Party under any Loan Document (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) from any of its obligations and liabilities thereunder.
 
 
SECTION 1.09.         . THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
Applicable Law
 
SECTION 1.10.         . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which when so executed and delivered shall be deemed an original, but all of which taken together shall constitute a single contract. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile transmission or other electronic imaging (such as a pdf) shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart hereof.
Counterparts
 
SECTION 1.11.         . Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability
 
SECTION 1.12.         . Section headings used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and are not to affect the construction of, or to be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
 
[Signature pages follow.]
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the date set forth above.
 
 
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Amendment and Restatement Agreement]
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Amendment and Restatement Agreement]
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Amendment and Restatement Agreement]
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Amendment and Restatement Agreement]
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Amendment and Restatement Agreement]
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Amendment and Restatement Agreement]
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Amendment and Restatement Agreement]
 
  
 
[Signature Page to Amendment and Restatement Agreement]
 
 
 
 
For Lenders requiring a second signature line.
*
 
[Signature Page to Amendment and Restatement Agreement]
 
 
SCHEDULE 1
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.,
THE DRESS BARN, INC.,
MAURICES INCORPORATED,
FB DISTRO DISTRIBUTION CENTER, LLC
DBX, INC,
DRESS BARN CREDIT MANAGEMENT, LLC,
MAURICES CREDIT MANAGEMENT, INC.,
TWEEN BRANDS, INC.,
TWEEN BRANDS AGENCY, INC.,
TWEEN BRANDS PURCHASING, INC.,
TWEEN BRANDS SERVICE CO.,
TWEEN BRANDS INVESTMENT, LLC,
TOO GC, LLC,
TWEEN BRANDS DIRECT, LLC,
TWEEN BRANDS DIRECT SERVICES, INC.,
TWEEN BRANDS STORE PLANNING, INC.,
WORLDWIDE RETAIL HOLDINGS, INC.,
933 INSPIRATION LLC
CHARMING SHOPPES, INC.,
CHARMING SHOPPES OF DELAWARE, INC.,
CSI INDUSTRIES, INC.,
CATHERINES, INC.,
CATHERINES STORES CORPORATION,
LANE BRYANT, INC.,
LANE BRYANT PURCHASING CORP.
FB APPAREL, INC.,
CHARMING DIRECT, INC.,
CHARMING SHOPPES INTERACTIVE INC.,
CATHERINES C.S.A.C., INC.,
CATHERINES OF NEVADA, INC.,
CATHERINES OF CALIFORNIA, INC.,
CS INVESTMENT COMPANY,
CS HOLDCO LLC,
C.S.F. CORP.,
FSHC, INC.,
SIERRA NEVADA FACTORING, INC.,
OUTLET DIVISION MANAGEMENT CO., INC.,
OUTLET DIVISION STORE CO., INC.,
CHARMING SHOPPES OUTLET STORES, LLC
 
 
SCHEDULE 2
 
Eric Specter on behalf of each entity in the capacity shown:
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SCHEDULE 3
 
Colin D. Stern on behalf of each entity in the capacity shown:
 
 
 
EXHIBIT A
 
RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT
 

 
Exhibit 10.2
 
EXHIBIT A
 
 
AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT
 
dated as of
 
January 3, 2011,
 
as further amended and restated as of June 14, 2012,
 
as further amended and restated as of March 13, 2013,
 
among
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.,
 
The BORROWING SUBSIDIARIES party hereto,
 
The other LOAN PARTIES party hereto,
 
The LENDERS party hereto
 
and
 
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A.,
as Administrative Agent
 
 
J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES LLC and
MERRILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER & SMITH INCORPORATED,
as Joint Bookrunners and Joint Lead Arrangers
 
BANK OF AMERICA, N.A., as Syndication Agent
 
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION and
FIFTH THIRD BANK,
as Co-Documentation Agents
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SCHEDULES:
 
 
:
EXHIBITS
 
 
 
AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated by the Second Restatement Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012, and as further amended and restated by the Third Restatement Agreement dated as of March 13, 2013, among ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC., the BORROWING SUBSIDIARIES party hereto, the other LOAN PARTIES party hereto, the LENDERS party hereto and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
 
The Borrowers (such term and each other capitalized term used herein having the meaning assigned to it in Article I of this Agreement), the other Loan Parties, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent are parties to the Existing Credit Agreement, and have agreed to amend and restate such Agreement to provide for, among other things, (a) an increase in total Revolving Commitments of $250,000,000, (b) the extension of the maturity of the credit facility established thereby, and (c) certain pricing and other amendments thereto, all as set forth herein.
 
Accordingly, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein contained and other good and valuable consideration, the sufficiency and receipt of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto have agreed pursuant to the Third Restatement Agreement that, as of the Third Restatement Effective Date, the Existing Credit Agreement shall be amended and restated to be in the form of this Agreement.
 
ARTICLE I
Definitions
 
SECTION 1.01. As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms.
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, bears interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Account
 
 means any Person obligated on an Account.
Account Debtor
 
 means Charming Shoppes, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation.
Acquired Company
 
 means the 1.125% Senior Convertible Notes due 2014 of the Acquired Company outstanding as of the Second Restatement Effective Date.
Acquired Company Convertible Notes
 
 means the Acquisition Tender Offer and the Merger, collectively.
Acquisition
 
 
 means the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of May 1, 2012, among the Company, Merger Sub and the Acquired Company, together with the exhibits thereto and the related disclosure letter.
Acquisition Agreement
 
 means the offer to purchase for cash all the outstanding shares of common stock in the Acquired Company commenced by Merger Sub pursuant to the Acquisition Agreement.
Acquisition Tender Offer
 
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
 
 means JPMCB, in its capacity as administrative agent hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Article VIII.
Administrative Agent
 
 means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly or indirectly Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
 
 means this Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, as modified, amended or restated from time to time.
Agreement
 
 means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus  of 1% per annum and (c) the Adjusted LIBO Rate on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) for a deposit in dollars with a maturity of one month plus 1% per annum. For purposes of clause (c) above, the Adjusted LIBO Rate on any day shall be based on the rate per annum appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or on any successor or substitute screen provided by Reuters, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such screen, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, on such day (without any rounding) for deposits in dollars with a maturity of one month. Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate, respectively
Alternate Base Rate
 
 
 means, with respect to any Lender, a percentage equal to a fraction the numerator of which is such Lenders Revolving Commitment and the denominator of which is the total Revolving Commitments of all the Lenders (if the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Revolving Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments at or prior to the time of determination); that for purposes of Section 2.20 when a Defaulting Lender shall exist, any such Defaulting Lenders Revolving Commitment shall be disregarded in the calculation.
Applicable Percentage
provided
 
 means, for any day, with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Revolving Loan or the participation fee for any Standby Letter of Credit or Commercial Letter of Credit, as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth in the table below under the caption ABR Spread, Eurodollar Spread, Standby Letter of Credit Fee or Commercial Letter of Credit Fee, as the case may be:
Applicable Rate
 
 
The Applicable Rate shall be determined from and after the Third Restatement Effective Date, at times when the Leverage Ratio at the end of the then most recent period of four fiscal quarters for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) shall be less than 1.00 to 1.00, and until any change thereto pursuant to the next sentence below, by reference to Category 1 in the table above. At any time after September 13, 2013, and at any time when the Leverage Ratio at the end of the then most recent period of four fiscal quarters for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) shall be equal to or greater than 1.00 to 1.00, the Applicable Rate shall be determined based on Average Availability for the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Company (or shorter period from the Third Restatement Effective Date until the end of a fiscal quarter) as set forth in the table above, with each change to the Applicable Rate to be effective on the first day of the first month immediately following the last day of such fiscal quarter (or shorter period). Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this definition, if the Borrowers shall fail to deliver any Borrowing Base Certificate by the time required under Section 5.01(h), then the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to Category 3 in the table above from and including the day next following the date on which such Borrowing Base Certificate shall have been due to but excluding the day after the date on which such Borrowing Base Certificate shall have been delivered.
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.10.
Applicable Share
 
 
 means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in commercial loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its activities and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
 
 means J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, in their capacities as joint bookrunners and joint lead arrangers for the credit facility established hereby.
Arrangers
 
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an Eligible Assignee, with the consent of any Person whose consent is required by Section 9.04, and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of Exhibit A or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
 
 means, at any time, an amount equal to (a) the lesser of (i) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (ii) the Borrowing Base then in effect (b) the total Credit Exposure of all Lenders at such time.
Availability
minus
 
 means the period from and including the Original Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments.
Availability Period
 
 means, with respect to any fiscal quarter (or shorter period from the Third Restatement Effective Date until the end of a fiscal quarter), (a) the sum of Availability for each day during such fiscal quarter (or period) divided by (b) the number of days in such fiscal quarter (or period).
Average Availability
 
 means, with respect to any period, (a) the sum of Utilization for each day during such period divided by (b) the number of days in such period.  means, on any day, an amount equal to (a) the total Credit Exposure of all Lenders on such day, divided by (b) the total Revolving Commitments in effect on such day.
Average Utilization
Utilization
 
 means each and any of the following bank services provided to any Loan Party by any Lender or any of its Affiliates: (a) credit cards for commercial customers (including, without limitation, commercial credit cards and purchasing cards), (b) stored value cards and (c) treasury management services (including, without limitation, controlled disbursement, automated clearinghouse transactions, return items, overdrafts and interstate depository network services).
Banking Services
 
 means any and all obligations of the Loan Parties, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor), in connection with Banking Services.
Banking Services Obligations
 
 mean all Reserves that the Administrative Agent from time to time establishes in its Permitted Discretion for Banking Services then provided or Banking Services Obligations then outstanding.
Banking Services Reserves
 
 
 means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board of Governors
 
 means Bank of America, N.A., a national banking association, in its individual capacity, and its successors.
BofA
 
 means the Company, in its capacity as contractual representative of the Borrowers pursuant to Article XI.
Borrower Representative
 
 means the Company and the Borrowing Subsidiaries, collectively.
Borrowers
 
 means (a) Revolving Loans of the same Type made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect, (b) a Swingline Loan, (c) a Protective Advance or (d) an Overadvance.
Borrowing
 
 means, at any time (subject to modification as provided below), an amount equal to the sum of (a) 90% of the Loan Parties Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable at such time, (b) 90% the Net Orderly Liquidation Value percentage identified in the most recent inventory appraisal ordered by the Administrative Agent the Loan Parties Eligible Inventory, valued at the lower of cost, determined on a first-in-first-out basis, or market value, (c) the lesser of (i) 75% of the Fair Market Value of each Eligible Real Property (the  for such Eligible Real Property); that, at any time when the Leverage Ratio at the end of the most recent period of four fiscal quarters of the Company for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) is greater than 1.50 to 1.00, the amount added for each Eligible Real Property in computing the Borrowing Base pursuant to this clause (c)(i) shall be reduced by an amount equal to 2.5% of the Base Amount for such Eligible Real Property by the number of fiscal quarters of the Company that have ended since the date of the most recent FIRREA Appraisal of such Eligible Real Property received by the Administrative Agent and (ii) 20% of the aggregate Revolving Commitments, (d) Reserves. The Administrative Agent may, in its Permitted Discretion and with not fewer than four Business Days prior written notice to the Borrower Representative, reduce the advance rates set forth above, adjust Reserves or reduce one or more of the other elements used in computing the Borrowing Base. Subject to the immediately preceding sentence and the other provisions hereof expressly permitting the Administrative Agent to adjust the Borrowing Base, the Borrowing Base at any time shall be determined by reference to the Borrowing Base Certificate delivered to the Administrative Agent on or most recently prior to such day pursuant to Section 4.02(c) or 5.01(h) (or, prior to the first such delivery following the Third Restatement Effective Date, the Borrowing Base Certificate delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 1.06(ix) of the Third Restatement Agreement); that if any Borrowing Base Certificate delivered under Section 4.02(c) or 5.01(h) (or under Section 4(h) of the Second Restatement Agreement) shall prove to have been materially inaccurate (regardless of whether any Revolving Commitments are in effect or any amounts are outstanding hereunder when such inaccuracy is discovered), and such inaccuracy shall have resulted in the payment of any interest or fees at rates lower than those that were in fact applicable for any period (based on the actual Borrowing Base), the applicable Borrowers shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for distribution to the Lenders (or former Lenders) as their interests may appear, the accrued interest or fees that should have been paid but were not paid as a result of such inaccuracy.
Borrowing Base
plus
multiplied by
multiplied by
plus
Base Amount
provided
multiplied
minus
provided
 
 
 means a certificate, signed and certified as accurate and complete by a Financial Officer of the Borrower Representative, in substantially the form of Exhibit B (with such changes thereto as may be required by the Administrative Agent from time to time to reflect the components of and reserves against the Borrowing Base as provided for hereunder) or another form that is acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion.
Borrowing Base Certificate
 
 means the last day of each fiscal quarter of the Company; that (a) if on the last day of any fiscal month of the Company (i) any Revolving Loans shall be outstanding or (ii) the LC Exposure shall be $60,000,000 or more, then the last day of such fiscal month will also be a Borrowing Base Reporting Date and (b) during any Enhanced Reporting Period, the last day of each week will also be a Borrowing Base Reporting Date.
Borrowing Base Reporting Date
provided
 
 means a request by the Borrower Representative for a Revolving Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03, which shall be, in the case of any such written request, in the form of Exhibit C or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Borrowing Request
 
 means, until such time as it ceases to be a Borrowing Subsidiary pursuant to Section 2.22, each of (a) The Dress Barn Inc., a Connecticut corporation, (b) Tween Brands, Inc., a Delaware corporation, (c) Maurices Incorporated, a Delaware corporation, (d) the Acquired Company, (e) Charming Shoppes of Delaware, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation, (f) CSI Industries, Inc., a Delaware corporation, (g) Catherines, Inc., a Delaware corporation, (h) Catherines Stores Corporation, a Tennessee corporation, (i) Lane Bryant, Inc., a Delaware corporation, (j) Lane Bryant Purchasing Corp., an Ohio corporation, (k) FB Apparel, Inc., an Indiana corporation, and (l) any other wholly owned Subsidiary designated as a Borrowing Subsidiary pursuant to Section 2.22.
Borrowing Subsidiary
 
 means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term Business Day shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
provided
 
 means any Subsidiary that has been formed or is organized under the laws of Canada or any province or territory thereof.
Canadian Subsidiary
 
 
 means, for any period, (a) the additions to property, plant and equipment and other capital expenditures of the Company and the Subsidiaries that are (or would be) set forth in a consolidated statement of cash flows of the Company for such period prepared in accordance with GAAP and (b) such portion of principal payments on Capital Lease Obligations or Synthetic Lease Obligations made by the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries during such period as is attributable to additions to property, plant and equipment that have not otherwise been reflected on the consolidated statement of cash flows as additions to property, plant and equipment for such period.
Capital Expenditures
 
 of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP; the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP, and the final maturity of such obligations shall be the date of the last payment of such amounts due under such lease (or other arrangement) prior to the first date on which such lease (or other arrangement) may be terminated by the lessee without payment of a premium or a penalty. For purposes of Section 6.02, a Capital Lease Obligation shall be deemed to be secured by a Lien on the property being leased and such property shall be deemed to be owned by the lessee.
Capital Lease Obligations
 
 means each Person that is a controlled foreign corporation within the meaning of Section 957(a) of the Code.
CFC
 
 means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Exchange Act and the rules of the SEC thereunder as in effect on the Third Restatement Effective Date), other than the Permitted Investor, of Equity Interests representing more than 30% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in the Company and the percentage of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by Equity Interests in the Company owned by such Person or group then exceeds the percentage of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by Equity Interests in the Company owned by the Permitted Investor; (b) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of the Company by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the board of directors of the Company nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated; or (c) the occurrence of a change of control (or a similar event, however denominated) in any agreement or instrument governing Material Indebtedness.
Change in Control
 
 
 means the occurrence, after the Third Restatement Effective Date, of any of the following: (a) the adoption or taking effect of any rule, regulation, treaty or other law, (b) any change in any rule, regulation, treaty or other law or in the administration, interpretation, implementation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority or (c) the making or issuance of any request, rule, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority; that, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a Change in Law, regardless of the date enacted, adopted, promulgated or issued.
Change in Law
provided
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.16.
Charges
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Revolving Loans, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances.
Class
 
 means U.S. Bank National Association and Fifth Third Bank.
Co-Documentation Agents
 
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
 
 means any and all assets, whether real or personal, tangible or intangible, on which Liens are purported to be granted pursuant to the Collateral Documents as security for the Secured Obligations.
Collateral
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Collateral Access Agreement
 
 means, at any time, the requirement that:
Collateral and Guarantee Requirement
 
(a)  the Administrative Agent shall have received from the Company and each Designated Subsidiary either (i) (A) a counterpart of this Agreement or a counterpart of the Third Restatement Agreement, in each case duly executed and delivered on behalf of such Person as a Loan Guarantor hereunder, and (B) a counterpart of the Restated Security Agreement, duly executed and delivered on behalf of such Person, or (ii) in the case of any Person that becomes a Designated Subsidiary after the Third Restatement Effective Date, (A) a Joinder Agreement, duly executed and delivered on behalf of such Person, and (B) instruments in the form or forms specified in the Restated Security Agreement under which such Person becomes a party to the Restated Security Agreement, duly executed and delivered on behalf of such Person, together with such documents and opinions with respect to such Designated Subsidiary as may reasonably be requested by the Administrative Agent;
 
(b)  the Administrative Agent shall have received all such Collateral Access Agreements, Deposit Account Control Agreements and other Collateral Documents required to be provided to it under the Restated Security Agreement, duly executed by the parties thereto and evidence that all Credit Card Notifications required to be provided pursuant to Section 5.16 have been provided;
 
 
(c)  all Equity Interests owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party shall have been pledged pursuant to, and to the extent required by, the Restated Security Agreement and, in the case of Equity Interests in any Foreign Subsidiary, where the Administrative Agent so requests in connection with the pledge of such Equity Interests, a Foreign Pledge Agreement ( that the Loan Parties shall not be required to pledge Equity Interests in Foreign Subsidiaries that are not Eligible Foreign Subsidiaries, and that the Loan Parties shall not be required to pledge more than 65% of the outstanding Equity Interests entitled to vote (within the meaning of Treas. Reg. Section 1.956-2(c)(2)) of any such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary), and the Administrative Agent shall, to the extent required by the Restated Security Agreement, have received certificates or other instruments representing all such certificated Equity Interests, together with undated stock powers or other instruments of transfer with respect thereto endorsed in blank;
provided
provided
further
 
(d)  (i) all Indebtedness of the Company and any Subsidiary and (ii) all Indebtedness of any other Person in a principal amount of $5,000,000 or more that, in each case, is owing to any Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note and shall have been pledged pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement, and the Administrative Agent shall have received all such promissory notes, together with undated instruments of transfer with respect thereto endorsed in blank;
 
(e)  all documents and instruments, including UCC financing statements, required by law or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to be filed, registered or recorded to perfect the Liens intended to be created by the Collateral Documents with the priority required by the Collateral Documents shall have been filed, registered or recorded or delivered to the Administrative Agent for filing, registration or recording;
 
(f)  the Administrative Agent shall have received (i) counterparts of a Mortgage with respect to each Mortgaged Property duly executed and delivered by the record owner of such Mortgaged Property, (ii) a policy or policies of title insurance issued by a nationally recognized title insurance company insuring the Lien of each such Mortgage as a valid and enforceable Lien on the Mortgaged Property described therein, free of any other Liens except as permitted under Section 6.02, together with such endorsements, coinsurance and reinsurance as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request, (iii) if any Mortgaged Property is located in an area determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency to have special flood hazards, evidence of such flood insurance as may be required under applicable law, including Regulation H of the Board of Governors, and (iv) such surveys, abstracts, appraisals, legal opinions and other documents as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request with respect to any such Mortgage or Mortgaged Property; and
 
 
(g)  each Loan Party shall have obtained all material consents and approvals required in connection with the execution and delivery of all Collateral Documents to which it is a party, the performance of its obligations thereunder and the granting by it of the Liens thereunder.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Designated Subsidiary formed or acquired after the Third Restatement Effective Date shall not be required to comply with the foregoing requirements prior to the time specified in Section 5.03. The foregoing definition shall not require the creation or perfection of pledges of or security interests in, or the obtaining of title insurance or, subject to the requirements of applicable law, flood insurance, legal opinions or other deliverables with respect to, particular assets of the Loan Parties, or the provision of Guarantees by any Subsidiary, if and for so long as the Administrative Agent, in consultation with the Company, determines that the cost of creating or perfecting such pledges or security interests in such assets, or obtaining such title insurance or flood insurance, legal opinions or other deliverables in respect of such assets, or providing such Guarantees, shall be excessive in view of the benefits to be obtained by the Lenders therefrom. The Administrative Agent may grant extensions of time for the creation and perfection of security interests in (including delivery of promissory notes as required by clause (d) above) or the obtaining of title insurance or, subject to the requirements of applicable law, flood insurance, legal opinions or other deliverables with respect to particular assets or the provision of any Guarantee by any Subsidiary (including extensions beyond the Third Restatement Effective Date or in connection with assets acquired, or Subsidiaries formed or acquired, after the Third Restatement Effective Date) where it determines that such action cannot be accomplished without undue effort or expense by the time or times at which it would otherwise be required to be accomplished by this Agreement or the Collateral Documents.
 
 means the Restated Security Agreement, each Collateral Access Agreement, each Credit Card Notification, each Deposit Account Control Agreement, each Mortgage, each Foreign Pledge Agreement, each IP Security Agreement and each other document granting a Lien upon any assets of any Loan Party as security for payment of the Secured Obligations.
Collateral Documents
 
 means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Commercial Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements relating to Commercial Letters of Credit that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrowers at such time. The Commercial LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Commercial LC Exposure at such time.
Commercial LC Exposure
 
 means a Letter of Credit that is (a) designated as a Commercial Letter of Credit by the Borrower Representative at the time of, or prior to, the issuance thereof, (b) issued to provide for the payment of the purchase price for goods or services purchased by the Company or any Subsidiary and (c) intended to be drawn when such purchase price is due and payable and not merely upon the occurrence of a default or other contingency.
Commercial Letter of Credit
 
 
 means, collectively, any written notice, demand, communication, information, document or other material provided by or on behalf of any Loan Party pursuant to any Loan Document or the transactions contemplated therein that is distributed to the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Bank by means of electronic communications pursuant to Section 9.01, including through the Platform.
Communications
 
 means Ascena Retail Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Company
 
 means a Compliance Certificate in the form of Exhibit D or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Compliance Certificate
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Concentration Account
 
 means Other Connection Taxes that are imposed on or measured by net income (however denominated) or that are franchise Taxes or branch profits Taxes.
Connection Income Taxes
 
 means, for any period, the excess of (a) the sum of (i) the cash interest expense (including (x) imputed interest expense in respect of Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations, (y) all commissions, discounts and other fees and charges owed with respect to letters of credit and bankers acceptance financing and (z) net costs under Swap Agreements entered into to hedge interest rates to the extent such net costs are allocable to such period in accordance with GAAP) of the Company and the Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, (ii) any interest accrued during such period in respect of Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary that is required to be capitalized rather than included in consolidated interest expense for such period in accordance with GAAP, plus (iii) any cash payments made during such period in respect of obligations referred to in clause (b)(iii) below that were amortized or accrued in a previous period, (b) the sum of (i) interest income of the Company and the Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, (ii) to the extent included in such consolidated interest expense for such period, non-cash amounts attributable to amortization or write-off of capitalized interest or other financing costs paid in a previous period, plus (iii) to the extent included in such consolidated interest expense for such period, non-cash amounts attributable to accretion or amortization of debt discounts or accrued interest payable in kind for such period.
Consolidated Cash Interest Expense
minus
 
 
 means, for any period, Consolidated Net Income for such period, (a) without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (i) consolidated interest expense for such period (including imputed interest expense in respect of Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations), (ii) consolidated income tax expense for such period, (iii) all amounts attributable to depreciation and amortization for such period, (iv) any non-cash extraordinary charges for such period, (v) any non-cash compensation charges, including charges arising from restricted stock and stock-option grants, for such period, (vi) any other non-cash charges (other than the write-down or write-off of current assets, any additions to bad debt reserve or bad debt expense or any accruals for estimated sales discounts, returns or allowances) for such period, (vii) any losses for such period attributable to early extinguishment of Indebtedness or obligations under any Swap Agreement, (viii) any fees and expenses for such period paid in connection with, and other non-recurring charges for such period relating to, the Acquisition, (ix) charges for such period attributable to restructuring activities commenced by the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries prior to the Second Restatement Effective Date, that the aggregate amount added back pursuant to this clause (ix) may not that the aggregate amount added back pursuant to this clause (x) may not (xi) sale, transfer or other disposition that the aggregate amount added back pursuant to this clause (xi) may not and (b) without duplication (i) to the extent not deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, all cash payments made during such period on account of non-cash charges that were or would have been added to Consolidated Net Income pursuant to clauses (a)(iv), (a)(v) or (a)(vi) above in such period or in a previous period and (ii) to the extent included in determining such Consolidated Net Income, (A) any extraordinary gains and all non-cash items of income (other than normal accruals in the ordinary course of business) for such period and (B) any gains for such period attributable to early extinguishment of Indebtedness or obligations under any Swap Agreement, all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that Consolidated EBITDA shall be calculated so as to exclude the effect of any gain or loss that represents after-tax gains or losses attributable to any sale, transfer or other disposition of assets by the Company or any Subsidiary, other than dispositions of inventory and other dispositions in the ordinary course of business.
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
, that such fees, expenses and non-recurring charges are incurred on or prior to January 26, 2014
provided
provided
exceed $25,000,000 in the aggregate for all periods (with not more than $10,000,000 thereof in the aggregate being for periods commencing after July 28, 2012), (x) severance charges for such period attributable to reorganization of certain operations of the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries,
provided
exceed $5,000,000 in the aggregate for all periods, and
charges for such period attributable to the
of, or cessation of the operation of, certain operations acquired as part of the Acquisition and consistent with the plan therefor previously communicated by the Company to the Administrative Agent,
provided
exceed $50,000,000 in the aggregate for all periods,
minus
provided
 
 means, for any period, Consolidated EBITDA for such period plus, without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated EBITDA, Consolidated Rental Expense for such period, all as determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated EBITDAR
 
 means, for any period, the sum, without duplication, of (a) Consolidated Cash Interest Expense for such period, (b) Consolidated Rental Expense for such period, (c) mandatory principal prepayments and scheduled principal payments on, and cash payments upon the conversion of, Indebtedness made during such period (other than redemptions of the Acquired Company Convertible Notes required to be made by the Acquired Company as a result of the Acquisition), (d) expense for income taxes paidin cash during such period, (e) Restricted Payments paid in cash during such period, (f) the aggregate amount of principal payments on Capital Lease Obligations during such period and (g) mandatory cash contributions to any Plan or Multiemployer Plan during such period, all calculated for the Company and the Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
Consolidated Fixed Charges
 
 
 means, for any period, the net income or loss of the Company and the Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that there shall be excluded (a) the income of any Person (other than the Company) that is not a Subsidiary except to the extent of the amount of cash dividends or similar cash distributions actually paid by such Person to the Company or, subject to clauses (b) and (c) below, any of the Subsidiaries during such period, (b) the income of, and any amounts referred to in clause (a) above paid to, any Subsidiary (other than a Loan Party) to the extent that, on the date of determination, the declaration or payment of cash dividends or similar cash distributions by such Subsidiary is restricted by operation of the terms of its organizational documents or any agreement, instrument, judgment, decree, statute, rule or regulation applicable to such Subsidiary and (c) the income or loss of, and any amounts referred to in clause (a) above paid to, any Subsidiary that is not wholly owned by the Company to the extent such income or loss or such amounts are attributable to the noncontrolling interest in such Subsidiary.
Consolidated Net Income
provided
 
 means, for any period, the aggregate minimum rental expense of the Company and the Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, in respect of all rental obligations under operating leases.
Consolidated Rental Expense
 
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise.  and  have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
 
 means, for purposes of Section 9.19, the Secured Obligations.
Corresponding Debt
 
 means any receivables due to any Loan Party from a credit card issuer or a credit card processor in connection with purchases of Inventory of such Loan Party on (a) credit cards issued by Visa, MasterCard, American Express, Discover and any other credit card issuers that are reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, (b) private label credit cards of any Loan Party issued through the Companys credit card program with Alliance Data Systems under non-recourse arrangements substantially similar to those in effect on the Original Effective Date or (c) debit cards and mall cards issued by issuers or providers that are reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, in each case which have been earned by performance by such Loan Party but not yet paid to such Loan Party by such credit card issuer or credit card processor.
Credit Card Accounts Receivable
 
 means any agreement between a Loan Party, on the one hand, and a credit card issuer or a credit card processor (including any credit card processor that processes purchases of Inventory from a Loan Party through debit cards or mall cards), on the other hand.
Credit Card Agreement
 
 
 means each Credit Card Notification, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, executed by one or more Loan Parties and delivered by such Loan Parties to credit card issuers or credit card processors that are party to any Credit Card Agreement.
Credit Card Notifications
 
 means, as to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lenders Revolving Loans and the sum of such Lenders LC Exposure, Swingline Exposure, Protective Advance Exposure and Overadvance Exposure at such time.
Credit Exposure
 
 means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
 means any Lender, as determined by the Administrative Agent, that has (a) failed to fund any portion of its Loans or participations in Letters of Credit, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances within three Business Days of the date required to be funded by it hereunder, (b) notified any Borrower, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, the Swingline Lender or any Lender in writing that it does not intend to comply with any of its funding obligations under this Agreement or has made a public statement to the effect that it does not intend to comply with its funding obligations under this Agreement or under other agreements in which it commits to extend credit, (c) failed, within three Business Days after request by the Administrative Agent, to confirm that it will comply with the terms of this Agreement relating to its obligations to fund prospective Loans and participations in then outstanding Letters of Credit, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances, (d) otherwise failed to pay over to the Administrative Agent or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder within three Business Days of the date when due, unless the subject of a good faith dispute, or (e) (i) become or is insolvent or has a parent company that has become or is insolvent or (ii) become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee or custodian appointed for it, or has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment or has a parent company that has become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee or custodian appointed for it, or has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment.
Defaulting Lender
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Deposit Account
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Deposit Account Control Agreement
 
 means each Subsidiary other than (a) any Subsidiary that is a Foreign Subsidiary, (b) any Subsidiary set forth on Schedule 1.01A and (c) any Inactive Subsidiary.
Designated Subsidiary
 
 
 means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed on Schedule 3.06.
Disclosed Matters
 
 means any capital stock which, by its terms (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable), or upon the happening of any event, (a) matures (excluding any maturity as the result of an optional redemption by the issuer thereof) or is mandatorily redeemable, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, or is redeemable at the option of the holder thereof, in whole or in part, or requires the payment of any cash dividend or any other scheduled payment constituting a return of capital, in each case at any time on or prior to the first anniversary of the Maturity Date, or (b) is convertible into or exchangeable (unless at the sole option of the issuer thereof) for (i) cash, (ii) debt securities or (iii) any capital stock referred to in (a) above, in each case at any time prior to the first anniversary of the Maturity Date.
Disqualified Stock
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Document
 
 or  refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
 
 means any Subsidiary except for (a) a Foreign Subsidiary or (b) a Subsidiary directly or indirectly owned by a CFC.
Domestic Subsidiary
 
 means any period (a) during which any Default under clause (a) of Article VII or any Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or (b) during a Reduced Availability Period; that if all applicable circumstances described in clauses (a) and (b) shall cease to exist, the Borrower Representative may, not more than twice during each period of 12 consecutive months, request that the Administrative Agent discontinue the applicable Dominion Period, and the Administrative Agent will promptly comply with such request and will provide notification of such discontinuance to the Loan Parties credit card issuers and credit card processors.
Dominion Period
provided
 
 means (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender, (c) an Approved Fund and (d) any other Person, other than, in each case, a natural person or the Company, any Subsidiary or any other Affiliate of the Company.
Eligible Assignee
 
 means, at any time, the Credit Card Accounts Receivable of a Loan Party that the Administrative Agent determines in its Permitted Discretion are eligible as the basis for (i) the extension of Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans and (ii) the issuance of Letters of Credit. Without limiting the Administrative Agents discretion provided herein, Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable shall not include any Credit Card Account Receivable:
Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable
 
(a)  which is not earned or does not represent the bona fide amount due to a Loan Party from a credit card processor or a credit card issuer that originated in the ordinary course of business of the applicable Loan Party;
 
 
(b)  which is not owned by a Loan Party or to which a Loan Party does not have good or marketable title;
 
(c)  in which the payee of such Credit Card Account Receivable is a Person other than a Loan Party;
 
(d)  which does not constitute an Account (as defined in the UCC);
 
(e)  which has been outstanding for more than five Business Days (or, in the case of American Express, 15 Business Days) from the date of sale;
 
(f)  with respect to which the applicable credit card issuer, credit card processor or debit card or mall card issuer or provider has (i) applied for, suffered, or consented to the appointment of any receiver, interim receiver, custodian, trustee, monitor, administrator, sequestrator or liquidator of its assets, (ii) has had possession of all or a material part of its property taken by any receiver, interim receiver, custodian, trustee, monitor, administrator, sequestrator or liquidator, (iii) filed, or had filed against it (but only so long as any such involuntary filing has not been stayed or vacated), any request or petition for liquidation, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment of debts, adjudication as bankrupt, winding-up, or voluntary or involuntary case under any state, provincial, territorial or federal bankruptcy laws, (iv) has admitted in writing its inability, or is generally unable to, pay its debts as they become due, (v) become insolvent or (vi) ceased operation of its business;
 
(g)  which is not a valid, legally enforceable obligation of the applicable credit card issuer or credit card processor with respect thereto;
 
(h)  which is not subject to a properly perfected first priority security interest in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties);
 
(i)  which is subject to any Lien, other than (i) a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties), and (ii) any Permitted Encumbrances contemplated by the applicable processor agreements and for which appropriate Reserves (as determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion) have been established;
 
(j)  with respect to which (i) any covenant has been breached or (ii) any representation or warranty is not true in all material respects, in each case to the extent contained in this Agreement, the Restated Security Agreement or in the credit card agreements relating to such Credit Card Account Receivable; that each such representation and warranty shall be true and correct in all respects to the extent already qualified by a materiality standard;
provided
 
 
(k)  which is subject to risk of set-off, recoupment, non-collection or not being processed due to unpaid and/or accrued credit card processor fee balances, to the extent of the lesser of the balance of the applicable Credit Card Accounts Receivable or the unpaid credit card processor fees;
 
(l)  which is evidenced by chattel paper or an instrument of any kind unless such chattel paper or instrument is in the possession of the Administrative Agent, and to the extent necessary or appropriate, endorsed to the Administrative Agent;
 
(m)  which the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion determines may not be paid by reason of the applicable credit card processors, credit card issuers or debit card or mall card issuers or providers inability to pay;
 
(n)  which represents a deposit or partial payment in connection with the purchase of Inventory of such Loan Party;
 
(o)  which is not subject to a Credit Card Notification; or
 
(p)  which does not meet such other usual and customary eligibility criteria for Credit Card Accounts Receivable in the Loan Parties industry generally as the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion may determine from time to time;
 
, , that the Administrative Agent shall not add any additional eligibility criteria (or amend any then-existing eligibility criteria to make the same more restrictive) without giving at least four Business Days prior notice to the Borrower Representative.
provided
however
 
In the event that (a) a Financial Officer of any Loan Party has actual knowledge that any credit card issuer, credit card processor or debit card or mall card issuer or provider with respect to Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable ceases to comply with the requirements of clause (f) above or (b) a Credit Card Account Receivable which was previously an Eligible Credit Card Account Receivable ceases to be an Eligible Credit Card Account Receivable hereunder (other than by reason of clause (m) or (p) above), the applicable Loan Party or the Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent thereof promptly, and in any event not later than the time of submission to the Administrative Agent of the next Borrowing Base Certificate.
 
In determining the amount of an Eligible Credit Card Account Receivable, the face amount of a Credit Card Account Receivable may, in the Administrative Agents Permitted Discretion, be reduced by, without duplication, to the extent not reflected in such face amount, (i) the amount of all accrued and actual discounts, claims, credits or credits pending, promotional program allowances, price adjustments, finance charges or other allowances (including any amount that any Loan Party may be obligated to rebate to an Account Debtor pursuant to the terms of any agreement or understanding (written or oral)) applicable to such Credit Card Account Receivable, (ii) the aggregate amount of all cash received in respect of such Credit Card Account Receivable but not yet applied by any Loan Party to reduce the amount of such Credit Card Account Receivable and (iii) the amount of all customary fees and expenses in connection with any credit card arrangement. Standards of eligibility may be made more restrictive from time to time solely by the Administrative Agent in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion, with any such changes to be effective four Business Days after delivery of notice thereof to the Borrower Representative and the Lenders.
 
 
 means a Foreign Subsidiary that is (a) a first-tier CFC owned directly by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary that is a U.S. Person or (b) described in clause (b) of the definition of the term Foreign Subsidiary.
Eligible Foreign Subsidiary
 
 means, at any time, the Inventory of a Loan Party which the Administrative Agent determines in its Permitted Discretion is eligible as the basis for (i) the extension of Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans and (ii) the issuance of Letters of Credit. Without limiting the Administrative Agents discretion provided herein, Eligible Inventory shall not include any Inventory:
Eligible Inventory
 
(a)  which is not subject to a first priority perfected Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties);
 
(b)  which is subject to any Lien other than (i) a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties), or (ii) a Permitted Encumbrance which does not have priority over the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties);
 
(c)  which is unmerchantable, defective, damaged or unfit for sale (as such terms are customarily used in the Loan Parties industry), or is not salable at prices approximating at least the cost of such Inventory in the ordinary course of business or is unacceptable due to age, type, category and/or quantity, in each case, consistent with the usage of such terms in the most recent inventory appraisal received by the Administrative Agent as contemplated hereby;
 
(d)  with respect to which any covenant, representation, or warranty contained in this Agreement or the Restated Security Agreement has been breached or is not true or which does not conform in all material respects to all standards imposed by any applicable Governmental Authority;
 
(e)  in which any Person other than such Loan Party shall (i) have any direct or indirect ownership, interest or title to such Inventory or (ii) be indicated on any purchase order or invoice with respect to such Inventory as having or purporting to have an interest therein;
 
(f)  which is not finished goods or which constitutes packaging and shipping material, samples, prototypes, displays or display items, bill-and-hold goods, goods that are returned or marked for return, repossessed goods, goods held on consignment, or goods which are not of a type held for sale in the ordinary course of business (for the avoidance of doubt, sales in the ordinary course of business includes clearance sales);
 
 
(g)  which is not located in the United States or is in transit with a common carrier from vendors and suppliers; that up to $20,000,000 of such Inventory in transit shall not be excluded from being Eligible Inventory pursuant to this clause (g) subject to the right of the Administrative Agent, in its Permitted Discretion and upon not less than four Business Days notice to the Borrower Representative, to exclude such Inventory if it determines that its ability to realize on such Inventory and the proceeds thereof upon the exercise of remedies would be uncertain; and that up to an additional $45,000,000 of such Inventory in transit shall not be excluded from being Eligible Inventory pursuant to this clause (g) so long as (i) the Administrative Agent shall have received (1) a true and correct copy of the bill of lading and other shipping documents for such Inventory (and, if such Inventory is in transit from outside the United States, such bill of lading is negotiable), (2) evidence of satisfactory casualty insurance naming the Administrative Agent as loss payee and otherwise covering such risks as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request, (3) confirmation that the applicable Loan Party has paid for the goods (unless such Loan Partys payment obligations are covered by a Commercial Letter of Credit or a private label letter of credit) or that the applicable Loan Party has title to such Inventory (together with such evidence thereof as the Administrative Agent may from time to time require) and (4) if the bill of lading is (A) non-negotiable, a duly executed Collateral Access Agreement or other bailee agreement reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent from the applicable customs broker for such Inventory, or (B) negotiable, confirmation that the bill is issued in the name of such Loan Party and consigned to the order of the Administrative Agent, and a reasonably acceptable agreement has been executed with such Loan Partys customs broker, in which the customs broker agrees that it holds the negotiable bill as agent for the Administrative Agent and will follow instructions of the Administrative Agent with respect to the disposition thereof and of the goods, (ii) the common carrier is not an Affiliate of the applicable vendor or supplier and (iii) the customs broker is not an Affiliate of any Loan Party;
provided
provided
further
 
(h)  which is located in any location leased by the applicable Loan Party (other than any retail store of such Loan Party located in a jurisdiction that does not provide for a common law or statutory landlords lien on the personal property of tenants that would be prior or superior to that of the Administrative Agent) unless (i) the lessor has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Collateral Access Agreement or (ii) a Rent Reserve has been established by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
 
(i)  which is located in any third party warehouse or is in the possession of a bailee (other than a third party processor) and is not evidenced by a Document (other than bills of lading to the extent permitted pursuant to clause (g) above), unless (i) such warehouseman or bailee has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Collateral Access Agreement and such other documentation as the Administrative Agent may require or (ii) an appropriate Reserve has been established by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion; that up to $10,000,000 at any one time of such Inventory described in this clause (i) and not meeting the requirements of the preceding subclauses (i) and (ii) may be included as Eligible Inventory to the extent such Inventory is being held for not more than 60 days in a warehouse pending delivery to a store upon the initial opening thereof (including the initial opening after the renovation or remodeling of a store);
provided
 
 
(j)   which is being processed offsite at a third party location or outside processor, or is in-transit to or from said third party location or outside processor;
 
(k)  which is the subject of a consignment by a Loan Party as consignor;
 
(l)  which contains or bears any intellectual property rights licensed to a Loan Party unless the Administrative Agent is satisfied that it may sell or otherwise dispose of such Inventory without (i) infringing the rights of such licensor, (ii) violating any contract with such licensor or (iii) incurring any liability with respect to payment of royalties other than royalties incurred pursuant to sale of such Inventory under the current licensing agreement;
 
(m) which is not reflected in a current perpetual inventory report of the applicable Loan Party (unless such Inventory is reflected in a report to the Administrative Agent as in transit Inventory);
 
(n)   for which reclamation rights have been asserted by the seller;
 
(o)   any Inventory of the Figi Companies or any other highly perishable Inventory; or
 
(p)  which does not meet such other eligibility criteria for Inventory as the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion may determine from time to time;
 
, , that the Administrative Agent shall not add any additional eligibility criteria (or amend any then-existing eligibility criteria to make the same more restrictive) without giving at least four Business Days prior notice to the Borrower Representative; that in determining the value of the Eligible Inventory, such value shall be reduced by, without duplication, any amounts representing (i) Vendor Rebates; (ii) costs included in Inventory relating to advertising; (iii) to the extent determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion to be appropriate, the shrink reserve; (iv) the unreconciled discrepancy between the general inventory ledger and the perpetual inventory ledger, to the extent the general inventory ledger reflects less Inventory than the perpetual inventory ledger; and (v) a reserve for Inventory which is designated or demanded to be returned to or retained by the applicable vendor or which is recognized as damaged or off quality by the applicable Loan Party.
provided
however
provided
further
 
 
In the event that a Financial Officer of any Loan Party has actual knowledge that Inventory at any location having a fair market value of $5,000,000 or more which was previously Eligible Inventory ceases to be Eligible Inventory hereunder (other than by reason of clause (p) above), such Loan Party or the Borrower Representative shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof; that the Loan Parties shall not be required to deliver an updated Borrowing Base Certificate until such time as submission to the Administrative Agent of the next Borrowing Base Certificate is required hereunder; that the Administrative Agent may, in its reasonable discretion, upon receipt of such notice as set forth above, adjust the Borrowing Base to reflect such change in Eligible Inventory.
provided
provided
further
 
 means (a) each Mortgaged Property that on the Third Amendment Restatement Date is subject to a Mortgage securing the Secured Obligations (as such term is defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) and (b) each other Mortgaged Property which the Administrative Agent determines in its Permitted Discretion is eligible as the basis for (i) the extension of Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans and (ii) the issuance of Letters of Credit; , that, without limiting the Administrative Agents discretion provided herein, the Eligible Real Properties shall not include any Mortgaged Property:
Eligible Real Properties
provided
 
(A)     which is not subject to a first priority perfected Mortgage in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties);
 
(B)     which is subject to any Lien other than (i) a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties), (ii) a Permitted Encumbrance described in clause (a), (b) or (f) of the definition of such term or (iii) a Permitted Encumbrance which does not have priority over the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Lender Parties);
 
(C)      with respect to which any covenant, representation, or warranty contained in this Agreement or the applicable Mortgage has been materially breached or is materially untrue if such breach or untruth constitutes a continuing Event of Default under this Agreement or the applicable Mortgage; or
 
(D)      which does not meet such other eligibility criteria as the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion may determine from time to time;
 
, , that the Administrative Agent shall not add any additional eligibility criteria (or amend any then-existing eligibility criteria to make the same more restrictive) without giving at least four Business Days prior notice to the Borrower Representative.
provided
however
 
In the event that a Financial Officer of any Loan Party has actual knowledge that a Mortgaged Property which was previously an Eligible Real Property ceases to be an Eligible Real Property hereunder, such Loan Party or the Borrower Representative shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof; that the Loan Parties shall not be required to deliver an updated Borrowing Base Certificate until such time as submission to the Administrative Agent of the next Borrowing Base Certificate is required hereunder; that the Administrative Agent may, in its reasonable discretion, upon receipt of such notice as set forth above, adjust the Borrowing Base to reflect such change in the Eligible Real Properties.
provided
provided
further
 
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this definition, no Mortgaged Property, including the Mortgaged Properties referred to in clause (a) of this definition, shall constitute an Eligible Real Property unless the Administrative Agent shall have received in respect of such Mortgaged Property the following, in each case satisfactory to the Administrative Agent: (i) a FIRREA Appraisal, (ii) a report on environmental hazards and liabilities, (iii) a flood hazard certificate and (iv) in the case of any Mortgaged Property that is located in an area determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency to have special flood hazards, evidence of flood insurance as required under applicable law, including Regulation H of the Board of Governors.
 
 means a bank or financial institution that is organized under the laws of the United States or any State or district thereof with an office in New York, New York which has a combined capital surplus of at least $200,000,000.
Eligible Successor Agent
 
 means any period (a) commencing at any time when Availability shall be less than the greater of (i) the lesser of (A) 15% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (B) 15% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $70,000,000 and (b) ending when Availability shall have been greater than the greater of (i) the lesser of (A) 17.5% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (B) 17.5% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $80,000,000 for a period of 30 consecutive days.
Enhanced Reporting Period
 
 means all applicable federal, state, and local laws (including common law), regulations, rules, ordinances, codes, decrees, judgments, directives, orders (including consent orders), and binding agreements with any Governmental Authority in each case, relating to pollution or protection of the environment, natural resources, human health and safety (to the extent related to exposure to Hazardous Materials), or the presence, Release of, or exposure to, Hazardous Materials, or the generation, manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, transport, recycling or handling of, or the arrangement for such activities with respect to, Hazardous Materials.
Environmental Laws
 
 means any liability, claim, action, suit, agreement, judgment or order arising under or relating to any Environmental Law for any damages, injunctive relief, losses, fines, penalties, fees, expenses (including reasonable fees and expenses of attorneys and consultants) or costs, whether contingent or otherwise, including those arising from or relating to: (a) compliance or non-compliance with any Environmental Law or permit, license or approval issued thereunder, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the Release of any Hazardous Materials or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
 
 
 means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest (other than, prior to the date of such conversion, any Indebtedness that is convertible into any such Equity Interests).
Equity Interests
 
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
ERISA
 
 means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with any Loan Party, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or 414(c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(m) or 414(o) of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
 
 means (a) any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived), (b) any failure by any Plan to satisfy the minimum funding standard (within the meaning of Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA) applicable to such Plan, in each case whether or not waived, (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(c) of the Code or Section 302(c) of ERISA, of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan, (d) a determination that any Plan is, or is reasonably expected to be, in at-risk status (as defined in Section 303(i)(4) of ERISA or Section 430(i)(4) of the Code), (e) the incurrence by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan, (f) the receipt by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan, (g) the incurrence by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan, (h) the receipt by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA, or in endangered or critical status, within the meaning of Section 305 of ERISA or Section 432 of the Code, any Loan Party
ERISA Event
(i) the occurrence of a non-exempt prohibited transaction (as defined in Section 4975 of the Code or Section 406 of ERISA) with respect to which
or any ERISA Affiliate is a disqualified person (within the meaning of Section 4975 of the Code) or a party in interest (within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA) or could otherwise reasonably be expected to be liable or (j) any other event or condition with respect to a Plan or Multiemployer Plan that could reasonably be expected to result in material liability of any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate.
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
 
 
 has the meaning set forth in Article VII.
Events of Default
 
 means the United States Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Exchange Act
 
 means (a) any Deposit Account that is an operating account maintained by any Loan Party solely for the use of one of its retail stores (or a group of 80 or fewer retail stores) in which payments received from customers are deposited and which is not an account to which amounts held in other deposit accounts of the Loan Parties are swept, that (i) such Loan Party shall cause all amounts on deposit in such Deposit Account (other than amounts reasonably determined by such Loan Party to be required for the operating needs of the retail store or stores to which such Deposit Account relates), to be swept on each business day into one or more Deposit Accounts that are not Excluded Deposit Accounts and (ii) no such Deposit Account shall contain payment of or in respect of any Credit Card Account Receivable of any Loan Party, (b) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for the payment of salaries and wages and (c) any Deposit Account that is a zero balance disbursement account the funds in which are used solely for payment of medical or insurance reimbursement, workers compensation and similar expenses.
Excluded Deposit Account
provided
 
 means any of the following Taxes imposed on or with respect to a Recipient or required to be withheld or deducted from a payment to a Recipient, (a) Taxes imposed on or measured by net income (however denominated), franchise Taxes, and branch profits Taxes, in each case, (i) imposed as a result of such Recipient being organized under the laws of, or having its principal office or, in the case of any Lender, its applicable lending office located in, the jurisdiction imposing such Tax (or any political subdivision thereof) or (ii) that are Other Connection Taxes, (b) in the case of a Lender, U.S. Federal withholding Taxes imposed on amounts payable to or for the account of such Lender with respect to an applicable interest in a Loan or Revolving Commitment pursuant to a law in effect on the date on which (i) such Lender acquires such interest in the Loan or Revolving Commitment (other than pursuant to an assignment request by the Company under Section 2.19(b)) or (ii) such Lender changes its lending office, except in each case to the extent that, pursuant to Section 2.17, amounts with respect to such Taxes were payable either to such Lenders assignor immediately before such Lender acquired the applicable interest in such Loan or Revolving Commitment or to such Lender immediately before it changed its lending office, (c) Taxes attributable to such Recipients failure to comply with Section 2.17(f) and (d) any U.S. Federal withholding Taxes imposed under FATCA.
Excluded Taxes
 
 means the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of January 3, 2011, as further amended and restated by the Second Restatement Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012, among the Company, the Borrowing Subsidiaries party thereto, the other Loan Parties, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent, as in effect immediately prior to the Third Restatement Effective Date.
Existing Credit Agreement
 
 
 means the letters of credit referred to on Schedule 2.06.
Existing Letters of Credit
 
 means, as to any Eligible Real Property, the fair market value of such Eligible Real Property as determined by the Administrative Agent in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion taking into account the most recent FIRREA Appraisal of such Eligible Real Property received by the Administrative Agent pursuant to the Third Restatement Agreement or Section 5.12(b) and such other matters as the Administrative Agent shall deem relevant in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion.
Fair Market Value
 
 means Sections 1471 through 1474 of the Code, as of the Third Restatement Effective Date (or any amended or successor version that is substantively comparable and not materially more onerous to comply with) and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof and any agreements entered into pursuant to Section 1471(b) of the Code.
FATCA
 
 means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
 
 means Figis Inc., a Wisconsin corporation, and its subsidiaries.
Figi Companies
 
 means, with respect to any Person, the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of such Person.
Financial Officer
 
 means the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989, as amended.
FIRREA
 
 means an appraisal that (a) has been prepared by an appraiser engaged by the Administrative Agent, (b) complies with the applicable requirements of the Real Estate Appraisal Reform Amendments of FIRREA and (c) is satisfactory to and has been approved by the Administrative Agent in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion.
FIRREA Appraisal
 
 means, for any period, the ratio of (a) (i) Consolidated EBITDAR for such period (ii) Capital Expenditures for such period, to (b) Consolidated Fixed Charges for such period. In the event that the Company or any Subsidiary shall have completed a Material Acquisition or a Material Disposition during the relevant period, the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio shall be determined for such period on a Pro Forma Basis.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
minus
 
 means a Lender that is not a U.S. Person.
Foreign Lender
 
 
 means a pledge or charge agreement granting a Lien on Equity Interests in a Foreign Subsidiary to secure the Secured Obligations, governed by the law of the jurisdiction of organization of such Foreign Subsidiary and in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Foreign Pledge Agreement
 
 means a Subsidiary that (a) is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States or any State thereof or the District of Columbia or (b) substantially all the assets of which consist of Equity Interests in Subsidiaries described in clause (a) above.
Foreign Subsidiary
 
 means the deposit account(s) of the Borrowers to which the Administrative Agent or the Swingline Lender is authorized by the Borrowers (or by the Borrower Representative on their behalf) to transfer the proceeds of any Borrowings requested or authorized pursuant to this Agreement.
Funding Accounts
 
 means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America, applied in accordance with the consistency requirements thereof.
GAAP
 
 means, at any time, the sum of (a) 50% of the aggregate remaining amount at such time of outstanding gift certificates and gift cards sold by the Loan Parties entitling the holder thereof to use all or a portion of the certificate or gift card to pay all or a portion of the purchase price of Inventory and (b) 100% of the aggregate amount at such time of outstanding customer deposits and merchandise credits entitling the holder thereof to use all or a portion of such deposit or credit to pay all or a portion of the purchase price of Inventory.
Gift Card Reserve
 
 means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national body exercising such powers or functions, such as the European Union or the European Central Bank).
Governmental Authority
 
 of or by any Person (the ) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the ) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or other obligation; that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business. The amount, as of any date of determination, of any Guarantee shall be the principal amount outstanding on such date of Indebtedness or other obligation guaranteed thereby (or, in the case of (i) any Guarantee the terms of which limit the monetary exposure of the guarantor or (ii) any Guarantee of an obligation that does not have a principal amount, the maximum monetary exposure as of such date of the guarantor under such Guarantee (as determined, in the case of clause (i), pursuant to such terms or, in the case of clause (ii), reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company)).
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
 
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.01.
Guaranteed Obligations
 
 means any chemical, material, substance or waste that is prohibited, limited or regulated by or pursuant to any applicable Environmental Law, including, without limitation, any petroleum products or byproducts and all other hydrocarbons, coal ash, radon gas, asbestos-containing materials, urea formaldehyde foam insulation, polychlorinated biphenyls, chlorofluorocarbons and all other ozone-depleting substances or mold.
Hazardous Materials
 
 means any Subsidiary that (a) does not conduct any business operations and (b) either (i) has assets with a total book value of $1,000,000 or less or (ii) (A) was formed to conduct operations of one or more retail stores each of which has since closed and ceased to be in operation, (B) does not own any assets material to the Company and the Subsidiaries and (C) is (or after the closing of such retail stores will be) in the process of voluntary liquidation, dissolution or merger in compliance with Section 6.03.
Inactive Subsidiary
 
 of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person (excluding trade accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business), (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding (i) current accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business, (ii) deferred compensation payable to directors, officers or employees of the Company or any Subsidiary and (iii) any purchase price adjustment or earnout incurred in connection with an acquisition, except to the extent that the amount payable pursuant to such purchase price adjustment or earnout is, or becomes, reasonably determinable), (e) all Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations of such Person, (f) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty, (g) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers acceptances, (h) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed by such Person (but only to the extent of the lesser of (x) the amount of such Indebtedness and (y) the fair market value of such property, if such Indebtedness has not been assumed by such Person), and (i) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other Person (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor by contract, as a matter of law or otherwise as a result of such Persons ownership interest in or other relationship with such other Person, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor. It is acknowledged and agreed that private label letters of credit issued by the Company or any Subsidiary for the making of payment for the purchase of Inventory in the ordinary course of business (and in respect of which no Issuing Bank or other financial institution is an issuer thereof or has any disbursement obligations thereunder) do not constitute Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary.
Indebtedness
 
 
 means (a) Taxes, other than Excluded Taxes, imposed on or with respect to any payment made by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party under any Loan Document and (b) to the extent not otherwise described in clause (a), Other Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.03(b).
Indemnitee
 
 means the information package prepared for Lenders relating to the Borrowers and the Transactions and dated February 2013, and all other written materials relating to the Borrowers and the Transactions (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement or in this Agreement) provided to the Lenders in connection with the syndication of the Revolving Commitments under the Existing Credit Agreement or this Agreement or the solicitation of consents to the amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement effected hereby.
Information Materials
 
 means a request by the Borrower Representative to convert or continue a Revolving Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.08, which shall be, in the case of any such written request, in the form of Exhibit F or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Interest Election Request
 
 means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan, a Protective Advance or an Overadvance), the first Business Day of each calendar quarterand the Maturity Date, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months duration, such day or days prior to the last day of such Interest Period as shall occur at intervals of three months duration after the first day of such Interest Period, and the Maturity Date, and (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, Protective Advance or Overadvance, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid and the Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
 
 
 means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months (or, with the consent of each Lender, nine or twelve months) thereafter, as the Borrower Representative may elect; that (a) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (b) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and, in the case of a Revolving Borrowing, thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
provided
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
Inventory
 
 means, with respect to a specified Person, any Equity Interests, evidences of Indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, or any capital contribution or loans or advances (other than advances made in the ordinary course of business that would be recorded as accounts receivable on the balance sheet of the specified Person prepared in accordance with GAAP) to, Guarantees of any Indebtedness or other obligations of, or any other investment (including any investment in the form of transfer of property for consideration that is less than the fair value thereof (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company)) in, any other Person that are held or made by the specified Person. The amount, as of any date of determination, of (a) any Investment in the form of a loan or an advance shall be the principal amount thereof outstanding on such date, without any adjustment for write-downs or write-offs (including as a result of forgiveness of any portion thereof) with respect to such loan or advance after the date thereof, (b) any Investment in the form of a Guarantee shall be determined in accordance with the definition of the term Guarantee, (c) any Investment in the form of a purchase or other acquisition for value of any Equity Interests, evidences of Indebtedness or other securities of any Person shall be the fair value (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company) of the consideration therefor (including any Indebtedness assumed in connection therewith), plus the fair value (as so determined) of all additions, as of such date of determination, thereto, and minus the amount, as of such date of determination, of any portion of such Investment repaid to the investor in cash as a repayment of principal or a return of capital, as the case may be, but without any other adjustment for increases or decreases in value of, or write-ups, write-downs or write-offs with respect to, such Investment after the time of such Investment, (d) any Investment (other than any Investment referred to in clause (a), (b) or (c) above) in the form of a transfer of Equity Interests or other property by the investor to the investee, including any such transfer in the form of a capital contribution, shall be the fair value (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company) of such Equity Interests or other property as of the time of such transfer (less, in the case of any investment in the form of transfer of property for consideration that is less than the fair value thereof, the fair value (as so determined) of such consideration as of the time of the transfer), minus the amount, as of such date of determination, of any portion of such Investment repaid to the investor in cash as a return of capital, but without any other adjustment for increases or decreases in value of, or write-ups, write-downs or write-offs with respect to, such Investment after the time of such transfer, and (e) any Investment (other than any Investment referred to in clause (a), (b), (c) or (d) above) in any Person resulting from the issuance by such Person of its Equity Interests to the investor shall be the fair value (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Company) of such Equity Interests at the time of the issuance thereof.
Investment
 
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Restated Security Agreement.
IP Security Agreements
 
 means the United States Internal Revenue Service.
IRS
 
 means (a) each of JPMCB and BofA in its capacity as an issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Section 2.06(i), and (b) solely with respect to any Existing Letter of Credit, any Lender that shall have issued such Letter of Credit. An Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Bank, in which case the term Issuing Bank shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Bank
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., a national banking association, in its individual capacity, and its successors.
JPMCB
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 5.03.
Joinder Agreement
 
 means Kirkstone Company Limited, a company incorporated in Hong Kong with limited liability, and its subsidiaries.
Kirkstone
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(j).
LC Collateral Account
 
 means a payment made by an Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
 
 means, at any time, the sum of the Commercial LC Exposure and the Standby LC Exposure. The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
 
 means (a) the Administrative Agent, (b) the Arrangers, (c) the Syndication Agent, (d) the Documentation Agent, (e) the Lenders, (f) the Issuing Banks, (g) Lenders and their Affiliates to whom any Banking Services Obligations are owing, (h) Lenders and their Affiliates to whom Swap Obligations constituting Secured Obligations hereunder are owing, (i) the beneficiaries of each indemnification obligation undertaken by any Loan Party under any Loan Document and (j) the permitted successors and assigns of the foregoing.
Lender Parties
 
 
 means the Persons listed on Schedule 2.01 and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption or an amendment referred to in Section 2.09(e), other than any such Person that shall have ceased to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term Lenders includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
 
 means each Existing Letter of Credit and any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement. It is acknowledged that private label letters of credit issued by the Company or any Subsidiary do not constitute Letters of Credit (it being further acknowledged that no Issuing Bank is an issuer of any such private label letter of credit or has any disbursement obligations thereunder).
Letter of Credit
 
 means, on any date, the ratio of the sum of (a) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Company and the Subsidiaries as of such date, determined on a consolidated basis ( that, for purposes of this clause (a), the term Indebtedness shall not include contingent obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary as an account party in respect of any letter of credit to the extent such letter of credit does not support Indebtedness) to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four fiscal quarters ended on or most recently prior to such date.
Leverage Ratio
provided
 
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or on any successor or substitute screen provided by Reuters, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such screen, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the LIBO Rate with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
 
 means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, charge, security interest or other encumbrance in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
 
 
 means this Agreement, the Third Restatement Agreement, the Collateral Documents, any agreement referred to in Section 2.06(i), any amendment referred to in Section 2.09(e) and, except for purposes of Section 9.02, any promissory notes issued pursuant to this Agreement, any Letter of Credit applications and all other agreements, instruments, documents and certificates identified in Section 4.01 executed and delivered to, or in favor of, the Administrative Agent or any other Lender Party and including all other pledges, powers of attorney, consents, assignments, contracts, notices, letter of credit agreements and all other written matter whether heretofore, now or hereafter executed by or on behalf of any Loan Party, or any employee of any Loan Party, and delivered to the Administrative Agent or any other Lender Party in connection with the Agreement or the transactions contemplated thereby. Any reference in this Agreement or any other Loan Document to a Loan Document shall include all appendices, exhibits or schedules thereto, and all amendments, restatements, supplements or other modifications thereto, and shall refer to this Agreement or such Loan Document as the same may be in effect at any and all times such reference becomes operative.
Loan Documents
 
 means of this Agreement.
Loan Guarantee
Article X
 
 means the Company and each Subsidiary that is a party to this Agreement.
Loan Guarantor
 
 means the Company and the Subsidiary Loan Parties.
Loan Parties
 
 means the loans and advances made by the Lenders or the Administrative Agent pursuant to this Agreement, including Swingline Loans, Overadvances and Protective Advances.
Loans
 
 means any acquisition, or a series of related acquisitions, of (a) Equity Interests in any Person if, after giving effect thereto, such Person will become a Subsidiary or (b) assets comprising all or substantially all the assets of (or all or substantially all the assets constituting a business unit, division, product line or line of business of) any Person; that the aggregate consideration therefor (including Indebtedness assumed in connection therewith, all obligations in respect of deferred purchase price (including obligations under any purchase price adjustment but excluding earnout or similar payments) and all other consideration payable in connection therewith) exceeds $50,000,000.
Material Acquisition
provided
 
 means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, operations or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Company and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of any Borrower to perform any of its monetary obligations under the Loan Documents to which it is a party, (c) the Collateral, or the Administrative Agents Liens (on behalf of itself and the Lender Parties) on the Collateral or the priority of such Liens (with materiality to be determined for purposes of this clause (c) in terms of the Collateral taken as a whole, and not in terms of any individual item of Collateral), or (d) the rights of or benefits available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Lenders under the Loan Documents (other than, in the case of this clause (d) only, a material adverse effect caused by an improper act or omission of any Issuing Bank or Lender or the Administrative Agent).
Material Adverse Effect
 
 
 means any sale, transfer or other disposition, or a series of related sales, transfers or other dispositions, of (a) all or substantially all the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in any Person that are owned by the Company or any Subsidiary or (b) assets comprising all or substantially all the assets of (or all or substantially all the assets constituting a business unit, division, product line or line of business of) any Person; that the aggregate consideration therefor (including Indebtedness assumed by the transferee in connection therewith, all obligations in respect of deferred purchase price (including obligations under any purchase price adjustment but excluding earnout or similar payments) and all other consideration payable in connection therewith) exceeds $50,000,000.
Material Disposition
provided
 
 means Indebtedness (other than the Loans, Letters of Credit and the Loan Guarantee), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of the Company and the Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $50,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the principal amount of the obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Company or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
 
 means each Borrowing Subsidiary and each other Subsidiary (a) the consolidated total assets of which equal 5.0% or more of the consolidated total assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries or (b) the consolidated revenues of which equal 5.0% or more of the consolidated revenues of the Company and the Subsidiaries, in each case as of the end of or for the most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b); that if at the end of or for any such most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters the combined consolidated total assets or combined consolidated revenues of all Subsidiaries that under clauses (a) and (b) above would not constitute Material Subsidiaries shall have exceeded 10.0% of the consolidated total assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries or 10.0% of the consolidated revenues of the Company and the Subsidiaries, then one or more of such excluded Subsidiaries shall for all purposes of this Agreement be deemed to be Material Subsidiaries in descending order based on the amounts of their consolidated total assets or consolidated revenues, as the case may be, until such excess shall have been eliminated.
Material Subsidiary
provided
 
 means June 14, 2018, or any earlier date on which the Revolving Commitments are reduced to zero or otherwise terminated pursuant to the terms hereof.
Maturity Date
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.09.
Maximum Liability
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.16.
Maximum Rate
 
 means the merger of Merger Sub with and into the Acquired Company, with the Acquired Company surviving such merger as a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Company.
Merger
 
 
 means Colombia Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation.
Merger Sub
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc., and any successor to its rating agency business.
Moodys
 
 means a mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents or other security document granting a Lien on any Mortgaged Property to secure the Secured Obligations. Each Mortgage shall be in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Mortgage
 
 means each parcel of real property located in the United States of America owned in fee by a Loan Party, and the improvements thereto, that (together with such improvements) has a book value of $5,000,000 or more, other than the parcels of real property located in Duluth, Minnesota and Johnston, Iowa, owned by Maurices Incorporated and set forth on Schedule 1.01B.
Mortgaged Property
 
 means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
 
 means, with respect to Inventory of any Person, the orderly liquidation value thereof, as determined on a basis consistent in all material respects with the inventory appraisals referred to in Section 4.01(h) of the Existing Credit Agreement (with such adjustments as shall be deemed appropriate to reflect events or changes in circumstances after the dates of such appraisals) by an appraiser acceptable to the Administrative Agent, net of all costs of liquidation thereof.
Net Orderly Liquidation Value
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.02(d).
Non-Consenting Lender
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.10.
Non-Paying Guarantor
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.02.
Obligated Party
 
 means all unpaid principal of and accrued and unpaid interest on the Loans, all LC Exposure, all accrued and unpaid fees and all expenses, reimbursements, indemnities and other obligations of the Loan Parties to any Lender, the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, the Documentation Agent, the Syndication Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Indemnitee arising under the Loan Documents, whether direct or indirect (including those acquired by assumption), absolute or contingent, due or to become due, now existing or hereafter arising and including interest, fees, costs, expenses and indemnities that accrue after the commencement by or against any Loan Party or any Affiliate thereof of any proceeding under any bankruptcy or insolvency laws naming such Person as the debtor in such proceeding, regardless of whether such interest, fees costs, expenses and indemnities are allowed claims in such proceeding.
Obligations
 
 means the United States Treasury Department Office of Foreign Assets Control.
OFAC
 
 
 means November 25, 2009.
Original Effective Date
 
 means, with respect to any Recipient, Taxes imposed as a result of a present or former connection between such Recipient and the jurisdiction imposing such Tax (other than connections arising from such Recipient having executed, delivered, become a party to, performed its obligations under, received payments under, received or perfected a security interest under, engaged in any other transaction pursuant to or enforced any Loan Document, or sold or assigned an interest in any Loan Document).
Other Connection Taxes
 
 means all present or future stamp, court or documentary, intangible, recording, filing or similar Taxes that arise from any payment made under, from the execution, delivery, performance, enforcement or registration of, from the receipt or perfection of a security interest under, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document, except any such Taxes that are Other Connection Taxes imposed with respect to an assignment (other than an assignment made pursuant to Section 2.19).
Other Taxes
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(b).
Overadvance
 
 means, at any time, the sum of the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Overadvances at such time. The Overadvance Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Overadvance Exposure at such time.
Overadvance Exposure
 
 means any amount that a Loan Party owes to the Administrative Agent under Section 9.19.
Parallel Debt
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04(c)(ii).
Participant Register
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04(c)(i).
Participants
 
 means the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001 (Title III of Pub.L. No. 107-56 (Signed into law October 26, 2001)).
Patriot Act
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.10.
Paying Guarantor
 
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA.
PBGC
 
 
 means the purchase or other acquisition by the Company or any Subsidiary of Equity Interests in, or all or substantially all the assets of (or all or substantially all the assets constituting a business unit, division, product line or line of business of), any Person if (a) in the case of any purchase or other acquisition of Equity Interests in a Person, such Person will be, upon the consummation of such acquisition a wholly owned Subsidiary (or, in the case of any such purchase or other acquisition structured as a two-step tender offer, such Person will become a wholly owned Subsidiary reasonably promptly thereafter upon the consummation of the second-step merger), in each case including as a result of a merger or consolidation between any Subsidiary and such Person, or (b) in the case of any purchase or other acquisition of other assets, such assets will be owned by the Company or a wholly owned Subsidiary; that (i) all transactions related thereto are consummated in accordance with applicable law, (ii) the business of such Person, or such assets, as the case may be, constitute a business permitted under Section 6.03(b) and (iii) with respect to each such purchase or other acquisition, all actions required to be taken with respect to each newly created or acquired Subsidiary or assets in order to satisfy the requirements set forth in Section 5.03 and the Collateral Documents shall be taken in accordance therewith.
Permitted Acquisition
provided
 
 means a determination made in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable (from the perspective of a secured asset-based lender) business judgment.
Permitted Discretion
 
 means:
Permitted Encumbrances
 
(a)    Liens imposed by law for Taxes that are not yet delinquent or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.06;
 
(b)   carriers, warehousemens, mechanics, materialmens, repairmens and other like Liens imposed by law (other than any Lien imposed pursuant to Section 430(k) of the Code or Section 303(k) of ERISA or a violation of Section 436 of the Code), arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than 30 days or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.06;
 
(c)   pledges and deposits made (i) in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations and (ii) in respect of letters of credit, bank guarantees or similar instruments issued for the account of the Company or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business supporting obligations of the type set forth in clause (i) above;
 
(d)   deposits made to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts (other than Indebtedness for borrowed money), leases (other than Capital Lease Obligations), statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(e)    judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (k) of Article VII;
 
(f)    easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances and exceptions to title on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business or in the ordinary operation of such real property that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not materially detract from the value of the affected property or interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Company or any Subsidiary or the ordinary operation of such real property;
 
 
(g) customary rights of setoff upon deposits of cash in favor of banks and other depository institutions and Liens of a collecting bank arising under the UCC in respect of payment items in the course of collection;
 
(h) Liens arising from precautionary UCC financing statement filings (or similar filings under applicable law) regarding operating leases or consignments;
 
(i) Liens representing any interest or title of a licensor, lessor or sublicensor or sublessor, or a licensee, lessee or sublicensee or sublessee, in the property subject to any lease (other than Capital Lease Obligations), license or sublicense or concession agreement permitted by this Agreement;
 
(j) Liens arising in the ordinary course of business in favor of custom and forwarding agents and similar Persons in respect of imported goods and merchandise in the custody of such Persons;
 
(k) Liens in favor of customs and revenue authorities arising as a matter of law to secure payment of customs duties in connection with the importation of goods;
 
(l) Liens or rights of setoff against credit balances of the Company or any Subsidiary with credit card issuers or credit card processors to secure obligations of the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, to any such credit card issuer or credit card processor incurred in the ordinary course of business as a result of fees and chargebacks; and
 
(m) other Liens that are contractual rights of set-off;
 
that the term Permitted Encumbrances shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness, other than Liens referred to in clause (c) above securing letters of credit, bank guarantees or similar instruments.
provided
 
 means:
Permitted Investments
 
(a)  direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof;
 
(b)  investments in commercial paper maturing within 270 days from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, the highest credit rating obtainable from S&P or from Moodys;
 
(c)  investments in certificates of deposit, bankers acceptances and time deposits maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof that has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000;
 
 
(d)   fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above;
 
(e) money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in SEC Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) are rated AAA by S&P or Aaa by Moodys and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $5,000,000,000;
 
(f)  marketable direct obligations issued by any state of the United States or any political subdivision of any such state or any public instrumentality thereof and rated, at the time of the acquisition thereof, at least A by S&P or Moodys; and
 
(g)  in the case of any Foreign Subsidiary, other short-term investments that are analogous to the foregoing, are of comparable credit quality and are customarily used by companies in the jurisdiction of such Foreign Subsidiary for cash management purposes.
 
 means David Jaffe (or any member of his family that is actively involved in the management of the Company).
Permitted Investor
 
 means any transaction or series of related transactions pursuant to which the direct or indirect ownership of the Equity Interests in Kirkstone are transferred to a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company at least 65% of the Equity Interests of which are pledged as Collateral for the Secured Obligations.
Permitted Restructuring
 
 means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
 
 means any employee pension benefit plan, as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA (other than a Multiemployer Plan), that is subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an employer as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.01(d).
Platform
 
 means the Post-Closing Letter Agreement dated as of the Third Restatement Effective Date between the Company and the Administrative Agent.
Post-Closing Letter Agreement
 
 
 means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMCB as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City. Each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
 
 means, with respect to any computation hereunder required to be made on a pro forma basis giving effect to any proposed Investment or other acquisition (including any Permitted Acquisition or any Material Acquisition), any Material Disposition, any Restricted Payment or any payment of or in respect of any Indebtedness (collectively, ), computation thereof after giving pro forma effect to such Pro Forma Event in accordance with Regulation S-X under the Securities Act (including pro forma adjustments arising out of events which are directly attributable to such Pro Forma Event, are factually supportable and are expected to have a continuing impact), using, for purposes of making such computation, the consolidated financial statements of the Company and the Subsidiaries (and, to the extent applicable, the historical financial statements of any entities or assets so acquired or to be acquired, or so disposed or to be disposed), which shall be reformulated as if such Pro Forma Event (and, in the case of any pro forma computations made hereunder to determine whether such Pro Forma Event is permitted to be consummated hereunder, to any other Pro Forma Event consummated since the first day of the period covered by any component of such pro forma computation and on or prior to the date of such computation), and any Indebtedness or other liabilities incurred in connection with any such Pro Forma Event, had been consummated and incurred at the beginning of such period. If any Indebtedness bears a floating rate of interest and is being given pro forma effect, the interest on such Indebtedness shall be calculated as if the rate in effect on the date of determination had been the applicable rate for the entire period (taking into account any Swap Agreement applicable to such Indebtedness if such Swap Agreement has a remaining term in excess of 12 months).
Pro Forma Basis
Pro Forma Events
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.04(a).
Protective Advance
 
 means, at any time, the sum of the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Protective Advances at such time. The Protective Advance Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Protective Advance Exposure at such time.
Protective Advance Exposure
 
 means the Administrative Agent, any Lender, any Issuing Bank or any combination thereof (as the context requires).
Recipient
 
 means any period (a) commencing at any time when Availability shall be less than the greater of (i) the lesser of (A) 10.0% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (B) 10% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $50,000,000 for three consecutive Business Days and (b) ending on the first day thereafter when Availability shall have been greater than the greater of (i) the lesser of (A) 12.5% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (B) 12.5% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $60,000,000 for a period of 60 consecutive days.
Reduced Availability Period
 
 
 means, in respect of any Indebtedness (the ), any Indebtedness that extends, renews or refinances such Original Indebtedness (or any Refinancing Indebtedness in respect thereof); that (a) the principal amount of such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not exceed the principal amount of such Original Indebtedness except by an amount no greater than accrued and unpaid interest with respect to such Original Indebtedness; (b) the stated final maturity of such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not be earlier than that of such Original Indebtedness; (c) such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not constitute an obligation (including pursuant to a Guarantee) of any Subsidiary that shall not have been (or, in the case of after-acquired Subsidiaries, shall not have been required to become pursuant to the terms of the Original Indebtedness) an obligor in respect of such Original Indebtedness and shall constitute an obligation of such Subsidiary only to the extent of their obligations in respect of such Original Indebtedness; and (d) such Refinancing Indebtedness shall not be secured by any Lien on any asset other than the assets that secured such Original Indebtedness (or would have been required to secure such Original Indebtedness pursuant to the terms thereof).
Refinancing Indebtedness
Original Indebtedness
provided
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04(b).
Register
 
 means, with respect to any specified Person, such Persons Affiliates and the directors, officers, partners, members, trustees, employees, agents, administrators, managers, representatives and advisors of such Person and of such Persons Affiliates.
Related Parties
 
 means any actual release, spill, emission, leaking, dumping, injection, pouring, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migration into or through the environment or within or upon any building, structure, facility or fixture.
Release
 
 means, with respect to any leased store, warehouse distribution center, regional distribution center or depot where any Inventory subject to Liens arising by operation of law is located, a reserve equal to two months rent at such store, warehouse distribution center, regional distribution center or depot.
Rent Reserve
 
 means reports prepared by the Administrative Agent or another Person showing the results of appraisals, field examinations or audits pertaining to the Loan Parties assets from information furnished by or on behalf of the Loan Parties, after the Administrative Agent has exercised its rights of inspection pursuant to this Agreement, which Reports may be distributed to the Lenders by the Administrative Agent.
Report
 
 means, at any time, Lenders having Credit Exposure and unused Revolving Commitments representing more than 50% of the sum of the total Credit Exposure and unused Revolving Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
 
 
 means any and all reserves which the Administrative Agent deems necessary, in its Permitted Discretion, to maintain (including, without limitation, reserves for accrued and unpaid interest on the Secured Obligations, Rent Reserves, Gift Card Reserves, Banking Services Reserves and reserves for loyalty programs, reserves for consignees, warehousemens and bailees charges, reserves for dilution of Accounts, reserves for Inventory shrinkage, reserves for customs charges and shipping charges and other foreign landing costs related to any Inventory in transit, reserves for Swap Obligations, reserves for contingent liabilities of any Loan Party, reserves for uninsured losses of any Loan Party, reserves for uninsured, underinsured, un-indemnified or under-indemnified liabilities or potential liabilities with respect to any litigation and reserves for taxes, fees, assessments, and other governmental charges) with respect to the Collateral or any Loan Party.
Reserves
 
 means that certain Amended and Restated Pledge and Security Agreement, dated as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, between the Loan Parties and the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lender Parties, as amended by the Third Restatement Agreement.
Restated Security Agreement
 
 means any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary, or any payment or distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, exchange, conversion, cancellation or termination of any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary.
Restricted Payment
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit, Protective Advances, Overadvances and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum possible aggregate amount of such Lenders Credit Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to (a) Section 2.09 and (b) assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lenders Revolving Commitment is set forth on Schedule 2.01, or in the Assignment and Assumption or amendment referred to in Section 2.09(e) pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed or acquired its Revolving Commitment, as applicable. The aggregate amount of the Lenders Revolving Commitments as of the Third Restatement Effective Date is $500,000,000.
Revolving Commitment
 
 means a Loan made pursuant to Sections 2.01 and 2.02(a).
Revolving Loan
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw Hill Companies, Inc., and any successor to its rating agency business.
S&P
 
 means an arrangement relating to property owned by the Company or any Subsidiary whereby the Company or such Subsidiary sells or transfers such property to any Person and the Company or any Subsidiary leases such property, or other property that it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property sold or transferred, from such Person or its Affiliates.
Sale/Leaseback Transaction
 
 means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
SEC
 
 
 means the Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of June 14, 2012, among the Company, the other Loan Parties, the Lenders, the Swingline Lender, the Issuing Banks and the Administrative Agent.
Second Restatement Agreement
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Second Restatement Agreement.
Second Restatement Effective Date
 
 means all Obligations, together with all (a) Banking Services Obligations and (b) Swap Obligations owing to one or more Lenders or their respective Affiliates; that at or prior to the time that any transaction relating to such Swap Obligation is executed, the Lender or an Affiliate thereof party thereto (if other than JPMCB or an Affiliate thereof) shall have delivered written notice to the Administrative Agent that such a transaction has been entered into and that it constitutes a Secured Obligation entitled to the benefits of the Collateral Documents.
Secured Obligations
provided
 
 means the United States Securities Act of 1933.
Securities Act
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(d).
Settlement
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(d).
Settlement Date
 
 means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Standby Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements relating to Standby Letters of Credit that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrowers at such time. The Standby LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Standby LC Exposure at such time.
Standby LC Exposure
 
 means all Letters for Credit other than Commercial Letters of Credit.
Standby Letter of Credit
 
 means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves), expressed as a decimal, established by the Board of Governors to which the Administrative Agent is subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as Eurocurrency Liabilities in Regulation D of the Board of Governors). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
 
 of a Person means any Indebtedness of such Person the payment of which is subordinated to payment of the Secured Obligations.
Subordinated Indebtedness
 
 
 means, with respect to any Person (the ) at any date, (a) any Person the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parents consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date and (b) any other Person (i) of which Equity Interests representing more than 50% of the equity value or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (ii) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
 
 means any direct or indirect subsidiary of the Company.
Subsidiary
 
 means each Subsidiary that is a party to this Agreement as a Borrower or a Loan Guarantor (including any such Subsidiary that becomes a party hereto as a Loan Guarantor pursuant to the Third Restatement Agreement or a Joinder Agreement) and is a party to the Restated Security Agreement.
Subsidiary Loan Party
 
 means a certificate in the form of Exhibit G or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Supplemental Perfection Certificate
 
 means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Company or any Subsidiary shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
 
 of a Person means any and all obligations of such Person, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor), under (a) any and all Swap Agreements, and (b) any and all cancellations, buy backs, reversals, terminations or assignments of any Swap Agreement transaction.
Swap Obligations
 
 means, at any time, the sum of the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Swingline Loans at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
 
 means JPMCB, in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder, and its successors and assigns in such capacity.
Swingline Lender
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(a).
Swingline Loan
 
 means BofA.
Syndication Agent
 
 
 means, as to any Person, any lease (including leases that may be terminated by the lessee at any time) of any property (whether real, personal or mixed) (a) that is accounted for as an operating lease under GAAP and (b) in respect of which the lessee retains or obtains ownership of the property so leased for US federal income tax purposes, other than any such lease under which such Person is the lessor.
Synthetic Lease
 
 means, as to any Person, an amount equal to the sum, without duplication, of (a) the obligations of such person to pay rent or other amounts under any Synthetic Lease which are attributable to principal and (b) the amount of any purchase price payment under any Synthetic Lease assuming the lessee exercises the option to purchase the leased property at the end of the lease term. For purposes of Section 6.02, a Synthetic Lease Obligation shall be deemed to be secured by a Lien on the property being leased and such property shall be deemed to be owned by the lessee.
Synthetic Lease Obligations
 
 means all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, withholdings (including backup withholding), assessments, fees or other charges imposed by any Governmental Authority, including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto.
Taxes
 
 means the Term Credit Agreement dated as of the Second Restatement Effective Date, among the Company, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
Term Credit Agreement
 
 means the Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of March 13, 2013, among the Company, the other Loan Parties, the Lenders, the Swingline Lender, the Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent.
Third Restatement Agreement
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Third Restatement Agreement.
Third Restatement Effective Date
 
 means the (a) the repayment in full of all principal, premium, if any, interest, fees and other amounts due or outstanding under the Term Credit Agreement and the discharge and release of the guarantees and liens existing in connection therewith, (b) the execution, delivery and performance by the Loan Parties of this Agreement, the borrowing of the Loans, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder, (c) the creation and perfection of the security interests provided for in the Collateral Documents, and (d) the payment of all fees and expenses in connection with the foregoing.
Transactions
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
 
 means the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect from time to time in the State of New York or any other state the laws of which are required to be applied in connection with the perfection of security interests created by the Collateral Documents.
UCC
 
 
 means, at any time, any Secured Obligations (or portion thereof) that are contingent in nature or unliquidated at such time, including any Secured Obligation that is: (a) an obligation to reimburse a bank for drawings not yet made under a letter of credit issued by it; (b) any other obligation (including any guarantee) that is contingent in nature at such time; or (c) an obligation to provide collateral to secure any of the foregoing types of obligations.
Unliquidated Obligations
 
 means a United States person within the meaning of Section 7701(a)(30) of the Code.
U.S. Person
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.17(f)(ii)(B)(3).
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
 
 means credits earned from vendors for volume purchases that reduce net inventory costs for the Loan Parties.
Vendor Rebates
 
, when used in reference to a subsidiary of any Person, means that all the Equity Interests in such subsidiary (other than directors qualifying shares and other nominal amounts of Equity Interests that are required to be held by other Persons under applicable law) are owned, beneficially and of record, by such Person, another wholly-owned subsidiary of such Person or any combination thereof.
wholly-owned
 
 means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
SECTION 1.02. For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Class (, a Revolving Loan) or by Type (, a Eurodollar Loan) or by Class and Type (, a Eurodollar Revolving Loan). Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Class (, a Revolving Borrowing) or by Type (, a Eurodollar Borrowing) or by Class and Type (, a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing).
Classification of Loans and Borrowings.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
 
SECTION 1.03. The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words include, includes and including shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase without limitation. The word will shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word shall. The words asset and property shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all real and personal, tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights. The word law shall be construed as referring to all statutes, rules, regulations, codes and other laws (including official rulings and interpretations thereunder having the force of law or with which affected Persons customarily comply), and all judgments, orders, writs and decrees, of all Governmental Authorities. Except as otherwise provided herein and unless the context requires otherwise, (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document (including this Agreement and the other Loan Documents) shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any definition of or reference to any statute, rule or regulation shall be construed as referring thereto as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (including by succession of comparable successor laws), and all references to any statute shall be construed as referring to all rules, regulations, rulings and official interpretations promulgated or issued thereunder, (c) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Persons successors and permitted assigns (subject to any restrictions on assignment set forth herein) and, in the case of any Governmental Authority, any other Governmental Authority that shall have succeeded to any or all functions thereof, (d) the words herein, hereof and hereunder, and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof and (e) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement.
Terms Generally.
 
 
SECTION 1.04. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature used herein shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that (a) if the Borrower Representative notifies the Administrative Agent that the Borrowers request an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the Third Restatement Effective Date in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower Representative that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith; that the Borrower Representative, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent and Lenders, on the other hand, agree to negotiate in good faith with respect to any proposed amendment to eliminate or adjust for the effect of any such change in GAAP; and (b) notwithstanding any other provision contained herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature used herein shall be construed, and all computations of amounts and ratios referred to herein shall be made, without giving effect to (i) any election under Statement of Financial Accounting Standards 159, The Fair Value Option for Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities, or any successor thereto (including pursuant to the Accounting Standards Codification), to value any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary at fair value, as defined therein, and (ii) any change in GAAP occurring after the Third Restatement Effective Date as a result of the adoption of any proposals set forth in the Proposed Accounting Standards Update, Leases (Topic 840), issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board on August 17, 2010, or any other proposals issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board in connection therewith, in each case if such change would require treating any lease (or similar arrangement conveying the right to use) as a capital lease where such lease (or similar arrangement) was not required to be so treated under GAAP as in effect on the Third Restatement Effective Date.
Accounting Terms; GAAP.
provided
provided
 
 
 
ARTICLE II
The Credits
 
SECTION 2.01. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender, severally and not jointly, agrees to make Revolving Loans to the Borrowers from time to time during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in (a) such Lenders Credit Exposure exceeding such Lenders Revolving Commitment or (b) the total Credit Exposures exceeding the lesser of (i) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect or (ii) the Borrowing Base then in effect, subject to the Administrative Agents authority, in its sole discretion, to make Protective Advances and Overadvances pursuant to the terms of Section 2.04 and 2.05. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrowers may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Commitments.
 
SECTION 2.02. (a) Each Revolving Loan shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans of the same Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments. Any Protective Advance, any Swingline Loan and any Overadvance shall be made in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.04 or 2.05, as applicable.
Loans and Borrowings.
 
(b) Subject to Section 2.14, each Revolving Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower Representative may request in accordance herewith. Each Protective Advance, Swingline Loan or Overadvance shall be an ABR Loan. Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Revolving Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrowers to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
 
(c) At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate principal amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000; that a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing that results from a continuation of an outstanding Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to such outstanding Borrowing. At the time each ABR Revolving Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate principal amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000 and not less than $1,000,000; that, without affecting the Borrowing Base limitation set forth in Section 2.01, an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate principal amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the Revolving Commitments then in effect or that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.06(e).
provided
provided
 
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower Representative shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert to or continue, any Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
 
 
SECTION 2.03. To request a Revolving Borrowing, the Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request either in writing (delivered by hand or facsimile) or by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m. (or, solely in the case of a request for a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing proposed to be made on the Third Restatement Effective Date, 2:30 p.m.), New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Revolving Borrowing, not later than 12:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of an executed written Borrowing Request. Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Requests for Revolving Borrowings.
 
(i) the name of the applicable Borrower;
 
(ii) the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing and the manner in which the proceeds of such Borrowing are to be disbursed (which shall be consistent with Section 2.07);
 
(iii) the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iv) whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
 
(v) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period.
 
If no election as to the Type of Revolving Borrowing is specified, then the requested Revolving Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, then the applicable Borrower(s) shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lenders Revolving Loan to be made as part of the requested Revolving Borrowing.
 
 
SECTION 2.04. (a) Subject to the limitations set forth below, the Administrative Agent is authorized by the Borrowers and the Lenders, from time to time in the Administrative Agents sole discretion (but shall have absolutely no obligation), to make Loans to the Borrowers, on behalf of all Lenders, which the Administrative Agent, in its Permitted Discretion, deems necessary or desirable (i) to preserve or protect the Collateral or any portion thereof, (ii) to enhance the likelihood of, or maximize the amount of, repayment of the Loans and other Obligations, or (iii) to pay any other amounts required to be paid by the Borrowers pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, including payments of reimbursable expenses (including costs, fees, and expenses as described in Section 9.03) and other sums payable under the Loan Documents which have not been paid by the Borrowers after written demand therefor (any of such Loans are herein referred to as ); that the aggregate principal amount of Protective Advances outstanding at any time shall not exceed (i) $15,000,000 in the aggregate or (ii) together with the aggregate principal amount of Overadvances outstanding at such time pursuant to Section 2.05, $20,000,000 in the aggregate; that no Protective Advance may be made if, after giving effect thereto, any Lenders Credit Exposure shall exceed its Revolving Commitment. Protective Advances may be made even if the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have not been satisfied. The Protective Advances shall be secured by the Liens in favor of the Administrative Agent in and to the Collateral and shall constitute Obligations hereunder. All Protective Advances shall be ABR Borrowings. The Administrative Agents authorization to make Protective Advances may be revoked at any time by the Required Lenders. Any such revocation must be in writing and shall become effective prospectively upon the Administrative Agents receipt thereof. At any time that there is sufficient Availability and the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have been satisfied, the Administrative Agent may request the Lenders to make Revolving Loans to repay a Protective Advance. At any other time the Administrative Agent may require the Lenders to fund their risk participations as described in Section 2.04(b).
Protective Advances.
Protective Advances
provided
provided
further
 
(b) The Administrative Agent may by notice given not later than 12:00 p.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of any Protective Advance outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate principal amount of the Protective Advance in which the Lenders will be required to participate and each Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Protective Advance. Each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to the Administrative Agent such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Protective Advance. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Protective Advances pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including nonsatisfaction of any of the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02, the occurrence and continuance of a Default or any reduction or termination of the Revolving Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Revolving Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders pursuant to this paragraph). From and after the date, if any, on which any Lender has paid in full for its participation in any Protective Advance purchased hereunder, the Administrative Agent shall promptly distribute to such Lender its Applicable Percentage of all payments of principal and interest and all proceeds of Collateral received by the Administrative Agent in respect of such Protective Advance; that any such payment or proceeds so distributed shall be repaid to the Administrative Agent if and to the extent such payment or proceeds is required to be refunded to the Borrowers for any reason. The purchase of participations in any Protective Advance pursuant to this paragraph shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrowers of their obligation to repay such Protective Advance.
mutatis
mutandis
provided
 
 
SECTION 2.05. (a) The Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Lenders agree that in order to facilitate the administration of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, promptly after the Borrower Representative requests an ABR Revolving Borrowing pursuant to Section 2.03, the Swingline Lender may, in its discretion, elect to have the terms of this Section 2.05(a) apply to such Borrowing Request by advancing, on behalf of the Lenders and in the amount and on the date requested, same day funds to the Borrowers to the Funding Account(s) (each such Loan made solely by the Swingline Lender pursuant to this Section 2.05(a) is referred to in this Agreement as a ), with settlement among the Swingline Lender and the other Lenders as to the Swingline Loans to take place on a periodic basis as set forth in Section 2.05(d). Each Swingline Loan shall be subject to all the terms and conditions applicable to other ABR Loans funded by the Lenders, except that all payments thereon shall be payable to the Swingline Lender solely for its own account. The aggregate principal amount of Swingline Loans outstanding at any time shall not exceed $25,000,000. The Swingline Lender shall not make any Swingline Loan if the requested Swingline Loan exceeds Availability (before giving effect to such Swingline Loan). All Swingline Loans shall be ABR Borrowings.
Swingline Loans and Overadvances.
Swingline Loan
 
(b) Any provision of this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, at the request of the Borrower Representative, the Administrative Agent may in its sole discretion (but shall have absolutely no obligation) make Loans to the Borrowers, on behalf of the Lenders, in amounts that exceed Availability (any such Loans are herein referred to collectively as ); that the aggregate principal amount of Overadvances outstanding at any time shall not exceed (i) $15,000,000 in the aggregate or (ii) together with the aggregate principal amount of Protective Advances outstanding at such time pursuant to Section 2.04, $20,000,000 in the aggregate; that no Overadvance may be made if, after giving effect thereto, any Lenders Credit Exposure shall exceed its Revolving Commitment. The Overadvances shall be secured by the Liens in favor of the Administrative Agent in and to the Collateral and shall constitute Obligations hereunder. All Overadvances shall be ABR Borrowings. The Borrowers shall be required to repay each Overadvance no later than the 60th day after the date of the making thereof. The Administrative Agents authorization to make Overadvances may be revoked at any time by the Required Lenders. Any such revocation must be in writing and shall become effective prospectively upon the Administrative Agents receipt thereof.
Overadvances
provided
provided
further
 
 
(c) The Swingline Lender and the Administrative Agent may by notice given not later than 12:00 p.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of any Swingline Loan or Overadvance, respectively, outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate principal amount of the Swingline Loan or Overadvance, respectively, in which the Lenders will be required to participate and each Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Overadvance. Each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender or the account of the Administrative Agent, as applicable, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Overadvance. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans and Overadvances pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including nonsatisfaction of any of the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02, the occurrence and continuance of a Default or any reduction or termination of the Revolving Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Revolving Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders pursuant to this paragraph). From and after the date, if any, on which any Lender has paid in full for its participation in any Swingline Loan or Overadvance purchased hereunder, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, shall promptly distribute to such Lender its Applicable Percentage of all payments of principal and interest and all proceeds of Collateral received by the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, in respect of such Swingline Loan or Overadvance; that any such payment or proceeds so distributed shall be repaid to the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, if and to the extent such payment or proceeds is required to be refunded to the Borrowers for any reason. The purchase of participations in any Swingline Loan or Overadvance pursuant to this paragraph shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrowers of their obligation to repay such Swingline Loan or Overadvance.
mutatis
mutandis
provided
 
(d) The Administrative Agent, on behalf of the Swingline Lender, shall request settlement (a ) with the Lenders on at least a weekly basis or on any earlier date that the Administrative Agent elects, by notifying the Lenders of such requested Settlement by facsimile, telephone, or e-mail no later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of such requested Settlement (the ). Each Lender (other than the Swingline Lender) shall transfer the amount of such Lenders Applicable Percentage of the outstanding principal amount of the applicable Swingline Loan with respect to which Settlement is requested to the Administrative Agent, to such account of the Administrative Agent as the Administrative Agent may designate, not later than 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on such Settlement Date. Settlements may occur during the existence of a Default and whether or not the applicable conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have then been satisfied. Such amounts transferred to the Administrative Agent shall be applied against the amounts of the Swingline Lenders Swingline Loans and, together with Swingline Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan, shall constitute Revolving Loans of such Lenders, respectively. If any such amount is not transferred to the Administrative Agent by any Lender on such Settlement Date, the Swingline Lender shall be entitled to recover such amount on demand from such Lender together with interest thereon as specified in Section 2.07.
Settlement
Settlement Date
 
SECTION 2.06. (a)    Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower Representative may request the issuance of Letters of Credit for its own account or for the account of another Borrower, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks, at any time and from time to time during the Availability Period. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrowers to, or entered into by the Borrowers with, an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
Letters of Credit.
General.
 
 
(b) To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit (other than an automatic renewal permitted pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section), the Borrower Representative shall hand deliver or facsimile (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the recipient) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If requested by the applicable Issuing Bank, the applicable Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on such Issuing Banks standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrowers shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the total LC Exposure shall not exceed $250,000,000, (ii) the total Standby LC Exposure shall not exceed $60,000,000 and (iii) the total Credit Exposures shall not exceed the lesser of (x) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (y) the Borrowing Base then in effect.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions.
 
(c) Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date; that a Letter of Credit may expire at a later date if the applicable Borrower shall have deposited cash collateral in an LC Collateral Account pursuant to Section 2.06(j) in an amount equal to 103% of the undrawn face amount of such Letter of Credit. Any Letter of Credit may provide by its terms that it may be automatically extended for additional successive one year periods on terms reasonably acceptable to the applicable Issuing Bank. Any Letter of Credit providing for automatic extension shall be extended upon the then current expiration date without any further action by any Person unless the applicable Issuing Bank shall have given notice to the applicable beneficiary (with a copy to the applicable Borrower) of the election by such Issuing Bank not to extend such Letter of Credit, such notice to be given not fewer than 30 days prior to the then current expiration date of such Letter of Credit; that no Letter of Credit may be extended automatically or otherwise beyond the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date (other than in accordance with this paragraph).
Expiration Date.
provided
provided
 
 
(d) By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the applicable Issuing Bank or the Lenders, such Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from such Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lenders Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of such Issuing Bank, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by such Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrowers on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrowers for any reason. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default, reduction or termination of the Revolving Commitments or any or other event that under any rule of law or uniform practices to which any Letter of Credit is subject (including Section 3.14 of ISP 98 or any successor publication of the International Chamber of Commerce) permits a drawing to be made under such Letter of Credit after the expiration thereof or of the Revolving Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations.
force
majeure
 
(e) If an Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrowers shall, following notice of such LC Disbursement to the Borrower Representative, reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 2:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower Representative shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower Representative prior to such time on such date, then not later than 2:00 p.m., New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the Borrower Representative receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the day of receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower Representative receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt; that the Borrowers may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 that such payment be financed with an ABR Revolving Borrowing in an equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrowers obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Revolving Borrowing or, if the Swingline Lender shall have elected to apply the terms of Section 2.05(a) to such requested Borrowing, the resulting Swingline Loan. If the Borrowers fail to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrowers in respect thereof and such Lenders Applicable Percentage thereof. Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrowers, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to such Issuing Bank the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Borrowers pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the applicable Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse such Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and such Issuing Bank as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse an Issuing Bank for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of ABR Revolving Loans or a Swingline Loan as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrowers of their obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
Reimbursement.
provided
mutatis
mutandis
 
 
(f) The Borrowers joint and several obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section is absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by any Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not substantially comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, (iv) any or other event that under any rule of law or uniform practices to which any Letter of Credit is subject (including Section 3.14 of ISP 98 or any successor publication of the International Chamber of Commerce) permits a drawing to be made under such Letter of Credit after the stated expiration date thereof or of the Revolving Commitments or (v) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this paragraph, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrowers obligations hereunder. None of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders or the Issuing Banks, or any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any other act, failure to act or other event or circumstance; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse any Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrowers to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by any Borrower that are caused by such Issuing Banks failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of bad faith, gross negligence or wilful misconduct on the part of an Issuing Bank (with such absence to be presumed unless otherwise determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final and nonappealable judgment), such Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, an Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
Obligations Absolute.
force
majeure
provided
 
 
(g) Each Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit. Each Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Borrower Representative by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of such demand for payment and whether such Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrowers of their obligation to reimburse such Issuing Bank and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures.
provided
 
(h) If any Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrowers shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrowers reimburse such LC Disbursement in full, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Borrowers fail to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then Section 2.13(d) shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be paid to the Administrative Agent for the account of the applicable Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse the Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment, and shall be payable on demand or, if no demand has been made, on the date on which the Borrowers reimburse the applicable LC Disbursement in full.
Interim Interest.
provided
 
(i) Any Issuing Bank may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Borrower Representative, the Administrative Agent, the replaced Issuing Bank and the successor Issuing Bank. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of an Issuing Bank. At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Borrowers shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Bank pursuant to Section 2.12(b). From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Bank shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term Issuing Bank shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Bank, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Banks, as the context shall require. After the replacement of an Issuing Bank hereunder, the replaced Issuing Bank shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
Replacement of the Issuing Banks.
 
 
(j) If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Borrower Representative receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Borrowers shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders (the ), an amount in cash equal to 103% of the LC Exposure as of such date plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to any Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII. The Borrowers shall also deposit cash collateral in accordance with this paragraph as and to the extent required by Section 2.11(b) or 2.20. Each such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the Secured Obligations. The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account and the Borrowers hereby grant the Administrative Agent a security interest in the LC Collateral Account. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Borrowers risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall, notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein or in the Collateral Documents, be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrowers for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated, be applied to satisfy other Secured Obligations (but subject to, in the case of any such application at a time when any Lender is a Defaulting Lender (but only if, after giving effect thereto, the remaining cash collateral shall be less than the aggregate LC Exposure of all the Defaulting Lenders that has not been reallocated to non-Defaulting Lenders pursuant to Section 2.20), the consent of each Issuing Bank). If the Borrowers are required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrowers within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived. If any Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder pursuant to Section 2.11(b), such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to such Borrower as and to the extent that, after giving effect to such return, the Borrowers would remain in compliance with Section 2.11(b) and no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing. If any Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder pursuant to Section 2.20, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to such Borrower as promptly as practicable to the extent that, after giving effect to such return, no Issuing Bank shall have any exposure in respect of any outstanding Letter of Credit that is not fully covered by the Revolving Commitments of the non-Defaulting Lenders and/or the remaining cash collateral and no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Cash Collateralization.
LC Collateral Account
provided
 
 
(k) Each Existing Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be a Letter of Credit issued hereunder for all purposes hereof and of the other Loan Documents, and no issuance or similar fees (as distinguished from ongoing participation or fronting fees) will be required in connection with the Existing Letters of Credit. Without limiting the foregoing (i) each such Existing Letter of Credit shall be included in the calculation of the LC Exposure, (ii) all liabilities of the Borrowers and the other Loan Parties with respect to such Existing Letters of Credit shall constitute Obligations and (iii) each Lender shall have reimbursement obligations with respect to such Existing Letters of Credit as provided in this Section 2.06. Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this Section 2.06, no Existing Letter of Credit that has not been issued by an Issuing Bank referred to in clause (a) of the definition of such term may be renewed or extended.
Existing Letters of Credit.
 
(l) Unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank shall, in addition to its notification obligations set forth elsewhere in this Section, report in writing to the Administrative Agent (i) periodic activity (for such period or recurrent periods as shall be requested by the Administrative Agent) in respect of Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank, including all issuances, extensions, amendments and renewals, all expirations and cancelations and all disbursements and reimbursements, (ii) reasonably prior to the time that such Issuing Bank issues, amends, renews or extends any Letter of Credit, the date of such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension, and the stated amount of the Letters of Credit issued, amended, renewed or extended by it and outstanding after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (and whether the amounts thereof shall have changed), (iii) on each Business Day on which such Issuing Bank makes any LC Disbursement, the date and amount of such LC Disbursement, (iv) on any Business Day on which the Borrowers fail to reimburse an LC Disbursement required to be reimbursed to such Issuing Bank on such day, the date of such failure and the amount of such LC Disbursement and (v) on any other Business Day, such other information as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request as to the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank.
Issuing Bank Reports to the Administrative Agent.
 
(m) For all purposes of this Agreement, the amount of a Letter of Credit that, by its terms or the terms of any document related thereto, provides for one or more automatic increases in the stated amount thereof shall be deemed to be the maximum stated amount of such Letter of Credit after giving effect to all such increases, whether or not such maximum stated amount is in effect at the time of determination.
LC Exposure Determination.
 
 
SECTION 2.07. (a) Each Lender shall make each Revolving Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 2:00 p.m., New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower Representative by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to the Funding Account(s); that ABR Revolving Loans made to finance the reimbursement of (i) an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(e) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the applicable Issuing Bank and (ii) a Protective Advance or an Overadvance shall be retained by the Administrative Agent.
Funding of Borrowings.
provided
 
(b) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Revolving Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lenders share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance on such assumption, make available to the applicable Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrowers severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the applicable Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of a payment to be made by such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of a payment to be made by the Borrowers, the interest rate applicable to ABR Revolving Loans. If the Borrowers and such Lender shall pay such interest to the Administrative Agent for the same or an overlapping period, the Administrative Agent shall promptly remit to the Borrowers the amount of such interest paid by the Borrowers for such period. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lenders Revolving Loan included in such Borrowing. Any payment by the Borrowers shall be without prejudice to any claim the Borrowers may have against a Lender that shall have failed to make such payment to the Administrative Agent.
 
SECTION 2.08. (a) Each Revolving Borrowing initially shall be of the Type and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in the applicable Borrowing Request or as otherwise provided in Section 2.03. Thereafter, the Borrower Representative may elect to convert such Borrowing to a Borrowing of a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. The Borrower Representative may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing. This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings, Overadvances or Protective Advances, which may not be converted or continued.
Interest Elections.
 
(b) To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Borrowers were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of an executed written Interest Election Request. Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
 
 
(i) the Borrower and the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
 
(ii) the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii) whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
 
(iv) if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period.
 
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrowers shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration.
 
(c) Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lenders portion of each resulting Borrowing.
 
(d) If the Borrower Representative fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower Representative ( that no such notice shall be required in the case of an Event of Default under clause (h) or (i) of Article VII), then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Revolving Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
provided
 
SECTION 2.09. (a) Unless previously terminated, the Revolving Commitments shall automatically terminate on the Maturity Date.
Termination and Reduction of Revolving Commitments; Increase in Revolving Commitments.
 
 
(b) The Borrowers may at any time terminate the Revolving Commitments upon (i) the payment in full of all outstanding Loans and any LC Disbursements, together with accrued and unpaid interest thereon and on any LC Disbursements, (ii) the cancellation and return of all outstanding Letters of Credit (or alternatively, with respect to each such Letter of Credit, the furnishing to the Administrative Agent of a cash deposit (or at the discretion of the Administrative Agent a back up standby letter of credit reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent) equal to 103% of the portion of the LC Exposure attributable to such Letter of Credit as of such time), (iii) the payment in full of all accrued and unpaid fees and (iv) the payment in full of all reimbursable expenses and all other Obligations outstanding at such time.
 
(c) The Borrowers may from time to time reduce the Revolving Commitments; that (i) each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 and (ii) the Borrowers shall not reduce the Revolving Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Loans in accordance with Section 2.11, the sum of the Credit Exposures would exceed the lesser of (x) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (y) the Borrowing Base then in effect.
provided
 
(d) The Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Revolving Commitments under paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any such notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Borrower Representative pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments delivered by the Borrower Representative may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower Representative (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied. Any termination or reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments.
provided
 
(e) (i) The Borrowers shall have the right to increase the total Revolving Commitments by obtaining additional Revolving Commitments, either from one or more of the Lenders or from one or more other lending institutions (which shall not be Affiliates of the Company); that (i) no Lender hereunder shall have any obligation to provide any such requested increase, (ii) any such request for an increase shall be in a minimum amount of $10,000,000, (iii) the aggregate amount of all additional Revolving Commitments obtained under this paragraph shall not exceed $100,000,000, (iv) the Administrative Agent shall have approved the identity of any such new Lender, such approval not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, (v) any such new Lender shall assume all the rights and obligations of a Lender hereunder, and (vi) the procedure described in paragraph (e)(ii) of this Section shall have been satisfied.
provided
 
 
(ii) Any amendment hereto for such an increase or addition shall be in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and shall only require the written signatures of the Administrative Agent, the Borrowers and the Lender(s) being added or increasing their Revolving Commitments. As a condition precedent to such an increase, the Borrower Representative shall deliver to the Administrative Agent (A) a certificate of each Loan Party signed by an authorized officer of such Loan Party (1) certifying and attaching the resolutions adopted by such Loan Party approving or consenting to such increase, and (2) in the case of the Borrowers, certifying that, before and after giving effect to such increase, (x) the representations and warranties contained in Article III and the other Loan Documents are true and correct in all material respects, except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they are true and correct as of such earlier date, and (y) no Default exists, (B) an opinion of counsel to the Loan Parties as to the power and authority of the Loan Parties to effect such increase and such other customary and related matters as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request and (C) a reaffirmation agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, executed and delivered by the Loan Parties.
 
(iii) On the Business Day following any such increase, all outstanding ABR Revolving Borrowings shall be reallocated, pursuant to procedures reasonably determined by the Administrative Agent, among the Lenders (including any newly added Lenders) in accordance with the Lenders respective revised Applicable Percentages. Eurodollar Revolving Borrowings outstanding at the time of such increase shall be reallocated, pursuant to procedures reasonably determined by the Administrative Agent, among the Lenders in accordance with the Lenders respective Applicable Percentages in effect at the time upon the expiration of the then applicable Interest Periods.
 
SECTION 2.10. (a) The Borrowers hereby unconditionally promise to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan on the Maturity Date and (ii) to the Administrative Agent the then unpaid amount of each Protective Advance and Overadvance on the earliest of (A) the Maturity Date, (B) demand by the Administrative Agent therefor and (C) in the case of any Overadvance, the 60th day after the date of the making thereof.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt.
 
(b) On each Business Day during any Dominion Period, the Administrative Agent shall apply all funds credited to a Concentration Account on such Business Day or the immediately preceding Business Day (at the discretion of the Administrative Agent, whether or not immediately available), , to prepay any Protective Advances and Overadvance that may be outstanding and, , to prepay the Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans and to cash collateralize outstanding LC Exposure.
first
second
 
(c) Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrowers to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
 
 
(d) The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrowers to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lenders share thereof.
 
(e) The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (c) or (d) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrowers to pay any amounts due hereunder in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
 
(f) Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the Borrowers shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
 
SECTION 2.11. (a) The Borrowers shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to prior notice in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
Prepayment of Loans.
 
(b) Except to the extent such excess arises from Protective Advances permitted under Section 2.04 or Overadvances permitted under Section 2.05, in the event and on each occasion that the total Credit Exposure exceeds the lesser of (i) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (ii) the Borrowing Base then in effect, the Borrowers shall prepay the Revolving Loans and/or Swingline Loans (or, if no such Borrowings are outstanding, deposit cash collateral in the LC Collateral Account in accordance with Section 2.06(j)) in an aggregate amount equal to such excess.
 
(c) The Borrower Representative shall notify the Administrative Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by hand delivery or facsimile) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment or (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid; that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.09, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.09. Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Revolving Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Revolving Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Revolving Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02. Each prepayment of a Revolving Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Revolving Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.13.
provided
 
 
SECTION 2.12. (a) The Borrowers agree to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue for each day on the amount of the unused Revolving Commitment of such Lender on such day at a rate equal to (i) for any day on or prior to September 13, 2013, when the Leverage Ratio at the end of the then most recent period of four fiscal quarters for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) shall be less than 1.00 to 1.00, 0.250% per annum, and (ii) for any other day, the applicable rate set forth in the table below based on Average Utilization during the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Company (or shorter period from the Third Restatement Effective Date until the end of a fiscal quarter):
Fees.
 
 
Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the first Business Day of each January, April, July and October, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Third Restatement Effective Date, and on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate. All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed. For purposes of computing commitment fees, the Revolving Commitment of a Lender shall be deemed to be used to the extent of the outstanding Revolving Loans and LC Exposure of such Lender (and the Swingline Exposure and participations in Protective Advances and Overadvances of such Lender shall be disregarded for such purpose).
 
 
(b) The Borrowers agree to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participation in each Standby Letter of Credit or Commercial Letter of Credit at the Applicable Rate for a Letter of Credit of such type, in each case on the average daily amount of the portion of such Lenders LC Exposure attributable to such Letter of Credit (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Third Restatement Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lenders Revolving Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to each Issuing Bank a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate or rates per annum separately agreed upon between the Company and such Issuing Bank, on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Third Restatement Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as such Issuing Banks standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder. Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of each calendar month shall be payable on the first Business Day of the next succeeding month, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Third Restatement Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to the Issuing Banks pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within 10 days after demand. All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed.
provided
 
(c) The Borrowers agree to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees in the amounts and payable at the times separately agreed upon between the Company and the Administrative Agent.
 
(d) All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the applicable Issuing Bank, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances (absent manifest error in the amount paid).
 
SECTION 2.13.   (a) The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan, but excluding Protective Advances and Overadvances) shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
Interest.
 
(b) The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
 
(c) Each Protective Advance and Overadvance shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate for ABR Revolving Loans plus 2% per annum.
 
(d) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrowers hereunder is not paid when due (after giving effect to any applicable grace period), whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% per annum plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% per annum plus the rate applicable to ABR Revolving Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
 
 
(e) Accrued interest on each Loan (for ABR Loans, accrued through the last day of the prior calendar quarter) shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and upon termination of the Revolving Commitments; that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (d) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Revolving Loan prior to the end of the Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Revolving Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
provided
 
(f) All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate or Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
SECTION 2.14. If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest.
 
(a) the Administrative Agent determines in good faith (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period; or
 
(b) the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
 
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice (which may be telephonic) thereof to the Borrower Representative and the Lenders as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower Representative and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist (which notification shall be made promptly after the Administrative Agent obtains knowledge of the cessation of such circumstances), (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Revolving Borrowing to, or continuation of any Revolving Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective, and such Revolving Borrowing shall be continued as an ABR Borrowing, and (ii) any Borrowing Request for a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing shall be treated as a request for an ABR Revolving Borrowing.
 
 
SECTION 2.15. (a) If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs.
 
(i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended or participated in by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or any Issuing Bank;
 
(ii) impose on any Lender or any Issuing Bank or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense (other than Taxes) affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein; or
 
(iii) subject any Recipient to any Taxes (other than (A) Indemnified Taxes, (B) Taxes described in clauses (b) through (d) of the definition of the term Excluded Taxes and (C) Connection Income Taxes) on its loans, loan principal, letters of credit, commitments or other obligations, or its deposits, reserves, other liabilities or capital attributable thereto;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender or other Recipient of making, converting to, continuing or maintaining any Loan or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan, or to increase the cost to such Lender or other Recipient of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit (or of maintaining its obligation to participate in or to issue any Letter of Credit), or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or other Recipient hereunder (whether of principal, interest or any other amount) then, from time to time upon request of such Lender or other Recipient, the Borrowers will pay to such Lender or other Recipient, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or other Recipient, as the case may be, for such additional costs or expenses incurred or reduction suffered. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Company reasonably believes that any such Taxes were not correctly or legally asserted, the applicable Recipient will use commercially reasonable efforts to cooperate with the Company to obtain a refund of such Taxes so long as such efforts would not, in the sole determination of such Recipient exercised in good faith result in any non-reimbursable additional costs, expenses or risks or be otherwise disadvantageous to it.
 
(b) If any Lender or any Issuing Bank determines that any Change in Law regarding capital or liquidity requirements has had or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lenders or such Issuing Banks capital or on the capital of such Lenders or such Issuing Banks holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement, the Revolving Commitments of such Lender or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit or Loans held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank, to a level below that which such Lender or such Issuing Bank or such Lenders or such Issuing Banks holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lenders or such Issuing Banks policies and the policies of such Lenders or such Issuing Banks holding company with respect to capital adequacy or liquidity), then, from time to time upon request of such Lender or such Issuing Bank, the Borrowers will pay to such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Bank or such Lenders or such Issuing Banks holding company for any such reduction suffered.
 
 
(c) A certificate of a Lender or an Issuing Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or such Issuing Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section delivered to the Borrower Representative shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrowers shall pay such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
 
(d) Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or any Issuing Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lenders or such Issuing Banks right to demand such compensation; that the Borrowers shall not be required to compensate a Lender or an Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or expenses incurred or reductions suffered more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower Representative of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or expenses or reductions and of such Lenders or such Issuing Banks intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or expenses or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
 
SECTION 2.16. In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Eurodollar Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.11(c) and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower Representative pursuant to Section 2.19, then, in any such event, the Borrowers shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. Such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan (but not including the Applicable Rate applicable thereto), for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest that would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate such Lender would bid if it were to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the London interbank market. A certificate of any Lender delivered to the Borrower Representative and setting forth and explaining in reasonable detail any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrowers shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 30 days after receipt thereof.
Break Funding Payments.
 
 
SECTION 2.17. (a) Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party under any Loan Document shall be made without deduction or withholding for any Taxes, except as required by applicable law. If any applicable law (as determined in the good faith discretion of an applicable withholding agent) requires the deduction or withholding of any Tax from any such payment by a withholding agent, then the applicable withholding agent shall be entitled to make such deduction or withholding and shall timely pay the full amount deducted or withheld to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law and, if such Tax is an Indemnified Tax, then the sum payable by the applicable Loan Party shall be increased as necessary so that after such deduction or withholding has been made (including such deductions and withholdings applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the applicable Recipient receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deduction or withholding been made.
Taxes.
Payments Free of Taxes.
 
(b) The Loan Parties shall timely pay to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law, or at the option of the Administrative Agent timely reimburse it for the payment of, any Other Taxes.
Payment of Other Taxes by the Loan Parties.
 
(c) As soon as practicable after any payment of Taxes by any Loan Party to a Governmental Authority pursuant to this Section, such Loan Party shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Evidence of Payment.
 
(d) The Loan Parties shall jointly and severally indemnify each Recipient, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes (including Indemnified Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) payable or paid by such Recipient or required to be withheld or deducted from a payment to such Recipient and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to the Borrower Representative by a Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Indemnification by the Loan Parties.
 
 
(e) Each Lender shall severally indemnify the Administrative Agent, within 10 days after demand therefor, for (i) any Indemnified Taxes attributable to such Lender (but only to the extent that any Loan Party has not already indemnified the Administrative Agent for such Indemnified Taxes and without limiting the obligation of the Loan Parties to do so), (ii) any Taxes attributable to such Lenders failure to comply with the provisions of Section 9.04(c)(ii) relating to the maintenance of a Participant Register and (iii) any Excluded Taxes attributable to such Lender, in each case, that are payable or paid by the Administrative Agent in connection with any Loan Document, and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Lender by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive absent manifest error. Each Lender hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent to set off and apply any and all amounts at any time owing to such Lender under any Loan Document or otherwise payable by the Administrative Agent to the Lender from any other source against any amount due to the Administrative Agent under this paragraph (e).
Indemnification by the Lenders.
 
(f) (i) Any Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding Tax with respect to payments made under any Loan Document shall deliver to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent, at the time or times reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent, such properly completed and executed documentation reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate of withholding. In addition, any Lender, if reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent, shall deliver such other documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent as will enable the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent to determine whether or not such Lender is subject to backup withholding or information reporting requirements. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the preceding two sentences, the completion, execution and submission of such documentation (other than such documentation set forth in Section 2.17(f)(ii)(A), (ii)(B) and (ii)(D) below) shall not be required if in the Lenders reasonable judgment such completion, execution or submission would subject such Lender to any material unreimbursed cost or expense or would materially prejudice the legal or commercial position of such Lender.
Status of Lenders.
 
Without limiting the generality of the foregoing:
(ii)
 
any Lender that is a U.S. Person shall deliver to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent on or prior to the date on which such Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent), executed originals of IRS Form W-9 certifying that such Lender is exempt from U.S. Federal backup withholding tax;
(A)
 
any Foreign Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Foreign Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent), whichever of the following is applicable:
(B)
 
 
in the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party (x) with respect to payments of interest under any Loan Document, executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN establishing an exemption from, or reduction of, U.S. Federal withholding Tax pursuant to the interest article of such tax treaty and (y) with respect to any other applicable payments under any Loan Document, executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN establishing an exemption from, or reduction of, U.S. Federal withholding Tax pursuant to the business profits or other income article of such tax treaty;
(1)
 
executed originals of IRS Form W-8ECI;
(2)
 
in the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of the exemption for portfolio interest under Section 881(c) of the Code, (x) a certificate substantially in the form of Exhibit I-1 to the effect that such Foreign Lender is not a bank within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, a 10 percent shareholder of the Company within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, or a controlled foreign corporation described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code (a ) and (y) executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN; or
(3)
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
 
to the extent a Foreign Lender is not the beneficial owner, executed originals of IRS Form W-8IMY, accompanied by IRS Form W-8ECI, IRS Form W-8BEN, a U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate substantially in the form of Exhibit I-2 or Exhibit I-3, IRS Form W-9, and/or other certification documents from each beneficial owner, as applicable; that if the Foreign Lender is a partnership and one or more direct or indirect partners of such Foreign Lender are claiming the portfolio interest exemption, such Foreign Lender may provide a U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate substantially in the form of Exhibit I-4 on behalf of each such direct and indirect partner;
(4)
provided
 
(C) any Foreign Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Foreign Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent), executed originals of any other form prescribed by applicable law as a basis for claiming exemption from or a reduction in U.S. Federal withholding Tax, duly completed, together with such supplementary documentation as may be prescribed by applicable law to permit the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent to determine the withholding or deduction required to be made; and
 
  
if a payment made to a Lender under any Loan Document would be subject to U.S. Federal withholding Tax imposed by FATCA if such Lender were to fail to comply with the applicable reporting requirements of FATCA (including those contained in Section 1471(b) or 1472(b) of the Code, as applicable), such Lender shall deliver to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent at the time or times prescribed by law and at such time or times reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent such documentation prescribed by applicable law (including as prescribed by Section 1471(b)(3)(C)(i) of the Code) and such additional documentation reasonably requested by the Borrower Representative or the Administrative Agent as may be necessary for the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent to comply with their obligations under FATCA and to determine that such Lender has complied with such Lenders obligations under FATCA or to determine the amount to deduct and withhold from such payment. Solely for purposes of this clause (D), FATCA shall include any amendments made to FATCA after the Third Restatement Effective Date.
(D)
 
Each Lender agrees that if any form or certification it previously delivered expires or becomes obsolete or inaccurate in any respect, it shall promptly update such form or certification or promptly notify the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent in writing of its legal inability to do so.
 
(g) If any party determines, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, that it has received a refund of any Taxes as to which it has been indemnified pursuant to this Section (including by the payment of additional amounts pursuant to this Section), it shall pay to the indemnifying party an amount equal to such refund (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made under this Section with respect to the Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses (including Taxes) of such indemnified party and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund). Such indemnifying party, upon the request of such indemnified party, shall repay to such indemnified party the amount paid over pursuant to this paragraph (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) in the event that such indemnified party is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in no event will the indemnified party be required to pay any amount to an indemnifying party pursuant to this paragraph the payment of which would place the indemnified party in a less favorable net after-Tax position than the indemnified party would have been in if the indemnification payments or additional amounts giving rise to such refund had never been paid. This paragraph shall not be construed to require any indemnified party to make available its Tax returns (or any other information relating to its Taxes that it deems confidential) to the indemnifying party or any other Person.
Treatment of Certain Refunds.
 
(h) For purposes of this Section, the term Lender shall include any Issuing Bank, and the term applicable law includes FATCA.
Defined Terms.
 
  
SECTION 2.18. (a) The Borrowers shall make each payment required to be made by them hereunder or under any other Loan Document on or prior to the time expressly required hereunder or under such other Loan Document for such payment or, if no such time is expressly required, on or prior to 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without any defense, setoff, recoupment or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 10 South Dearborn Street, 22 Floor, Chicago, Illinois, or by wire transfer using the Administrative Agents wire instructions, except that payments required to be made directly to an Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender shall be so made and except that payments pursuant to Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto and payments pursuant to other Loan Documents shall be made to the Persons specified therein. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payment received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments under each Loan Document shall be made in dollars.
Payments Generally; Allocation of Proceeds; Sharing of Set-offs.
nd
 
(b) Any proceeds of Collateral received by the Administrative Agent (i) not constituting (A) a specific payment of principal, interest, fees or other sum payable under the Loan Documents (which shall be applied as specified by the Borrowers), (B) amounts to be applied from a Concentration Account during any Dominion Period (which shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.10(b)) or, (C) so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, amounts which are received into any Concentration Account (which shall be deposited to the Borrowers Funding Account in accordance with the Restated Security Agreement) or (ii) after an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent so elects or the Required Lenders so direct, shall be applied ratably , to pay any fees, indemnities, or expense reimbursements then due to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks from the Borrowers (other than in connection with Banking Services or Swap Obligations), , to pay any fees or expense reimbursements then due to the Lenders from the Borrowers (other than in connection with Banking Services or Swap Obligations), , to pay interest due in respect of the Protective Advances and Overadvances, , to pay the principal of the Protective Advances and Overadvances, , to pay interest then due and payable on the Loans (other than the Protective Advances and Overadvances) ratably, , to prepay principal on the Loans (other than the Protective Advances and Overadvances) and unreimbursed LC Disbursements ratably, , to pay an amount to the Administrative Agent equal to 103% of the aggregate undrawn face amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit and the aggregate amount of any unpaid LC Disbursements, to be held as cash collateral for such Obligations, , to payment of any amounts owing with respect to Banking Services and Swap Obligations, , to the payment of any other Secured Obligations due to the Administrative Agent or any Lender, and , any excess to be returned to Borrower RepresentativeNotwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, unless so directed by the Borrower Representative, or unless a Default is in existence, neither the Administrative Agent nor any Lender shall apply any payment which it receives to any Eurodollar Loan, except (a) on the expiration date of the Interest Period applicable to such Eurodollar Loan or (b) in the event, and only to the extent, that there are no outstanding ABR Loans and, in any such event, the Borrowers shall pay the break funding payment required in accordance with Section 2.16.
first
second
third
fourth
fifth
sixth
seventh
eighth
ninth
tenth
; , that if and to the extent that it would be unlawful for any Subsidiary Loan Party to secure any Swap Obligation under the Commodity Exchange Act or any rule, regulation or order of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (or the application or official interpretation of any thereof) by virtue of such Subsidiary Loan Partys failure for any reason (and after giving effect to the guarantees by the other Guarantors of the Obligations of such Subsidiary Loan Party) to constitute an eligible contract participant as defined in the Commodity Exchange Act at the time the security interests created by the Loan Documents in the assets of such Subsidiary Loan Party become effective with respect to such Swap Obligation, no proceeds of Collateral of such Subsidiary Loan Party will be applied pursuant to clause of the preceding sentence to the payment of such Swap Obligation
provided
eighth
.
 
  
(c) At the election of the Administrative Agent, all payments of principal, interest, LC Disbursements, fees, reimbursable expenses (including, without limitation, all reimbursements of fees and expenses pursuant to Section 9.03) and other sums payable under the Loan Documents may be paid from the proceeds of Borrowings made hereunder, whether made following a request by the Borrower Representative pursuant to Section 2.03 or a deemed request as provided in this Section or may be deducted from any deposit account of any Borrower maintained with the Administrative Agent. Each Borrower hereby irrevocably authorizes (i) the Administrative Agent to make a Borrowing for the purpose of paying each payment of principal, interest, fees or any other amount due under the Loan Documents and agrees that all such amounts charged shall constitute Loans (including Swingline Loans and Overadvances, but such a Borrowing may only constitute a Protective Advance if it is to reimburse costs, fees and expenses pursuant to Section 9.03) and that all such Borrowings shall be deemed to have been requested pursuant to Section 2.03, 2.04 or 2.05, as applicable, and (ii) the Administrative Agent to charge any deposit account of any Borrower (other than, so long as no Dominion Period is in effect or no Event of Default shall have occurred or be continuing, any Excluded Deposit Account) maintained with the Administrative Agent for each payment of principal, interest, fees or any other amount due under the Loan Documents.
 
(d) If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall notify the Administrative Agent of such fact and shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances and Overadvances of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the amount of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amounts of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances and Overadvances; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrowers pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement (for the avoidance of doubt, as in effect from time to time) or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances or Overadvances to any Person that is an Eligible Assignee (as such term is defined from time to time). Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against such Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
 
 
(e) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower Representative prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the Issuing Banks hereunder that the Borrowers will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrowers have made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the Issuing Banks, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Borrowers have not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or Issuing Banks, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Bank with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
 
(f) If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it hereunder to or for the account of the Administrative Agent, then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), (i) apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lenders obligations in respect of such payment until all such unsatisfied obligations have been discharged and/or (ii) hold any such amounts in a segregated account as cash collateral for, and apply any such amounts to, any future payment obligations of such Lender hereunder to or for the account of the Administrative Agent.
 
 
SECTION 2.19. (a) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrowers are required to pay any Indemnified Taxes or additional amounts to any Lender or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign and delegate its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or Affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment and delegation (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Borrowers hereby agree to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment and delegation.
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders.
 
(b) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrowers are required to pay any Indemnified Taxes or additional amounts to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, or if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the Borrowers may, at their sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent by the Borrower Representative, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights (other than its existing rights to payments pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17) and obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents to an Eligible Assignee that shall assume such obligations (which Eligible Assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment and delegation); that (i) the Borrowers shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Banks, which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, Swingline Loans, Protective Advances and Overadvances, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrowers (in the case of all other amounts), (iii) in the case of any such assignment and delegation resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.15 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.17, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments and (iv) such assignment and delegation does not conflict with applicable law. A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrowers to require such assignment and delegation have ceased to apply. Each party hereto agrees that an assignment and delegation required pursuant to this paragraph may be effected pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption executed by the Borrower Representative, the Administrative Agent and the assignee (subject to any required consents referred to above) and that the Lender required to make such assignment and delegation need not be a party thereto.
provided
 
SECTION 2.20. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
Defaulting Lenders.
 
(a) commitment fees shall cease to accrue on the unused portion of the Revolving Commitment of such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(a);
 
  
(b) the Revolving Commitment and Credit Exposure of such Defaulting Lender shall not be included in determining whether all Lenders or all affected Lenders or the Required Lenders have taken or may take any action hereunder (including any consent to any amendment, waiver or modification pursuant to Section 9.02); that any waiver, amendment or modification requiring the consent of all Lenders or each affected Lender which affects such Defaulting Lender differently than other affected Lenders shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender;
provided
 
(c) if any Swingline Exposure, LC Exposure, Protective Advance Exposure and Overadvance Exposure exists at the time such Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then:
 
(i) such Defaulting Lenders Swingline Exposure (other than any portion thereof with respect to which such Defaulting Lender shall have funded its participation as contemplated by Section 2.05(c)), LC Exposure (other than any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements with respect to which such Defaulting Lender shall have funded its participation as contemplated by Section 2.06(d)), Protective Advance Exposure (other than any portion thereof with respect to which such Defaulting Lender shall have funded its participation as contemplated by Section 2.04(b)) and Overadvance Exposure (other than any portion thereof with respect to which such Defaulting Lender shall have funded its participation as contemplated by Section 2.05(c)) shall be reallocated among the non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages, but only to the extent the sum of all non-Defaulting Lenders Revolving Credit Exposures plus such Defaulting Lenders Swingline Exposure, LC Exposure, Protective Advance Exposure and Overadvance Exposure does not exceed the total of all non-Defaulting Lenders Revolving Commitments;
 
(ii) if the reallocation described in clause (i) above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Borrowers shall within one Business Day following notice by the Administrative Agent, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the Borrowers against such Defaulting Lender, (A) first, prepay the portion of such Defaulting Lenders Overadvance Exposure that has not been so reallocated, (B) second, prepay the portion of such Defaulting Lenders Protective Advance Exposure that has not been so reallocated, (C) third, prepay the portion of such Defaulting Lenders Swingline Exposure that has not been so reallocated and (D) fourth, cash collateralize such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure that has not been so reallocated in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.06(j) for so long as such LC Exposure is outstanding;
 
(iii) if the Borrowers cash collateralize any portion of such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure pursuant to clause (ii) above, the Borrowers shall not be required to pay any letter of credit participation fees to such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lenders cash collateralized LC Exposure during the period such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure is cash collateralized;
 
  
(iv) if any portion of the LC Exposure of such Defaulting Lender is reallocated pursuant to clause (c)(i) above, then the fees payable to the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.12(b) shall be adjusted to give effect to such reallocation; or
 
(v) if any portion of such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure is neither cash collateralized nor reallocated pursuant to clause (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above, then, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the applicable Issuing Bank or any Lender hereunder, all letter of credit participation fees payable under Section 2.12(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure shall be payable to the Issuing Banks (and allocated among them ratably based on the amount of such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit issued by each Issuing Bank) until such LC Exposure is cash collateralized and/or reallocated; and
 
(d) the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loan and no Issuing Bank shall be required to issue, amend, renew, extend or increase any Letter of Credit, in each case, unless it is satisfied that the related exposure will be 100% covered by the Revolving Commitments of the non-Defaulting Lenders and/or cash collateral provided by the Borrowers in accordance with clause (c) of this Section, and participating interests in any such newly issued, amended, renewed, extended or increased Letter of Credit or newly made Swingline Loan shall be allocated among non-Defaulting Lenders in a manner consistent with clause (c)(i) of this Section (and Defaulting Lenders shall not participate therein).
 
In the event and on the date that each of the Administrative Agent, the Company, each Issuing Bank and the Swingline Lender agrees that a Defaulting Lender has adequately remedied all matters that caused such Lender to be a Defaulting Lender, then the Swingline Exposure, LC Exposure, Protective Advance Exposure and Overadvance Exposure of the other Lenders shall be readjusted to reflect the inclusion of such Lenders Revolving Commitment and on such date such Lender shall purchase at par such of the Revolving Loans of the other Lenders as the Administrative Agent shall determine may be necessary in order for such Lender to hold Revolving Loans in accordance with its Applicable Percentage.
 
SECTION 2.21. If after receipt of any payment which is applied to the payment of all or any part of the Obligations, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender is for any reason compelled to surrender such payment or proceeds to any Person because such payment or application of proceeds is invalidated, declared fraudulent, set aside or determined to be void or voidable as a preference, impermissible setoff, or a diversion of trust funds, or for any other reason, then the Obligations or part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued and this Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall continue in full force as if such payment or proceeds had not been received by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender. The provisions of this Section shall be and remain effective notwithstanding any contrary action which may have been taken by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender in reliance upon such payment or application of proceeds. The provisions of this Section shall survive the termination of this Agreement.
Returned Payments.
 
  
SECTION 2.22. The Company may designate any Subsidiary that is a wholly owned Domestic Subsidiary of the Company as a Borrowing Subsidiary upon 10 Business Days notice to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders (such notice to include the name, primary business address and tax identification number of such proposed Borrowing Subsidiary). Upon proper notice and receipt by the Administrative Agent of such agreements, documents and legal opinions as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request and subject to the Administrative Agents determining in consultation with the Lenders that designating such Subsidiary as a Borrowing Subsidiary would not cause any Lender to suffer any economic, legal or regulatory disadvantage, such Subsidiary shall be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. A Subsidiary shall cease to be a Borrowing Subsidiary hereunder at such time as the Company gives notice to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders of its intention to terminate such Subsidiary as a Borrowing Subsidiary; that any such termination shall not be effective (other than to terminate such Borrowing Subsidiarys right to make further Borrowings or to obtain Letters of Credit) and such Subsidiary shall remain a Borrowing Subsidiary until such time as all Loans to such Borrowing Subsidiary and accrued interest thereon and all other amounts then due from such Borrowing Subsidiary have been paid in full and no Letter of Credit issued for the account of such Borrowing Subsidiary shall be outstanding.
Borrowing Subsidiaries.
provided
 
ARTICLE III
 
Representations and Warranties
 
Each Loan Party represents and warrants to the Lenders as follows:
 
SECTION 3.01. The Company and each Subsidiary is duly organized, validly existing and (to the extent the concept is applicable in such jurisdiction and, in the case of any Subsidiary other than a Borrowing Subsidiary, except where the failure to be so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect) in good standing the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Organization; Powers.
under
 
SECTION 3.02. (a) The Transactions, insofar as they are to be carried out by each Loan Party, are within such Loan Partys corporate or other organizational powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or other organizational and, if required, shareholder or other equityholder action. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each Loan Party and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which any Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Loan Party, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors rights generally and to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Authorization; Enforceability; Benefit to Loan Parties.
 
  
(b) Each Loan Party expects to derive benefit (and its board of directors or other governing body has determined that it may reasonably be expected to derive benefit), directly and indirectly, from (i) successful operations of each of the other Loan Parties and (ii) the credit extended by the Lenders to the Borrowers hereunder. Each Loan Party has determined that execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement and any other Loan Documents to be executed by such Loan Party is within its purpose, will be of direct and indirect benefit to such Loan Party, and is in its best interest.
 
SECTION 3.03. The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except such as have been obtained or made and are (or will so be) in full force and effect and except for filings necessary to perfect Liens created under the Loan Documents, (b) will not violate any applicable law, including any order of any Governmental Authority, or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company or any Subsidiary, except, in the case of any applicable law, a violation which would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any indenture, material agreement or other material instrument binding upon the Company or any Subsidiary or any of their assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Company or any Subsidiary, and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Company or any Subsidiary, except Liens created pursuant to the Loan Documents.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts.
 
SECTION 3.04. (a) The Loan Parties have heretofore furnished to the Lenders (i) (A) the consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, cash flows and equity of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the fiscal year ended July 30, 2011 and (B) the consolidated balance sheets and related statements of comprehensive income, cash flows and equity of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for the fiscal year ended July 28, 2012, in each case, audited by and accompanied by the unqualified opinion of Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent registered public accounting firm, and (ii) the unaudited consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, comprehensive income and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of and for each of the fiscal quarters and the portions of the fiscal year ended January 26, 2013 and October 27, 2012. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clause (ii) above.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Effect.
 
  
(b) Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto or in the Information Materials and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has, as of the Third Restatement Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities, material unusual long-term commitments or material unrealized losses.
 
Since July 28, 2012, there has been no event, development or circumstance that has had, or could reasonably be expected to have, a material adverse effect on the business, assets, results of operations or financial conditions of the Company and the Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
(c)
 
SECTION 3.05. (a) The Company and each Subsidiary has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its property material to its business (including its Mortgaged Properties), except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes and Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02.
Properties.
 
(b) The Company and each Subsidiary owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, tradenames, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and, to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, the use thereof by the Company and the Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(c) Schedule 3.05 sets forth the address of each real property that is owned in fee by the Loan Parties as of the Third Restatement Effective Date and, with respect to any such real property that constitutes a Mortgaged Property, the proper jurisdiction for the filing of a Mortgage in respect thereof. As of the Third Restatement Effective Date, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary (i) has received notice, or has knowledge, of any pending or contemplated condemnation proceeding affecting any Mortgaged Property or any sale or disposition thereof in lieu of condemnation or (ii) is or could be obligated under any right of first refusal, option or other contractual right to sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of any Mortgaged Property or any interest therein.
 
SECTION 3.06. (a) There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, threatened against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
Litigation and Environmental Matters.
 
(b) Except for the Disclosed Matters or matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received written notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
 
  
(c) Since the Third Restatement Effective Date, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.07. (a) The Company and each Subsidiary is in compliance with all laws, including all orders of Governmental Authorities, applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect (it being agreed that this Section does not apply to any law which is specifically addressed in Section 3.06(b), 3.07(b), 3.08, 3.09, 3.10 or 3.14). No Default has occurred and is continuing.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements.
 
(b) To the extent applicable, the Company and the Subsidiaries are in compliance, in all material respects, with (i) the Trading with the Enemy Act and each of the foreign assets control regulations of the United States Treasury Department (31 CFR, Subtitle B, Chapter V) and any other enabling legislation or executive order relating thereto, and (ii) the USA Patriot Act. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, any director, officer, agent, employee or Affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary, is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by OFAC that could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. No part of the proceeds of the Loans will be used, directly or indirectly, or otherwise made available (A) for any payments to any officer or employee of a Governmental Authority, or any Person controlled by a Governmental Authority, or any political party, official of a political party, candidate for political office, or anyone else acting in an official capacity, in order to obtain, retain or direct business or obtain any improper advantage, in violation of the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977 or (B) to any Person for the purpose of financing the activities of any Person currently subject to any United States sanctions administered by OFAC.
 
(c) No Loan Party is in default in any material respect in the performance, observance or fulfillment of any of the obligations, covenants or conditions contained in (i) any material agreement to which it is a party or (ii) any agreement or instrument evidencing or governing Material Indebtedness.
 
SECTION 3.08. No Loan Party is an investment company as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Investment Company Status.
 
SECTION 3.09. The Company and each Subsidiary has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) any Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Company or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books reserves with respect thereto to the extent required by GAAP or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes.
 
  
SECTION 3.10. (a) No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan that is subject to Title IV of ERISA (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Accounting Standards Codification Topic 715) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $2,000,000 the fair value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans that are subject to Title IV of ERISA (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Accounting Standards Codification Topic 715) did not, as of the date or dates of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed the fair value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans by any material amount.
ERISA; Labor Matters.
 
(b) As of the Third Restatement Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts, slowdowns or any other material labor disputes against the Company or any Subsidiary pending or, to the knowledge of the Borrowers, threatened. The hours worked by and payments made to employees of the Company and the Subsidiaries have not been in violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act or any other applicable Federal, state, local or foreign law dealing with such matters, except for any such violation that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. All payments due from the Company or any Subsidiary, or for which any claim may be made against the Company or any Subsidiary, on account of wages and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a liability on the books of the Company or such Subsidiary to the extent required by GAAP. The consummation of the Transactions will not give rise to any right of termination or right of renegotiation on the part of any union under any collective bargaining agreement to which the Company or any Subsidiary is bound.
 
SECTION 3.11. The Loan Parties have disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which the Company or any Subsidiary is subject, and all other matters known to them, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Information Materials nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary to the Administrative Agent, any Arranger or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to forecasts and projected financial information, the Loan Parties represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed by them to be reasonable at the time made and at the time so furnished and, if furnished prior to the Third Restatement Effective Date, as of the Third Restatement Effective Date (it being understood that such forecasts and projections may vary from actual results and that such variances may be material).
Disclosure.
provided
 
  
SECTION 3.12. Schedule 3.12 sets forth, as of the Third Restatement Effective Date, the name, type of organization and jurisdiction of organization of, and the percentage of each class of Equity Interests owned by the Company or any Subsidiary in, (a) each Subsidiary and (b) each joint venture in which the Company or any Subsidiary owns any Equity Interests, and identifies each Designated Subsidiary and each Inactive Subsidiary as such. None of the Subsidiaries set forth on Schedule 1.01A (if any) conducts any business operations or owns any assets material to the Company and the Subsidiaries. All the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in each Subsidiary owned by any Loan Party have been (to the extent such concepts are relevant with respect to such Equity Interests) duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non assessable. Except as set forth on Schedule 3.12, as of the Third Restatement Effective Date, there is no existing option, warrant, call, right, commitment or other agreement to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party requiring, and there are no Equity Interests in any Subsidiary outstanding that upon exercise, conversion or exchange would require, the issuance by any Subsidiary of any additional Equity Interests or other securities exercisable for, convertible into, exchangeable for or evidencing the right to subscribe for or purchase any Equity Interests in any Subsidiary.
Subsidiaries and Joint Ventures.
 
SECTION 3.13. Schedule 3.13 sets forth a description of all insurance maintained by or on behalf of the Company and the Subsidiaries as of the Third Restatement Effective Date. As of the Third Restatement Effective Date, all premiums due and payable in respect of such insurance have been paid. The Loan Parties believe that the insurance maintained by or on behalf of the Company and the Subsidiaries is adequate.
Insurance.
 
SECTION 3.14. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is principally, or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying margin stock (within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors), or extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying margin stock. No part of the proceeds of any Loan or any Letter of Credit will be used, whether directly or indirectly, and whether immediately, incidentally or ultimately, in any manner or for any purpose that would entail a violation of Regulations T, U or X of the Board of Governors.
Federal Reserve Regulations.
 
 
SECTION 3.15. Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Third Restatement Effective Date, (a) the fair value of the assets of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries, at a fair valuation, will exceed their debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries (determined on the basis of such property being liquidated with reasonable promptness in an arms-length transaction) will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of their debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (c) the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries will be able to pay their debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise (it being understood and agreed that for purposes of this Section, contingent liabilities mean the maximum amount of liability that could reasonably be likely to result from pending litigation, asserted claims and assessments, guaranties, indemnification obligations, adjustment of purchase price or other post-closing payment adjustments (including earn-outs and other similar arrangements) and uninsured risks of the Company and its Subsidiaries), as such debts and liabilities become absolute and matured; and (d) the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the businesses in which they are engaged as such businesses are now conducted and are proposed to be conducted following the Third Restatement Effective Date.
Solvency.
 
SECTION 3.16. (a) The Restated Security Agreement, upon execution and delivery thereof by the parties thereto, will create in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lender Parties, a valid and enforceable security interest in the Collateral and (i) when the Collateral constituting certificated securities (as defined in the UCC) is delivered to the Administrative Agent, together with instruments of transfer duly endorsed in blank, the security interest created under the Restated Security Agreement will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the pledgors thereunder in such Collateral, prior and superior in right to any other Person, and (ii) when financing statements in appropriate form are filed in the applicable filing offices, the security interest created under the Restated Security Agreement will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in the remaining Collateral (as defined therein) to the extent perfection can be obtained by filing UCC financing statements, prior and superior to the rights of any other Person, except for rights secured by Liens permitted under Section 6.02.
Collateral Matters.
 
(b) Each Mortgage, upon execution and delivery thereof by the parties thereto, will create in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lender Parties, a legal, valid and enforceable security interest in all the applicable mortgagors right, title and interest in and to the Mortgaged Properties subject thereto and the proceeds thereof, and when the Mortgages have been filed in the jurisdictions specified therein, the Mortgages will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the mortgagors in the Mortgaged Properties and the proceeds thereof, prior and superior in right to any other Person, but subject to Liens permitted under Section 6.02.
 
(c) Upon the recordation of the IP Security Agreements with the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, and the filing of the financing statements referred to in paragraph (a) of this Section, the security interest created under the Restated Security Agreement will constitute a fully perfected security interest in all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in the Intellectual Property (as defined in the Restated Security Agreement) in which a security interest may be perfected by filing in the United States of America, in each case prior and superior in right to any other Person, but subject to Liens permitted under Section 6.02 (it being understood that subsequent recordings in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office may be necessary to perfect a security interest in such Intellectual Property acquired by the Loan Parties after the Third Restatement Effective Date).
 
  
(d) It is understood that, to the extent the actions referred to in the foregoing paragraphs of this Section have already been taken with the results envisioned by such paragraphs, no further action shall be required in connection with the effectiveness of the Third Restatement Agreement.
 
SECTION 3.17. The Borrowers will use the proceeds of the Loans and will request the issuance of Letters of Credit only for purposes set forth in Section 5.11.
Use of Proceeds.
 
SECTION 3.18. Schedule 3.18 (as updated from time to time as permitted by Section 5.16) sets forth a list of all Credit Card Agreements to which any Loan Party is a party. A true and complete copy of each Credit Card Agreement listed on Schedule 3.18 has been delivered to the Administrative Agent, together with all material amendments, waivers and other modifications thereto. All such Credit Card Agreements are in full force and effect, currently binding upon each Loan Party that is a party thereto and, to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, binding upon other parties thereto in accordance with their terms. The Loan Parties are in compliance in all material respects with each such Credit Card Agreement.
Credit Card Agreements.
 
ARTICLE IV
 
Conditions
 
SECTION 4.01. The effectiveness of the amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement in the form of this Agreement is subject to the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in the Third Restatement Agreement.
Third Restatement Effective Date.
 
SECTION 4.02. The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of each Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to receipt of the request therefor in accordance herewith and to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event.
 
(a) The representations and warranties of the Loan Parties set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable.
 
(b) At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
  
(c) After giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, the aggregate Credit Exposures shall not exceed the lesser of (i) the total Revolving Commitments then in effect or (ii) other than in the case of a Protective Advance or an Overadvance, the Borrowing Base then in effect, and, other than in the case of a Protective Advance or an Overadvance, the Administrative Agent shall have received a Borrowing Base Certificate as of a date not earlier than the last day of the most recent fiscal month ended at least 20 days prior to the date of such Borrowing or such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension.
 
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrowers on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this Section.
 
Notwithstanding the failure to satisfy the conditions precedent set forth in paragraphs (a) or (b) of this Section, unless otherwise directed by the Required Lenders, the Administrative Agent may, but shall have no obligation to, continue to make Loans and an Issuing Bank may, but shall have no obligation to, issue or cause to be issued any Letter of Credit for the ratable account and risk of Lenders from time to time if the Administrative Agent believes that making such Loans or issuing or causing to be issued any such Letter of Credit is in the best interests of the Lenders.
 
ARTICLE V
 
Affirmative Covenants
 
Until the Revolving Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees, expenses and other amounts payable under any Loan Document (other than Banking Services Obligations and contingent or indemnity obligations for which no claim has been made) have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Loan Parties covenant and agree, jointly and severally, with the Lenders that:
 
SECTION 5.01. The Borrowers will furnish to the Administrative Agent, for distribution to each Lender:
Financial Statements; Borrowing Base and Other Information.
 
(a) within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, its audited consolidated balance sheet and related consolidated statements of comprehensive income, cash flows and equity as of the end of and for such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all audited by and accompanied by the opinion of Deloitte & Touche LLP or another independent registered public accounting firm of recognized national standing (without a going concern or like qualification, exception or emphasis and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP;
 
  
(b) within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Company, its consolidated balance sheet as of the end of such fiscal quarter, the related consolidated statements of comprehensive income for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year and the related consolidated statement of cash flows for the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by a Financial Officer of the Company as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and such portion of the fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
(c) during any Enhanced Reporting Period, within 20 days after the end of each of the first two fiscal months of each fiscal quarter of the Company, the consolidated balance sheet and related statements of comprehensive income and cash flows of the Company as of the end of and for such fiscal month and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by a Financial Officer of the Company as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal month and such portion of the fiscal year on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
 
(d) concurrently with each delivery of financial statements under clause (a), (b) or (c) above, a completed Compliance Certificate signed by a Financial Officer of the Company (i) certifying, in the case of the financial statements delivered under clause (b) or (c), that such financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, subject to normal year end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes, (ii) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (iii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Section 6.12, (iv) if any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate (and, in the event of any such change referred to in Section 1.04(b)(ii), with respect to the amounts included in the calculation of the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for the period of four fiscal quarters of the Company then most recently ended, providing a reasonably detailed reconciliation of such amounts as they are reflected in the financial statements accompanying such certificate and as they would be reflected therein without giving effect to such change) and (v) certifying that all notices required to be provided under Sections 5.03 and 5.04 have been provided;
 
(e) concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, a certificate of the accounting firm that audited such financial statements stating whether it obtained knowledge during the course of its examination of such financial statements of any Default and, in the case it shall have obtained knowledge of any Default, specifying the details thereof (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines); that such certificate shall not be required to be delivered if the Company has used commercially reasonable efforts to cause such certificate to be delivered by such accounting firm and such accounting firm has informed the Company that it is not willing to provide such certificate;
provided
 
(f) within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, a completed Supplemental Perfection Certificate, signed by a Financial Officer of the Company, setting forth the information required pursuant to the Supplemental Perfection Certificate;
 
(g) as soon as available, but within 60 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, a copy of the plan and forecast (including (i) a projected consolidated balance sheet and statement of operations and (ii) a projected consolidated statement of cash flow) of the Company for each quarter of the upcoming fiscal year;
 
(h) as soon as available but in any event within 20 days (or, during any Enhanced Reporting Period, 3 days) after each Borrowing Base Reporting Date, and at such other times as may be requested by the Administrative Agent, a Borrowing Base Certificate setting forth a computation of the Borrowing Base as of such Borrowing Base Reporting Date, together with supporting information and any additional reports with respect to the Borrowing Base that the Administrative Agent may reasonably request;
 
  
(i) as soon as available but in any event within 20 days (or, during any Enhanced Reporting Period, 3 days) after each Borrowing Base Reporting Date, and at such other times as may be requested by the Administrative Agent, the following information as of such Borrowing Base Reporting Date, all delivered electronically in a text formatted file reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent:
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
(j) at any time that any Revolving Loan is outstanding or the LC Exposure is equal to or greater than $100,000,000, as soon as available but in any event within 20 days after the end of each calendar month and at such other times as may be reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent, a schedule and aging of the Loan Parties accounts payable as of the month then ended, delivered electronically in a text formatted file reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent;
 
(k) promptly upon the Administrative Agents request:
 
 
 
(l) at such other times as may be requested by the Administrative Agent, the Loan Parties sales journal, cash receipts journal and debit memo/credit memo journal as of the period then ended;
 
(m) at such other times as may be reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent, copies of all tax returns filed by any Loan Party with the IRS;
 
(n) within 20 days after the first Business Day of March of each year, commencing with March 2014, a certificate of good standing for each Borrower from the appropriate governmental officer in its jurisdiction of incorporation, formation, or organization;
 
(o) promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by the Company to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
 
 
(p) promptly after any request therefor by the Administrative Agent, copies of (i) any documents described in Section 101(k)(1) of ERISA that the Loan Parties or any ERISA Affiliate may request with respect to any Multiemployer Plan (following the receipt thereof from the administrator or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan) and (ii) any notices described in Section 101(l)(1) of ERISA that the Loan Parties or any ERISA Affiliate may request with respect to any Multiemployer Plan (following the receipt thereof from the administrator or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan); that if an ERISA Event has occurred or, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, is reasonably likely to occur, and the Loan Parties or any ERISA Affiliate have not requested such documents or notices from the administrator or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan, upon request by the Administrative Agent, the applicable Loan Party or ERISA Affiliate shall promptly make a request for such documents and notices from such administrator or sponsor and shall provide copies of such documents and notices to the Administrative Agent promptly after receipt thereof; and
provided
 
(q) promptly after any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Company or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of any Loan Document, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request.
 
Information required to be delivered pursuant to clause (a), (b) or (o) of this Section shall be deemed to have been delivered if such information, or one or more annual or quarterly reports containing such information, shall have been posted by the Administrative Agent on an IntraLinks or similar site to which the Lenders have been granted access or shall be available on the website of the SEC at http://www.sec.gov. Information required to be delivered pursuant to this Section may also be delivered by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent.
 
SECTION 5.02. The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent (for distribution to the Lenders) written notice promptly upon any Financial Officer, or other officer or employee responsible for compliance with the Loan Documents, of the Company or any Subsidiary becoming aware of any of the following:
Notices of Material Events.
 
(a) the occurrence of any Default;
 
(b) the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary, or any adverse development in any such pending action, suit or proceeding not previously disclosed in writing by the Company to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, that in each case could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect or that in any manner questions the validity of any Loan Document;
 
(c) any Lien (other than a Permitted Encumbrance) or claim made or asserted against any material portion of the Collateral;
 
  
(d) any and all default notices received under or with respect to any leased location or public warehouse where Collateral having an aggregate value in excess of $10,000,000 is located (which shall be delivered within two Business Days after receipt thereof); and
 
(e) any other development that has resulted, or could reasonably be expected to result, in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Company setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
 
SECTION 5.03. . If any additional Domestic Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Third Restatement Effective Date, the Company will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will, as promptly as practicable, and in any event within 30 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in writing) after such Domestic Subsidiary is formed or acquired (i) if such Domestic Subsidiary is a Designated Subsidiary, execute and deliver a Joinder Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit H (the ), and (ii) cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied with respect to such Domestic Subsidiary and with respect to any Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of such Domestic Subsidiary owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party. If any additional Eligible Foreign Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Third Restatement Effective Date, the Company will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will, as promptly as practicable, and in any event within 60 days (or such longer period as the Administrative Agent may agree in writing) after such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary is formed or acquired, cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied with respect to any Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of such Eligible Foreign Subsidiary owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party.
Additional Subsidiaries
Joinder Agreement
 
SECTION 5.04. (a) Each Loan Party will furnish to the Administrative Agent prompt written notice of any change in (i) its legal name, as set forth in its organizational documents, (ii) its jurisdiction of organization or the form of its organization (including as a result of any merger or consolidation), (iii) the location of its chief executive office or (iv) its organizational identification number, if any, or, with respect to any Loan Party organized under the laws of a jurisdiction that requires such information to be set forth on the face of a UCC financing statement, its Federal Taxpayer Identification Number. Each Loan Party agrees not to effect or permit any change referred to in the preceding sentence unless all filings have been made under the UCC or otherwise that are required in order for the Administrative Agent to continue at all times following such change to have a valid, legal and perfected security interest in all the Collateral affected thereby. Each Loan Party also agrees promptly to notify the Administrative Agent if any material portion of the Collateral is damaged or destroyed.
Information Regarding Collateral.
 
  
(b) If (i) any Mortgaged Property is acquired by any Loan Party after the Third Restatement Effective Date or (ii) any material assets are acquired by any Loan Party after the Third Restatement Effective Date (other than assets constituting Collateral under the Collateral Documents that become subject to the Lien of the Collateral Documents upon the acquisition thereof), the Loan Parties will promptly notify the Administrative Agent thereof and will cause such assets to be subjected to a Lien securing the Secured Obligations and will take such actions as shall be necessary or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to grant and perfect such Lien, all at the expense of the Loan Parties. It is understood and agreed that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this Agreement or in any Collateral Document, the Loan Parties shall not be required to (A) grant leasehold mortgages, (B) obtain landlord lien waivers or Collateral Access Agreements with respect to any of their retail operating store locations or (C) enter into Deposit Account Control Agreements in respect of any Excluded Deposit Account.
 
SECTION 5.05. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, do or cause to be done all things reasonably necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation, dissolution, disposition or other transaction permitted under Section 6.03 or 6.05.
Existence; Conduct of Business.
provided
 
SECTION 5.06. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, pay or discharge all its material obligations, including Tax liabilities, before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) (i) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (ii) such Loan Party or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books reserves with respect thereto to the extent required by GAAP and (iii) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and the enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation or (b) the failure to make payment could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Obligations.
 
SECTION 5.07. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
Maintenance of Properties.
 
SECTION 5.08. The Loan Parties will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies having a financial strength rating of at least A- by A.M. Best Company (a) insurance in such amounts (with no greater risk retention) and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies of established repute engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations and (b) all insurance required to be maintained pursuant to the Collateral Documents. The Borrower will furnish to the Lenders, upon request of the Administrative Agent, information in reasonable detail as to the insurance so maintained. With respect to each Mortgaged Property that is located in an area determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency to have special flood hazards, the applicable Loan Party has obtained and will maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies, such flood insurance as is required under applicable law, including Regulation H of the Board of Governors.
Insurance.
 
  
SECTION 5.09. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, (a) keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct (in all material respects) entries in accordance with GAAP and applicable law are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities and (b) permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender (including employees of the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any consultants, accountants, lawyers and appraisers retained by the Administrative Agent), upon reasonable prior notice (but in no event more than once each fiscal year of the Company unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing), to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and, accompanied by one or more such officers or their designees if requested by the Company, independent accountants, all at such reasonable times during normal business hours and as often as reasonably requested. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the right of the Administrative Agent or any Lender to conduct appraisals or field examinations shall be governed exclusively by Sections 5.12 and 5.13, respectively, and shall not be limited by this Section.
Books and Records; Inspection Rights.
 
SECTION 5.10. Each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, comply with all laws, including all orders of any Governmental Authority, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws.
 
SECTION 5.11. The Letters of Credit and the proceeds of the Loans will be used only to repay loans outstanding on the Third Restatement Effective Date under the Term Credit Agreement, for working capital and for other general corporate purposes of the Borrowers and their subsidiaries. No part of the proceeds of any Loan and no Letter of Credit will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board of Governors, including Regulations T, U and X.
Use of Proceeds.
 
SECTION 5.12. (a) The Loan Parties will provide to the Administrative Agent from time to time upon the Administrative Agents request, at the sole expense of the Loan Parties, appraisals (or updates thereof) of the Inventory of the Loan Parties from appraisers selected and engaged by the Administrative Agent, prepared on a basis consistent in all material respects with the inventory appraisals delivered pursuant to the Existing Credit Agreement (with such adjustments as shall be deemed appropriate to reflect events or changes in circumstances after the dates of such appraisals); that the Administrative Agent shall be entitled to request only one such appraisal in any calendar year, except that (i) at any time when Availability shall have been less than the greater of (A) the lesser of (x) 20% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect or (y) 20% of the Borrowing Base then in effect and (B) $95,000,000 for three consecutive Business Days, the Administrative Agent may request a second appraisal in the then-current calendar year, (ii) if an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, there shall be no limitation on the number of appraisals that the Administrative Agent may request and (iii) if the Company or any Subsidiary shall have consummated any Permitted Acquisition, the Administrative Agent may request a separate appraisal of the inventory acquired thereby to the extent the Loan Parties desire to include such inventory in Eligible Inventory. For purposes of the foregoing, it is understood that a single appraisal may consist of appraisals of the assets of each Loan Party and may be conducted at multiple sites. Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon reasonable advance notice to the Company, the Administrative Agent may request appraisals in addition to those authorized by the preceding sentences of this Section; that the Loan Parties will not be responsible for the expense of appraisals conducted pursuant to this sentence.
Appraisals.
provided
provided
 
 
(b) At any time when Availability shall be less than 20% of the total Revolving Commitments for three consecutive Business Days, the Loan Parties will provide to the Administrative Agent upon the Administrative Agents request, at the sole expense of the Loan Parties, updated FIRREA Appraisals of one or more of the Eligible Real Properties included in the Borrowing Base from appraisers selected and engaged by the Administrative Agent; that not more than one such updated FIRREA Appraisal may be requested for any single Eligible Real Property in a single calendar year.
provided
 
SECTION 5.13. At any time that the Administrative Agent requests, the Company and the Subsidiaries will allow the Administrative Agent, at the sole expense of the Loan Parties, to conduct, or engage a third party to conduct, field examinations (or updates thereof) upon reasonable prior notice during normal business hours to ensure the adequacy of Collateral included in the Borrowing Base and related reporting and control systems; that the Administrative Agent shall be entitled to conduct only one such field examination in any calendar year, except that (a) at any time when Availability shall have been less than the greater of (i) the lesser of (x) 20% of the total Revolving Commitments then in effect and (y) 20% of the total Borrowing Base then in effect and (ii) $95,000,000 for three consecutive Business Days, the Administrative Agent may conduct a second field examination in the then-current calendar year, (b) if an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, there shall be no limitation on the number of field examinations that the Administrative Agent may conduct and (c) if the Company or any Subsidiary shall have consummated any Permitted Acquisition, the Administrative Agent may conduct a separate field examination of the Collateral acquired thereby to the extent the Loan Parties desire to include such Collateral in the Borrowing Base. For purposes of the foregoing, it is understood that a single field examination may consist of examinations of the assets of each Loan Party and may be conducted at multiple sites. Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon reasonable advance notice to the Company, the Administrative Agent may conduct, or engage a third party to conduct, field examinations in addition to those authorized by the preceding sentences of this Section; that the Loan Parties will not be responsible for the expense of field examinations conducted pursuant to this sentence.
Field Examinations.
provided
provided
 
 
SECTION 5.14. The Loan Parties will, and will cause Subsidiaries to, maintain the Administrative Agent or one or more Lenders acceptable to the Administrative Agent as their principal depository bank, including for the maintenance of operating, administrative, cash management, collection activity, and other Deposit Accounts for the conduct of their business; that the Loan Parties shall not be required to satisfy the foregoing requirement with respect to (a) the Deposit Accounts of the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries maintained with any financial institution with which the Acquired Company or any such subsidiary maintained a Deposit Account prior to the Second Restatement Effective Date or (b) any Deposit Account that is an Excluded Deposit Account.
Depository Banks.
provided
 
SECTION 5.15. The Loan Parties will execute any and all further documents, financing statements, agreements and instruments, and take all such further actions (including the filing and recording of financing statements, fixture filings, mortgages, deeds of trust and other documents) that may be required under any applicable law, or that the Administrative Agent may reasonably request, to cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be and remain satisfied at all times, all at the expense of the Loan Parties. The Loan Parties also agree to provide to the Administrative Agent, from time to time upon request, evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent as to the perfection and priority of the Liens created or intended to be created by the Collateral Documents.
Further Assurances.
 
SECTION 5.16. Each Loan Party will (a) comply in all material respects with all its obligations under each Credit Card Agreement to which it is party and (b) maintain credit card arrangements solely with the credit card issuers and credit card processors identified on Schedule 3.18; , , that the Company may amend Schedule 3.18 to remove any credit card issuer or credit card processor identified on such Schedule or to add additional credit card issuers and credit card processors that are satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its reasonable discretion, and concurrently with the making of any such amendment the Loan Party shall provide to the Administrative Agent evidence that a Credit Card Notification shall have been delivered to any credit card issuer or credit card processor added to such Schedule.
Credit Card Agreements and Notifications.
provided
however
 
SECTION 5.17. The Loan Parties shall deliver, when and as required by the terms of the Post-Closing Letter Agreement, the items referenced therein.
Post Closing Requirements.
 
ARTICLE VI
 
Negative Covenants
 
Until the Revolving Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees, expenses and other amounts payable under any Loan Document (other than Banking Services Obligations and contingent or indemnity obligations for which no claim has been made) have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Loan Parties covenant and agree, jointly and severally, with the Lenders that:
 
 
SECTION 6.01. (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
Indebtedness; Certain Equity Securities.
 
(i) Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
 
(ii) Indebtedness existing on the Third Restatement Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.01 and Refinancing Indebtedness in respect thereof;
1
 
(iii) Indebtedness of the Company to any Subsidiary and of any Subsidiary to the Company or any other Subsidiary; that (A) such Indebtedness shall not have been transferred to any Person other than the Company or any Subsidiary, (B) any such Indebtedness owing by any Loan Party shall be unsecured and subordinated in right of payment to the Obligations on terms customary for intercompany subordinated Indebtedness, as reasonably determined by the Administrative Agent, (C) any such Indebtedness owing to any Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note (which may be a global promissory note) that shall have been pledged pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement and (D) any such Indebtedness owing by any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to any Loan Party shall be incurred in compliance with Section 6.04;
provided
 
(iv) Guarantees incurred in compliance with Section 6.04;
 
(v) Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary (A) incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations and Synthetic Lease Obligations, that such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 180 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and the principal amount of such Indebtedness does not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets or (B) assumed in connection with the acquisition of any fixed or capital assets, and Refinancing Indebtedness in respect of any of the foregoing; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (v) shall not exceed $75,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
provided
 
(vi) Indebtedness in respect of netting services, overdraft protections (in an aggregate amount not to exceed $1,000,000 at any time outstanding) and otherwise in connection with deposit and checking accounts;
 
 
Subject to review of Schedule 6.01.
1
 
 
(vii) Indebtedness in respect of letters of credit, bank guarantees and similar instruments issued for the account of the Company or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business supporting obligations under workers compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws;
 
(viii) Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary in the form of purchase price adjustments or earn-outs incurred in connection with any Permitted Acquisition or other Investment permitted by Section 6.04;
 
(ix) the Acquired Company Convertible Notes;
 
(x) [Reserved]
 
(xi) Indebtedness of Loan Parties in respect of surety bonds (whether bid performance or otherwise) and other obligations of a like nature, in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business; and
 
(xii) other Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties permitted by this clause (xii) shall not exceed $100,000,000at any time outstanding; and that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (xii) that is secured by Liens on the assets of the Loan Parties may not exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding.
provided
provided
further
 
(b) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, issue any Disqualified Stock, other than, in the case of the Subsidiaries, to the Company or a Subsidiary; that any issuance of Equity Interests of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to any Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.04.
provided
 
SECTION 6.02. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any asset now owned or hereafter acquired, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Liens.
 
(a) Liens created under the Loan Documents;
 
(b) Permitted Encumbrances;
 
(c) any Lien on any asset of the Company or any Subsidiary existing on the Third Restatement Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.02; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other asset of the Company or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations that it secures on the Third Restatement Effective Date and any extensions, renewals and refinancings thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
 
 
(d) any Lien existing on any asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Company or any Subsidiary or existing on any asset of any Person that becomes (including pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition) a Subsidiary (or of any Person not previously a Subsidiary that is merged or consolidated with or into a Subsidiary in a transaction permitted hereunder) after the Third Restatement Effective Date prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary (or is so merged or consolidated); that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary (or such merger or consolidation), (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other assets of the Company or any Subsidiary (other than, in the case of any such merger or consolidation, the assets of any special purpose merger Subsidiary that is a party thereto) and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations that it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary (or is so merged or consolidated) and any extensions, renewals and refinancings thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
 
(e) Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Company or any Subsidiary; that (i) such Liens secure only Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(a)(v) and obligations relating thereto not constituting Indebtedness and (ii) such Liens shall not apply to any other asset of the Company or any Subsidiary (other than the proceeds and products thereof); that in the event purchase money obligations are owed to any Person with respect to financing of more than one purchase of any fixed or capital assets, such Liens may secure all such purchase money obligations and may apply to all such fixed or capital assets financed by such Person;
provided
provided
further
 
(f) in connection with the sale or transfer of any Equity Interests or other assets in a transaction permitted under Section 6.05, customary rights and restrictions contained in agreements relating to such sale or transfer pending the completion thereof;
 
(g) in the case of (i) any Subsidiary that is not a wholly-owned Subsidiary or (ii) the Equity Interests in any Person that is not a Subsidiary, any encumbrance or restriction, including any put and call arrangements, related to Equity Interests in such Subsidiary or such other Person set forth in the organizational documents of such Subsidiary or such other Person or any related joint venture, shareholders or similar agreement;
 
(h) Liens solely on any cash earnest money deposits, escrow arrangements or similar arrangements made by the Company or any Subsidiary in connection with any letter of intent or purchase agreement for a Permitted Acquisition or other transaction permitted hereunder;
 
 
(i) [Reserved]
 
(j) any Lien on assets of any Foreign Subsidiary; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any Collateral (including any Equity Interests in any Foreign Subsidiary that constitute Collateral) or any other asset of the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary and (B) such Lien shall secure only Indebtedness of such Foreign Subsidiary permitted by Section 6.01(a)(xii) and obligations relating thereto not constituting Indebtedness; and
provided
 
(k) other Liens securing Indebtedness or other obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding (it being understood that in the event any such Liens extend to Credit Card Accounts Receivable or Inventory, such Credit Card Accounts Receivable or Inventory shall, to the extent otherwise included therein, cease to be Eligible Credit Card Accounts Receivable or Eligible Inventory, as applicable).
 
SECTION 6.03. (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing (i) any Subsidiary may merge into the Company in a transaction in which the Company is the surviving corporation, (ii) any Person (other than the Company) may merge into or consolidate with any Subsidiary in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary and, if any party to such merger or consolidation is a Loan Party, a Loan Party, (iii) any Subsidiary may merge into or consolidate with any Person (other than the Company) in a transaction permitted under Section 6.05 in which, after giving effect to such transaction, the surviving entity is not a Subsidiary, (iv) the Permitted Restructuring may be carried out and (v) any Subsidiary (other than a Borrower) may liquidate or dissolve if the Company determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Company and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders; that any such merger or consolidation involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger or consolidation shall not be permitted unless it is also permitted by Section 6.04.
Fundamental Changes; Business Activities.
provided
 
(b) The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Company and the Subsidiaries on the Third Restatement Effective Date and businesses reasonably related or complementary thereto, including development, operation and promotion of certain gift products, of other apparel or accessories in a specialty store, catalogue or e-commerce environment.
 
 
SECTION 6.04. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, purchase, hold, acquire (including pursuant to any merger or consolidation with any Person that was not a wholly-owned Subsidiary prior thereto), make or otherwise permit to exist any Investment in any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) all or substantially all the assets of any other Person or of a business unit, division, product line or line of business of any other Person, except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions.
 
(a) Permitted Investments;
 
(b) Investments existing on the Third Restatement Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.04 (but not any additions thereto (including any capital contributions) made after the Third Restatement Effective Date);
 
(c) Investments by the Company and the Subsidiaries in Equity Interests in their respective subsidiaries; that (i) such subsidiaries are Subsidiaries prior to such Investments, (ii) any such Equity Interests held by a Loan Party shall be pledged in accordance with the requirements of the definition of the term Collateral and Guarantee Requirement and (iii) the aggregate amount of such Investments by the Loan Parties in, and loans and advances by the Loan Parties to, and Guarantees by the Loan Parties of Indebtedness and other obligations of, Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties (excluding all such Investments, loans, advances and Guarantees existing on the Third Restatement Effective Date and permitted by clause (b) above) shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
(d) loans or advances made by the Company to any Subsidiary or made by any Subsidiary to the Company or any other Subsidiary; that (i) the Indebtedness resulting therefrom is permitted by Section 6.01(a)(iii), (ii) any such loans and advances made by a Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note (which may be in the form of a grid note) pledged pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement and (iii) the amount of such loans and advances made by the Loan Parties to Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties shall be subject to the limitation set forth in clause (c) above;
provided
 
(e) Guarantees by the Company or any Subsidiary of Indebtedness or other obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary (including any such Guarantees (i) arising as a result of any such Person being a joint and several co-applicant with respect to any letter of credit or letter of guaranty or (ii) of any leases of retail store locations and related obligations arising thereunder); that the aggregate amount of Indebtedness and other obligations of Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties that is Guaranteed by any Loan Party shall be subject to the limitation set forth in clause (c) above;
provided
 
(f) Guarantees of the obligations of the Canadian Subsidiaries under real property leases; that the aggregate amount of Guarantees under this clause (f) may not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
 
 
(g) Investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(h) any Permitted Acquisition; that (i) both before and after giving effect to such acquisition no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (ii) after giving effect to such acquisition (A) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio, computed on a Pro Forma Basis for the most recent period of four fiscal quarters of the Company for which financial statements shall have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 shall be not less than 1.10 to 1.00 and (B) Availability, determined on a Pro Forma Basis, shall have been and shall be not less than 17.5% of the total Revolving Commitments in effect at all times during the period commencing on the 60th day before such acquisition and (iii) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clause (ii) above and confirming that the other requirements of the definition of the term Permitted Acquisition and this clause (h) have been satisfied;
provided
 
(i) deposits, prepayments and other credits to suppliers, lessors and landlords made in the ordinary course of business;
 
(j) advances by the Company or any Subsidiary to employees in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices for travel and entertainment expenses, relocation costs and similar purposes;
 
(k) Investments made as a result of receipt of non-cash consideration from a sale, transfer or other disposition of assets permitted under Section 6.05; that any such Investment in the form of a promissory note in an amount in excess of $5,000,000 shall be pledged pursuant to the Restated Security Agreement;
provided
 
(l) Investments in the form of Swap Agreements permitted under Section 6.07;
 
(m) investments constituting deposits described in clauses (c) and (d) of the definition of Permitted Encumbrances and endorsements of instruments for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business;
 
(n) acquisitions of individual retail store locations and leases;
 
(o) the Permitted Restructuring;
 
 
(p) Investments in unconsolidated entities that do not constitute Subsidiaries of the Company; that the aggregate amount of Investments under this clause (o) may not exceed $35,000,000 at any time outstanding; and
provided
 
(q) other Investments; that (i) both before and after giving effect to such Investment no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (ii) Availability, determined on a Pro Forma Basis, shall have been and shall be not less than 17.5% of the aggregate Revolving Commitments in effect at all times during the period commencing on the 60th day before such Investment and (iii) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clause (ii) above and confirming that the other requirements of this clause (p) have been satisfied; that a purchase or acquisition (in one transaction or a series of transactions) of all or substantially all the assets of any Person or of a business unit, division, product line or line of business of any Person, may be only made in reliance on clause (h) of this Section and not on this clause (p).
provided
provided
further
 
For the purposes of this Section, any unreimbursed payment by the Company or any Subsidiary for goods or services delivered to any Subsidiary shall be deemed to be an Investment in such Subsidiary.
 
SECTION 6.05. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any asset, including any Equity Interest owned by it, nor will the Company permit any Subsidiary to issue any additional Equity Interests in such Subsidiary (other than to the Company or any other Subsidiary in compliance with Section 6.04, and other than directors qualifying shares and other nominal amounts of Equity Interests that are required to be held by other Persons under applicable law), except:
Asset Sales.
 
(a) (i) sales of inventory, (ii) sales, transfers and other dispositions of used, surplus, obsolete or outmoded machinery or equipment, (iii) contributions of merchandise to charitable organizations and (iv) dispositions of cash and Permitted Investments, in each case (other than in the case of clause (iv)) in the ordinary course of business;
 
(b) sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions to the Company or any Subsidiary; that any such sales, transfers, leases or other dispositions involving a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be made in compliance with Sections 6.04 and 6.09;
provided
 
 
(c) the sale or discount of accounts receivable arising in the ordinary course of business, but only in connection with the compromise or collection thereof and not in connection with any financing transaction;
 
(d) dispositions of assets subject to any casualty or condemnation proceeding (including in lieu thereof);
 
(e) leases or subleases of real property granted by the Company or any Subsidiary to third Persons not interfering in any material respect with the business of the Company or any Subsidiary, including retail store lease assignments and surrenders;
 
(f) the sale, transfer or other disposition of patents, trademarks, copyrights and other intellectual property (i) in the ordinary course of business, including pursuant to non-exclusive licenses of intellectual property; that no such sale, transfer or other disposition shall adversely affect in any material respect the fair value of any Eligible Inventory or the ability of the Administrative Agent to dispose of or otherwise realize upon any Eligible Inventory, or (ii) which, in the reasonable judgment of the Company or any Subsidiary, are determined to be uneconomical, negligible or obsolete in the conduct of business;
provided
 
(g) Sale/Leaseback Transactions permitted by Section 6.06;
 
(h) sale, transfer or other disposition
the
of certain operations acquired as part of the Acquisition and consistent with the plan therefor previously communicated by the Company to the Administrative Agent;
 
(i) sales, transfers and other dispositions of assets that are not permitted by any other clause of this Section; that the aggregate fair value of all assets sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance on this clause (i) shall not exceed $35,000,000 during any fiscal year of the Company;
provided
 
(j) sales, transfers and other dispositions of any real property; and
 
(k) the Permitted Restructuring.
 
that all sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions permitted hereby (other than those permitted by clause (a)(ii), (a)(iii), (b) or (d) above) shall be made for fair value and, in the case of sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions permitted by clauses (c), (f)(ii), (g), (h), (i) and (j) above, for at least 75% cash consideration.
provided
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, other than dispositions to the Company or any Subsidiary in compliance with Section 6.04, and other than directors qualifying shares and other nominal amounts of Equity Interests that are required to be held by other Persons under applicable requirements of law, (a) no such sale, or other disposition of any Equity Interests in any Subsidiary shall be permitted unless (i) such Equity Interests constitute all the Equity Interests in such Subsidiary held by the Company and the Subsidiaries and (ii) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, the Company and the Subsidiaries shall otherwise be in compliance with Section 6.04 and (b) no such sale, transfer or other disposition of any Equity Interests in any Borrowing Subsidiary shall be permitted.
transfer
 
 
SECTION 6.06. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Sale/Leaseback Transaction, except for any such sale of any fixed or capital assets that is made for cash consideration in an amount not less than the cost of such fixed or capital asset and is consummated within 180 days after the Company or a Subsidiary acquires or completes the construction of such fixed or capital assets.
Sale/Leaseback Transactions.
 
SECTION 6.07. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Swap Agreement, other than Swap Agreements entered into in the ordinary course of business to hedge or mitigate risks to which the Company or a Subsidiary is exposed in the conduct of its business or the management of its liabilities and not for speculative purposes.
Swap Agreements.
 
SECTION 6.08. (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, or incur any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to do so, except that (i) the Company may declare and pay dividends with respect to its Equity Interests payable solely in additional Equity Interests (other than Disqualified Stock), (ii) any Subsidiary may declare and pay dividends or make other distributions with respect to its capital stock, partnership or membership interests or other similar Equity Interests, or make other Restricted Payments in respect of its Equity Interests, in each case ratably to the holders of such Equity Interests (or, if not ratably, on a basis more favorable to the Company and the Subsidiaries), (iii) the Company may make Restricted Payments, not exceeding $1,000,000 during any fiscal year of the Company, pursuant to and in accordance with stock option plans or other benefit plans for management or employees of the Company and the Subsidiaries, (iv) the Company may repurchase Equity Interests upon the exercise of stock options if such Equity Interests represent a portion of the exercise price of such options, (v) the Company may make cash payments in lieu of the issuance of fractional shares representing insignificant interests in the Company in connection with the exercise of warrants, options or other securities convertible into or exchangeable for shares of common stock in the Company and (vi) the Company may repurchase shares of its common stock and make other Restricted Payments, that at the time of and immediately after giving effect to any such repurchase or other Restricted Payment referred to in this clause (vi), (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) Availability, determined on a Pro Forma Basis, shall at all times during the period commencing on the 60th day before such Restricted Payment have been and shall on the date of such Restricted Payment be not less than the greater of (x) 20% of the total Revolving Commitments in effect and (y) $60,000,000, and (C) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clause (B) above and confirming that the other requirements of this clause (vi) have been satisfied.
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments of Indebtedness.
provided
 
 
(b) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, make or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) of or in respect of principal of or interest on any Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(xii), or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(xii), except:
 
(i) payments of regularly scheduled interest and principal payments as and when due in respect of any Indebtedness, other than payments in respect of any Subordinated Indebtedness prohibited by the subordination provisions thereof;
 
(ii) refinancings of Indebtedness with the proceeds of other Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01;
 
(iii) payment of secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of (A) any voluntary sale or transfer of any assets securing such Indebtedness or (B) any casualty or condemnation proceeding (including a disposition in lieu thereof) of any assets securing such Indebtedness;
 
(iv) payments of or in respect of Indebtedness solely by issuance of the common stock of the Company;
 
(v) payments of or in respect of Indebtedness incurred by any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party; and
 
(vi) other payments of or in respect of Indebtedness; that at the time of and immediately after giving effect thereto, (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio, computed on a Pro Forma Basis for the most recent period of four fiscal quarters for which financial statements shall have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 shall be not less than 1.15 to 1.00, (C) Availability, determined on a Pro Forma Basis, shall have been and shall be not less than 17.5% of the total Revolving Commitments in effect at all times during the period commencing on the 60th day before such payment and (D) the Company shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent setting forth computations demonstrating compliance with the requirement set forth in clauses(B) and (C) above and confirming that the other requirements of this clause (vi) have been satisfied.
provided
 
 
SECTION 6.09. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease, license or otherwise transfer any assets to, or purchase, lease, license or otherwise acquire any assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) transactions in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than those that would prevail in an arms-length transactions with unrelated third parties, (b) transactions between or among the Loan Parties not involving any other Affiliate, (c) any Restricted Payment permitted by Section 6.08, (d) the payment of reasonable fees and compensation to, and the providing of reasonable indemnities on behalf of, directors and officers of the Company or any Subsidiary, as determined by the board of directors of the Company in good faith, (e) the transactions described on Schedule 6.09 and (f) the Permitted Restructuring.
Transactions with Affiliates.
 
SECTION 6.10. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of the Company or any Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its assets to secure any Secured Obligations or (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to its Equity Interests or to make or repay loans or advances to the Company or any Subsidiary or to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to (A) restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by any Loan Document, (B) restrictions and conditions existing on the Third Restatement Effective Date identified on Schedule 6.10 (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (C) customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary pending such sale, that such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (D) in the case of any Subsidiary that is not a wholly-owned Subsidiary, restrictions and conditions imposed by its organizational documents or any related joint venture or similar agreement, that such restrictions and conditions apply only to such Subsidiary and to any Equity Interests in such Subsidiary and (E) restrictions and conditions imposed by agreements relating to Indebtedness of Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties permitted under Section 6.01(a), that such restrictions and conditions apply only to such Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties, (ii) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to (A) restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01(a)(v) if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the assets securing such Indebtedness and (B) customary provisions in leases and other agreements restricting the assignment thereof and (iii) clause (b) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by agreements relating to Indebtedness of any Subsidiary in existence at the time such Subsidiary became a Subsidiary and otherwise permitted under Section 6.01(a) (but shall apply to any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), that such restrictions and conditions apply only to such Subsidiary. Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to modify the requirements set forth in the definition of the term Guarantee and Collateral Requirement or the obligations of the Loan Parties under Sections 5.03, 5.04 or 5.15 or under the Collateral Documents.
Restrictive Agreements.
provided
provided
provided
provided
provided
 
 
SECTION 6.11. The Company will not, or will permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive any of its rights under its certificate of incorporation, by-laws or other organizational documents, in either case, to the extent such amendment, modification or waiver would be adverse in any material respect to the rights or interests of the Lenders hereunder or under any other Loan Document.
Amendment of Organizational Documents.
 
SECTION 6.12. The Company will not permit the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for any period of four fiscal quarters ending during a Reduced Availability Period to be less than 1.00 to 1.00.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
 
SECTION 6.13. The Company will not change its fiscal year or its method of determining fiscal quarters.
Changes in Fiscal Periods.
 
ARTICLE VII
Events of Default
 
If any of the following events () shall occur:
Events of Default
 
(a) the Borrowers shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
 
(b) the Borrowers shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days;
 
(c) any representation, warranty or certification made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been materially incorrect when made or deemed made;
 
(d) any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 5.02(a), 5.05 (with respect to a Loan Partys existence) or 5.11 or in Article VI;
 
(e) the Loan Parties shall fail to comply with Section 5.01(h), 5.01(i) or 5.08 and any such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days or more, or any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any other covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement or any other Loan Document (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after the earlier of (i) any Loan Partys knowledge of such breach or (ii) notice thereof from the Administrative Agent;
 
 
(f) any Loan Party or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal, interest, termination payment or other payment obligation and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness when and as the same shall become due and payable (after giving effect to any applicable grace period);
 
(g) any event or condition shall occur that results in any Material Indebtedness (other than with respect to the Acquired Company Convertible Notes) becoming due, or being terminated or required to be prepaid, repurchased, redeemed or defeased, prior to its scheduled maturity, or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness (other than with respect to the Acquired Company Convertible Notes) or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf, or, in the case of any Swap Agreement, the applicable counterparty, to cause any Material Indebtedness (other than with respect to the Acquired Company Convertible Notes) to become due, or to terminate or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to (i) any secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the assets securing such Indebtedness or (ii) any Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of a voluntary refinancing thereof permitted under Section 6.01;
provided
 
(h) an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of the Company or any Material Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Material Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
 
(i) the Company or any Material Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation (other than any liquidation permitted by Section 6.03(a)(iv)), reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Material Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding or (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, or the board of directors (or similar governing body) of the Company or any Material Subsidiary (or any committee thereof) shall adopt any resolution or otherwise authorize any action to approve any of the actions referred to above in this clause (i) or clause (h) of this Article;
 
(j) the Company or any Material Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
 
 
(k) one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $50,000,000 (to the extent not covered by independent third-party insurance as to which the insurer has been notified of such judgment and has not denied coverage) shall be rendered against the Company or any Subsidiary, or any combination thereof, and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor to attach or levy upon any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
 
(l) one or more ERISA Events shall have occurred that could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(m) a Change in Control shall occur;
 
(n) the Loan Guarantee shall fail to remain in full force or effect or any action shall be taken to discontinue or to assert the invalidity or unenforceability of the Loan Guarantee, or any Loan Guarantor shall fail to comply in any material respect with any of the terms or provisions of the Loan Guarantee to which it is a party, or any Loan Guarantor shall deny that it has any further liability under the Loan Guarantee to which it is a party, or shall give notice to such effect (except as a result of the release thereof as provided herein); or
 
(o) any Lien purported to be created under any Collateral Document shall cease to be, or shall be asserted by any Loan Party not to be, a valid and perfected Lien on any material Collateral, with the priority required by the applicable Collateral Document, except (i) as a result of the sale or other disposition of the applicable Collateral in a transaction permitted under the Loan Documents, (ii) the release thereof as provided in the applicable Collateral Document or Section 9.02(c) or (iii) as a result of the failure of the Administrative Agent to (A) maintain possession of any stock certificates, promissory notes or other instruments delivered to it under the Restated Security Agreement or (B) continue in accordance with applicable law the effectiveness of any UCC financing statement;
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to any Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower Representative, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Revolving Commitments, and thereupon the Revolving Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, in each case without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers; and in the case of any event with respect to any Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Revolving Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall immediately and automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers to the extent permitted by applicable law.
 
 
ARTICLE VIII
The Administrative Agent
 
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks hereby irrevocably appoints the entity named as Administrative Agent in the heading of this Agreement and its successors to serve as administrative agent and collateral agent under the Loan Documents, and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf, including execution of the other Loan Documents, and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms of the Loan Documents, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. In addition, to the extent required under the laws of any jurisdiction other than the United States of America, each of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks hereby grants to the Administrative Agent any required powers of attorney to execute any Collateral Document governed by the laws of such jurisdiction on such Lenders or Issuing Banks behalf.
 
The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender or Issuing Bank and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, own securities of, act as the financial advisor or in any other advisory capacity for and generally engage in any kind of business with the Company or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder and without any duty to account therefor to the Lenders or the Issuing Banks.
 
 
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth in the Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing (and it is understood and agreed that the use of the term agent herein or in any other Loan Documents (or any other similar term) with reference to the Administrative Agent is not intended to connote any fiduciary or other implied (or express) obligations arising under agency doctrine of any applicable law, and that such term is used as a matter of market custom and is intended to create or reflect only an administrative relationship between contracting parties), (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or to exercise any discretionary power, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise as directed in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary, or as the Administrative Agent shall believe in good faith to be necessary, under the circumstances as provided in the Loan Documents), that the Administrative Agent shall not be required to take any action that, in its opinion, could expose the Administrative Agent to liability or be contrary to any Loan Document or applicable law, and (c) except as expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Company or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary, or as the Administrative Agent shall believe in good faith to be necessary, under the circumstances as provided in the Loan Documents) or in the absence of its own bad faith, gross negligence or wilful misconduct (such absence to be presumed unless otherwise determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and nonappealable judgment). The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof (stating that it is a notice of default) is given to the Administrative Agent by the Borrower Representative or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or in connection with any Loan Document, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth in any Loan Document or the occurrence of any Default, (iv) the sufficiency, validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of any Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, (v) the creation, perfection or priority of Liens on the Collateral or the existence of the Collateral, or (vi) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
provided
 
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely, and shall not incur any liability for relying, upon any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing (including any electronic message, Internet or intranet website posting or other distribution) believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed, sent or otherwise authenticated by the proper Person (whether or not such Person in fact meets the requirements set forth in the Loan Documents for being the signatory, sender or authenticator thereof). The Administrative Agent also shall be entitled to rely, and shall not incur any liability for relying, upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person (whether or not such Person in fact meets the requirements set forth in the Loan Documents for being the signatory, sender or authenticator thereof), and may act upon any such statement prior to receipt of written confirmation thereof. In determining compliance with any condition hereunder to the making of a Loan, or the issuance, extension, renewal or increase of a Letter of Credit, that by its terms must be fulfilled to the satisfaction of a Lender or an Issuing Bank, the Administrative Agent may presume that such condition is satisfactory to such Lender or Issuing Bank unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice to the contrary from such Lender or Issuing Bank prior to the making of such Loan or the issuance of such Letter of Credit. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrowers), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts
 
 
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers hereunder or under any other Loan Document by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all their duties and exercise their rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of this Article shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for the bad faith, negligence or misconduct of any sub-agents except to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction determines in a final and nonappealable judgment that the Administrative Agent acted with bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct in the selection of such sub-agents.
 
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Borrower Representative. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Borrowers, to appoint a successor that is an Eligible Successor Agent. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, in consultation with the Borrower Representative, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which is an Eligible Successor Agent, until such time, if any, as the Required Lenders appoint a successor Administrative Agent. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. The fees payable by the Borrowers to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrowers and such successor. After the Administrative Agents resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article, Section 2.17(d) and Section 9.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
 
Each Lender and Issuing Bank acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, any Lender or any Issuing Bank, or any of the Related Parties of any of the foregoing, and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender and Issuing Bank also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, any Lender or any Issuing Bank, or any of the Related Parties of any of the foregoing, and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
 
 
The Loan Parties acknowledge and agree that the Administrative Agent may prepare and distribute to the Lenders Reports containing information obtained by the Administrative Agent through the conduct of appraisals and field examinations pursuant to Sections 5.12 and 5.13 and the exercise of its inspection rights under Section 5.09. Each Lender hereby agrees that (a) it has requested a copy of each Report prepared by or on behalf of the Administrative Agent; (b) the Administrative Agent (i) makes no representation or warranty, express or implied, as to the completeness or accuracy of any Report or any of the information contained therein or any inaccuracy or omission contained in or relating to a Report and (ii) shall not be liable for any information contained in any Report; (c) the Reports are not comprehensive audits or examinations, and that any Person performing any field examination will inspect only specific information regarding the Loan Parties and will rely significantly upon the Loan Parties books and records, as well as on representations of the Loan Parties personnel and that the Administrative Agent undertakes no obligation to update, correct or supplement the Reports; (d) it will keep all Reports confidential and strictly for its internal use, not share the Report with any Loan Party or any other Person except as otherwise permitted pursuant to this Agreement; and (e) without limiting the generality of any other indemnification provision contained in this Agreement, it will pay and protect, and indemnify, defend, and hold the Administrative Agent and any such other Person preparing a Report harmless from and against, the claims, actions, proceedings, damages, costs, expenses, and other amounts (including reasonable attorney fees) incurred by as the direct or indirect result of any third parties who might obtain all or part of any Report through the indemnifying Lender.
 
The provisions of this Article are solely for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, and, except solely to the extent of the Borrowers rights to consent pursuant to and subject to the conditions set forth in this Article, none of the Borrowers or any other Loan Party shall have any rights as a third party beneficiary of any such provisions. Each Lender Party, whether or not a party hereto, will be deemed, by its acceptance of the benefits of the Collateral and of the Loan Guarantee provided under the Loan Documents, to have agreed to the provisions of this Article.
 
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, neither the Arrangers nor any Person named on the cover page of this Agreement as a Syndication Agent or a Documentation Agent shall have any duties or obligations under this Agreement or any other Loan Document (except in its capacity, as applicable, as a Lender or an Issuing Bank), but all such Persons shall have the benefit of the indemnities provided for hereunder.
 
 
ARTICLE IX
Miscellaneous
 
SECTION 9.01. (a) Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) of this Section), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by facsimile, as follows:
Notices.
 
(i)  if to any Loan Party, to the Borrower Representative at:
 
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
Attention: Mr. Dirk Montgomery, Chief Financial Officer
Facsimile No: (845) 369-4625
 
(ii)  if to the Administrative Agent, JPMCB in its capacity as an Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. at:
 
270 Park Avenue, 44th Floor
Mail Code: NY1-K855
New York, New York 10017
Attention: Donna DiForio
Facsimile No: (646) 534-2274
 
With a copy to:
 
10 South Dearborn, Floor 22
Chicago, IL 60603-2300
Attention: Justin Anderson
Facsimile No: (312) 732-7583
 
(iii)  if to any other Issuing Bank, to it at its address or facsimile number most recently specified by it in a notice delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower Representative; and
 
(iv)  if to any other Lender, to it at its address or facsimile number set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
 
All such notices and other communications (i) sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received, (ii) sent by facsimile shall be deemed to have been given when sent (or, if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient) and (iii) delivered through electronic communications to the extent provided in paragraph (b) of this Section shall be effective as provided in such paragraph.
 
 
(b) Notices and other communications to the Lenders and Issuing Banks hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications (including e-mail and internet or intranet websites) pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices under Article II to any Lender or Issuing Bank if such Lender or Issuing Bank, as applicable, has notified the Administrative Agent that it is incapable of receiving notices under such Article by electronic communication. The Administrative Agent or the Borrower Representative (on behalf of the Loan Parties) may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications. All such notices and other communications (i) sent to an e-mail address shall be deemed received upon the senders receipt of an acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by return e-mail or other written acknowledgement), that if not given during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient, and (ii) posted to an Internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its e-mail address as described in the foregoing clause (b)(i) of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor.
provided
provided
provided
 
(c) Any party hereto may change its address or facsimile number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.
 
(d) The Loan Parties agree that the Administrative Agent may, but shall not be obligated to, make any Communication by posting such Communication on Debt Domain, Intralinks, Syndtrak or a similar electronic transmission system (the ). The Platform is provided as is and as available. Neither the Administrative Agent nor any its Related Parties warrants, or shall be deemed to warrant, the adequacy of the Platform and expressly disclaim liability for errors or omissions in the Communications. No warranty of any kind, express, implied or statutory, including any warranty of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, non-infringement of third-party rights or freedom from viruses or other code defects, is made, or shall be deemed to be made, by the Administrative Agent or any of its Related Parties in connection with the Communications or the Platform.
Platform
 
SECTION 9.02. (a) No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders hereunder and under any other Loan Document are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by any Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Bank may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
Waivers; Amendments.
 
 
(b) Except as provided in Sections 2.09(e), 5.16 and 9.02(e), and except for the execution and delivery of the Joinder Agreements, none of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any provision hereof or thereof may be waived, amended or modified except (i) in the case of this Agreement, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Borrowers and the Required Lenders or (ii) in the case of any other Loan Document, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, with the consent of the Required Lenders; that (A) any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document may be amended by an agreement in writing entered into by the Company and the Administrative Agent to cure any ambiguity, omission, defect or inconsistency so long as, in each case, (1) such amendment does not adversely affect the rights of any Lender or (2) the Lenders shall have received at least five Business Days prior written notice thereof and the Administrative Agent shall not have received, within five Business Days of the date of such notice to the Lenders, a written notice from the Required Lenders stating that the Required Lenders object to such amendment and (B) no such agreement shall (1) increase the Revolving Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender ( that the Administrative Agent may make Protective Advances and Overadvances as set forth in Section 2.04 or 2.05, as applicable), (2) reduce or forgive the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce or forgive any interest or fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby, (3) postpone any scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any date for the payment of any interest, fees or other Obligations payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Revolving Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender directly affected thereby, (4) change Section 2.18(b) or 2.18(d) in a manner that would alter the manner in which payments are shared, without the written consent of each Lender, (5) increase the advance rates set forth in the definition of Borrowing Base or add new categories of eligible assets, without the written consent of each Lender, (6) change any of the provisions of this Section or the percentage set forth in the definition of the term Required Lenders or any other provision of any Loan Document specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights thereunder or make any determination or grant any consent thereunder, without the written consent of each Lender, (7) change Section 2.20 without the consent of each Lender (other than any Defaulting Lender), (8) release any Loan Guarantor from its obligation under its Loan Guarantee (except as otherwise permitted herein or in the other Loan Documents), without the written consent of each Lender, or (9) except as provided in paragraph (c) of this Section or in any Collateral Document, release Collateral having an aggregate value in excess of $20,000,000 without the written consent of each Lender; further that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender hereunder or under any other Loan Document without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be (it being understood that any change to Section 2.20 shall require the consent of the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Banks). Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, this Agreement may be amended without any additional consents to provide for increased Revolving Commitments in the manner contemplated by Section 2.09. The Administrative Agent may also amend Schedule 2.01 to reflect increases in the Revolving Commitments in the manner contemplated by Section 2.09 or assignments entered into pursuant to Section 9.04.
provided
provided
provided
 
 
(c) The Lenders and the Issuing Banks hereby irrevocably authorize the Administrative Agent, at its option and in its sole discretion, (i) to release any Liens granted to the Administrative Agent by the Loan Parties on any Collateral (A) upon the termination of all the Revolving Commitments, payment and satisfaction in full in cash of all Secured Obligations (other than Unliquidated Obligations) and the cash collateralization of all Unliquidated Obligations in a manner satisfactory to each affected Lender, (B) constituting property being sold or disposed of if the Loan Party disposing of such property certifies to the Administrative Agent that the sale or disposition is made in compliance with the terms of this Agreement (and the Administrative Agent may rely conclusively on any such certificate, without further inquiry), and to the extent that the property being sold or disposed of constitutes 100% of the Equity Interest of a Subsidiary, the Administrative Agent is authorized to release any Loan Guarantee provided by such Subsidiary, (C) constituting property leased to a Loan Party under a lease which has expired or been terminated in a transaction not prohibited under this Agreement and (D) as required to effect any sale or other disposition of such Collateral in connection with any exercise of remedies of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to Article VII and (ii) to release any Loan Guarantee provided by any Subsidiary that may be dissolved pursuant to Section 6.03(a)(iv) in connection with a voluntary liquidation or dissolution thereof permitted by such Section and, in connection therewith, to release any Liens granted to the Administrative Agent by such Subsidiary on any Collateral, if the Company certifies to the Administrative Agent that such liquidation or dissolution is made in compliance with the terms of this Agreement (and the Administrative Agent may rely conclusively on any such certificate, without further inquiry). Except as provided above and in paragraphs (b) and (e) of this Section, the Administrative Agent will not release any Liens on Collateral without the prior written authorization of the Required Lenders; that, the Administrative Agent may in its discretion, release its Liens on Collateral valued in the aggregate not in excess of $10,000,000 during any calendar year without the prior written authorization of the Required Lenders. Any such release shall not in any manner discharge, affect, or impair the Obligations or any Liens (other than those expressly being released) upon (or obligations of the Loan Parties in respect of) all interests retained by the Loan Parties, including the proceeds of any sale, all of which shall continue to constitute part of the Collateral.
provided
 
 
(d) If, in connection with any proposed amendment, waiver or consent requiring the consent of each Lender or each Lender affected thereby, the consents of Lenders having Credit Exposure and unused Revolving Commitments representing more than 66% of the sum of the total Credit Exposure and unused Revolving Commitments at such time are obtained, but the consents of other necessary Lenders are not obtained (any such Lender whose consent is necessary but not obtained being referred to herein as a ), then the Borrower Representative may elect to replace any Non-Consenting Lender as a Lender party to this Agreement; that, concurrently with such replacement, (i) an Eligible Assignee which is reasonably satisfactory to the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent shall agree, as of such date, to purchase for cash the Loans and other Obligations due to the Non-Consenting Lender pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption and to become a Lender for all purposes under this Agreement and to assume all obligations of the Non-Consenting Lender to be terminated as of such date and to comply with the requirements of paragraph (b) of Section 9.04, and (ii) the Borrowers shall pay to such Non-Consenting Lender in same day funds on the day of such replacement (A) all interest, fees and other amounts then accrued but unpaid to such Non-Consenting Lender by the Borrowers hereunder to and including the date of termination, including without limitation payments due to such Non-Consenting Lender under Sections 2.15 and 2.17, and (B) an amount, if any, equal to the payment which would have been due to such Lender on the day of such replacement under Section 2.16 had the Loans of such Non-Consenting Lender been prepaid on such date rather than sold to the replacement Lender.
Non-Consenting Lender
provided
 
(e) Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Administrative Agent may, without the consent of any Lender Party, consent to a departure by any Loan Party from any covenant of such Loan Party set forth in this Agreement or in any Collateral Document to the extent such departure is consistent with the authority of the Administrative Agent set forth in the definition of the term Collateral and Guarantee Requirement.
 
SECTION 9.03. (a) The Borrowers shall pay (i) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers and their respective Affiliates, including the reasonable and documented fees, charges and disbursements of one primary counsel for the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers and their Affiliates, and if deemed necessary by the Administrative Agent, one local counsel in each applicable jurisdiction, in connection with the syndication and distribution (including, without limitation, via the internet or through a service such as Intralinks) of the credit facility provided for herein, the preparation and administration of the Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions of the Loan Documents (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by each Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement, collection or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit. Subject to the provisions of Sections 5.09, 5.12 and 5.13, expenses subject to reimbursement by the Borrowers under this Section include, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with:
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.
 
 
(i) appraisals and insurance reviews;
 
(ii) field examinations and the preparation of Reports based on the fees charged by a third party retained by the Administrative Agent or the internally allocated fees for each Person employed by the Administrative Agent with respect to each field examination;
 
(iii) taxes, fees and other charges for (A) lien searches and (B) filing financing statements and continuations, and other actions to perfect, protect, and continue the Administrative Agents Liens;
 
(iv) sums paid or incurred to take any action required of any Loan Party under the Loan Documents that such Loan Party fails to pay or take; and
 
(v) forwarding loan proceeds, collecting checks and other items of payment, and establishing and maintaining the accounts and lock boxes, and costs and expenses of preserving and protecting the Collateral.
 
All of the foregoing costs and expenses may be charged to the Borrowers as Revolving Loans or to another deposit account, all as described in Section 2.18(c).
 
(b) The Borrowers agree, jointly and severally, to indemnify the Administrative Agent (or any sub-agent thereof), the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, each Issuing Bank and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an ), against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, penalties, incremental taxes, liabilities and related expenses, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the syndication of the credit facility provided for herein and the execution or delivery of the Loan Documents or any agreement or instrument contemplated thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by an Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or Release of Hazardous Materials on at, to or from any property owned or operated by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or any other Environmental Liability related in any way to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether such proceeding is initiated against or by any party to this Agreement, or any Affiliate thereof, by an Indemnitee or any third party or whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, penalties, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and non-appealable judgment to have resulted from the bad faith, gross negligence or wilful misconduct of such Indemnitee. This Section shall not apply to any Taxes (other than any Taxes that represent losses, claims, damages or related expenses arising from any non-Tax claim).
Indemnitee
provided
 
 
(c) To the extent the Borrowers fail to pay any amount required to be paid by them to the Administrative Agent (or any sub-agent thereof), any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, or any Related Party of any of the foregoing, under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank, Swingline Lender or such Related Party, as the case may be, such Lenders Applicable Percentage (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, penalty, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent (or such sub-agent), such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such, or against any Related Party of any of the foregoing acting for the Administrative Agent (or any such sub-agent), any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in connection with such capacity.
provided
 
(d) To the extent permitted by applicable law, no Loan Party shall assert, and each hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee (i) for any damages arising from the use by others of information or other materials obtained through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems (including the Internet) or (ii) on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any other Loan Document, or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
 
(e) All amounts due under this Section shall be payable not later than 10 days after written demand therefor.
 
SECTION 9.04. (a) The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of any Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) the Borrowers may not assign or otherwise transfer any of their rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by a Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of any Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section), the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the sub-agents of the Administrative Agent and the Related Parties of any of the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns.
 
 
(b) (i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Revolving Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
(A) the Borrower Representative; that no consent of the Borrower Representative shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee;
provided
 
(B) the Administrative Agent;
 
(C) the Swingline Lender; that if the Swingline Lender has not provided written notice of its objection to any proposed assignment within three Business Days of its receipt thereof from the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender shall be deemed to have consented to such proposed assignment; and
provided
 
(D) each Issuing Bank; that if any Issuing Bank has not provided written notice of its objection to any proposed assignment within three Business Days of its receipt thereof from the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have consented to such proposed assignment.
provided
 
(ii) Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
 
(A) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lenders Revolving Commitment or Loans, the amount of the Revolving Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent; that no such consent of the Borrower Representative shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
provided
 
(B) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement;
 
 
(C) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500; and
 
(D) the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire in which the assignee designates one or more credit contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain material non-public information about the Company, the Subsidiaries and other Affiliates thereof or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the assignees compliance procedures and applicable law, including Federal, State and foreign securities laws.
 
(iii)  Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
 
(iv)  The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as non-fiduciary agent of the Borrowers, shall maintain at one of its offices a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and records of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Revolving Commitment of, and principal amount (and stated interest) of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrowers, any Issuing Bank and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
 
 
(v)  Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignees completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register; that if either the assigning Lender or the assignee shall have failed to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.05, 2.06(d) or (e), 2.07(b), 2.17(d) or 9.03(c), the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information therein in the Register unless and until such payment shall have been made in full, together with all accrued interest thereon. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
provided
 
(c) (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Swingline Lender, sell participations to one or more Eligible Assignees () in all or a portion of such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Revolving Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lenders obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lenders rights and obligations under the Loan Documents. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce the Loan Documents and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of the Loan Documents; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.02(b) that affects such Participant or requires the approval of all the Lenders. Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrowers agree that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16 and 2.17 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender; that such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.18(d) as though it were a Lender.
Participants
provided
provided
provided
 
 
(ii) A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.15 or 2.17 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower Representatives prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 2.17 unless the Borrower Representative is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrowers, to comply with Section 2.17(f) as though it were a Lender. Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as a non-fiduciary agent of the Borrowers, maintain records of the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each participants interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement (the ); that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of the Participant Register (including the identity of any Participant or any information relating to a Participants interest in any Revolving Commitments or Revolving Loans or its other obligations under this Agreement or any other Loan Document) to any Person except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that such Revolving Commitment or Revolving Loan or other obligation is in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations. The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary. For the avoidance of doubt, the Administrative Agent (in its capacity as Administrative Agent) shall have no responsibility for maintaining a Participant Register.
Participant Register
provided
 
(d) Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
 
SECTION 9.05. All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, any Arranger, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any Loan Document is executed and delivered or any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any LC Exposure is outstanding and so long as the Revolving Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Revolving Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Survival.
 
 
SECTION 9.06. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. This Agreement shall become effective as provided in the Third Restatement Agreement and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective permitted successors and assigns. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic imaging shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness.
 
SECTION 9.07. Any provision of any Loan Document held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions thereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability.
 
SECTION 9.08. If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Borrower or any Loan Guarantor against any of and all the Secured Obligations held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under the Loan Documents and although such obligations may be unmatured. The applicable Lender shall notify the Borrower Representative and the Administrative Agent of such set-off or application; that any failure to give or any delay in giving such notice shall not affect the validity of any such set-off or application under this Section. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff.
provided
 
SECTION 9.09. (a)
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
The Loan Documents (other than those containing a contrary express choice of law provision) shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York, but giving effect to federal laws applicable to national banks.
 
(b) Each party hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each Loan Party hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document brought by it or any of its Affiliates shall be brought, and shall be heard and determined, exclusively in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each party hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against any Loan Party or any of its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
 
(c) Each Loan Party hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
(d) Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
SECTION 9.10. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
 
SECTION 9.11. Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings.
 
 
SECTION 9.12. Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below) with the same degree of care that it uses to protect its own confidential information, but in no event less than a commercially reasonable degree of care, except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its Related Parties, including accountants, legal counsel and other agents and advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent required or requested by any regulatory authority purporting to have jurisdiction over such Person or its Related Parties (including any self-regulatory authority, such as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners), (c) to the extent required by applicable law or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies under this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing confidentiality undertakings substantially similar to those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its Related Parties) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Company or any Subsidiary or its obligations, (g) on a confidential basis to any rating agency in connection with rating the Company or the Subsidiaries or the credit facilities provided for herein, (h) with the consent of the Company, or (i) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing, on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrowers; that, in the case of clause (c) above, the party disclosing such information shall provide to the Company prior written notice of such disclosure to the extent permitted by applicable law (and to the extent commercially feasible under the circumstances) and shall cooperate with the Company, at the Companys sole expense, in obtaining a protective order for, or other confidential treatment of, such disclosure, in each case at the Companys sole expense. For the purposes of this Section,  means all information received from the Borrowers relating to the Company or any Subsidiary or their businesses or the Collateral, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, or any Affiliate of any of the foregoing, on a non-confidential basis prior to disclosure by the Borrowers; that, in the case of information received from the Borrowers after the Third Restatement Effective Date, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential.
Confidentiality.
provided
Information
provided
 
EACH LENDER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 9.12 FURNISHED TO IT PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE COMPANY, THE SUBSIDIARIES AND ITS OTHER AFFILIATES AND THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES, AND CONFIRMS THAT IT HAS DEVELOPED COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES REGARDING THE USE OF MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION AND THAT IT WILL HANDLE SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
 
ALL INFORMATION, INCLUDING REQUESTS FOR WAIVERS AND AMENDMENTS, FURNISHED BY THE BORROWERS OR THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT PURSUANT TO, OR IN THE COURSE OF ADMINISTERING, THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE SYNDICATE-LEVEL INFORMATION, WHICH MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE COMPANY, THE SUBSIDIARIES AND ITS OTHER AFFILIATES AND THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES. ACCORDINGLY, EACH LENDER REPRESENTS TO THE BORROWERS AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT THAT IT HAS IDENTIFIED IN ITS ADMINISTRATIVE QUESTIONNAIRE A CREDIT CONTACT WHO MAY RECEIVE INFORMATION THAT MAY CONTAIN SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
SECTION 9.13. The respective obligations of the Lenders hereunder are several and not joint and the failure of any Lender to make any Loan or perform any of its obligations hereunder shall not relieve any other Lender from any of its obligations hereunder. Anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, neither any Issuing Bank nor any Lender shall be obligated to extend credit to the Borrowers in violation of applicable law.
Several Obligations; Nonreliance; Violation of Law.
 
SECTION 9.14. Each Lender that is subject to the requirements of the Patriot Act hereby notifies the Borrowers and the Loan Guarantors that pursuant to the requirements of the Patriot Act, it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrowers and the Loan Guarantors, which information includes the names and addresses of the Borrowers and the Loan Guarantors and other information that will allow such Lender to identify the Borrowers and the Loan Guarantors in accordance with the Patriot Act.
USA PATRIOT Act.
 
SECTION 9.15. Each Lender hereby appoints each other Lender as its agent for the purpose of perfecting Liens, for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, in assets which, in accordance with Article 9 of the UCC or any other applicable law can be perfected only by possession. Should any Lender (other than the Administrative Agent) obtain possession of any such Collateral, such Lender shall notify the Administrative Agent thereof, and, promptly upon the Administrative Agents request therefor shall deliver such Collateral to the Administrative Agent or otherwise deal with such Collateral in accordance with the Administrative Agents instructions.
Appointment for Perfection.
 
SECTION 9.16. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan, together with all fees, charges and other amounts that are treated as interest on such Loan under applicable law (collectively the ), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the ) which may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding such Loan in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan hereunder, together with all Charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and Charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated and the interest and Charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
Interest Rate Limitation.
Charges
Maximum Rate
 
 
SECTION 9.17. Each Loan Party, on behalf of itself and its subsidiaries, agrees that in connection with all aspects of the transactions contemplated hereby and any communications in connection therewith, the Company, the Subsidiaries and its other Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and their Affiliates, on the other hand, will have a business relationship that does not create, by implication or otherwise, any fiduciary duty on the part of the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks or their Affiliates, and no such duty will be deemed to have arisen in connection with any such transactions or communications. The Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and their Affiliates may be engaged, for their own accounts or the accounts of customers, in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company, the Subsidiaries and its other Affiliates, and none of the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks or their Affiliates has any obligation to disclose any of such interests to the Company, the Subsidiaries or its other Affiliates. To the fullest extent permitted by law, each Loan Party hereby waives and releases any claims that it or any of its Affiliates may have against the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Syndication Agent, the Documentation Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and their Affiliates with respect to any breach or alleged breach of agency or fiduciary duty in connection with any aspect of any transaction contemplated hereby.
No Fiduciary Relationship.
 
SECTION 9.18. [Reserved]
 
SECTION 9.19. (a) Each Loan Party irrevocably and unconditionally undertakes to pay to the Administrative Agent amounts equal to, and in the currency or currencies of, its Corresponding Debt.
Dutch Parallel Debt.
 
(b) The Parallel Debt of each Loan Party:
 
shall become due and payable at the same time as its Corresponding Debt; and
(i)
 
is independent and separate from, and without prejudice to, its Corresponding Debt.
(ii)
 
(c) For purposes of this Section, the Administrative Agent:
 
is the independent and separate creditor of each Parallel Debt;
(i)
 
acts in its own name and not as agent, representative or trustee of the Lender Parties and its claims in respect of each Parallel Debt shall not be held in trust; and
(ii)
 
 
shall have the independent and separate right to demand payment of each Parallel Debt in its own name (including, without limitation, through any suit, execution, enforcement of security, recovery of guarantees and applications for and voting in any kind of insolvency proceeding in accordance with the Loan Documents).
(iii)
 
(d) The Parallel Debt of a Loan Party shall be (i) decreased to the extent that its Corresponding Debt has been irrevocably and unconditionally paid or discharged and (ii) increased to the extent to that its Corresponding Debt has increased, and the Corresponding Debt of a Loan Party shall be (x) decreased to the extent that its Parallel Debt has been irrevocably and unconditionally paid or discharged and (y) increased to the extent that its Parallel Debt has increased, in each case that the Parallel Debt of a Loan Party shall never exceed its Corresponding Debt.
provided
 
(e) All amounts received or recovered by the Administrative Agent in connection with this Section, to the extent permitted by applicable law, shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.18.
 
(f) This Section applies solely for the purpose of determining the secured obligations in the Collateral Documents governed by Dutch law.
 
SECTION 9.20. . In connection with the Permitted Restructuring, the Administrative Agent is authorized to release the pledge of the Equity Interests of Kirkstone currently held by it.
Permitted Restructuring
 
ARTICLE X
Loan Guarantee
 
SECTION 10.01. Each Loan Guarantor hereby agrees that it is jointly and severally liable for, and absolutely, irrevocably and unconditionally guarantees to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the other Lender Parties the prompt payment and performance when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, and at all times thereafter, of the Secured Obligations and all reasonable costs and expenses including, without limitation, all court costs and attorneys and paralegals fees and expenses paid or incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders in endeavoring to collect all or any part of the Secured Obligations from, or in prosecuting any action against, any Borrower, any Loan Guarantor or any other guarantor of all or any part of the Secured Obligations (such costs and expenses, together with the Secured Obligations, being collectively called the ); provided, that . Each Loan Guarantor further agrees that the Guaranteed Obligations may be extended or renewed in whole or in part without notice to or further assent from it, and that it remains bound upon its guarantee notwithstanding any such extension or renewal. All terms of this Loan Guarantee apply to and may be enforced by or on behalf of any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of any Lender that extended any portion of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Guarantee.
Guaranteed Obligations
the guarantee of any Subsidiary Loan Party will not apply to any Swap Obligation if and to the extent that it would be unlawful for such Subsidiary Loan Party to guarantee such Swap Obligation under the Commodity Exchange Act or any rule, regulation or order of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (or the application or official interpretation of any thereof) by virtue of such Subsidiary Loan Partys failure for any reason (and after giving effect to the guarantees by the other Guarantors of the Obligations of such Subsidiary Loan Party) to constitute an eligible contract participant as defined in the Commodity Exchange Act at the time the Guarantee of such Subsidiary Loan Party becomes effective with respect to such Swap Obligation
 
 
SECTION 10.02. This Loan Guarantee is a Guarantee of payment and not of collection. Each Loan Guarantor waives any right to require the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any other Lender Party to sue any Borrower, any other Loan Guarantor, any other guarantor, or any other Person obligated for all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations (each, an ), or to enforce its rights against any collateral securing all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Guarantee of Payment.
Obligated Party
 
SECTION 10.03. (a) Except as otherwise provided for herein, the obligations of each Loan Guarantor hereunder are unconditional and absolute and not subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination for any reason (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations), including: (i) any claim of waiver, release, extension, renewal, settlement, surrender, alteration, or compromise of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, by operation of law or otherwise; (ii) any change in the corporate existence, structure or ownership of any Borrower or any other guarantor of or other Person liable for any of the Guaranteed Obligations; (iii) any insolvency, bankruptcy, reorganization or other similar proceeding affecting any Obligated Party or its assets or any resulting release or discharge of any obligation of any Obligated Party; or (iv) the existence of any claim, setoff or other right which any Loan Guarantor may have at any time against any Obligated Party, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender, or any other Person, whether in connection herewith or in any unrelated transaction.
No Discharge or Diminishment of Loan Guarantee.
 
(b) The obligations of each Loan Guarantor hereunder are not subject to any defense or setoff, counterclaim, recoupment, or termination whatsoever by reason of the invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any of the Guaranteed Obligations or otherwise, or any provision of applicable law or regulation purporting to prohibit payment by any Obligated Party, of the Guaranteed Obligations or any part thereof.
 
 
(c) Further, the obligations of any Loan Guarantor hereunder are not discharged or impaired or otherwise affected by: (i) the failure of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any other Lender Party to assert any claim or demand or to enforce any remedy with respect to all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations; (ii) any waiver or modification of or supplement to any provision of any agreement relating to the Guaranteed Obligations; (iii) any release, non-perfection or invalidity of any indirect or direct security for the obligations of any Borrower for all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations or any obligations of any other guarantor of or other Person liable for any of the Guaranteed Obligations; (iv) any action or failure to act by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any other Lender Party with respect to any collateral securing any part of the Guaranteed Obligations; or (v) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the payment or performance of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, or any other circumstance, act, omission or delay that might in any manner or to any extent vary the risk of such Loan Guarantor or that would otherwise operate as a discharge of any Loan Guarantor as a matter of law or equity (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations).
 
SECTION 10.04. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Loan Guarantor hereby waives any defense based on or arising out of any defense of any Borrower or any Loan Guarantor or the unenforceability of all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations from any cause, or the cessation from any cause of the liability of any Borrower or any Loan Guarantor, other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Loan Guarantor irrevocably waives acceptance hereof, presentment, demand, protest and, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any notice not provided for herein, as well as any requirement that at any time any action be taken by any Person against any Obligated Party or any other Person. Each Loan Guarantor confirms that it is not a surety under any state law and shall not raise any such law as a defense to its obligations hereunder. The Administrative Agent may, at its election, foreclose on any Collateral held by it by one or more judicial or nonjudicial sales, accept an assignment of any such Collateral in lieu of foreclosure or otherwise act or fail to act with respect to any collateral securing all or a part of the Guaranteed Obligations, compromise or adjust any part of the Guaranteed Obligations, make any other accommodation with any Obligated Party or exercise any other right or remedy available to it against any Obligated Party, without affecting or impairing in any way the liability of such Loan Guarantor under this Loan Guarantee except to the extent the Guaranteed Obligations have been fully and indefeasibly paid in cash. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Loan Guarantor waives any defense arising out of any such election even though that election may operate, pursuant to applicable law, to impair or extinguish any right of reimbursement or subrogation or other right or remedy of any Loan Guarantor against any Obligated Party or any security.
Defenses Waived.
 
SECTION 10.05. No Loan Guarantor will assert any right, claim or cause of action, including, without limitation, a claim of subrogation, contribution or indemnification that it has against any Obligated Party, or any Collateral, until the Loan Parties and the Loan Guarantors have fully performed all their obligations to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders and the other Lender Parties.
Rights of Subrogation.
 
SECTION 10.06. If at any time any payment of any portion of the Guaranteed Obligations is rescinded or must otherwise be restored or returned upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of any Borrower or otherwise, each Loan Guarantors obligations under this Loan Guarantee with respect to that payment shall be reinstated at such time as though the payment had not been made and whether or not the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders or the other Lender Parties are in possession of this Loan Guarantee. If acceleration of the time for payment of any of the Guaranteed Obligations is stayed upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of any Borrower, all such amounts otherwise subject to acceleration under the terms of any agreement relating to the Guaranteed Obligations shall nonetheless be payable by the Loan Guarantors forthwith on demand by the Administrative Agent.
Reinstatement; Stay of Acceleration.
 
 
SECTION 10.07. Each Loan Guarantor assumes all responsibility for being and keeping itself informed of the Borrowers financial condition and assets, and of all other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of the Guaranteed Obligations and the nature, scope and extent of the risks that each Loan Guarantor assumes and incurs under this Loan Guarantee, and agrees that none of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender shall have any duty to advise any Loan Guarantor of information known to it regarding those circumstances or risks.
Information.
 
SECTION 10.08. The provisions of Section 2.17 shall apply to all payments by the Loan Guarantors of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Taxes.
mutatis
mutandis
 
SECTION 10.09. The provisions of this Loan Guarantee are severable, and in any action or proceeding involving any state corporate law, or any state, federal or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or other law affecting the rights of creditors generally, if the obligations of any Loan Guarantor under this Loan Guarantee would otherwise be held or determined to be avoidable, invalid or unenforceable on account of the amount of such Loan Guarantors liability under this Loan Guarantee, then, notwithstanding any other provision of this Loan Guarantee to the contrary, the amount of such liability shall, without any further action by the Loan Guarantors or the Lenders, be automatically limited and reduced to the highest amount that is valid and enforceable as determined in such action or proceeding (such highest amount determined hereunder being the relevant Loan Guarantors ). This Section with respect to the Maximum Liability of each Loan Guarantor is intended solely to preserve the rights of the Lenders to the maximum extent not subject to avoidance under applicable law, and no Loan Guarantor nor any other Person or entity shall have any right or claim under this Section with respect to such Maximum Liability, except to the extent necessary so that the obligations of any Loan Guarantor hereunder shall not be rendered voidable under applicable law. Each Loan Guarantor agrees that the Guaranteed Obligations may at any time and from time to time exceed the Maximum Liability of each Loan Guarantor without impairing this Loan Guarantee or affecting the rights and remedies of the Lenders hereunder; that nothing in this sentence shall be construed to increase any Loan Guarantors obligations hereunder beyond its Maximum Liability.
Maximum Liability.
Maximum Liability
provided
 
 
SECTION 10.10. In the event any Loan Guarantor (a ) shall make any payment or payments under this Loan Guarantee or shall suffer any loss as a result of any realization upon any collateral granted by it to secure its obligations under this Loan Guarantee, each other Loan Guarantor (each a ) shall contribute to such Paying Guarantor an amount equal to such Non-Paying Guarantors Applicable Share of such payment or payments made, or losses suffered, by such Paying Guarantor. For purposes of this Section, each Non-Paying Guarantors  with respect to any such payment or loss by a Paying Guarantor shall be determined as of the date on which such payment or loss was made by reference to the ratio of (a) such Non-Paying Guarantors Maximum Liability as of such date (without giving effect to any right to receive, or obligation to make, any contribution hereunder) or, if such Non-Paying Guarantors Maximum Liability has not been determined, the aggregate amount of all monies received by such Non-Paying Guarantor from the Borrowers after the Original Effective Date (whether by loan, capital infusion or by other means) to (b) the aggregate Maximum Liability of all Loan Guarantors hereunder (including such Paying Guarantor) as of such date (without giving effect to any right to receive, or obligation to make, any contribution hereunder), or to the extent that a Maximum Liability has not been determined for any Loan Guarantor, the aggregate amount of all monies received by such Loan Guarantors from the Borrowers after the Original Effective Date (whether by loan, capital infusion or by other means). Nothing in this provision shall affect any Loan Guarantors several liability for the entire amount of the Guaranteed Obligations (up to such Loan Guarantors Maximum Liability). Each of the Loan Guarantors covenants and agrees that its right to receive any contribution under this Loan Guarantee from a Non-Paying Guarantor shall be subordinate and junior in right of payment to the payment in full in cash of the Guaranteed Obligations. This provision is for the benefit of both the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders and the Loan Guarantors and may be enforced by any one, or more, or all of them in accordance with the terms hereof.
Contribution.
Paying Guarantor
Non-Paying Guarantor
Applicable Share
 
SECTION 10.11. . The liability of each Loan Party as a Loan Guarantor under this Article X is in addition to and shall be cumulative with all other liabilities of each Loan Party to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents to which such Loan Party is a party or in respect of any obligations or liabilities of the other Loan Parties, without any limitation as to amount, unless the instrument or agreement evidencing or creating such other liability specifically provides to the contrary.
Liability Cumulative
 
ARTICLE XI
The Borrower Representative
 
SECTION 11.01. The Company is hereby appointed by each of the Borrowers as its contractual representative (herein referred to as the ) hereunder and under each other Loan Document, and each of the Borrowers irrevocably authorizes the Borrower Representative to act as the contractual representative of such Borrower with the rights and duties expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents. The Borrower Representative agrees to act as such contractual representative upon the express conditions contained in this Article XI. Additionally, the Borrowers hereby appoint the Borrower Representative as their agent to receive all of the proceeds of the Loans in the Funding Account(s), at which time the Borrower Representative shall promptly disburse such Loans to the appropriate Borrower. The Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders, and their respective Related Parties, shall not be liable to the Borrower Representative or any Borrower for any action taken or omitted to be taken by the Borrower Representative or the Borrowers pursuant to this Section.
Appointment; Nature of Relationship.
Borrower Representative
 
 
SECTION 11.02. The Borrower Representative shall have and may exercise such powers under the Loan Documents as are specifically delegated to the Borrower Representative by the terms of each thereof, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. The Borrower Representative shall have no implied duties to the Borrowers, or any obligation to the Lenders to take any action thereunder except any action specifically provided by the Loan Documents to be taken by the Borrower Representative.
Powers.
 
SECTION 11.03. The Borrower Representative may execute any of its duties as the Borrower Representative hereunder and under any other Loan Document by or through authorized officers.
Employment of Agents.
 
SECTION 11.04. Each Borrower shall immediately notify the Borrower Representative of the occurrence of any Default hereunder referring to this Agreement describing such Default and stating that such notice is a notice of default. In the event that the Borrower Representative receives such a notice, the Borrower Representative shall give prompt notice thereof to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders. Any notice provided to the Borrower Representative hereunder shall constitute notice to each Borrower on the date received by the Borrower Representative.
Notices.
 
SECTION 11.05. Upon the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Borrower Representative may resign at any time, such resignation to be effective upon the appointment of a successor Borrower Representative. The Administrative Agent shall give prompt written notice of such resignation to the Lenders.
Successor Borrower Representative.
 
SECTION 11.06. The Borrowers hereby empower and authorize the Borrower Representative, on behalf of the Borrowers, to execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders the Loan Documents and all related agreements, certificates, documents, or instruments as shall be necessary or appropriate to effect the purposes of the Loan Documents, including without limitation, the Borrowing Base Certificates and the Compliance Certificates. Each Borrower agrees that any action taken by the Borrower Representative or the Borrowers in accordance with the terms of this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, and the exercise by the Borrower Representative of its powers set forth therein or herein, together with such other powers that are reasonably incidental thereto, shall be binding upon all of the Borrowers.
Execution of Loan Documents; Borrowing Base Certificate.
 
SECTION 11.07. Each Borrower hereby agrees that such Borrower shall furnish promptly after each fiscal month to the Borrower Representative any certificate or report requested by the Borrower Representative, on which the Borrower Representative shall rely to prepare the Borrowing Base Certificates and Compliance Certificates required pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement.
Reporting.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130411161901.txt.gz
TIME:20130411161901
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
April 10, 2013 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d 2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e 4c))
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On April 10, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) participated in the Telsey Advisory Groups 5 Annual Spring Consumer Conference.
th
A transcript of the presentation is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and a copy of the slide presentation is furnished as Exhibit 99.2 which are incorporated by reference herein.
 
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
 
Date: April 11, 2013
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
 
David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
Dirk Montgomery
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
Janine Stichter
Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst
  
PRESENTATION
 
Janine Stichter
- Telsey Advisory Group - Analyst
  
Hi, I'm Janine Stichter. I am on the specialty retail team here at Telsey. Next up, we have Ascena Retail Group. Ascena is the parent company of five brands, each occupying their own niche. These brands are dressbarn, Justice and maurices; and then most recently in 2012, the Company acquired Charming Shoppes, including Lane Bryant, which is the leading plus-size specialty retailer, as well as Catherines.
 
Combined, the Company operates nearly 4000 stores with expected revenues of nearly $5 billion in fiscal '13. The Company is focused on improving the performance of its core business, while integrating and reaping the synergies from this acquisition. And now, I will turn it over to CEO David Jaffe and CFO Dirk Montgomery to tell you more about the story.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
  
Thank you, and I appreciate your coming out. For those of you not as familiar with the brand, we have a little video that will just give you some visuals of our different concepts.
 
(video playing)
 
All right. Well, thank you. We have our forward-looking statement, which I won't bother reading. And then just to give you a high-level overview, Ascena's vision -- and many of you are new to the story -- we used to be dressbarn, and as we have grown, we have kind of taken on a whole new persona. And our vision is to serve our shareholders and create value by becoming a family of leading retail concepts with $10 billion in sales and top share profitability. So each part of that statement has a lot of meaning.
 
A family of leading retail brands. We have got five brands, which I will talk about briefly, so we are very, very proud of the family that we have put together so far. We are projecting just under $5 billion in sales, so we are kind of half way to our vision. And the profitability, depending on the brand, still has some significant opportunities. And that is where we see part of our growth coming from.
 
And our mission is making people feel good about themselves. It sounds all hearts and flowers, but it relates not just to our customers, our associates, our vendors and our shareholders.
 
So take you through the highlights. We have a very diversified portfolio. So it is not that they are all specialty women's apparel, which they are, it is that within each concept, they occupy very different whitespace. And we will talk about that in a second.
 
We think each of them has significant growth opportunities. So whether it is new stores, whether it is international, whether it is e-commerce, whether it is improving margins, we think there is significant opportunity for each of the brands, and we will talk a little bit about those as well.
 
Because of our merger with Charming Shoppes last June, we are now developing a shared-service organization, and we think that is going to leverage both our overhead, as well as create significant synergies that we didn't have before.
 
 
We have a terrific balance sheet, which Dirk will talk about later, and great cash flow, which provides the opportunity to fund all our major CapEx. Anything that has an attractive ROIC, we like to fund; we like to continue to grow and invest in our infrastructure. And finally, it provides opportunities, whether it is to buy back stock or perhaps someday, if we find the right opportunity, to look at another acquisition.
 
So to jump into it, you can see we have five external brands and then we have our one internal brand, which we are calling our Shared Service Group. So that is really important to think about, as we do that, that is an internal brand. And we will talk about the model, because it is a little bit of a unique model from a lot of the other retailers.
 
So what we do is allow the brands to focus on their target customer. We allow them, when we make the acquisition -- whether it was maurices in Duluth or Justice in Columbus, Lane Bryant is also in Columbus; Bensalem is the home of our Catherine's concepts -- they stay there. For the most part, the brand management -- the executive management team has remained in place.
 
And then what we have been able to do is go in and start peeling off the back end of the business. So they are able to focus on the customer, they are able to put all their energies into driving the business, whereas on a centralized basis, we are able to leverage five brands, 55,000 associates, 3800 stores, $5 billion in sales to create these synergies. And that is what we are working on now.
 
So our pyramid is a little bit reversed from what some other folks might show you. Our Shared Services supports the brands which supports the customer. So we see ourselves at all levels in service to the ultimate customer, the ultimate user of our product.
 
Just to look at the customers briefly, you can see Justice has the highest income on obviously the youngest; they are going after a 7- to 12-year-old girl. And then Catherines is lowest income, most mature. You can see dressbarn, maurices, Lane Bryant in the middle.
 
The only place where you have a slight overlap -- and I would definitely call it slight -- is on the dressbarn Woman's side of the business, there is a little bit of overlap with Lane Bryant. But with dressbarn, think older, think more middle America; whereas with Lane Bryant, think sexier, younger, more fashionable, more ethnic.
 
As we look at Justice -- I will go through each brand pretty quickly, and then obviously we can come back and drill on any questions you might have. And the deck is available either online or we have got them outside if you want to get more detail.
 
So each brand has their own mission. You can see we are closing in on 1000 stores. We think we have at least 1100 store potential. We are continuing to open up. Even going into the smaller markets, we have had good success and we find a very profitable formula going into these smaller markets. So we have learned that -- Justice has learned that from our maurices brand, which is primarily in smaller markets, so there has been good sharing there. It gives us an opportunity to leverage the relationships with the landlords, one of whom at least I saw in the room before.
 
We are going to continue to grow in Canada as well. We are pretty excited about that. And we do have international, but right now, we have licensed it.
 
We just took over -- or actually tied for leading market share with Target. And this has been a tremendous movement in the last four years since we first started getting involved with Justice. They've really reinvented their business. You may remember it used to be tween brands, they had The Limited 2 stores and the Justice stores. They converted The Limited 2 stores to Justice. That is when we got involved. And then they started reinventing their model, and it has been hugely successful, both in terms of market share as well as sales growth and profitability.
 
And you can see it is all big boxes, up until the point when you get to Children's Place, which is the only specialty store that competes directly with us.
 
So our strategic initiatives continue to be dominant in our categories. And the Est is from a book some of you may have heard called "Winning at Retail." And those are definitions -- not the hottest in terms of the most fashionable, but it is having the fashion that she wants, when she wants it, in quantity. And then of course the biggest selection and the easiest store to shop.
 
MMU dollars, e-commerce, new stores and then dual gender. We have a new concept called Brothers, which is the boy's version of Justice, and we have just started rolling that out. It has been online for a couple of years now. We learned a lot and now we are bringing it into brick-and-mortar and we are pleased. We think it has got tremendous potential. We are going to be rolling out another 50 stores this fall, which will bring us up to 80. And we see that as incremental volume.
 
In the stores we have put it in, we actually have not increased the size of the store. We just kind of put it in a back corner. We have made it its own little space, so it looks like a boys' club. It is kind of woody, treehousey, and there's of course the requisite sports video going. So the girl and the boy don't really feel they are in the same store, and as a result of that, we have seen very good incremental sales from the Brothers business that has not impacted the Justice business. That is an important point. It has not impacted the Justice business. So it is pure incremental, and as I said, we see that rolling out.
 
 
 
So there is our growth drivers I just mentioned. Turning to Lane Bryant, this store -- this concept has almost 800 stores, primarily strip, although a big chunk of them are malls. One of the strategies is to start moving some of those mall stores out into the more popular strips in the communities, make it more convenient.
 
And the same thing here -- you can see -- where is my pointer? You can see over here, Lane Bryant is number two market share of course behind Walmart, which is such a giant. But it is number two. And you have to go all the way down here before you hit Catherines and dressbarn, which obviously are our own nameplates. So we think we have got a pretty good position in the large-size specialty store market.
 
Lane Bryant, of course, has been around for over 100 years. It is a great name. And we see it as a little bit of a fixer-upper, turnaround opportunity. We have just brought in a new President there, Linda Heasley, from Limited Stores. And she has been on the job for about two months now. Very excited about her ideas. And while it will take a little while to get things going, we think the prognosis for this brand is excellent.
 
So strategic initiatives --rebranding. You know, we are not your mother's Lane Bryant. Reposition the fleet, as I mentioned. Considering going out of malls into strips or vice versa, wherever the best real estate in the market is.
 
Multichannel. Right now, e-commerce represents 16% of our sales. So it is a really good number. And that includes the business that comes from the stores. So if you go in and we don't have your size, we can get it for you; and that is about 3 points of the 16% is derived from the store. And then of course, inventory productivity, we want to make sure we are turning so we can keep our goods more fashionable. And more of what I have just said.
 
So turning to maurices, you can see 850 stores, and still growing; a nice mix between mall and strip. Most of the malls are smaller malls. This is a small concept -- small-market concept. So two thirds of our stores are market pops of 150,000 or less. We think we have got significant potential. We have just gone into Canada. And as you can see, kind of the heritage is the Midwest. And as we have pushed out to the West Coast, into Texas and down to the southeast, we have seen a good result, but not the same as our core markets, and that is another opportunity for us, to build our non-core market to be as productive as our core markets.
 
So we continue to grow both new stores and e-commerce. We have just brought on a new CMO, so we think we will improve our merchandising. We are looking at doing more direct-sourced product and developing that capability. Up until now, it has been primarily market-sourced goods. And continue to go out and figure out how to not just acquire, but also retain customers. And we have done different things with loyalty programs and social media.
 
So on to dressbarn. You can see dressbarn is primarily a strip concept. There are some mall stores, but very few, and a good chunk of outlet stores. You can see there is a much greater concentration in the Northeast corridor here and in cities. This concept appeals to more of a working woman, a career working woman who is on a budget. I call her a pink collar customer.
 
So if you remember, maurices had a lot of dots all around here. So the real estate strategy is very different. Dressbarn is going to be much more like a Lane Bryant, and Justice is even more mall-based and maurices is, as I said, much more small-market-based.
 
So key initiatives here are being hottest for our target customer, improving our store experience, developing a marketing strategy. In the fall, we brought in a new marketing executive that we think is terrific, and she is now going through a segmentation study and just hired a creative firm to figure out exactly who we should be talking to and what message and how to get it across. So you will hear more on that in the coming months.
 
Get back on the growth curve, both in terms of new stores, as well as our comp sales. And finally, making sure we have got the right talent on board. And those growth drivers include developing a design function, like we talked about with maurices.
 
So finally, Catherines, our smallest, last but not least. Primarily a strip concept, and there are 400 stores. We think this one for now is just a hold. The business is not performing up to the expectations that I would have for a chain that I would want to invest in. So it is doing well. We are very pleased with its results, but it needs to continue to build up to the level at which any new store investments would have a positive ROIC.
 
So as I told them when we first merged, with a little bit of a wink, I said we bought the company for Lane Bryant -- no surprise. Most of you know we shut down Fashion Bug; that happened in January, so they are gone. They have got a little business called Figi's, which we are in the process of selling off. And then I said that Catherines was our gift with purchase.
 
 
So we are now waiting to see if that is going to bear fruit or not. We are patient. It is cash flow positive. They have got a really good team and I am very optimistic. But until they prove it and until we see the numbers that would justify greater investment, we are just going to hold it for a while.
 
So you remember on this chart, you saw they are way down here. A little bit of growth in market share, and we would like to see that continue and we would like to see their productivity continue to climb.
 
So again, like all the other brands, e-commerce, making sure we are turning the inventory, do even more direct-sourced. They have developed that model and they are going to start ramping that up to a much greater extent. Getting the marketing mix down, including what kind of promos we need to do, and using that database and their loyalty program more effectively.
 
So switching now to our sixth brand, our internal brand, Shared Services, it has got a lot of functions. You can see here it runs the gamut of all the stuff that doesn't touch the customer. So we want to continue to provide these services where we say faster, better, smarter than the brands could do themselves. Some of these are well-entrenched and others we are developing as we speak.
 
So just to jump right into the first big one, about six months ago, we had five DCs, one for each brand, basically. So we are going to a model where we will have one DC for brick-and-mortar. So we are in the process of building that out now, and we will start putting in the additional companies into that DC next spring. So we believe we will be able to substantially improve our cost of handling product, because we are going to be using state-of-the-art equipment that we couldn't afford to use on a brand basis.
 
The other part is that because everything now is in one location, we can do long pulls for all five stores from the DC out to say LA or Chicago or St. Louis, and make that much cheaper, much more efficient, and then do the last mile from that local hub. So we have looked at the investment in our DC and believe it is got a terrific ROI, as well as from the transformation of our logistics.
 
The next thing is all five brands today outsource e-commerce. So what we are going to do is bring that in-house and take one of our other DCs and convert it. That is in process also. That will be up and running next spring as well. And then we will be down just to the two DCs, one for brick-and-mortar, one for e-commerce fulfillment.
 
We have two direct sourcing arms, one that was legacy Ascena through Justice and the other was legacy Charming. So what we are going to do is put them together, become more efficient and look to start growing dressbarn and maurices, as well as Catherines.
 
We are on more platforms than I would care to count, and as time goes on, we are going to be consolidating those and putting all the brands on the same platform to the extent we can. So we are starting with the big ones, our merchandising system, our warehouse management system, our POS system, and then we will work our way through.
 
And then business processing, everything from payroll to lease administration, we are now doing on a much more efficient basis, because we are doing it for all the brands the same way by the same team.
 
So here is the issue. When we merged with Charming, they had their own Shared Service Group. And, rough numbers, for the fiscal 2012, Ascena's was $70 million, $80 million; you have the $150 million. And we believe over the next three years, we are going to be able to pull out $50 million of that overhead. It is ambitious, and we frankly haven't identified all of it yet. But we have kept -- the former CFO from Charming, we have kept him on and made him Chief Integration Officer. And he is like a dog on a bone with expenses, so he is doing a great job.
 
The other aspect of it is that we think there are significant synergies. So this is the slide that we put together when we did our Investor Day in the fall. We have not [taken] to update it. We are staying at $37 million to $45 million without the direct sourcing opportunity. And we will be drilling these numbers of course, and then at our next Investor Day, next October, we will see if we can't provide better guidance on the synergies opportunities.
 
So with that, I would like to turn it over to Dirk to go through the financials.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
  
Thanks, David. Good morning, everybody. It is my pleasure to be presenting to all of you today, and I am going to review our fall season financials and update our outlook for spring.
 
 
I will start with fall season comp sales. Total comp sales for the fall season were 3%, with first-quarter total comp sales of 4% and second quarter at 2%. Sales plan misses at dressbarn, Lane Bryant and maurices were partially offset by a strong 33% increase in e-commerce. The backdrop for the second quarter was a tough one for specialty retail in general and for Ascena. Traffic, especially in the Northeast, was hurt by significant weather events, including, obviously, Hurricane Sandy, and economic concerns took a toll on middle-income consumers.
 
The challenging external environment has continued in the third quarter, with unseasonably cold weather impacting multiple regions in the country. Shopper traffic in malls and strip centers was down through much of February and March, and we are also up against tough comparisons for the spring of 2012, when unfortunately, we had record high warm weather. So as a result, our third-quarter total comp sales through March were roughly flat, with brick-and-mortar comp sales down low single digits.
 
While sales have been disappointing quarter to date, we are encouraged by the fact that warmer weather regions have significantly outperformed the colder weather regions. So I don't like to make excuses for weather, but we do have pretty good evidence that we don't think we have a merchandise issue; we really have an issue that consumers just aren't ready for that warm weather occasion because it is not warm enough yet.
 
We will share additional details on our sales trends as part of our third-quarter earnings call that is coming up.
 
So although we have had challenges to top-line growth recently, on a total sales basis, Ascena has generated very strong and consistent sales growth over the last few years. We have grown from $2.4 billion in fiscal year 2010 to $3.4 billion in 2012, with plans of reaching $4.8 billion in fiscal 2013. The increases over this three-year period have been driven by the Justice merger, consistency in comp sales and new store growth and e-commerce, which has been very strong for us.
 
Our fiscal 2013 sales estimate included a full-year impact of our newest brands, Lane Bryant and Catherines, compared to only a partial year in 2012.
 
E-commerce sales growth has been very strong across all our brands and continues to significantly outpace brick-and-mortar sales growth. We see this business as a long-term growth vehicle with strong operating margins. Overall e-commerce sales for fiscal 2013 are estimated to increase to $390 million, and despite this rapid growth, our relatively low penetration of e-commerce to total sales at 8% represents a big opportunity for future growth in this channel.
 
Ascena's adjusted operating income of $332 million for 2012 has grown 50% over three years and is expected to grow further to $350 million for 2013. This growth has been fueled by increased sales, margin expansion and expense leverage. Brand results are shown, with corporate overhead fully allocated in this slide. It is also worth noting the outstanding operating income growth at our Justice brand over this time frame.
 
Driven by consistent top-line growth and acquisitions, our adjusted earnings per share have grown 52%, from $0.88 per share in fiscal 2010 to $1.34 in fiscal 2012. As we noted on our second-quarter earnings call, we anticipated a challenging top-line environment this spring and responded by adjusting inventory down to match lower sales trends, tightening expense controls and accelerating synergies and integration efforts where possible. Our current 2013 EPS guidance range of $1.20 to $1.30 per share assumes that our brick-and-mortar comps improve to low single digits the remainder of the spring season.
 
In terms of uses of cash, our business generates very strong cash flow, as you can see in the pink shaded bars on this chart, which afford us the opportunity to invest in the business for growth and margin improvement, which is our top priority in terms of uses of cash.
 
We incurred a modest level of term loan debt in 2012 to fund a portion of the Charming acquisition, and over the last year, debt repayment has also been a priority for us and we will continue to pay down additional debt with available cash.
 
The increase in CapEx in 2013 to $350 million that you can see here is driven by major high-return investments that David mentioned in logistics, e-commerce and infrastructure that should drive both sales growth and margin improvement in the future. We expect CapEx in 2014 to be comparable to the 2013 levels as we complete those major projects.
 
In addition, we will continue to opportunistically evaluate opportunities to drive growth and shareholder returns via external investments and share repurchases.
 
This summary underscores our strong balance sheet, with over $325 million in cash and low debt. Our leverage ratio is roughly 0.6, which is very low even for the specialty retail industry. Due to favorable market conditions in early calendar 2013, we were able to successfully restructure our debt by eliminating the term loan and replacing that capacity with a larger $500 million ABL revolver. This new facility will result in lower interest rates and greater flexibility. Combined with our strong cash flow generation, this new facility should comfortably meet our liquidity needs through the five-year maturity. Since closing on the new facility in the third quarter, we have further reduced our debt balance.
 
 
So as we look beyond 2013, we feel very good about our capability to deliver attractive long-term shareholder returns, driven by the following -- strong top-line growth opportunities in existing store comps; significant upside in e-commerce; and ongoing new store growth potential. Significant margin upside from overhead reduction and brand synergy initiatives that have the potential to generate $100 million in savings over the next three years. And excellent cash flow generation capability and a conservative balance sheet.
 
As we realize the benefits of those growth levers, we are confident that we can deliver a long-term economic model of annual sales growth of 8% to 10% per year, operating income reaching 12% as a percentage of sales and annual EPS growth of 10% or more a year. And as David mentioned, we think that these growth drivers on this slide really present a compelling investment opportunity as we look to the future.
 
So in closing, our leadership team is looking forward to growing the business and driving higher margins. We are very encouraged by the opportunities we have to create superior shareholder returns over the long term. Thank you, and now we would like to open the floor for questions.
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
 
Unidentified Audience Member
 
Just on Lane Bryant, (inaudible), can you give us any an initial thoughts on how you (inaudible) about the business (inaudible)? And also, I know you have (inaudible).
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
  
It's too small. If you haven't seen it, it is actually a very, very pretty store. It is just a little tight. But there are features there that we really like, and we are going to try and figure out how to roll them out to the rest of the chain. I am actually meeting Linda there next Tuesday to walk through it and start identifying things.
 
So it is a flagship, it is a prototype. And by the way, if any of you get out to Mall of America, we have a new flagship prototype for maurices which is absolutely gorgeous, which I would encourage you to see.
 
So the idea of doing these stores is to, one, create a flagship that you can use as a testing vehicle to try new designs, new fixtures, whatever, and see what works and kind of use it as that laboratory idea, to move stuff in and out, whether it is products or displays.
 
Linda is learning. She says it is like drinking out of a fire hose. The good news is that she came from Limited Stores, so obviously she knows specialty women's apparel. And while she was there, she had started up a concept called Eloquii. And Eloquii was their version of dressbarn Woman, and whatever. It was the large-size answer that they were putting in the store in a small section.
 
So it was very small, but as a result of that, she really had done her homework on large size and came in very knowledgeable, had shopped Lane Bryant every week for years, and has a lot of ideas to maybe make the product a little more fashionable. Without getting into specifics, I think she would say that some of the product got a little old, a little dowdy or perhaps a little bit too much repetitive from prior years -- seasons.
 
So it's still early, and I am sure, again, when we have this Investor Day in October, I hope you can all make it and we will have a lot more to say -- I am sure she will have a lot more to say at that point.
 
Unidentified Audience Member
  
Medium-term, can you talk about where you would like to get profit -- medium-term, can you talk a little bit about where you are going to take profitability (inaudible)? (inaudible) your average brand portfolio?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
 
 
No, it is not. I forget the definition of medium-term, but if -- we said over the next three, four, five years should that be functioning and performing at the same level as our other brands -- you know, maybe not quite the same level of a Justice or maurices, but certainly well above where it is. And not that I want to be held to a number, but if you said is a 10% operating income achievable, it absolutely is, and that is what we are striving for. But it is going to take a while.
 
Well, I guess we answered all the questions, Dirk.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
 
Yes.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - President, CEO
  
Thank you guys for your interest and we are going to be doing a breakout, if you have more issues.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - EVP, CFO
  
Appreciate your interest.
 
 
 
 

 
TAG Consumer Conference April 10, 2013 David Jaffe President & CEO
Forward Looking Statements This presentation contains forward - looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 . Forward - looking statements involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties, which may cause our actual results in future periods to differ materially from our forecasted results . Detailed information concerning those risks and uncertainties are readily available in our most recent Annual Report on Form 10 - K and Quarterly Report on Form 10 - Q which have been filed with the U . S . Securities and Exchange Commission . Non - GAAP Financial Measures Where indicated, certain financial information herein has been presented on a non - GAAP basis . This basis adjusts for items that management believes are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance . Reference should be made to the Companys annual earnings releases for all periods for the nature of such adjustments and for a reconciliation of such non - GAAP measures to the Companys financial results prepared in accordance with GAAP . 2
Our Vision Serve our shareholders and create value by becoming a family of leading retail concepts with $10 billion in sales and top tier profitability. Our Mission Making people feel good about themselves. 3
Investor Highlights 4  Diversified portfolio  Significant growth opportunities  Shared Services leverages overhead & drives synergies  Strong Balance Sheet & Cash Flow  Future opportunities
Current Structure 5 Shared Services Group
Unique Business Model  Brands focus on their target customer  Brands remain in existing locations  Brand management remains in place  Centralization of back office functions Model enables brands to drive business and shared services group to drive efficiencies 6
Shared Services Organization Structure 7
Customer Demographics 8 Youthful Mature Income Justice Lane Bryant maurices dressbarn Catherines HHI $88K $70K $75K $73K $69K Age 7 - 12 yrs old 30 - 45 yrs old 17 - 34 yrs old 35 - 55+ yrs old 45+ yrs old
Our Mission 9 To enhance a tween girls self - esteem by providing her the hottest fashion and lifestyle products, in a unique, fun, interactive environment all at a great value for mom!
Locations 958 Stores in 47 States, Puerto Rico & Canada  1,100 store potential  55 new stores planned in FY13 Outlets 10% Strip 24% Lifestyle 12% Mall 55% 10
Market Share 11 0.0% 2.0% 4.0% 6.0% 8.0% 10.0% 12.0% 14.0% 16.0% Tween girls 7 - 12 apparel market, 12 ME Nov 12, 11 Source  NPD Group Dotted line represents 2011 Market Share 2012 10.5% 10.5% 10.3% 5.8% 5.4% 4.6% 3.8% 2011 10.8% 11.0% 10.4% 6.3% 8.4% 4.9% 3.3% % Var (0.3%) (0.5%) (0.1%) (0.5%) (3.0%) (0.3%) 0.5% 50 bps (30 bps) (300 bps) (30 bps) (50 bps) (10 bps) (50 bps)
FY13 Strategic Initiatives 12  Continue market domination in Hot - Est , Big - Est & Easy - Est  Drive MMU $  E - commerce sales growth  New store growth  Expand dual - gender concept: Brothers
Growth Drivers  Comp sales  New stores  E - commerce  Brothers expansion 13
Our Mission 14 Consistently provide our Guest fashionable outfits that fit her, make her look stylish and feel sexy, confident and happy.
Outlets 15% Strip 44% Mall 34% Lifestyle 8% Locations 15 789 Stores in 46 States  Market focus: 100K to 150K population  Continuing migration to strip centers  1,000 store potential  45 new stores planned in FY13
0.0% 2.0% 4.0% 6.0% 8.0% 10.0% 12.0% 14.0% Market Share Source: The NPD Group/Consumer Panel Track  12 Months Ending January 2013 NPD definition of Plus Size (self reported) Data includes all Womens A pparel categories and Intimate A pparel; does not include Jewelry or Footwear 10 bps (10 bps) (30 bps) 2013 11.2% 5.1% 4.8% 4.8% 3.9% 2.8% 2.7% 2.6% 2.3% 2.3% 2.2% 1.8% 2012 11.8% 5.0% 4.9% 4.8% 4.8% 2.7% 2.6% 2.2% 1.9% 2.4% 1.9% 1.8% % Var (0.6%) 0.1% (0.1%) FLAT (0.9%) 0.2% 0.2% 0.4% 0.4% (0.1%) 0.3% FLAT 16 Flat Flat (60 bps) (90 bps) 20 bps 20 bps 40 bps 40 bps (10 bps) 30 bps
FY13 Strategic Initiatives 17  Launched comprehensive rebranding  Reposition the fleet  Drive multi - channel growth  Improve inventory productivity
Growth Drivers 18  Store relocation and expansion  E - commerce  Merchandise mix refinement  Tighter inventory, markdown management
Simply the best hometown specialty store. 19 Our Mission
Locations 850 Stores in 45 States & Canada  Small  mid market focus: 25K to 150K population  1,250 store potential  60 new stores planned in FY13 Outlets 5% Strip 48% Mall 37% Metro/Fringe 10% 20
FY13 Strategic Initiatives 21  Open new stores  Grow e - commerce  Consistency in merchandise offering  Increase direct sourced product  Refine markdown management  Customer acquisition and retention
Growth Drivers 22  Comp sales  New stores  Domestic  Canada  E - commerce  Develop sourcing
Our Mission 23 23 Inspiring women to look and feel beautiful.
Locations 829 Stores in 48 States  National presence in medium to large markets  1,000 store potential  35 new stores planned in FY13 24 Outlets 22% Strip 72% Downtown 2% Mall 4%
FY13 Strategic Initiatives 25  Hot - Est in fashion for our target customer  Store experience  Marketing strategy  Accelerating growth  Talent
Growth Drivers 26  Sales growth  Comp stores  E - commerce expansion  New store openings  Margin Expansion  Design  Greater depth per SKU  Merchandise enhancements  Differentiating service
Our Mission 27 To serve the lifestyle and fit needs of women size 18+ with up - to - date classic outfits inspiring her to look and feel her best.
Locations 409 Stores in 44 States  National presence in major markets 28 Strip 83% Outlet 2% Mall 14% Lifestyle 1%
0.0% 2.0% 4.0% 6.0% 8.0% 10.0% 12.0% 14.0% Market Share Source: The NPD Group/Consumer Panel Track  12 Months Ending January 2013 NPD definition of Plus Size (self reported) Data includes all Womens A pparel categories and Intimate A pparel; does not include Jewelry or Footwear 10 bps (10 bps) (30 bps) 2013 11.2% 5.1% 4.8% 4.8% 3.9% 2.8% 2.7% 2.6% 2.3% 2.3% 2.2% 1.8% 2012 11.8% 5.0% 4.9% 4.8% 4.8% 2.7% 2.6% 2.2% 1.9% 2.4% 1.9% 1.8% % Var (0.6%) 0.1% (0.1%) FLAT (0.9%) 0.2% 0.2% 0.4% 0.4% (0.1%) 0.3% FLAT 29 Flat Flat (60 bps) (90 bps) 20 bps 20 bps 40 bps 40 bps (10 bps) 30 bps
FY13 Strategic Initiatives 30  Drive multi - channel growth  Improve inventory productivity  Increase direct - sourced product penetration  Optimize marketing mix  Streamline marketing events & campaigns  Leverage CRM database
Growth Drivers 31  E - commerce  Merchandise mix refinement  Greater penetration of direct - sourced product  Tighter inventory, markdown management
Shared Service Capabilities 32 Finance Accounting Internal Audit Risk HR Services Benefits Lease Admin Legal Global Sourcing Distribution & Global Logistics Information Technology Digital Shared Services Tax Treasury Compensation Payroll HRIS
Integration Strategies 33  Optimize distribution centers  Transform logistics network  In - source e - commerce platform  Expand direct sourcing  Consolidate technology platforms  Optimize business processing
Corporate Overhead Reduction 34 FY13 FY14 FY15 Estimated Savings Net Savings ($10M) ($20M) ($20M) ($50M) EPS Impact $0.04 $0.08 $0.08 $0.20 2012 Legacy ascena ~$70M 2012 Legacy Charming Shoppes ~$80M Proforma ascena Shared Services Group ~$150M
Brand Synergies Potential (in millions, except EPS) Estimated Savings  DC consolidation  Retail distribution $12  13  E - commerce fulfillment $9  10  Transportation $5  6  Benefits consolidation $4  5  Common systems $2  3  Renegotiate national contracts $2  3  Corporate Insurance/Risk $2  3  Lease administration $1  2  Direct sourcing opportunity TBD Total $37  45 Estimated EPS impact $0.15  0.18 35
Financials Dirk Montgomery Chief Financial Officer
Fall Season Comp Sales 37 Comp Store Sales Justice 4% Lane Bryant (5%) maurices 1% dressbarn (2%) Catherines 5% ascena Flat E - commerce 33% Combined Store & E - commerce 3%
0 1,000 2,000 3,000 4,000 5,000 FY10 FY11 FY12 FY13E 36 300 982 987 1,037 1,070 681 777 853 940 120 1,045 712 1,150 1,307 1,475 Justice Lane Bryant maurices dressbarn Catherines Sales Growth 38 ($M) 2,914 3,353 4,830 2,375
0 50 100 150 200 250 300 350 400 FY10 FY11 FY12 FY13E 3 35 11 25 40 9 25 45 65 15 135 27 68 90 115 Justice Lane Bryant maurices dressbarn Catherines E - Commerce Growth 39 ($M) 104 178 390 36
0 50 100 150 200 250 300 350 400 450 FY10 FY11 FY12 FY13E 5 66 63 57 35 93 108 103 115 64 140 173 195 Justice Lane Bryant maurices dressbarn Catherines Operating Income* Growth 40 311 332 350 *Non - GAAP including fully allocated overhead costs ($M) 223
$0.00 $0.20 $0.40 $0.60 $0.80 $1.00 $1.20 $1.40 FY10 FY11 FY12 FY13E $0.88 $1.17 $1.34 $1.20 - $1.30 Annual EPS* Growth 41 *Non - GAAP
Uses of Cash 42
Selected Balance Sheet Information 43 ($M) Cash and investments 326 Inventories 499 Total assets 2,883 Debt 277 Total liabilities 1,409 Total equity 1,474 Total liabilities & equity 2,883 2nd Quarter Ended January 26, 2013
Long - term Economic Model  Sales annual growth rate of 8% to 10%  Operating income % of sales of 12%+  EPS annual growth rate of 10%+ 44
Investor Highlights 45  Diversified portfolio  Significant growth opportunities  Shared Services leverages overhead & drives synergies  Strong Balance Sheet & Cash Flow  Future opportunities


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130605161530.txt.gz
TIME:20130605161530
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
June 5, 2013 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4c))
o
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On June 5, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release disclosing material non-public information regarding its results of operations for its fiscal third quarter ended April 27, 2013. The Company also revised its earnings per diluted share guidance for its full fiscal year ending July 27, 2013. A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.02.
 
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
  
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
  
Date: June 5, 2013
 
 

 
   
ascena retail group, Inc. reports
THIRD quarter 2013 results
 
 ADJUSTED EPS OF $0.26 
 GAAP EPS FROM CONTINUING OPERATIONS OF $0.20 
 Total Comparable sales decreased 1% 
 Revises Fiscal 2013 GUIDANCE TO $1.10 TO $1.15 PER SHARE 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) today reported financial results for its fiscal third quarter and nine months ended April 27, 2013.
SUFFERN, NY 
June
5, 2013 
(NASDAQ  ASNA)
 
For the third quarter of Fiscal 2013, earnings from continuing operations share, while losses from discontinued operations were $0.01 per diluted share. This compares to earnings from continuing operations of $0.31 per diluted share in the same period of Fiscal 2012. Adjusted earnings from continuing operations in the third quarter of Fiscal 2013 were $0.26 per diluted share, compared to $0.34 per diluted share in the prior years third quarter.
were $0.20 per diluted
 
In both periods, the Company incurred (see Non-GAAP Financial Results section of this release for a reconciliation of these adjustments).
certain acquisition-related integration, restructuring and transaction costs in connection with its acquisition of Charming Shoppes, Inc. (Charming and the Charming Acquisition). Additionally, in the third quarter of 2013, the Company also incurred a charge on the extinguishment of debt. Management believes that such costs are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance and has, therefore, reported adjusted results to exclude their effect
 
third quarter. This growth was driven by the inclusion of the recently acquired and businesses, slightly offset by a total comparable sales decrease of 1% for the quarter versus the prior year. Store comp sales for the quarter declined 4% and e-commerce comp sales increased 37%.
Net sales for the third quarter of Fiscal 2013 increased 46% to $1.142 billion, compared to $783 million in the prior years
Lane Bryant
Catherines
 
David Jaffe, President and Chief Executive Officer of Ascena Retail Group, Inc., commented, Our soft third quarter top line performance reflects lower than expected traffic driven by continued economic challenges for our customers and unseasonably cold weather as well as merchandising misses at and .  Sales trends improved somewhat across all brands in Q4 to date compared to Q3, and we are adjusting our promotional plans to ensure that spring inventory balances are at appropriate levels by the end of our Fiscal 2013 fourth quarter.
Lane Bryant
dressbarn
 
Mr. Jaffe concluded: As we look toward 2014, we continue to make solid progress positioning the business for long term growth by building talent and infrastructure, implementing long range synergy initiatives and improving our merchandising strategies to better match our customers needs.
 
 
 
Fiscal Third Quarter Results
 
Consolidated (excluding e-commerce) decreased by 4% for the period. E-commerce sales increased by 171% to $98 million on a consolidated basis, and 37% on a comparable basis. Combined, comparable store and e-commerce sales decreased by 1%.
comparable store sales
 
Unseasonably cold weather and economic pressure on middle-income consumers drove decreased traffic and spending, which contributed to negative comparable store sales at , , and , whereas realized an 8% increase in comparable store sales.
Justice
Lane Bryant
maurices
dressbarn
Catherines
 
years third quarter, largely driven by the inclusion of sales from the newly acquired and businesses, along with a 1% increase in sales from the Companys legacy family of brands.
Net sales for the third quarter of Fiscal 2013 increased 46% to $1.142 billion, compared to $783 million for last
Lane Bryant
Catherines
 
The Companys comparable store and e-commerce sales data for the third fiscal quarter is summarized below:
 
 
*Comparable store sales include stores open for at least one year. Comparable store sales for Lane Bryant and Catherines include sales for all stores that were open in both that period and the comparative period in the prior year.
 
Gross margin for the third quarter of Fiscal 2013 increased to sales, compared to $459.9 million, or 58.7% of third quarter sales last yearThe gross margin rate decline of 110 basis points was primarily due to lower margins associated with increased markdowns and promotional activity, particularly at .
$657.8
million, or 57.6% of
.
dressbarn
 
were $208.1 million, or 18.2% of sales, compared to $129.7 million, or 16.6The 160 basis point increase was primarily due to the inclusion of andwhich have a higher BD&O expense as a percent of sales compared to the ascena legacy brands, as well as deleveraging relating to lower comparable store sales. The Company continues to anticipate the capture of certain integration-related efficiencies in its distribution structure over time.
Buying, distribution and occupancy (BD&O) costs for the third quarter of Fiscal 2013
% of third quarter sales last year.
Lane Bryant
Catherines,
 
quarter of Fiscal 2013 were $332.4 million, or 29.1% of sales, compared to $219.3 million, or 28.0% of third quarter sales last year.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the third
The 110 basis point increase is largely due to a duplicative overhead structure relating to the Charming Acquisition, which is also expected to be improved as integration work progresses.  
 
 
2013 was sales, compared to $85.3 million, or 10.9% of sales last yearOn an adjusted basis, operating income for Fiscal 2013 was $72.7 million, or 6.4% of sales.
Operating income for the third quarter of Fiscal
$65.8
million, or 5.8% of
.
The decrease in adjusted operating income as a percent of sales was primarily due, as described above, to increased promotion and markdown activity, increased BD&O expenses and duplicative overhead expenses from the Charming Acquisition.
 
Income from continuing operations for the third quarter of Fiscal 2013 $49.4 million in the prior years third quarter.
was $32.9 million as compared to
Adjusted income from continuing operations for the third quarter of Fiscal 2013 was $42.2 million, as compared to $53.7 million in the prior years third quarter.
 
Earnings from continuing operations for the third quarter of Fiscal 2013 share, compared to $0.31 in the third quarter of Fiscal 2012.
were $0.20 per diluted
Adjusted earnings per share from continuing operations for the third quarter of Fiscal 2013 was $0.26 per diluted share, compared to $0.34 in the third quarter of Fiscal 2012.
 
Fiscal Third Quarter Balance Sheet Highlights
 
The Company ended the third quarter of Fiscal 2013 with cash and investments of $206.1 million and total debt of $155.6 million, compared to $168.9 million of cash and investments and $326.6 million of debt at the end of Fiscal 2012. During the quarter, the Company expanded availability under its revolving credit facility to $500 million and used borrowings thereunder and available cash to prepay the remaining $279.3 million of the outstanding principal balance of its term loan.
 
Revised Fiscal Year 2013 Earnings Guidance
 
The Company has revised its guidance for adjusted earnings per diluted share from continuing operations for the fiscal year ending July 2013 to a range of $1.10 to $1.15. This guidance excludes any one-time, finance-related and acquisition-related integration, restructuring and purchase accounting costs that have been, and may continue to be, incurred during the fiscal year. The Company noted that its guidance is based upon various assumptions, including flat to up low single digits total comparable sales for the remainder of its Fiscal 2013 fourth quarter, and between 50 and 60 net new store openings during the Spring Season.
 
Conference Call Information
 
The Company will conduct a conference call today, June 5, 2013, at 4:30 PM Eastern Time to review its third quarter of Fiscal 2013 results, followed by a question and answer session. Parties interested in participating in this call should dial in at (617) 213-8052 prior to the start time, the passcode is 63258572. The call will also be simultaneously broadcast at
www.ascenaretail.com
. A recording of the call will be available shortly after its conclusion and until July 5, 2013 by dialing (617) 801-6888, the passcode is 99693481. 
 
 
About Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: ASNA) is a leading specialty retailer offering clothing, shoes, and accessories for missy and plus-size women, under the , , , and brands; and for tween girls and boys, under the and brands. Ascena Retail Group, Inc. operates through its subsidiaries approximately 3,800 stores throughout the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada. 
Lane Bryant
Cacique
maurices
dressbarn
Catherines
Justice
Brothers
 
For more information about Ascena Retail Group, Inc. and its brands, visit
www.ascenaretail.com
,
www.charmingshoppes.com
,
www.shopjustice.com
,
www.lanebryant.com
,
www.maurices.com
,
www.dressbarn.com
,
www.catherines.com
,
www.cacique.com
,
www.shopbrothers.com
,
www.figis.com
and
www.figisgallery.com
. 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements made within this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. The Company does not undertake to publicly update or review its forward-looking statements even if experience or future changes make it clear that our projected results expressed or implied will not be achieved. Detailed information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from the information contained herein is readily available in the Companys most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended July 28, 2012 and in its last filed Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended January 26, 2013.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Results
 
Ascenas financial results for its fiscal third quarter and nine months ended April 27, 2013 reflect the Charming Acquisition. In connection with the Charming Acquisition, the Company has incurred certain acquisition-related, integration, restructuring and transaction costs, as well as certain losses on the extinguishment of debt, during Fiscal 2013 and Fiscal 2012. Management believes that all of such costs are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance. As such, adjusted results for the third quarter of Fiscal 2013 and Fiscal 2012, which exclude the effect of such costs, have been presented to supplement the reported results for each period. Reference should be made to Note 2 to the unaudited consolidated financial information included elsewhere in this release for a reconciliation of adjusted, non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures.
 
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(millions, except per share data)
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
See accompanying notes.
 
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Segment Information (Unaudited)
(millions)
 
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
Ascena Retail Group, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Information (Unaudited)
 
Note 1. Basis of Presentation
 
Discontinued Operations
 
In connection with the Charming Acquisition, certain acquired businesses have been classified as a component of discontinued operations within the consolidated financial statements.
 
In particular, the Company announced, contemporaneously with the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, its intent to cease operating the acquired business. The business, consisting of approximately 600 retail stores, ceased operations at the end of the second quarter of Fiscal 2013.
Fashion Bug
Fashion Bug
 
In addition, the Company also announced, contemporaneously with the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes, its intent to sell the acquired business. The business, which markets food and specialty gift products, is expected to be sold around the one-year anniversary date of the closing of the acquisition of Charming Shoppes.
Figis
Figis
 
Those businesses have been classified as discontinued operations within the unaudited consolidated financial statements. As such, assets and liabilities relating to discontinued operations have been segregated and separately disclosed in the balance sheet as of the end of each period. In turn, operating results for those businesses have also been segregated and reported separately in the statement of operations for Fiscal 2013.
 
Buying, Distribution and Occupancy Costs Reclassification
 
Historically, the Company included buying, distribution and occupancy costs within cost of goods sold on the face of its statements of operations. However, in the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2012, in connection with conforming the financial presentation of Charming Shoppes, the Company decided to present each of the aggregate of buying, distribution and occupancy costs and gross margin separately on the face of its statements of operations. In addition, certain costs, such as store utility costs, were reclassified from selling, general and administrative expenses to buying, distribution and occupancy costs. Financial information for all prior periods has been reclassified in order to conform to the current periods presentation. There have been no changes in historical operating income or historical net income for any period as a result of these changes.
 
Other
Reclassifications
 
Certain other immaterial reclassifications also have been made to the prior periods financial information in order to conform to the current periods presentation.
 
 
 
Note 2. Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
To provide investors information to assist them in assessing the Companys ongoing operations on a comparable basis, the Company has provided Fiscal 2013 and Fiscal 2012 financial measures in this press release that exclude the effects of certain acquisition-related, integration, restructuring and transaction costs resulting from the Charming Acquisition, as well as certain losses on the extinguishment of debt. Management believes that all of such costs are not indicative of the Companys underlying operating performance. Throughout this release, the term reported refers to information prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States (GAAP), while the term adjusted refers to non-GAAP financial information adjusted to exclude such costs. All information below is presented for the Companys continuing operations.
 
 
 
Operating income:
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130606165925.txt.gz
TIME:20130606165925
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
June 5, 2013 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)  
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4c))
o
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
 
On June 5, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) hosted an investor conference call to discuss the Companys results of operations for its fiscal third quarter ended April 27, 2013 and certain other information, including the contents of the Companys press release dated June 5, 2013 which was furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 8-K on June 5, 2013. The conference call was pre-announced and was available to the public through live teleconference. A transcript of the conference call is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
 
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
 
Date: June 6, 2013
 
 
 
By:
/s/ Jay Levine                                               
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
 
Allison Townsend
ICR - Senior Associate
 
David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Dirk Montgomery
Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
 
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
 
Taposh Bari
Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
Scott Krasik
BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Brian Tunick
JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Alex Fuhrman
Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
Oliver Chen
Citigroup - Analyst
 
Edward Yruma
KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Mike Richardson
Sidoti & Company - Analyst
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
Janet Kloppenburg
JJK Research - Analyst
 
 
 
PRESENTATION
 
 
 
Operator
 
Good afternoon. My name is Sheverly, and I will be your conference operator today. At this time, I would like to welcome everyone to Ascena Retail Group's third quarter earnings conference call. I would now like to introduce Allison Townsend of ICR. Ms. Townsend, please begin.
 
Allison Townsend
- ICR - Senior Associate
 
Thank you operator, and good afternoon to everyone. Today's call is being recorded, and will be available for replay later today. Information on accessing this replay is available in today's press release. As a matter of formality, we would like to remind participants that remarks made by management during the course of this call may contain forward-looking statements about the Company's results and plans. These are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause the actual results and implementation of the Company's plans to vary materially. These risks and uncertainties are referenced in today's press release, as well as in the Company's most recently filed Form 10-Q. Finally, in these remarks we refer to adjusted earnings, which is a non-GAAP financial measure. A reconciliation of the non-GAAP measures we discuss today to GAAP measures are included in today's press release. At this time, I would like to turn the conference call over to your host, Mr. David Jaffe, President and CEO. David?
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thank you. Good afternoon, and thank you for joining us to discuss our fiscal third quarter. A challenging external environment, characterized by continued economic pressure on middle income consumers coupled with an unseasonally cold and long winter had a negative impact on traffic. Sales improved across all brands in Q4 to date compared to Q3; however, the late May and early June comps were choppy, suggesting that the improved trend may have been driven in part by pent-up demand from the cold Spring. With that background, let's look at the overall financials. Total comp sales for the third quarter were down 1%, reflecting a store comp decline of 4% and e-commerce sales increases of 37%. All of our brands except Catherine's had negative comps, driven predominantly by the environment I just described. The Lane Bryant and dressbarn were further impacted by merchandising misses. Adjusted EPS for the third quarter of $0.26 compared to $0.34 in the same quarter last year, driven primarily by the disappointing sales results.
 
 
 
I'd like to walk you through results for each of our five brands in a little more detail. At Justice, total comp sales were down 2% in the third quarter, with store comps down 4% and e-commerce up 27%. The store comp decline was driven by soft traffic and transactions; however, total revenue was up 4%, driven by new store growth. With regard to specific categories, accessories, denim, and casual pants were standout performers. Warm weather merchandise, such as shorts, tank tops, and warm weather footwear are key elements of Spring sales and underperformed during Q3. However trends on this merchandise, as well as total Justice brand sales, have rebounded in early Q4. Driven by new store growth, total Justice revenue was up 4% for the quarter. We took the cadence of promotion up versus last year with a marketing strategy that continues to focus on communicating value through both targeted loyalty programs and store-wide point-of-sale events. Justice executed three additional point-of-sale events during the quarter, including two flash sale events in which an additional 20% off was offered.
 
Recent consumer research indicates that Justice continues to be the market leader in the tween girls space. We continue to be encouraged by our progress on the Brothers rollout, which will be in 80 locations by August, but the locations open to date have seen no decline in the girls' business and are generating promising incremental boys' sales to date. We will continue to rollout this brand to additional locations in 2014, and will provide more detail on specific plans this Fall. We open 12 Justice stores, including two in Canada, and closed 9, ending the quarter with 961 stores versus 920 last year. The Justice expansion into Canada is also progressing well, with 25 stores targeted by the end of the Spring season. On average, the Canadian locations are outperforming the US locations in terms of both sales and profit.
 
Turning to Lane Bryant, Q3 total comp sales were down 1% to last year, driven by soft traffic and product assortment misses. Store comps were down 6%, with traffic and ADS down versus last year, partially offset by higher conversion. E-commerce continued to be strong at 39% growth versus last year. Although weather was a factor in traffic declines, product assortment is also an issue. We believe the assortment was overly broad, and that it was overweighted toward casual wear occasions. In addition, the fashion assortment was too basic and not on trend in a number of departments, including knits. Underperforming categories in addition to knit tops were premium denim and jewelry. Intimate apparel and activewear performed well relative to other departments. Fourth quarter comp sales trends to date have improved compared to the third quarter, reflecting positive consumer reaction to new merchandise, a more wear-now assortment, and a more customer-friendly approach to merchandising assortments to support outfitting.
 
We're seeing strong builds in intimates, knit tops, crops, and pants. In addition, Lane Bryant has adjusted its promotional strategy toward category-focused and occasion promotions aimed at increasing conversion and trial, compared to their historical strategy of providing layered discounts to regular customers. We revised promotion and marketing plans to insure that we end the season with the appropriate level of Spring goods. While those exit strategies will impact fourth quarter margins, we expect to show a better balance of fresh inventory as we start the Fall season. The Lane Bryant store count was 788 locations at the end of the quarter versus 801 last year. During the third quarter, we opened 18 new stores and closed 19.
 
Maurice's total comp sales were flat for the quarter with strong e-commerce growth of 37%, and store comps down to 3% due to soft traffic. In addition, total sales growth increased 5%, driven by new store openings. Cooler weather merchandise categories performed well in the quarter, including our woven tops, footwear, and wear-to-work blazers and vests. Warmer weather merchandise generally underperformed non-seasonal goods in Q3, but have improved their selling rate in Q4 to date. With respect to marketing, we had a comparable level of direct mail verts last year, with two mailers in the quarter, and an increase in key item promotions to drive traffic and conversion. For the fourth quarter, we are adding one direct mail piece, a postcard specifically directed to activate low frequency customers. Our Take 10 loyalty program continues to grow and we've increased the size of our e-mail database to 3.1 million. Additionally, the penetration of our private label credit card increased over last year, and is at approximately 36%.
 
We are very excited about the hiring of our new Chief Merchandising Officer, Erin Stern, during the third quarter. Erin is an outstanding merchant with the deep understanding of the Maurice's customer. She has over two decades of retail experience, including Chief Merchant for Juicy Couture, President of bebe Sport, and several senior merchandising positions at Old Navy. Our store base is now 862 locations at the end of the quarter versus 813 last year. During the third quarter we opened 14 new stores, including two in Canada and closed 2.
 
Dressbarn's total comp sales were down 6%, including a 7% decrease in store comps. However, the e-commerce channel remains strong, continuing its impressive growth, with a 56% increase for the quarter. The cooler weather patterns, specifically in the Northeast where dressbarn has a high concentration of stores, clearly affected our results and drove traffic down. Our outerwear blazers and Jones sportswear categories all performed well in Q3, all showing increased sales versus last year, reflecting the continued purchase of apparel for the cooler weather trends. Underperforming departments were centered mostly in warmer weather items in knits, bottoms, and dresses, and the misses were larger in cooler weather regions.
 
Dressbarn responded to the sales decline by reducing inventory levels and cutting discretionary expenditures for the season. Q3 ending inventory was down 4% versus last year, and will be managed considerably into the Fall. With regard to marketing, the major differences in Q3 compared to last year were the launch of the April Fashion Bug earlier to support Easter, and additional key item promotions to stimulate demand. Enrollment in our Blush Perks loyalty program is now at 5.5 million customers, up significantly from last year. In addition, our private label credit card market share is now at 30% of sales. The dressbarn store count is at 833 locations at the end of the quarter versus 838 last year. During the second quarter we opened 17 and closed 13 stores. On an organization note, dressbarn's Chief Merchandising Officer, Keith Fulsher, announced his retirement recently after 18 years with the Company. I want to personally thank Keith for his outstanding leadership and contribution to dressbarn's growth over the years. We began a search for Keith's replacement in April, and Keith will remain with dressbarn until his successor is onboard to insure a smooth transition.
 
 
 
 
Catherine's continue its strong performance with total comp sales growth of 10%, with store comp sales of 8% and 28% growth in e-commerce sales. Merchandise categories that performed well for the quarter include casual wovens, denim, and sweaters. The Catherine's marketing program was largely unchanged versus last year, and stayed focused on frequent mailers, nine this year and last. We did extend our Catherine's cash bounce back program, which was successful at generating increased sales. The penetration of our private label credit card has increased to 40%. The Catherine's store count is at 402 locations at the end of the quarter versus 430 last year. During the third quarter we closed seven stores.
 
Before I turn the call over to Dirk for a deeper dive in the numbers, I'll just say that this was obviously a challenging quarter, due both to the external environment and what we recognize as opportunities to improve our merchandising and marketing strategies. I'm pleased that we responded quickly to the near-term top line challenges by adjusting promotions in Q3 and Q4 to stimulate sales and clear inventory so that we will be well-positioned for late Summer and Fall, and have also cut expenses to partially offset sales declines. We continue to build talent infrastructure to support improvement in these areas as part of our overall strategy to drive sustainable, long-term sales and profit growth. With that, now Dirk will provide an update on financial highlights.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Thank you David, and good afternoon everyone. Before reviewing our third quarter results, it's important to note that this years quarterly earnings include certain financing and restructuring costs related to the Charming acquisition. We believe these costs are not indicative of ongoing operations for period-to-period comparisons. The results discussed in this call are adjusted to exclude those items which are described more fully in our press release. In addition, my comments on last year's quarterly results have been adjusted to include Lane Bryant, Catherine's, and Charming Shoppes overhead costs for comparison purposes, unless otherwise noted. Total quarterly net sales increased 46% to $1.142 billion. Of this amount, Lane Bryant and Catherine's accounted for substantially all of the sales growth versus last year.
 
As David mentioned, cooler than normal weather and a challenging external environment resulted in comp store sales below our expectations, due primarily to soft traffic, comp store sales were down 4%. In terms of sales by regional, all regions were negatively impacted by cooler than normal weather patterns, other than the West Coast, which had positive store comps versus last year. Our e-commerce business continues to be strong, increasing 37% year-over-year to $98 million, with lots of future growth opportunity. On a combined basis, total comp sales decreased 1%. Moving down the income statement, gross margin was $658 million, or 57.6% of sales. This compares to last year's adjusted gross margin of $665 million, or 58.8% of sales. The 120 basis point decline was primarily due to increased markdowns and promotional activity associated with a challenging environment.
 
Total Q3 buying, occupancy, and distribution costs were $208 million, or 18.2% of sales, compared to last year of $195 million or 17.3 percent of sales, reflecting deleverage on our negative comp sales. Total SG&A was $332 million, or 29.1% of sales. This compares to last year's $323 million, or 28.6% of sales. The increase of 50 basis points was primarily due to the duplicative overhead structure created by the acquisition, and we expect to significantly reduce our overhead over the next three years. Adjusted operating income decreased to $73 million, or 6.4% of sales. This compares to $109 million, or 9.7% of sales last year. Adjusted quarterly operating income results by brand, fully loaded for corporate overhead costs, were as follows.
 
Justice's operating income decreased 11% year-over-year to $21 million, or 7% of sales. This compares to prior year Q3 operating income of $23 million, or 8.1% of sales. The decrease was mainly due to the deleveraging of operating expenses, particularly in buying and occupancy. Lane Bryant came in with operating income of $5 million compared to $19 million in Q3 of last year. A decline in gross margin was driven by increased markdowns and was coupled with an increase in SG&A, due to the duplicative corporate overhead structure. Maurice's operating income decreased 8% versus last year to $35 million, or 14.8% of sales compared to prior year Q3 operating income of $38 million, or 16.9%. This is primarily driven by a deleverage of SG&A.
 
Dressbarn came in with operating income of $6 million, or 2.5% of sales, compared to prior year Q3 income of $24 million, or 8.9% of sales. The decline was driven by a decrease in sales in gross margin rates due to higher markdowns and promotional activity, along with a deleverage of buying and occupancy expenses. Catherine's operating income was $6 million, or 6.7% of sales, compared to operating income of $4 million, or 5.4% in the prior year, reflecting very strong performance for the quarter. The Company's effective income tax rate for the third quarter was 39.6% on an adjusted basis. This compares to a rate of 37.5% in last year's third quarter. Adjusted net income from continuing operations decreased 21% to $42 million, or $0.26 per diluted share. This compares to last year's adjusted net Income of $54 million, or $0.34 per diluted share.
 
 
 
 
Turning to the balance sheet, we ended the quarter with $206 million in cash and cash equivalents. Of this amount, approximately $150 million is overseas. We ended the quarter with long term debt of $156 million. Under an amended revolver agreement completed in March, we expanded our borrowing availability from $250 million to $500 million, and extended the maturity date to June of 2018. We subsequently prepaid the remaining $279 million outstanding principal balance of the term loan. This new facility will result in lower interest rates and greater flexibility. Combined with our strong cash flow generation, this new facility should meet our liquidity needs. Total inventory of costs was $538 million at the close of Q3, up 2% versus last year on an adjusted basis. However, we've adjusted promotional and clearance plans in the fourth quarter to position ourselves for a clean inventory position going into Fall, with targeted total inventory dollars below last year.
 
CapEx for the quarter was approximately $75 million. Full year fiscal 2013 CapEx is projected at $350 million, which includes the major multi-year projects we noted previously, the centralized store distribution facility, our e-commerce fulfillment center, and the ongoing IT transformation. In terms of unit development, we expect to finish the year with approximately 200 openings, and expect to close approximately 160 stores. A quick update on Charming Shoppes' exit strategies for Fashion Bug and the Figi's sale. We've essentially completed the liquidation of the Fashion Bug business, including the resolution of credit card liabilities, inventory liquidation, and lease terminations at roughly breakeven. We have a small number of leases outstanding as the only remaining exposure, which is immaterial. The Figi's marketing process is ongoing, and we have no further updates at this time on the status of the sale.
 
I'd now like to provide some thoughts on our outlook for Q4 and full year 2013. We are encouraged by improved May results across all our brands compared to Q3. Q4 quarter-to-date total comp sales were up low single digits. However, the late May and early June comps were choppy, suggesting that the improved trend may have been driven in part by pent-up demand from the cold Spring. We also believe that macroeconomic trends are negatively impacting apparel segment traffic. All of our brands are focused on adjusting promotional activities to insure that we end the fourth quarter with appropriate levels of Spring carryover merchandise, and we are conservatively positioning inventory for the Fall season. We have also reduced expenses where possible to offset the soft sales trends. We are reducing our fiscal 2013 earnings guidance of $1.20 to $1.30 per share to $1.10 to $1.15 per share, which excludes one-time financing and restructuring costs related to the Charming acquisition. Note that this assumes total comps for the balance of the fourth quarter in June and July in the range of flat to up low single digits. That concludes my financial comments, and I will now turn it back to David.
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Dirk. As we look toward 2014 and beyond, we feel very good about our ability to achieve sustainable top line and bottom line growth at all of our brands. I'm encouraged by the progress both the Lane Bryant and dressbarn teams are making on their broader repositioning plans. While this will happen incrementally over time, we are confident that we are on the right path for long-term improvement in both brands. We've been focused first on talent, and as we find Keith's successor CMO at dressbarn, this will be the last senior level position in our executive ranks to be transitioned.
 
In terms of margin improvement, we previously identified a $90 million long range opportunity through overhead reduction and cross-brand synergies. We are making solid progress toward that goal, and expect to see benefits from those efforts ramping up over the next few years. In closing, we have a view of the future that is very compelling, and our lead shift team is looking forward to growing the business and achieving that vision while it's generating superior shareholder returns. Our brands and shared services leadership teams look forward to providing a more detailed update on our long-range growth plans at our annual Investor Day on October 9 in New York. Thank you, and I'd now like to open up the call to your questions.
 
 
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
 
 
Operator
 
(Operator Instructions)
 
Your first question comes from the line of Taposh Bari with Goldman Sachs.
 
Taposh Bari  
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
Thank you, and good afternoon. Hey, David. I guess I just want to start with the comp progression. Last we heard from you, you were running flat through the end of March, which I would have imagined was the worst of retail. It sounds like things got worse in April. If you could just elaborate on that, and if you could just provide some more color as to what's happening in May, just to start?
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Without giving the specifics, April was tough. We've all followed the weather patterns and the reports from all the other retailers, and you see our final numbers for the quarter, which was clearly disappointing. And then May, you just -- you follow the weather again. The first three weeks in May were perfect, and for those of us that struggled through Memorial Weekend on the East Coast with sweaters on, it was a tough weekend. And as we said that last week in May and so far in June, the word we're using is choppy, which means in our vernacular that it's been up and down, and it's been inconsistent among the brands for various reasons that are specific to each brand. So we're not seeing that strong trend continue that we saw in the first three weeks of May, which frankly is disappointing. But there are reasons for it, and I hate to keep using the weather, but certainly Memorial Day weekend was not great. And as we look out, we feel we're in good shape and well-positioned, but it's hard to see what the consumer is doing.
 
One of the things that we've seen on a global level, and I'm sure you read the same reports, is that there seems to be a trend towards more durable good purchases and less consumer discretionary/ So as auto sales are up, and home sales and home furnishing sales are up, we're seeing the apparel segment, particularly at the moderate level, suffer a little bit. And one report I just saw on consumer debt formation showed it at lower levels than expected, and the vast majority of that, interestingly, was for auto loans, and only a tiny bit was for credit card, or private label credit card. So I think we're seeing some trends out there that may be shorter term in duration but it's certainly playing a little bit of havoc with our results, and we're going to be watching those really carefully as we round the corner and start heading into back-to-school and the Fall season.
 
Taposh Bari  
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
As you've progressed here into post-Memorial Day, have you seen promotions throughout the industry ramp up? Because it sounds like, looking at the way that things evolved through the first quarter, a lot of companies missed on their sales plan, given the weather. It seemed like promotions were fairly rational, but now that we're entering, call it this clearance period, are you seeing an increased level of markdowns across the space?
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We saw a bunch during Memorial Weekend. I'm sure there is always someone who's doing something, but it wasn't that pervasive, you walk down the mall and everybody during Memorial Weekend had these crazy sales. We're not seeing that to the same extent. So I'm hoping that people got their inventories in line and we aren't going to see that heavy promotional environment, which isn't good for anybody.
 
Taposh Bari  
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
Last one I have for you guys is the SG&A line. Obviously, a lot of wood to chop there. When should we start to see some leverage on SG&A as you work through some of these overhead opportunities?
 
Dirk Montgomery  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
 
 
 
 
Yes, Taposh. I would say into next Fall, and then over the next 12 to 24 months. I mean, as we've said before, some of the overhead reduction opportunities will just take time to implement, and we see them ramping up over the next 12 to 24 months.
 
Taposh Bari  
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
Okay. So are you saying next Fall is when we should start to expect SG&A leverage on a comparable basis?
 
Dirk Montgomery  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
We'll give a lot more detail on that when we talk about next year's guidance in the Fall, but I think we certainly see, as we talked about last year, ongoing opportunities for overhead reduction as we head into '14 and '15.
 
Taposh Bari  
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
Okay, thank you very much guys, good luck.
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Taposh.
 
Operator
 
Your next question comes from the line of Scott Krasik with BB&T Capital Markets. Please proceed.
 
Scott Krasik  
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Yes, hi everyone. Thanks for taking my question.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Hi, Scott.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Just wanted to drill down on Justice a little bit. If you combine Q3 with what you expect to do in Q4, maybe sort of low growth on a comp basis. I'm not sure exactly what you have implied in your guidance for the operating margin in Justice in the fourth quarter, but maybe talk about what your expectations are going forward from here. Is this business just a low comp business at this point? You talked about expanding margins in the past, but you're probably going to be sort of flattish for the year relative to last year. So how do you think about that now?
 
 
 
 
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, I think there have been some unique issues in the Justice business. We've talked, Scott, about how Easter is so important to the Missy customer at dressbarn and Lane Bryant. Well, Easter is right around Spring Break, and if that customer isn't going somewhere warm, or it's not warm out Spring Break, those sales suffer, as we saw in that third quarter. I think the business there is still very strong. I think that they've developed some new tools, like this flash sale, which has been able to drive high levels of engagement with the customer, as well as attract new customers.
 
So they've added another tool to their kit, and then finally we're rolling out Brothers. So there will be 80 stores for back-to-school, and what that does is, as you heard me say earlier, is create incremental volume. So we'll tell you more about the specifics on that in October, but as I look out, there's no reason why every store, maybe have to be relocated to expand, but there's no reason why every store can't have a Brothers shop in it, and if we continue to be successful in adding Brothers volume without impacting the girls' volume, that is going to be a very strong comp driver.
 
Scott Krasik  
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
You said that's historically, what, a mid- to high-single digit lift from Brothers on the comp?
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay, and so in terms of rolling it out, you've seen that as you've gone from 0 to 25 to 50 (inaudible)?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, yes. The point, though, is, remember that we only have a handful of those stores that are truly comp.
 
Scott Krasik  
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Right.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
So you get the initial incremental, and then we're watching them comp on themselves. So we see that business not just at initial incremental, but also as we continue to refine the merchandising and improve the word of mouth and other marketing that we're doing to support the building of the brand. We see that growing and becoming a very important addition to our business at Justice.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
 
 
Okay, that's interesting, thanks. And just last, Dirk, in terms of incentive compensation, I don't know if it moves the needle or not. I assume with a second guidance cut this year, that's probably going to be a lot lower year-over-year in the fourth quarter. Does that -- is that a meaningful number we should think about for Q4?
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Yes, it's worked into our guidance numbers. We actually adjust it as we go and true it up as we go. So I wouldn't say that necessarily year-over-year it's going to show you a significant benefit as we head into the fourth quarter, although I don't have my facts handy on what that actual expense was in the fourth quarter. But, I mean, certainly with our results being what they are, the overall incentive expense is going to be lower than it was last year.
 
Scott Krasik
- BB&T Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Okay. Thanks.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Scott.
 
Operator
 
Your next question comes from the line of Brian Tunick with JP Morgan. Please proceed.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Thanks. Good afternoon, guys.
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Hi Brian.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Two questions. Hey, Dave. I guess at the Analyst Day, the Lane Bryant business, I guess you say the lifestyle casual was 40% and wear-to-work was 20%, and then on the fashion level, core was over 50%. So I guess I was just wondering, what's the timing for Linda to make meaningful changes to those mixes, and how do you think about doing that without walking the core customer? And then the second question, maybe for Dirk, at the Analyst Day, a lot of discussion of the SG&A and the corporate overhead opportunities, but can you talk a little bit about the gross margin opportunities that you guys think longer term from a direct sourcing perspective, or leveraging of the vendor base, how big of an opportunity do you think that could be as you talk about that 12% EBIT margin goal that I think you guys have put out there?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
 
 
While Dirk is working his calculator magic here, on the LB side, Linda has already gotten in and has rolled up her sleeves, and I think it's more important to think about the selection of the merchandise rather than the balancing between various categories. So it may be, and Linda will talk more about this in October, that she doesn't change the breakdown that you just laid out, but within that breakdown of, say, of casual or wear-to-work or whatever, the product selection changes significantly.
 
So one of the things that she's doing is going out and talking to the consumer and doing a segmentation study to make sure we understand exactly who our customer is, and not go off of some old research or old assumptions, and then make sure we've got the appropriate products and styling that appeals to her. So it may be that there are a few customers that we walk, but by providing more of what our core customer wants and less of, as you heard me say earlier, of basic goods, which really are not fashion compelling, I think we are going to attract a much stronger customer base, as well as give that customer more of what she's looking for. So with that, let me turn it over to (Multiple speakers)
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Are you doing that survey --
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I'm sorry. Go ahead, Brian.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
I'm sorry, Dave. Are you doing that survey work now? Is that something you've done before? And where are those customers shopping today that you're trying to bring into Lane Bryant, or even reactivate?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, we don't have the final results, so I'll give you kind of top-of-mind, and then let Linda give you more detail on that in October, but conceptually, it's about taking customers that left the brand. Unfortunately, in any retailer, you lose a lot of your customers year-over-year. So we want to get those customers back, reactivate them. We want to get greater share of wallet from our existing customers, and as I say, if we offer more fashion that's attractive to her, I think we'll be successful in that. And then there are a lot of other retailers that sell large-size women's clothing that do a pretty good job of it, and we happen to own a couple of those other brands in dressbarn woman and Catherine's and Maurice's Plus. So it's very competitive out there. Large-size apparel isn't as neglected as it was 20 years ago. So we need to make sure, as being the icon in the industry with the number one specialty store market share, that we continue to build on that and bring those customers that may have migrated away from us to go to a big box or a discounter or what-have-you, back into the fold.
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
[All right], very helpful.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
So Brian, to answer your second question, in terms of the, I think your question was aimed at as we think about the overall overhead reduction and synergies potential that we talked about last fall, including the direct sourcing opportunity, where do we see that impacting the P&L? I mean, clearly the direct sourcing opportunity would impact gross margin. As we talked in the Fall, we need to get into the implementation of that to really truly determine what the upside is, but certainly we feel like there's a lot of upside as we fully implement that opportunity over the next few years. If you consider the list of the other ideas that were in the brand synergies list that we unveiled in the Fall, many of those items, particularly the DC consolidation and logistics opportunity, will actually hit lines other than what goes into gross margin. BD&O obviously would be impacted by the DC and the logistics benefits. We had estimated a long-term potential in that category in the range of $25 million to $30 million, which is significant, and it's the most significant idea that was on that page. Many of the other initiatives that we have ongoing will also affect SG&A. So I think it's going to be spread pretty evenly across the P&L, and our plan is to provide an update on our specific savings plans for 2014 as we head into Fall.
 
 
 
 
Brian Tunick
- JPMorgan Chase & Co. - Analyst
 
Terrific. Thanks very much. Good luck guys.
 
Operator
 
Your next question comes from the line of Alex Fuhrman with Piper Jaffrey. Please proceed.
 
Alex Fuhrman
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
Great. Thanks, guys. Curious to talk a little bit about some of the other ongoing initiatives that you have, particularly the bringing e-commerce fulfillment in-house? Especially with e-commerce up as much as it was during the quarter, I mean, are you seeing e-commerce growth accelerate more or less than you would have thought over the past year? And as it becomes so much of a bigger part of the business, how does the ability to bring that in-house from a fulfillment side really change your ability to interact with the stores and the e-commerce side and really create a multi-channel experience for the customer?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
First, I'm please that e-commerce is outperforming our plans at virtually all the brands. So continues to do well in all regards, and we are excited about the out look for those businesses as we continue to invest in them, both in terms of people and systems and what-not. The opportunity to bring e-commerce fulfillment in-house is primarily a cost saving opportunity, as well as it gives us more control and flexibility to deliver the level of service that we think is appropriate for our customers, which in some cases, frankly, is a little bit higher than what we're currently doing through third parties. So that's going to start rolling out brand by brand beginning next Spring. And the fact that things are strong there in the e-commerce business does not impact the timing or our ability to take on this function for the brands. What it does also do is as we start centralizing our e-commerce, our distribution, start migrating to more common platforms, it gives us the ability to implement more Omnichannel initiatives, such as store ordering, delivering to stores, being able to use the stores as a fulfillment center. All those things are very exciting. Some of the other retailers out there are maybe a little further ahead of us, but we are very focused on that, and I think we'll be catching up quickly.
 
Alex Fuhrman
- Piper Jaffray - Analyst
 
Great, that's very helpful. Thanks, and good luck.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Alex.
 
Operator
 
 
 
Your next question comes from the line of Oliver Chen with Citibank. Please proceed.
 
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Hi, good afternoon.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Hi, Oliver.
 
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Regarding your comp guidance and for the flat to low single digit, was the improvement pretty evenly split across your banners, or were there any characterizations you could provide there? Also, with the merchandise misses you called out at Lane Bryant and dressbarn, could you just help us prioritize how we can get a little bit more comfortable that you're on the right track with respect to the improvement in merchandise? That would be great, thank you.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Sure. I probably would say that a rising tide lifts all ships. So while some of them in the third quarter were down more than others, the amount of improvement (inaudible) was relatively the same. So the guys that were still a little bit of a laggard, stayed a little bit -- like dressbarn had a tough third quarter and their business is still a little bit tough. Not as tough as it was, and that was seemingly consistent among all the brands, with a little bit of exception. Lane Bryant got a little bit better. So we'll see how the rest of the season plays out. On the second point, I think Oliver, this is one where we've been spending a lot of time, with the focus at dressbarn and Lane Bryant's has been to drill down on the merchandise based on the past misses, or in Lane Bryant's case, the addition of Linda to be focusing on products, with maybe a fresh eye, and there have been changes made.
 
There's been product that's been moved out quickly at aggressive prices to clear it, and there's other product that maybe we've said gee, this isn't going to work for us, let's not cut it, let's make it into something else. And the reality is that as you bring on new products, it's always a risk. You don't know. We feel much better about it, and the customer is going to tell us whether or not she likes it. So we're watching it very carefully, and where we can, we're out there testing product to get a read on it, and then we can go back and bring it in, in a big way for later in the season or the next season, and react to those trends that we're seeing on a test basis.
 
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Thank you, and just as a follow-up, you mentioned in your press release that you're adjusting your promo plans to insure the Spring inventory balances are in good shape. How do we triangulate that with how we think about gross margin? Is the runway that you experienced here sort of the range which we should expect it to be next quarter?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, I think what you heard Dirk say earlier is that -- and myself, we're going to have some gross margin impacts from clearing some of the products, like I just mentioned at Lane Bryant's. So yes, you will see an impact on margin. We can't quantify it for you, but I think we are going to have a little bit of a hit there overall, and the result is going to be that we're going to have clean inventories. That's the most important thing, but all our best guesses have been factored into the guidance that Dirk give you a minute ago.
 
 
 
 
 
Oliver Chen
- Citigroup - Analyst
 
Thank you, guys. Best regards.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Oliver.
 
Operator
 
Your next question comes from the line of Edward Yruma with KeyBanc.
 
Edward Yruma  
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Hi. Thanks for taking my question. You indicated, right, weather weighed on the quarter. You also indicated pressures on the middle income consumer. Are you adjusting your buy plans for the remainder of the calendar year should some of this weakness be a little bit more permanent than perhaps weather?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes. I think that's a really good question, Ed, because as we look at the pressures, and I don't want you to think that we believe that the middle income consumer is economically constrained. If that was the impression we gave, I want to correct that. I think it's a shift out of discretionary, or like out of apparel into durables, and we've seen this in a number of areas, and I mentioned some of it on one of my earlier question's responses, and I think consumer confidence is at a five-year high. Credit is -- consumer credit is in good position. So I think that this trend to durables may last for a little while, and as we look at Fall, we have not finalized our budgets, but we are certainly looking at those trends in light of our Fall expectations.
 
So what I would tell you is, as in the past where there have been apparel slowdowns, either due to a shift or due to tough economic times, we tended to have done reasonably well because of the trade-down effect. We are a middle or moderate retail group of moderate retail chains, and we are promotional. So a lot of times we get the benefit of people shifting out of the department stores or the mall specialty stores, and as much as we lose some of our customers down another notch to lower level, or they shop a little bit less from us, we have tended not to get the big ups and downs in a tough economic cycle or a durable shift. So we'll certainly look at it very carefully, but I would -- I'm not expecting that we're going to be planning our comps negative for Fall at all.
 
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
I got it, and one follow-up. I believe you said that you were relatively pleased with the performance at Catherine's. I think initially you had characterized this as kind of a gift with purchase. How do we think about the longer term strategic positioning of the brand? Does that work, kind of dovetail with the work that you're doing at Lane Bryant? Thanks.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
They are actually in very different positions. I would say Catherine's is a year or so ahead of where Lane Bryant is going, just because they started the process earlier. I am very pleased with what is going on at Catherine's and the leadership from Joan and Brett. They are doing a wonderful job. The team has really come together and focused on this customer in a way that's producing really terrific results. So as you may recall, after the recession, as a result of the recession, they had dropped from $750,000 a store to about $600,000. They are well on the way back up there, but they have still a couple more good years to go. So they are clearly focused on getting back to that $750,000, and when they are able to do that, it will be another discussion about whether or not we should be rolling the chain out or expanding it or what-have-you, but clearly that's something that's on hold for now until they're able to execute their three-year plan of getting back to the $750,000 level.
 
 
 
 
Edward Yruma
- KeyBanc Capital Markets - Analyst
 
Got it. Thanks so much.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Ed.
 
Operator
 
Your next question comes from the line of Mike Richardson with Sidoti. Please proceed.
 
Mike Richardson
- Sidoti & Company - Analyst
 
Yes, hi. Thanks for taking my call. Just two real quick questions. The first one is, can you remind us where you see the store count by brand for this year? And the second one would be, obviously you guys paid down some debt the last couple of quarters. Just how should we thinking about that going forward? Thanks.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Sure. So as far as the store counts by brand, I can give you all that offline after the call, just because it will be a little bit detailed. Can you repeat your second question? Was it around our anticipation over debt paydown?
 
Mike Richardson
- Sidoti & Company - Analyst
 
Yes.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Sure. So, I mean, I think our plans, as we have done historically, we want to have a conservative balance sheet with low debt in an effort to allow us to actually be opportunistic for future opportunities, and really to just make sure that we have ample liquidity as we go through this next -- really the next full year of significant infrastructure investment on some of these projects that are going to drive synergies. All that said is we have excess cash. A priority for us will be to pay down debt over the next year or two as a top priority for excess cash.
 
Mike Richardson
- Sidoti & Company - Analyst
 
Great. Thank you very much. Good luck.
 
 
 
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thank you, Mike.
 
Operator
 
Your next question comes from the line of Matt Temple of Avondale Partners.
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
Hi guys. This is Matt for Mark. I just wanted to touch on your e-commerce business now that it's becoming kind of a larger portion of total sales. And specifically in the quarter, when you guys look at such a big increase in such kind of a difficult weather environment, how do you guys think of -- was that inflated by the fact that consumers stayed home and did more shopping online, or do you look at that as a suppressed number as well with potential to grow higher, kind of like your in-store count?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well certainly, Matt, e-commerce has got a wonderful upward trend, and we see that continuing at all brands. So was it boosted or suppressed by the weather? Historically people would tell you that in bad weather people do shop more online or via catalogs because they don't want to go out. In this case, I'm not so sure because in Spring they're buying to wear now, and it was cold, so there was no big demand to wear now. So I don't think you saw a distorted number one way or the other. But as we look out, again let me emphasize that I see continued double digit growth in e-commerce at the brands.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Yes, I mean, as we look into Q4, the trend of the e-commerce growth versus last year is very much in line with the year-to-date average so far. So I think we feel very good about our opportunities to continue to grow it.
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
Have you given like a long term goal for like a potential e-commerce penetration?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
We haven't given one specifically, but what I would tell you generically is that in our brands where e-commerce is more established and been around for a longer time, such as Lane Bryant and Catherine's, you're in the mid-teens. So it's a very healthy number, whereas the brands that are newer to e-commerce, dressbarn is only 2.5 years, Maurice is 3.5 years, its got a much lower penetration, but its got wonderful ramp-up. So down the road can they all be a certain number? I'm not going to sit here and try and give you a projection for each brand, other than to say that we're not sure, given the existing technology, we're not sure where that limit to growth is, but clearly the consumer likes e-commerce, and as we talk briefly a minute ago about Omnichannel, she likes the ability to be able to buy online and deliver in the store, or if she's in the store, we don't have her size or color, to be able to order in the store. So that's back to what we had talked about on the last call. Where it starts getting blurry. and where we start looking at comps for brick-and-mortar and e-commerce and they get a little gray as to which one is which, and over time I think that you're going to see that continue.
 
 
 
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
I have one last one on your flash sales. When do you send those out in relation to when the sale begins?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
The night before.
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
And those are for store only or is that e-commerce as well?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes, it's both.
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
Did those drive incrementally higher profit dollars this quarter?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Yes.
 
Unidentified Participant
Analyst
 
Thanks, guys.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Matt.
 
Operator
 
Your next question comes from the line of Janet Kloppenburg with JJK Research. Please proceed.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
 
 
 
Hi David, hi Dirk, how are you?
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Hi, Janet.
 
Janet Kloppenburg  
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Hi. I got on a little bit late, you guys, but I was looking at the performance at dressbarn, and I know that weather was -- I have great appreciation for what weather did to business in this quarter, but I was just thinking about the performance of the brand over the last several quarters, and it seems to be having some difficulty. And I'm just wondering if you could help me better understand in what categories of business that might be, and if the modernization of the brand is on the course you expected it to be, or if you need to tweak that positioning a bit? Thanks so much.
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I think that's a fair call-out. We were not thrilled with our business at dressbarn in the third quarter. There were not a lot of stand-out categories, and we think that there is some tweaking to our positioning, and we started that work, Janet, and we'll see over the next three to six months a lot of soul searching as to who our customer is, what she's looking for, how she wants to be spoken to, styles that she likes, what level of fashion, types of promos, types of communication, et cetera. So we're really kind of starting with a blank slate, and Jeff has assembled primarily a brand new team at the executive leadership level, and he's really encouraging a rethinking.
 
So as we mentioned earlier, we're looking for a CMO, and that will be the last link that we need. In the meantime the work continues, and we have two strong women that have come in, one the Head of Marketing, one Head of Creative, that are working very well together with Keith for now, and then with his replacement at the right time, that are beginning this process of rethinking dressbarn's merchandise and positioning. So I feel very confident that they're on the right track. It's not going to happen overnight, but I was, as an example, just at a style-out for Fall sweaters, which you may recall was a real problem last year.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
I do.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
And I feel much, much more confident in what they're going to have on the floor this upcoming Fall versus what we had last Fall. So I think they're doing the right things. They are going slow and steady, and that's what we need to win the race here. Similar to what we've seen at Catherine's and their wonderful turnaround, and what I think is going on at the same time at Lane Bryant.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Okay, and I just had a follow-on. I know that Justice's operating margins for the year, I think they're up year-over-year, but maybe ticked down a little bit in the third quarter. I'm just wondering if the plan is for Justice's operating margins, I mean, if you think it's realistic that they can stay as healthy as they are, or because of the competitive situation that we should think that they may be under a little pressure going forward, David.
 
 
 
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Sure, Janet. It's Dirk.
 
Janet Kloppenburg  
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Hi, Dirk.
 
Dirk Montgomery  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Hi. The third quarter was clearly negatively affected.
 
Janet Kloppenburg
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Seasonal.
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
By sales being down. I think we feel like they actually ought to be able to maintain their margins over time as we head into the future, so not a big concern.
 
Janet Kloppenburg  
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Okay, so more weather-related than competitive-related as far as the -- yes, okay. Thanks.
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
The one sidebar --
 
Janet Kloppenburg  
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Go ahead, David.
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
(Multiple speakers) Is that the flash sales have been very, very successful, and as we've talked before, you're benefiting gross margin dollars at the slight expense of gross margin percent. So when we look at operating margin dollars, we'll see continued growth, and although you're getting more dollars that will leverage the other expenses, your gross margin is going to get a little bit of a hit, and those are going to playoff against each other. So while we're very --
 
 
 
 
Janet Kloppenburg  
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
But the operating margin leverage should be -- the expense leverage should offset that gross margin percent? Yes, I've got it. Thank you.
 
Dirk Montgomery  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
And despite the poor third quarter, I mean, their margins actually are still hanging in there relative to last year.
 
Janet Kloppenburg  
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
No, I think they are up on a nine-month basis.
 
Dirk Montgomery  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Yes, they are.
 
Janet Kloppenburg  
- JJK Research - Analyst
 
Thank you.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Thanks, Janet.
 
Operator
 
Your next question comes from the line of Taposh Bari with Goldman Sachs.
 
Taposh Bari
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
Hey, just a quick follow-up. Dirk, can you give us the pro forma gross margin buying, BD&O and SG&A rates for 4Q '12?
 
Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
Yes, we can handle that on the debrief call after this, Brian. Taposh, sorry.
 
Taposh Bari
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
 
 
Okay. Just one other one just to follow-up on Janet's question while I have you. These flash sales at Justice, I think some of the anxiety out there, I would say is that 20% off of 40%, and then 30% off of 40%. So is this a slippery slope in your opinion? And then secondarily to that, are you driving these flash sales from a position of defense, or are these more kind of aggressive actions on your part?
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Well, I would say that it does both. So we use it as an offensive tool, because as we've mentioned before, it's an opportunity to attract new customers and get greater share of our existing customers. So it's offensive in that way, and it can be used defensively as we just did a promo, a flash sale last weekend, and it was more defensive there in that, as you see the numbers. We're a little behind plan after the tough Q3, and so this was an opportunity to use it to clear inventory. So it can be used both ways because it does drive that consumer in the store. I do not think it's a slippery slope. I think it's something, it's a tool in your kit, and it's something that Mike and his team are using very thoughtfully. In addition, they're looking at other tools so that they don't have to wear this one out.
 
So in July you'll see other offer early in the month that we're pretty excited about, and it's the first time we've done it in brick-and-mortar, and we'll see what the results are. We're optimistic about it, but I think the challenge is to make sure that we keep coming up with new tools, new handles to attract that customer, create a call to action both for our existing customer as well as the passerby. You may remember that the average Justice customer, because it's a tween-focused business, isn't a customer for very long before she grows out of it. So we're constantly losing customers. On the other hand, we're constantly getting new ones in, and so we've got to make sure to attract those new ones in, and there's nothing like a big event, point-of-sale event in the store window to get them to cross the threshold.
 
Taposh Bari
- Goldman Sachs - Analyst
 
Well, thank you.
 
Dirk Montgomery  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - EVP and CFO
 
All right, thanks.
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
I think we're out of time, operator.
 
Operator
 
And we have no additional questions in queue.
 
David Jaffe  
- Ascena Retail Group Inc - President and CEO
 
Great. Well, I want to thank everyone for their interest. We'll have our end of year call in late September, and then again to remind you, just a week or two then on October 9, we'll have our Investor Day, and we hope to see all of you there. In the meantime, everyone have a very enjoyable summer. Thank you.
 
Operator
 
Ladies and gentlemen, this concludes today's conference. Thank you for your participation. You may now disconnect. Have a great day.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ASNA/ASNA-8K-20130613163221.txt.gz
TIME:20130613163221
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
_________________________
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
June 12, 2013 Date of Report (date of earliest event reported)
_________________________
 
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
30 Dunnigan Drive
Suffern, New York 10901
 
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
(845) 369-4500
 
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
_________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
  
On June 12, 2013, Ascena Retail Group, Inc. (the Company) participated in Piper Jaffrays 33 Annual Consumer Conference.
rd
A transcript of the presentation is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 which is incorporated by reference herein.
  
The information in Item 7.01 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
  
(d) .
Exhibits
 
 
SIGNATURES
  
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
  
ASCENA RETAIL GROUP, INC.
(Registrant)
 
 
Date: June 13, 2013
 
 
 
By:
/s/ Jay Levine____________________
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
 
 
  
   
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
 
 David Jaffe
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO
 
 Dirk Montgomery
Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CFO
 
 
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
 
 Neely Tamminga
Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst
 
 
 PRESENTATION
  
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst
 
 Good morning again. My name is Neely Tamminga, Piper Jaffray and the Senior Research Analyst for specialty retail and multi-branded retail. And it is a privilege to have with us the Ascena Retail Group team. Blessed by another year of participation, Mr. Jaffe for being with us today. We have with us President and CEO David Jaffe and the recently named EVP and CFO Dirk Montgomery, who came just recently from Bloomin' Brands. And so, we just want to chat a little bit about Ascena Retail Group. It is, as most of you probably know, a one of the largest specialty retailers in the nation -- in the US, with 3,800 stores across multiple nameplates including dressbarn, maurices, Justice, Catherines and Lane Bryant and no longer Fashion Bug.
 
So, if we could maybe just kick off our conversation a little bit with how you are feeling about the consumer. That would be probably a thing that's top of mind on a lot of people's minds right now.
  
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO
 
  Sure that'd be great. Thanks everyone for attending. It's very warm and crowded in here. We are feeling good overall about the consumer. I think the economy is taking root. It feels like things are strengthening albeit at a very slow and gradual pace. The challenge we see out there for our business and the industry is that it feels like there is a durable trend going on. So, when you look at some of the data points and I'm sure you all know, but this is going to remind you auto sales are up, home sales are up, new starts are up, home furnishing sales up. So, even on the credit side, the last credit report I saw on new credit formation talked about the credit being formed was primarily for new auto fills. So, it's very, very little credit cards credit being formed out of the stuff that we care about. So, it feels like the consumer is in a better place to than she was a year-ago and she is using that confidence to replace her car, upgrade her home or living room or whatever it might be. And so we see ourselves competing more directly with the durable goods side of the industry that we did a year-ago. So, what that means for our industry is, as always, it's very competitive and yet even with the payroll tax and the bad weather that we've talked -- all of us saw early the spring we've seen resilience in that customer and it all gets down to whether or not you have the right products at an attractive price.
 
So again, we believe that our five brands are all well positioned. All five of them are focused on fashion and they are all value oriented. They all have their own promotional cadence that they run; it's all about value to that moderate customer.
  
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst  
 
 Thank you David. Can you talk a little bit about kind of -- you just reported your quarter and I think it's important because I know from the feedback I've had as there's been some confusion around kind of where current trends really are. You had indicated I think on the call that you are up low-single digits in the current quarter but maybe a little bit of understanding around the cadence that kind of played out that you're describing?
 
  
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
 
 
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO
 
 Let me start off and then I'll turn over to Dirk. I think the word we used on the call was choppy. So, since the beginning of our fourth quarter in May, we've had good results and then you'll have a week of not-so-good results. So, I hate to keep using that the weather word, but any of us that went away for Memorial weekend knew it was cold and seasonally cold and that doesn't help our business. So, that's where the choppiness comes in. We had some very good business first three weeks of May and we were pleased across all brands. It may have been that some of that was the pent-up demand from the cold spring or maybe just this customer coming back in the beautiful weather and then we saw it go away again and so it's been a little choppy. And as we look out, we don't have the confidence to say "Oh! The business is going to get right back to where it was at the beginning of May." And so that's why Dirk made his comments about the guidance.
 
  
 
 Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CFO
 
 Correct and so I think overall, we see an improvement in trend across all the brands from Q3 to Q4. It has been choppy but all of our brands saw improvement from the Q3 trend to the Q4 trend. Also brick and mortar comps are up quarter-to-date. So we've got a little bit of variability, but I think we're encouraged by the fact that the trend has much improved in Q4 versus Q3.
 
  
 Neely Tamminga  
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst
 
 That's helpful, but give some clarification. We've had the good privilege of finding some time together recently and one of the things that I recently was very continue to be impressed by is you might as well just have the head of HR title as well and you've been doing a lot of hiring of people. So, can you talk a little bit about kind of what -- how you've been spending your time and some of the talent that you've been bringing in at the various different brands within the organization?
 
  
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO 
 
 Just for those not -- maybe you're not quite familiar with Ascena, we're a holding company. So, Ascena is up here and we've got the five brands as well as our six internal brands, I call a shared services group and that structure really requires you to have great leadership at each brand because on the front-end perspective they're completely independent.
 
So, to start off with Lane Bryant, we had an opening there for about six months and we were recruiting for someone and we're able to bring in Linda Heasley, who was the former head of Limited Stores and she's done a great job, off to a fast start and while no -- there are no promises I know we're on the right track and we feel very confident in her ability and she has really galvanized that team.
 
Dirk has joined us since January, since ICR, that's his first day. So Dirk has come from a background where he served both within the limited organization at a brand at Express, and also at the holding company level with Bloomin' Brands. So, we've got someone that really understands both sides of the equation and from day one, he's been adding tremendous value.
 
We hired a CIO who comes in again with the shared service background. And he's been on board for about three months now. A little over a year-ago, we brought on our COO, who is driving the integration, not just of Charming, but of all our legacy brands and leading the investment that we're making in our expanded DC, I think of letting you know we're taking one DC expanding. So, it'll be the single point of distribution for all of our brick and mortar stores and we're converting another DC into an e-commerce fulfillment center. So, we'll be taking our outsourced model and in-sourcing it for all five brands and both of those ramp up starting next spring. So, pretty exciting and the only other HR position or role that we're still looking for is we just learned that our CMO, Chief Merchandising Officer at the dressbarn division has said he wants to retire. He'll stay with us for a transition and so we're out there interviewing for that position as we speak.
 
 
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
 
 
 
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst 
 
 And that's really the last major hole. I mean you, the Head of Sourcing, you've done --
 
  
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO 
 
 maurices and I had their CMO filled a couple months ago with woman named Erin Stern with terrific background. So, we feel pretty good. Not only have we filled the positions, but we brought in Major League talents talent and I think they're going to do great job in their roles.
 
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst 
 
 You've been busy. You've been busy.
 
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO 
 
 Busy time.
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst  
 
 Could you walk us through a little bit of some of the major buckets? I mean this is -- we'll review some for sure, but this is so key to the story of integrating the Charming Shoppes acquisition, what are some of the major buckets of opportunity in terms of synergy as well as just overhead reduction? What have you -- what should we be looking for the next couple of months?
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO  
 
 So, let me start again on the high level and then I'll turn it over to Dirk to get into some of the details. The first thing we need to do is take our disparate systems and try and put everyone on the common platform. So, we're in the process of doing that which will enable us to go to the one DC, the one fulfillment center, one POS system for the entire Ascena. And that's in process as we speak, it's going smoothly. They're building, they're writing code so nothing to report other than we're on track and on budget. Once we get below that massive project level, there is 17 other streams of people and let Dirk talk a little bit about how we're bringing them together.
 
  
 Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CFO 
 
 Yes, so around -- we sort of have at a high level two big buckets of opportunity. We've got an overhead reduction opportunity that we identified last fall of $50 million and then roughly $40 million in synergies. And then within that synergies total, the DC and logistics opportunity that David talked about we think should be the long-term worth about $30 million in value and then we've got a number of the other synergistic scale leverage initiatives that account for another $10 million and it's pretty straightforward stuff honestly. It's consolidating our benefit platforms, its further leveraging scale and purchasing across all areas. It's our direct sourcing opportunity, which is a big opportunity. We have not yet to quantify what we think that'll be worth because it's going to take us some time to actually fully realize the opportunity and actually figure out well how much is it worth, but that's -- we've shown that as a TBD, but that is a significant opportunity for us. And then there's a whole host of other areas that we're going after which are pretty -- there are things that other people have done before, we haven't done them yet. So, consolidating our insurance platform, lease administration, things of that nature. So, we've got a long list of projects, but I think we feel really good about our -- the long-term opportunity that adds to $90 million in those two areas over the next few years.
  
 
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
 
 
 
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst  
 
 Could you talk about brands a little bit and get into some of the specifics, but before we transition there, if I'm hearing this right, the top really integration priority is probably on the DC side, the fulfillment you've got that how we should be thinking about it? Spring 2014's a big deal.
 
  
 
David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO 
 
 Yes. The savings aren't going to come like that, because we're going to roll one brand in after another. So it'll be gradual as Dirk said, but that's where the heavy lifting is right now. We're spending just on the two project loan of about $150 million. So, we're expecting good return on that investment, but we're kind of focused on getting that done, getting that right and then we can kind of move onto other projects.
 
  
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst 
 
 Okay. That's helpful. So, let's dip a little bit into the brands. Lane Bryant, what did you see a year or two years ago David when you're looking at that business? What attracted you to Lane Bryant and Catherines businesses and what excites you going forward about them?
  
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO  
 
 Well, I keep kidding everyone that Catherines was our gift of purchase. We hadn't spent a lot of time focusing on Catherines and frankly didn't know whether it was going to be a keep or not. So, just a moment on that. They're doing very well, we're really pleased with the progress they're making. They've have great leadership there. They've repositioned that brand, they're growing above our expectations, above their plan. And having said that, they still have two more years to go of that type of performance before we would be ready to say, "Okay, now we'll start opening up more stores." So, they're making money, they're cash flow positive. Significantly it just is a very small business and we want to make sure they're firmly established before we consider are taking it there.
 
So going back to Lane Bryant, we've been in the large size business with dressbarn women forever. So, we've watched our competition very carefully and they've always been hit, they are the brand in specialty store large size retailing. So, as time is going on and we watch out -- in my opinion, they've been under-managed and perhaps inconsistent in their approach to the customer, they've kind of gone one direction and then a year later they'll switch gears and offer something else and kind of confuse the customer. So, I always thought it was a great opportunity to take an iconic brand and free it up a little bit and help it focus on its customer and through our shared services model, be able to take off some of that excess overhead that Charming had and enable them with the right leadership to grow to that preeminent role that I think they deserve.
 
So, as the due diligence went on, the first thing we did was go out and do market research. So, it's interesting that I think that it worked -- but it's really not what I think or what our team thinks or what customer thinks. So, we've been both on a qualitative and quantitative research and the interesting thing was, for all these people that we spoke to some were left customers, current customers and aware but not customers. It came across consistently as the number one brand, it was my go-to brand for large size and then they would talk about their complaints about it, their prices are too high, their fashion is too dowdy on and on but they still love that brand. They love the service, they love what the brand stands for, they love that it's an exclusive store for large size and so to me, it was just a timing and the rough and if you could focus on what that customer wanted, you could clean it up and bring that business back to the level that it should be, in the level that it was at maybe ten years ago.
 
  
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
 
 
  
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst  
 
 And you alluded to Linda Heasley's arrival, even pleased with her so far kind of assessing this business. What do you think are like the one or two sort of high level things that she is doing to help the Lane Bryant business around?
  
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO 
 
 I think more than anything else, Linda is focusing the merchandise team on the customer. So in the old days, it was more what we know better and we have an expression give the customer what you want, not what you think she needs. And I think they've kind of gotten away from that under prior management. And so now Linda is much more thoughtful in directing the merchandise team to focus on the trends, focus on what the customer wants, focus on delivering an exciting floor set and not just stuff that than they may have seen in the year before or stuff that's got a little tweak to it, but really isn't very exciting. I think that's already happened and where she's been able to make her mark in a few purchases or few things, we've seen the results and I think we'll see more of it for sure in fall and definitely at holiday it should be mostly Linda.
  
 
 
Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst  
 
 Okay, that's great, that's helpful. So let's switch gears a little bit and talk about the Justice business as well. I think that Justice I think has definitely driven itself up to just be this great niche business. I mean if you're nine years old, you've love Justice that's just nowhere else, it's the only place to be. So, can you talk a little bit about kind of some the evolution of the flash sale and the decision points around that. I know that in my investor conversations that frequently will come up as the potential point.
  
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO
 
 Justice is now firmly established as the market leader. For last three or four years, they kept growing, growing, growing and now they've surpassed Walmart and Target. So, they are the number one leader in this tween niche and it's been through a lot of hard work and a lot of focusing on the consumer, on that girl. So that's what really separates this brand from some of the other places out there whether it's PS or Children's Place or Gap Kids, whatever. It's truly focused on this little girl and we'll get to Brothers in a minute. So one of things that happened when we first took over and acquired them is they had developed -- they've converted number of -- all the Limited Too stores to Justice stores. And so, they had one chain and the way they wanted to get excitement about the product and get people in called action was through this 40-off and it worked very well. And so, 40-off became the new mantra and whatever it is 98% of their sales are done on some form of 40-off whether it's the POS event or some type of bounce back.
 
So, as time is going on, Mike Rayden who runs this, brilliant merchant has said "Okay, that's great. Now, we need the next new thing." And the next new thing was the flash sales. So, what he's offering is another 20% off on top of the 40, which for those of who don't know retail map, it's not 60% is actually 52% off and re-architected his business to enable that to be profitable and just as profitable as it used to be. So, what we've seen is when we do these flash sales we get a big bump. So, you get incremental volume, you get a slight decrease in margin rate as you would expect, but we're attracting in new customers. So, they are new to the file and then we can target them and we find once we've got them in, they perform just like our regular customers. So, we're converting people and that may be the kind of the straw that broke the camel's back to finally get mom to come in, because now it's 20 and 40 mom, come on take me in. And as a result, we end up with more gross margin dollars after these events, more customers and a slightly lower rate. So, as we say, you know to pay your bill with dollars now right.
 
  
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst  
 
 Exactly.
  
 
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
 
 
 
 
 Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CFO 
 
 And I would add that their gross margin rate as a business actually is up slightly, flat to up slightly. So, in the scheme of things -- even though these promotions are you know rate dilutive a little bit, in the scheme of things, they're doing all the right things. They're growing sales, they're growing their margin, they're growing margin dollars. So it's just part of the overall formula to drive traffic.
  
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst 
 
 And you want to talk a little bit about Brothers and kind of what some of the excitement there?
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO  
 
 So, Brothers will have 80 stores or shops and stores by back-to-school. And we've been testing it -- a couple years ago, we tested online learned a lot, started testing it into ten stores, learned a lot, now we'll started rolling it out. Still learning a lot and still staffing it up. So, it's not like we've figured out yet. But the good news is that the stores where we have Brothers in does not see a degradation in girls business. So the fear was, "Oh! You're taking that space away. You're bringing in those yucky boys. It's going to hurt the Justice business" And we found out, it doesn't. There is no drop off and it performed at the same level as the balance of the fleet. It's not even slightly higher. So, what that says is, you're getting completely incremental volume from your Brothers addition. So, that volume right now is high-single digits. It's really just starting. We think there is significant potential there to go higher, don't know what that looks like. Obviously with these small cuttings, margin is low, so there is clearly going to be a significant increase in margins as we ramp that up. So, this will be a significant driver to the Justice business over the next five years as we roll out Brothers to all the stores.
 
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst 
 
 We'll hear maybe more of that in some --
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO 
 
 If not on the call, we're doing an Investor Day, October 9th and we'll certainly have Mike up to talk more about that.
 
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst 
 
 That's exciting. We'll be polling for some questions here shortly. I do want to still cover off dressbarn. So, be thinking about questions if you have some. You mentioned the Chief Merchant change over at dressbarn, what else is on deck for dressbarn (inaudible) when you're meeting with that team? What are some of their initiatives over of the next kind of 12-24 months?
 
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO
 
 Well, I think they've had some missed ups and they've brought in, over the last year or two, virtually an entirely new executive leadership team and they have a lot of new ideas and thoughts and before they go off in any direction what they have said is, let's pull back and they're doing a massive marketing study. So, right now, they're in middle of segmentation aspect of it to look at customer base, who's shopping where, who should we be focusing on and that's kind of the summer project. So, I think certainly by the October meeting, they'll have a lot more to say about where they're going to putting your energies and how they see their business develop. Right now, it's disappointing. We talked before about disappointment in the fall, based on a sweater mistake of that poor merchandising. And I think the spring has just been a little bit softer across the board. Some of it obviously was weather, but I think even as weather came back -- improved, but still maybe just a little bit below where we would like to see it. And I don't know if there's any one thing and that's why this study, which will obviously bring in you know merchandising, marketing, promos etcetera. It's going to be so important to reposition that brand as a necessary.
  
 
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
 
  
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst 
 
 And you have made some changes there too beyond just merchant stuff, right. I mean you have a new Head of Creative right as well.
 
  
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO 
 
 Yes, the whole leadership team, exactly, marketing, creative --
 
  
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst  
 
 Marketing, creative --
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO  
 
 We're building rather -- let Jeff talk more about it in October, but we're building a design capability and at maurices as well that they never had before. So, as they start morphing from purely or primarily market driven to be able to design goods themselves, they'll be able to really laser focus on the customer in the look that they're trying to develop.
 
  
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst 
 
 Let's assume it goes right back into some of Dirk's color around the direct sourcing initiative as well, right. I mean that's kind of the -- you need to get that set up, okay. So, are there any questions from the audience right now? Yes over here.
 
 
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
 
 
Exhibit 99.1
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
 
 
 Unidentified Audience Member 
 
 I have a question dude. You have an interesting holding company structure and you have (inaudible) most of the people in place that you want. I don't think you're going to be doing any acquisitions near-term. So, where do you spend more time over the next year or two to create value for the organization?
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO  
 
 Well, hopefully I'm creating value every day. But where I'd spend my time is working with each brand at a high level. So I don't go in and micro-manage them, but I speak with all the leaders every week, talk about the issues, it could be a high-level issue with marketing or it could be personnel issue with one of their people. And then once a month Dirk and I are on the phone with them and their CFO going through the open it by and the monthly financials and then quarterly, we do a review, we call them PBRs. So, we stay very focused on that and then every year, I'll go off-site with them for strategic planning session and same thing with our shared services group. So, even though we've got leaders for all those functions I'm kind of come to you know maybe, I call it ask those disruptive questions to make sure they're thinking about all the angles. I'm not going to them, "Oh! You need to be buying more blue, that's not my job, but at the hair, your color is imbalanced." How can we are selling through more of this and less of that.
  
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst  
 
 Any other questions in the room? Okay, could you be -- maybe for the -- we have a lot of moving parts and you have a lot of inputs, I'm not asking to sign up for those, but I do think it's interesting you look at your history, you like to buy-back stock. I mean what -- has your thought process around kind of ones we kind of (inaudible) has your philosophy around share buybacks and dividends and could you throw off a lot of cash?
  
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO 
 
 What I would tell you is that we've never been a fan of dividends. I'm not sure that once you start, you're kind of committed. We've always bought back stock very opportunistically and I would never say never with stock is something happening stock went pretty down, I think long-term, we've got a great outlook. So, sure we would certainly consider being a buyer, but what we've also learned is that a strong balance sheet is really valuable. So, whether it was with maurices or Justice or Charming, those acquisitions would not have been possible without the balance sheet that we had. So, I like it because it gives you that strength, gives everybody confidence. It provides a war chest. It's indeed someday we want to do another buyback and it gives us that war chest for buying back stock if there is a blip. So, I know people like AutoZone had been hugely successful with their steady program of buying back stock and I think it's a great strategy and maybe someday we'll consider it, but I think what's worked well for us in the past is holding on to that cash and then when there is some disruption in the marketplace over our stock for whatever reason being able to jump in there and buyback all and before your time we actually did a Dutch tender and bought back something like 22% of our stock because we saw it as a great opportunity when we thought we were undervalued and sure enough it worked up pretty well for us.
  
 
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst
 
 Prior to this right now would be to pay down the debt is what I'm hearing is that I'm seeing not (inaudible).
  
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO 
 
 To pay down the debt and strengthen the balance sheet.
  
  
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
 
 
  
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst  
 
 Strengthening the balance sheet. Okay, sounds good. Any other questions out there? Can you talk a little bit more about -- I know it's small at this point but I do find it interesting when we dug into it. Lane Bryant and Catherines both have a really high e-commerce penetration more so than the overall company. Are there some learnings kind of from them into your business that you can maybe recap where you guys are from an e-commerce perspective and how you view that channel?
  
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO 
 
 (inaudible) credit they saw that as a priority really on and they were one of the early adopters and they've brought in a guy somebody may not from the industry build that, who is terrific he has since left, but he really established a very strong e-commerce search. Remember years ago, Charming had bought Miller a holding company and that's what kind of spurred it on and they were -- it was easy for them to morph into e-commerce. So they've been at it for a long time and one of the interesting things is when you look at that business, there are really two components to it, it's the e-commerce business that everybody knows, but there's also a piece that's about 20% of it that originate from the store. So we call PTE, POS to e-commerce.
 
So the PTE business is really someone coming in and saying "Oh! You don't have my size." And you say we can get it for you. So what we're trying to do this is kind of the beginnings of that buzzword omnichannel where you can offer her for the product that she wants when she wants it, whether it's online, whether it's in the store, whether it's via mobile and you can give for the added convenience of being able to ship it where she wants. We'd love to ship it to the store and in many cases with different brands will do it for free, because we want to get her in and we're generally able to convert her when she is in the store at the same rate that we convert a customer coming in off the street. So not only that she have the product that she just ordered but then she'll come in and maybe she'll get a blaze to go with it or whatever. So, what we're doing is setting up a group that's out of Charming, that we're calling digital services. That are the guys that have been supporting Lane Bryant and Catherines and we're asking them now to help the other brands in areas where they may be weak. So, it's kind of just the kernel of an in-house agency, e-commerce agency or digital agency and we'll see how bigger growth, but we think it's got great potential and we're already sharing -- for the last year, we've already been sharing a lot of ideas among the five brands.
 
  
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst  
 
 That's really encouraging. A lot of opportunities in the story we think and obviously you did too. We're nearly out of time. So we should probably wrap it up here. Thank you very much David and Dirk for being with us today.
 
 
 David Jaffe
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CEO  
 
 Thank you Neely, always a pleasure.
 
 
 Neely Tamminga
- Piper Jaffray - Senior Research Analyst 
 
 Thank you.
 
 
 Dirk Montgomery
- Ascena Retail Group, Inc. - CFO 
 
 Thanks everybody.
 
  
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
THOMSON REUTERS STREETEVENTS |
www.streetevents.com
|
Contact Us
  


</DOCUMENT>
